

[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Intro]
Yeah, yeah
Ayo, Black, it's time, word (Word, it's time, man)
It's time, man (Aight, man, begin)
Straight out the fuckin' dungeons of rap
Where fake niggas don't make it back
I don't know how to start this shit, yo... now

[Verse 1]
Rappers, I monkey flip 'em, with the funky rhythm I be kickin'
Musician, inflictin' composition of pain
I'm like Scarface sniffin' cocaine
Holdin' an M16, see with the pen I'm extreme
Now, bullet holes left in my peepholes
I'm suited up in street clothes
Hand me a 9 and I'll defeat foes
Y'all know my steelo with or without the airplay
I keep some E&J, sittin' bent up in the stairway
Or either on the corner bettin' Grants with the cee-lo champs
Laughin' at baseheads tryna sell some broken amps
G-packs get off quick, forever niggas talk shit
Reminiscin' about the last time the task force flipped
Niggas be runnin' through the block shootin'
Time to start the revolution, catch a body, head for Houston
Once they caught us off-guard, the MAC-10 was in the grass and
I ran like a cheetah, with thoughts of an assassin
Picked the MAC up, told brothers, "Back up!" — the MAC spit
Lead was hittin' niggas, one ran, I made him backflip
Heard a few chicks scream, my arm shook, couldn't look
Gave another squeeze, heard it click, "Yo, my shit is stuck!"
Try to cock it, it wouldn't shoot, now I'm in danger
Finally pulled it back and saw
Three bullets caught up in the chamber
So now I'm jettin' to the building lobby
And it was full of children prob'ly, couldn't see as high as I be
(So what you sayin'?) It's like the game ain't the same
Got younger niggas pullin' the triggers, bringin' fame to their name
And claim some corners, crews without guns are goners
In broad daylight, stick-up kids, they run up on us
45's and gauges, MAC's in fact
Same niggas will catch you back-to-back
Snatchin' your cracks in black
There was a snitch on the block gettin' niggas knocked
So hold your stash 'til the coke price drop
I know this crackhead who said she got to smoke nice rock
And if it's good, she'll bring you customers in measuring pots
But yo, you gotta slide on a vacation
Inside information keeps large niggas erasin' and their wives basin'
It drops deep as it does in my breath
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
Beyond the walls of intelligence, life is defined
I think of crime when I'm in a New York state of mind

[Hook]
"New York state of mind"

[Verse 2]
Be havin' dreams that I'm a gangsta
Drinkin' Moëts, holdin' TEC's
Makin' sure the cash came correct, then I stepped
Investments in stocks, sewin' up the blocks to sell rocks
Winnin' gunfights with mega-cops
But just a nigga walkin' with his finger on the trigger
Make enough figures until my pockets get bigger
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'
Give me a Smith & Wesson, I have niggas undressin'
Thinkin' of cash flow, buddha and shelter
Whenever frustrated, I'm a hijack Delta
In the PJ's, my blend tape plays, bullets are strays
Young bitches is grazed, each block is like a maze
Full of black rats trapped plus the Island is packed
From what I hear in all the stories when my peoples come back
Black, I'm livin' where the nights is jet-black
The fiends fight to get crack
I just max, I dream I can sit back
And lamp like Capone, with drug scripts sewn
Or the legal luxury life, rings flooded with stones, holmes
I got so many rhymes, I don't think I'm too sane
Life is parallel to Hell, but I must maintain
And be prosperous, though we live dangerous
Cops could just arrest me, blamin' us: we're held like hostages
It's only right that I was born to use mics
And the stuff that I write is even tougher than dykes
I've taken rappers to a new plateau
Through rap slow, my rhymin' is a vitamin held without a capsule
The smooth criminal on beat breaks
Never put me in your box if your shit eats tapes
The city never sleeps, full of villains and creeps
That's where I learned to do my hustle, had to scuffle with freaks
I'm an addict for sneakers
20's of buddha and bitches with beepers
In the streets I can greet ya, about blunts I teach ya
Inhale deep like the words of my breath
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
I lay puzzle as I backtrack to earlier times
Nothing's equivalent to the New York state of mind

[Hook]
"New York state of mind"

[Outro]
"Nasty Nas"

Delete me! Me too!



[Produced by Ron Browz]

[Intro]
Fuck Jay Z!
(What's up, niggas?
Ayo, I know you ain't talkin' about me, dog
You? What?!)
Fuck Jay Z!
(You been on my dick, nigga
You love my style, nigga)
Fuck Jay Z!

[Hook]
(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you – the king – you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I prove you lost already

[Verse 1]
Brace yourself for the main event, y'all impatiently waitin'
It's like an AIDS test, what's the results? Not positive
Who's the best: Pac, Nas and B.I.G.? Ain't no best
East, West, North, South, flossed out, greedy
I embrace y'all with napalm
Blows up, no guts left, chest/face gone
How could Nas be garbage? Semi-autos at your cartilage
Burner at the side of your dome, come out of my throne!
I got this locked since 9-1, I am the truest
Name a rapper that I ain't influenced
Gave y'all chapters, but now I keep my eyes on the Judas
With Hawaiian Sophie fame, kept my name in his music

[Hook]
(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you – the king – you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I prove you lost already

[Interlude 1]
Ayo, pass me the weed!
Put my ashes out on these niggas, man
Ayo, you faggots, y'all kneel
And kiss the mothafuckin' ring!

[Hook]
(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you – the king – you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I prove you lost already

[Verse 2]
I've been fucked over, left for dead, dissed and forgotten
Luck ran out, they hoped that I'd be gone, stiff and rotten
Y'all just piss on me, shit on me, spit on my grave
Talk about me, laugh behind my back, but in my face
Y'all some well-wishers, friendly-acting, envy-hiding snakes
With your hands out for my money, man, how much can I take?
When these streets keep callin', heard it when I was sleep
That this Gay-Z and Cock-a-Fella Records wanted beef
Started cockin' up my weapon, slowly loadin' up this ammo
To explode it on a camel and his soldiers
I can handle this for dolo, and his manuscript just sound stupid
When KRS already made an album called Blueprint (dick!)
First Biggie's your man, then you got the nerve to say
That you better than B.I.G.
Dick-suckin' lips, why don't you let the late great veteran live?

[Interlude 2]
I… will… not… lose
God's son across the belly
I prove you lost already
The king is back, where my crown at?
Ill Will, rest in peace!
Let's do it, niggas!

[Hook]
(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you – the king – you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I prove you lost already

[Verse 3]
Y'all niggas deal with emotions like bitches
What's sad is I love you, ‘cause you're my brother
You traded your soul for riches
My child, I've watched you grow up to be famous
And now I smile like a proud dad watchin' his only son that made it
You seem to be only concerned with dissin' women
Were you abused as a child?
Scared to smile? They called you ugly?
Well, life is harsh, hug me, don't reject me
Or make records to disrespect me, blatant or indirectly
In '88 you was gettin' chased through your building
Callin' my crib and I ain't even give you my numbers
All I did was give you a style for you to run with
Smilin' in my face, glad to break bread with the God
Wearin' Jaz' chains, no TEC's, no cash, no cars
No jail bars, Jigga, no pies, no case
Just Hawaiian shirts, hangin' with little Chase
You a fan, a phony, a fake, a pussy, a Stan
I still whip yo' ass, you 36 in a karate class?
You Tae-Bo ho, tryna work it out, you tryna get brolic?
Ask me if I'm tryna kick knowledge?
Nah, I'm tryna kick the shit you need to learn though
That ether, that shit that make your soul burn slow
Is he Dame Diddy, Dame Daddy or Dame Dummy?
Oh, I get it, you Biggie and he's Puffy
Rocafella died of AIDS, that was the end of his chapter
And that's the guy y'all chose to name your company after?
Put it together: I rock hoes, y'all rock fellas
And now y'all try to take my spot, fellas
Feel these hot rocks, fellas, put you in a dry spot, fellas
In a pine box with nine shots from my Glock, fellas
Foxy got you hot ‘cause you kept your face in her puss
What you think, you gettin' girls now ‘cause of your looks?
Ne-gro, please! You no-mustache-havin'
With whiskers like a rat, compared to Beans you whack
And your man stabbed Un and made you take the blame
You ass, went from Jaz to hangin' with Kane
To Irv, to B.I.G. – and Eminem murdered you on your own shit
You a dick-ridin' faggot, you love the attention
Queens niggas run you niggas, ask Russell Simmons! Ha!

[Outro]
R-O-C get gunned up and clapped quick
J.J. Evans get gunned up and clapped quick
Your whole damn record label, gunned up and clapped quick
Shawn Carter to Jay Z – damn, you on Jaz dick!
So little shorty's gettin' gunned up and clapped quick
How much of Biggie's rhymes is gonna come out your fat lips?
Wanted to be on every last one of my classics
You pop shit, apologize, nigga, just ask Kiss!



[Produced by L.E.S. & Nas]

[Intro: AZ + Nas)]
Ayo, what's up, what's up?
Let's keep it real, son, count this money
You know what I'm sayin'? Yeah yeah
Ayo, put the Grants over there in the safe
You know what I'm sayin'?
‘Cause we spendin' these Jacksons
The Washingtons go to wifey, you know how that go
I'm sayin' that's what this is all about right
Clothes, bankrolls, and hoes
You know what I'm sayin'?
Yo, then what man, what?!

[Verse 1: AZ]
Visualizin' the realism of life in actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
‘Cause yeah, we were beginners in the hood as Five Percenters
But somethin' must've got in us, ‘cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some restin' in peace and some are sittin' in San Quentin
Others, such as myself, are tryin' to carry on tradition
Keepin' this Schweppervescent street ghetto essence inside us
'Cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though we know, somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leavin' thievin'
We'll be leavin' with some kind of dough
So, until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers will be somewhere stackin' plenty papers
Keepin' it real, packin' steel, gettin' high
‘Cause life's a bitch and then you die

[Hook: AZ] (x2)
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go

[Verse 2: Nas]
I woke up early on my born day; I'm 20, it's a blessin'
The essence of adolescence leaves my body, now I'm fresh and
My physical frame is celebrated ‘cause I made it
One quarter through life, some godly-like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual, plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I pus from
My skull, ‘cause it's pain in my brain vein, money maintain
Don't go against the grain, simple and plain
When I was young at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbin' foreigners, take they wallets, they jewels and rip they green cards
Dipped to the projects, flashin' my quick cash
And got my first piece of ass, smokin' blunts with hash
Now it's all about cash in abundance
Niggas I used to run with is rich or doin' years in the hundreds
I switched my motto; instead of sayin', "Fuck tomorrow!"
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Time is illmatic, keep static like wool fabric
Pack a 4-matic to crack your whole cabbage

[Hook: AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die

[Trumpet Outro: Olu Dara]

Delete me! Me too!



[Produced by Pete Rock]

[Hook: Pete Rock + Nas]
{It's yours} Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine—whose world is this?
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine—whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine—whose world is this?

[Verse 1: Nas]
I sip the Dom P, watchin' Gandhi 'til I'm charged, then
Writin' in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin
Behold the mic I'm throbbin', mechanical movement
Understandable smooth shit that murderers move with
The thief's theme; play me at night, they won't act right
The fiend of hip-hop has got me stuck like a crack pipe
The mind activation, react like I'm facin'
Time like Pappy Mason, with pens I'm embracin'
Wipe the sweat off my dome, spit the phlegm on the streets
Suede Timbs on my feet makes my cipher complete
Whether cruisin' in a Six cab or Montero Jeep
I can't call it; the beats make me fallin' asleep
I keep fallin', but never fallin' six feet deep
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Say what?)
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Say what?)
I'm out for dead presidents to represent me

[Hook: Pete Rock + Nas]
{It's yours} Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?

[Bridge: Nas]
To my man Ill Will
God bless your life
To my peoples throughout Queens
God bless your life

[Verse 2: Nas]
I trip, we box up crazy bitches
Aimin' guns in all my baby pictures
Beef with housing police, release scriptures that's maybe Hitler's
Yet I'm the mild, money-gettin' style, rollin' foul
The versatile, honey-stickin', wild, golden child
Dwellin' in the Rotten Apple, you get tackled
Or caught by the devil's lasso, shit is a hassle
There's no days for broke days
We sell it, smoke pays, while all the old folks pray
To Jesús, soakin' their sins in trays of holy water
Odds against Nas are slaughter
Thinkin' a word best describin' my life to name my daughter
My strength, my son, the star will be my resurrection
Born in correction, all the wrong shit I did
He'll lead a right direction
How you livin'? Large, a broker charge, cards are mediocre
You flippin' coke or playin' spit, spades, and strip poker?

[Hook: Pete Rock + Nas]
{It's yours} Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?

[Verse 3: Nas]
I'm the young city bandit, hold myself down single-handed
For murder raps, I kick my thoughts alone, get remanded
Born alone, die alone; no crew to keep my crown or throne
I'm deep by sound alone, caved inside, 1,000 miles from home
I need a new nigga for this black cloud to follow
‘Cause while it's over me it's too dark to see tomorrow
Tryin' to maintain, I flip, fill the clip to the tip
Picturin' my peeps not eatin' can make my heartbeat skip
And I'm amped up, they locked the champ up
Even my brain's in handcuffs
Headed for Indiana, stabbin' women like the Phantom
The crew is lampin', Big Willie style
Check the chip-toothed smile, plus I profile wild
Stash loot in fly clothes, burnin' dollars to light my stoge
Walk the blocks with a bop, checkin' dames
Plus the games people play bust the problems of the world today

[Hook: Pete Rock + Nas]
{It's yours} Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine — whose world is this?

[Outro: Nas]
Yeah, a'ight?
To everybody in Queens, the foundation (It's yours!)
The world is yours
To everybody uptown, yo, the world is yours (It's yours!)
The world is yours
To everybody in Brooklyn
Y'all know the world is yours (It's yours!)
The world is yours
Everybody in Mount Vernon, the world is yours (It's yours!)
Long Island, the world is yours (It's yours!)
Staten Island, yeah, the world is yours (It's yours!)
South Bronx, the world is yours (It's yours!)
Aight



[Intro: Nas]
Here we are
Here we are
Yeah
This one right here is for the people

[Hook] x2
Sabali, sabali, sabali yonkote
Sabali, sabali, sabali kiye
Ni kêra môgô

[Interlude: Nas]
Hey yo D
Let's go all the way in on this one

[Verse 1: Damian Marley]
Some of the smartest dummies
Can't read the language of Egyptian mummies
An' a fly go a moon
And can't find food for the starving tummies
Pay no mind to the youths
Cause it's not like the future depends on it
But save the animals in the zoo
Cause the chimpanzee dem a make big money
This is how the media pillages
On the TV the picture is
Savages in villages
And the scientist still can't explain the pyramids, huh
Evangelists making a living on the videos of ribs of the little kids
Stereotyping the image of the images
And this is what the image is
You buy a khaki pants
And all of a sudden you say a Indiana Jones
An' a thief out gold and thief out the scrolls and even the buried bones
Some of the worst paparazzis I've ever seen and I ever known
Put the worst on display so the world can see
And that's all they will ever show
So the ones in the West
Will never move East
And feel like they could be at home
Dem get tricked by the beast
But a where dem ago flee when the monster is fully grown?
Solomonic linage whe dem still can't defeat and them coulda never clone
My spiritual DNA that print in my soul and I will forever Own Lord

[Hook] x2

[Interlude: Nas]
Yeah, Sabali. Thats patience. That's what the old folks told me
Discovering the World before this World. A World buried in time
Uncover with rhymes. It gets no realer

[Verse 2: Damian Marley]
Huh, we born not knowing, are we born knowing all?
We growing wiser, are we just growing tall?
Can you read thoughts? can you read palms?
Huh, can you predict the future? can you see storms, coming?
The Earth was flat if you went too far you would fall off
Now the Earth is round
If the shape change again everybody woulda start laugh
The average man can't prove of most of the things
That he chooses to speak of
And still won't research and find out
The root of the truth that you seek of
Scholars teach in Universities and claim that they're smart and cunning
Tell them find a cure when we sneeze
And that's when their nose start running
And the rich get stitched up, when we get cut
Man a heal dem broken bones in the bush with the wet mud
Can you read signs? can you read stars?
Can you make peace? can you fight war?
Can you milk cows, even though you drive cars? huh
Can you survive? Against all odds, now?

[Hook] x2

[Interlude: Nas]
It's crazy when you feed people the truth you don't know how they're gonna react
You're scared of wrong doers, people that just ignorant
You're scared of the truth, be patient for now

[Verse 3: Nas]
Who wrote the Bible? Who wrote the Qur'an?
And was it a lightning storm
That gave birth to the Earth
And then dinosaurs were born? damn
Who made up words? Who made up numbers?
And what kind of spell is mankind under?
Everything on the planet we preserve and can it
Microwaved it and try it
No matter what we'll survive it
What's hue? What's man? What's human?
Anything along the land we consuming
Eatin', deletin', ruin
Trying to get paper
Gotta have land, gotta have acres
So I can sit back like Jack Nicholson
Watch niggas play the game like the Lakers
In a world full of 52 fakers
Gypsies, seances, mystical prayers
You superstitious? throw salt over your shoulders
Make a wish for the day cuz
Like somebody got a doll of me
Stickin' needles in my arteries
But I can't feel it
Sometimes it's like 'part of me, but I got a real big spirit'
I'm fearless.... I'm fearless
Don't you try and grab hold of my soul
It's like a military soldier since seven years old
I held real dead bodies in my arms
Felt their body turn cold, oh
Why we born in the first place
If this is how we gotta go?
Damn

[Outro: Nas]
This goes to all the wisdom and knowledge seekers of the World
Sabali, Patience, yeah



[Produced by Trackmasters]

[Verse 1]
Fake thug, no love, you get the slug CB4 Gusto
Your luck low, I didn't know 'til I was drunk though
You freak niggas played out, get fucked and ate out
Prostitute turned bitch, I got the gauge out
Ninety-six ways I made out, Montana way
The Good-F-E-L-L-A, verbal AK spray
Dipped attache, jump out the Range, empty out the ashtray
A glass of 'ze, makin' mad Cassius Clay
Red dot plots, murder schemes, thirty-two shotguns
Regulate with my Dunns
Seventeen rocks gleam from one ring
They let me let y'all niggas know one thing
There's one life, one love, so there can only be one King
The highlights of livin', Vegas-style roll dice in linen
Antera spinnin' on Millenniums
Twenty G bets, I'm winnin' 'em; threats I'm sendin' 'em
Lex with TV sets the minimum
Ill sex adrenaline, party with villains
A case of Demi-Sec to chase the Henny
Wet any clique, with the semi TEC—who want it?
Diamonds, I flaunt it, chickenheads flock, I lace 'em
Fried broiled with basil, taste 'em
Crack the legs way out of formation
It's horizontal how I have 'em fuckin' me in the Benz wagon
Can it be Vanity from Last Dragon?
Grab your gun, it's on though
Shit is grimy, real niggas buck in broad daylight
With the broke MAC that won't spray right
Don't give a fuck who they hit as long as the drama's lit
Yo, overnight thugs bug ‘cause they ain't promised shit
Hungry-ass hooligans stay on that piranha shit

[Refrain]
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'
I never sleep, ‘cause sleep is the cousin of death
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'

[Verse 2]
I peeped you frontin', I was in the Jeep sunk in the seat
Tinted with heat, beats bumpin'
Across the street you was wildin'
Talkin' about how you ran the Island in '89
Layin' up, playin' the yard with crazy shine
I cocked the baby 9, that nigga gravy mine
Clanked him; what was he thinkin'
On my corner when it's pay-me time?
Dug 'em, you owe me, cousin
Somethin' told me "Plug him!"
So dumb, felt my leg burn, then it got numb
Spun around and shot one
Heard shots and dropped, son, caught a hot one
Somebody take this biscuit 'fore the cops come
Then they came askin' me my name
What the fuck? I got stitched up and went through
Left the hospital that same night, what
Got my gat back, time to backtrack
I had the drop, so how the fuck I get clapped?
Black was in the Jeep, watchin' all these scenes speed by
It was a brown Datsun
And yo, nobody in my hood got one
That clown nigga's through, blazin' at his crew daily
The Bridge touched me up severely, hear me?
So when I rhyme it's sincerely yours
Be lightin' L's, sippin' Coors on all floors in project halls
Contemplatin' war niggas I was cool with before
We used to score together, Uptown coppin' the raw
But a thug changes and love changes
And best friends become strangers, word up

[Hook]
Y'all know my steelo
There ain't an army that could strike back
There ain't an army that could strike back
There ain't an army that could strike back
There ain't an army that could strike back

[Outro: Nas + (AZ)]
Thug niggas, yo, to them thug niggas
Gettin' it on in the world, you know?
To them niggas that's locked down
Doin' they thing, survivin', yaknowmsayin'?
To my thorough niggas, New York and worldwide
Yo, to the Queensbridge Militia
9-6 shit, The Firm clique
Illmatic, nigga, It Was Written though
It's been a long time comin'
Y'all fake niggas, tryin' to copy
Better come with the real though, fake-ass niggas, yo
(They throw us slugs, we throwin' them back, what)
Bring the shit, man! Live, man!
(Fuck that son, word up) 9-6 shit



[Produced by Large Professor]

[Verse 1]
It ain't hard to tell, I excel, then prevail
The mic is contacted, I attract clientele
My mic check is life or death, breathin' a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like The Shining, sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket linin'
Hit the Earth like a comet—invasion!
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian: half-man, half-amazin'
‘Cause in my physical I can express through song
Delete stress like Motrin, then extend strong
I drink Moët with Medusa, give her shotguns in Hell
From the spliff that I lift and inhale; it ain't hard to tell

[Verse 2]
The buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop
Place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jew-el, inhale from the L
School a fool well, you feel it like Braille
It ain't hard to tell, I kick a skill, like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills, I'm Ill plus Matic
I freak beats, slam it, like Iron Sheik
Jam like a TEC with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magmatize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave 'em froze, like heroin in your nose
Nas will rock well; it ain't hard to tell

[Verse 3]
This rhythmatic explosion
Is what your frame of mind has chosen
I'll leave your brain stimulated, niggas is frozen
Speak with criminal slang, begin like a violin
End like Leviathan, it's deep; well, let me try again
Wisdom be leakin' out my grapefruit, troop
I dominate break loops, givin' mics men-e-strual cycles
Street's disciple, I rock beats that's mega trifle
And groove even smoother than moves by Villanova
You're still a soldier, I'm like Sly Stone in Cobra
Packin' like a Rasta in the weed spot
Vocals will squeeze Glocks
MCs eavesdrop, though they need not to sneak
My poetry's deep, I never fell
Nas' raps should be locked in a cell; it ain't hard to tell



[Produced by Q-Tip]

[Verse 1]
What up, kid? I know shit is rough doin' your bid
When the cops came you shoulda slid to my crib
Fuck it, black, no time for lookin' back, it's done
Plus, congratulations, you know you got a son
I heard he looks like ya, why don't your lady write ya?
Told her she should visit, that's when she got hyper
Flippin', talkin' about he acts too rough
He didn't listen, he be riffin' while I'm tellin' him stuff
I was like, "Yeah," shorty don't care, she a snake too
Fuckin' with them niggas from that fake crew that hate you
But yo, guess who got shot in the dome-piece?
Jerome's niece, on her way home from Jones Beach
It's bugged, plus little Rob is sellin' drugs on the dime
Hangin' out with young thugs that all carry 9's
And night time is more trife than ever
What up with Cormega? Did you see him? Are y'all together?
If so, then hold the fort down, represent to the fullest
Say what's up to Herb, Ice and Bullet
I left a half a hundred in your commissary
You was my nigga when push came to shove
(One what?) One love!

[Hook: Q-Tip]
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love

[Verse 2]
Dear Born, you'll be out soon, stay strong
Out in New York the same shit is goin' on
The crackheads stalkin', loudmouths is talkin'
Hold, check out the story yesterday when I was walkin'
That nigga you shot last year tried to appear
Like he hurtin' somethin'
Word to mother, I heard him frontin'
And he be pumpin' on your block
Your man gave him your Glock
And now they run together — what up, son? Whatever
Since I'm on the streets I'ma put it to a cease
But I heard you blew a nigga with a ox for the phone piece
Wildin' on the Island, but now in Elmira
Better chill, ‘cause them niggas will put that ass on fire
Last time you wrote you said they tried you in the showers
But maintain, when you come home the corner's ours
On the reals, all these crab niggas know the deal
When we start the revolution all they probably do is squeal
But chill, see you on the next V-I
I gave your mom dukes loot for kicks, plus sent you flicks
Your brother's buckwildin' in 4-Main, he wrote me
He might beat his case, 'til he come home he'll play it lowkey
So stay civilized, time flies
Though incarcerated your mind dies
I hate it when your moms cries
It kinda makes me want to murder, for reala
I even got a mask and gloves to bust slugs, but one love

[Hook: Q-Tip]
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love

[Verse 3]
Sometimes I sit back with a Buddha sack
Mind's in another world, thinkin'
"How can we exist through the facts?"
Written in school text books, bibles, et cetera
Fuck a school lecture, the lies get me vexed-er
So I be ghost from my projects
I take my pen and pad for the weekend
Hittin' L's while I'm sleepin'
A two-day stay, you may say I need the time alone
To relax my dome, no phone, left the 9 at home
You see the streets had me stressed somethin' terrible
Fuckin' with the corners have a nigga up in Bellevue
Or HDM, hit with numbers from 8 to 10
A future in a maximum state pen is grim
So I comes back home, nobody's out but Shorty Doo-Wop
Rollin' two phillies together: in the Bridge we call 'em oo-wops
He said: "Nas, niggas caught me bustin' off the roof
So I wear a bulletproof and pack a black tre-deuce."
He inhaled so deep, shut his eyes like he was sleep
Started coughin', one eye peeked to watch me speak
I sat back like The Mack, my army suit was black
We was chillin' on these benches
Where he pumped his loose cracks
I took the L when he passed it, this little bastard
Keeps me blasted and starts talkin' mad shit
I had to school him, told him don't let niggas fool him
‘Cause when the pistol blows
The one that's murdered be the cool one
Tough luck when niggas are struck, families fucked up
Coulda caught your man, but didn't look when you bucked up
Mistakes happen, so take heed, never bust up
At the crowd, catch him solo, make the right man bleed
Shorty's laugh was cold-blooded as he spoke so foul
Only twelve, tryin' to tell me that he liked my style
Then I rose, wipin' the blunt's ash from my clothes
Then froze, only to blow the herb smoke through my nose
And told my little man I'ma ghost, I broze
Left some jewels in his skull that he can sell if he chose
Words of wisdom from Nas: try to rise up above
Keep an eye out for Jake, Shorty Wop, one love

[Hook: Q-Tip]
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love
One love, one love, one love, one love

[Outro]
To all my niggas locked up
From Queensbridge and all over
To my man [Goon?], one love
To my man [Her?], one love
To my man [Lake Gucciano?], one love
Can't forget my motherfuckin' heart, Big [Bo?], one love
To [Oogie?], yeah, one love



[Produced by No I.D.]

[Intro]
Check it out
I call it, yeah, yeah

[Hook]
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters

[Verse 1]
I saw my daughter send a letter to some boy her age
Who locked up, first I regretted it, then caught my rage
Like, how could I not protect her from this awful phase?
Never tried to hide who I was, she was taught and raised
Like a princess, but while I'm on stage I can't leave her defenseless
Plus she's seen me switchin' women, Pops was on some pimp shit
She heard stories of her daddy thuggin'
So if her husband is a gangster, can't be mad, I'll love him
Never, for her I want better, homie in jail – dead that
Wait 'til he come home, you can see where his head's at
Niggas got game, they be tryna live
He seen your Mama crib, plus I'm sure he know who your father is
Although you real, plus a honest kid
Don't think I'm slow, I know you probably had that chronic lit
You seventeen, I got a problem with it
She looked at me like I'm not the cleanest father figure
But she rockin' with it

[Hook]
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
Not sayin' that our sons are less important
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
Not sayin' that our sons are less important

[Verse 2]
This morning I got a call, nearly split my wig
This social network said: "Nas, go and get your kid!"
She's on Twitter, I know she ain't gon' post no pic
Of herself underdressed – no inappropriate shit, right?
Her mother cried when she answered
Said she don't know what got inside this child's mind, she planted
A box of condoms on her dresser, then she Instagram'd it
At this point I realized I ain't the strictest parent
I'm too loose, I'm too cool with her
Should've drove more time to school with her
I thought I dropped enough jewels on her
Took her from private school, so she can get a balance
To public school, they're too nurture teen talents
They grow fast, one day she's your little princess
Next day she's talkin' boy business – what is this?
They say the coolest playas and foulest heart breakers in the world
God gets us back, he makes us have precious little girls

[Hook]
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
Not sayin' that our sons are less important
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
For my brothers with daughters, I call this
Not sayin' that our sons are less important

[Verse 3]
And I ain't tryin' to mess your thing up
But I just wanna see you dream up
I finally understand
It ain't easy to raise a girl as a single man
Nah, the way mothers feel for they sons
How fathers feel for they daughters
When he date, he straight, chip off his own papa
When she date, we wait behind the door with a sawed-off
‘Cause we think no one is good enough for our daughters
Love



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Hook: Amy Winehouse]
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
I heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
Heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
And I’m alone, and I realize that when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry
Yes, I’m alone, and I realize when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry

[Verse 1]
I want someone who like the champagne I like, my a-alike
Someone to talk me off the bridge any day or night
She teach me how to live, she ain’t afraid of life
Not easily impressed with the rich and famous life
'Cause she done been there and heard all the rumors before
She loves art, she ride out with me on my music tour
She like the herb's natural medicine, she cookin' good
She tell me everything is cool when it ain't lookin' good
For real, the world so ill, yo I want a girl so real
Who not after material wealth but get dough still
Or maybe an educator, a lady with etiquette
Who can be from out the hood or even work for the president
As long as there’s no selfishness
Yes, as long as her love for the people is deep-rooted and evident
You can be easily recruited, you’re heaven-sent
Your smile put me at ease
You’re the woman I need, but where is she?

[Hook: Amy Winehouse]
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
I heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
Heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
And I’m alone, and I realize that when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry
Yes, I’m alone, and I realize when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry

[Verse 2]
I hate when people write me hostile texts
On account of my lifestyle’s perception
Invade my personal life out of the question
What are they expectin'? I be tryin' to reply and
They never suppose I get my quiet time in?
They think forever I’m rollin' in dough, swimmin' in a pool of cash
God, wouldn’t they know or am I a fool or ass?
I’m well known, got people comin' at me mad
I had to tell homes, I don’t keep a cell phone, my bad
I drag off the L and try to silence it
The noise in my head, the curse of the talented
Strong communicator, vagabond
I’d gallivant around the equator, if that would get me off the radar
It’s so intense, I’m on my Lilo & Stitch
Pour my Pinot Grigio and Cris with some lime, what is this?
An immaculate version of "Me & My Bitch" by Biggie
With all respect 'cause you the only one that gets me

[Hook: Amy Winehouse]
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
I heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
Heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
And I’m alone, and I realize that when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry
Yes, I’m alone, and I realize when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry

[Bridge]
Yeah, yeah, let’s pour some cherry wine
Everything’s good, everything’s fine
Yeah, yeah, we bring it every time
Yeah, pour a little cherry wine
Yeah, hey yo, Salaam
Yeah, I think they know the time
Everything’s good, everything’s fine
Yeah, pour a little cherry wine, yeah

Life is good, life is good, yeah
Life is good, no matter what, life is good
Life is good, life is good, yeah
No matter what, life is good

[Hook: Amy Winehouse]
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
I heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
Where is he, the man who was just like me?
Heard he was hidin' somewhere I can’t see
And I’m alone, and I realize that when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry
Yes, I’m alone, and I realize when I get home
I wanna talk to my red and my cherry



[Produced by Rashad Smith & Trackmasters]

[Intro: Nas]
Life, I wonder
Will it take me under?
I don't know

[Verse 1: Nas]
Imagine smoking weed in the streets without cops harassin'
Imagine going to court with no trial
Lifestyle cruising blue Bahama waters, no welfare supporters
More conscious of the way we raise our daughters
Days are shorter, nights are colder
Feeling like life is over, these snakes strike like a cobra
The world's hot my son got knocked, evidently
It's elementary, they want us all gone eventually
Trooping out of state for a plate of knowledge
If coke was cooked without the garbage
We'd all have the top dollars
Imagine everybody flashin', fashion, designer clothes
Lacing your clique up with diamond Roles
Your people holding dough, no parole, no rubbers
Go in raw, imagine law with no undercovers
Just some thoughts for the mind
I take a glimpse into time
Watch the blimp read "The World Is Mine"

[Hook: Lauryn Hill + (Nas)]
If I ruled the world (imagine that)
I'd free all my sons, I love 'em love 'em, baby
Black diamonds and pearls
(Could it be, if you could be mine, we'd both shine?)
If I ruled the world
(Still living for today, in these last days and times)

[Verse 2: Nas]
The way to be, paradise like relaxin'
Black, Latino and Anglo-Saxon
Armani Exchange deranged
Cash, Lost Tribe of Shabazz, free at last
Brand new whips to crash, then we laugh in the iller path
The Villa house is for the crew, how we do
Trees for breakfast, dime sexes and Benz stretches
So many years of depression make me vision
The better livin', type of place to raise kids in
Open they eyes to the lies history's told foul
But I'm as wise as the old owl, plus the Gold Child
Seeing things like I was controllin', click rollin'
Tricking six digits on kicks and still holdin'
Trips to Paris, I civilized every savage
Give me one shot, I turn trife life to lavish
Political prisoner set free, stress free
No work release, purple M3's and jet skis
Feel the wind breeze in West Indies
I make Coretta Scott-King mayor the cities
And reverse fiends to Willies
It sounds foul, but every girl I meet'd go downtown
I'd open every cell in Attica, send 'em to Africa

[Hook: Lauryn Hill + (Nas)]
If I ruled the world (imagine that)
I'd free all my sons, I love 'em love 'em, baby
Black diamonds and pearls
(Could it be, if you could be mine, we'd both shine?)
If I ruled the world
(Still living for today, in these last days and times)

[Bridge]
And then we'll walk right up to the sun
Hand in hand
We'll walk right up to the sun
We won't land

[Verse 3: Nas]
You'd love to hear the story how the thugs live in worry
Duck down in car seats, heat's mandatory
Running from Jake, getting chased, hunger for papes
These are the breaks, many mistakes go down out of state
Wait, I had to let it marinate, we carry weight
Trying to get laced, flip the ace, stack the safe
Millionaire plan to keep the gat with the cocked hammer
Making moves in Atlanta, back-and-forth scrambler
‘Cause you could have all the chips, be poor or rich
Still nobody want a nigga having shit
If I ruled the world and everything in it, sky's the limit
I push a Q-45 Infinit(i)
It wouldn't be no such thing as jealousies or B Felonies
Strictly living longevity to the destiny
I thought I'd never see, but reality struck
Better find out before your time's out, what the fuck?

[Hook: Lauryn Hill + (Nas)]
If I ruled the world (imagine that)
I'd free all my sons, I love 'em love 'em, baby
Black diamonds and pearls
(Could it be, if you could be mine, we'd both shine?)
If I ruled the world
(Still living for today, in these last days and times)



[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Hook]
Represent, represent
Represent, represent
Represent, represent
Represent, represent

[Verse 1]
Straight up, shit is real
And any day could be your last in the jungle
Get murdered on a humble, guns'll blast, niggas tumble
The corners is the hot spot, full of mad criminals
Who don't care, guzzling beers, we all stare
At the out-of-towners, they better break North
Before we get the four pounders and take their face off
The streets is filled with undercovers
Homicide chasing brothers
The D's on the roof tryin' to watch us and knock us
And killer coppers even come through in helicopters
I drink a little vodka, spark a L and hold a Glock
For the fronters, wannabe ill niggas and spot runners
Thinking it can't happen 'til I trap 'em and clap 'em
And leave 'em done, won't even run about gods
I don't believe in none of that shit, your facts are backwards
Nas is a rebel of the street corner
Pulling a TEC out the dresser; police got me under pressure

[Hook]
Represent, represent
Represent, represent
Represent, represent
Represent, represent

[Verse 2]
Yo, they call me Nas, I'm not your legal type of fella
Moet drinking, marijuana smoking street dweller
Who's always on the corner, rolling up blessed
When I dress, it's never nothing less than Guess
Cold be walking with a bop and my hat turned back
Love committing sins and my friends sell crack
This nigga raps with a razor, keep it under my tongue
The school drop-out, never liked the shit from day one
‘Cause life ain't shit but stress, fake niggas, and crab stunts
So I guzzle my Hennessy while pulling on mad blunts
The brutalizer, Brutus-izer, accelerator
The type of nigga who be pissing in your elevator
Somehow the rap game reminds me of the crack game
Used to sport Bally's and Cazals with black frames
Now I'm into fat chains, sex and TEC's
Fly new chicks and new kicks, Heine's and Beck's

[Hook]
Represent, represent
Represent, represent
Represent, represent

[Verse 3]
No doubt, see my stacks are fat, this is what it's about
Before the BDP conflict with MC Shan
Around the time when Shante dissed the Real Roxxane
I used to wake up every morning, see my crew on the block
Every day's a different plan that had us running from cops
If it wasn't hanging out in front of cocaine spots
We was at the candy factory, breaking the locks
Nowadays, I need the green in a flash just like the next man
Fuck a yard, God, let me see a hundred grand
Could use a gun, son, but fuck being the wanted man
But if I hit rock bottom then I'ma be the Son of Sam
Then call the crew to get live too, with Swoop
Bokeem, my brother Jungle, Big Bo cooks up the blow
Mike'll chop it; Mayo, you count the profit
My shit is on the streets, this way the Jakes'll never stop it
It's your brain on drugs, to all fly bitches and thugs
'Nuff respect to the projects, I'm ghost, one love

[Hook]
Represent y'all, represent
Represent y'all, represent
Represent y'all, represent
Represent y'all, represent

[Outro: Nas]
One time for your mothafuckin' mind
This goes out to everybody in New York
That's living the real fucking life and every projects, all over
To my man Big Will, he's still here
The 40 side of Vernon, my man Big L.E.S
Big Cee-Lo from the Don, Shawn Penn, the 40 busters
My crew the shorty busters, the 41st side of Vernon posse
The Goodfellas, my man Cormega, Lakey the Kid
Can't forget Draws, the Hillbillies
My man Slate, Wallethead, Black Jay, Big Oogi
Crazy barrio spot, (Big Dove), we rock shit a lot, Ph.D
And my man Primo, from Gang Starr
'94 real shit y'all (word up Harry O)
Fuck y'all crab-ass niggas though!

[Nas' posse]
Bitch ass niggas! Bitch ass niggas!
Young bitch ass motherfuckers!
Come to Queensbridge, motherfucker!
Yeah, yeah, let's bring it back
That's just a warm up
‘Cause I can– on anybody, anybody



[Produced by Chucky Thompson and Nas]

[Intro]
One time.. yeah.. yeah..

[Verse 1]
All I need is one mic, one beat, one stage
One nigga front, my face on the front page
Only if I had one gun, one girl and one crib
One God to show me how to do things his son did
Pure, like a cup of virgin blood
Mixed with 151, one sip'll make a nigga flip
Writin' names on my hollow tips, plottin' shit
Mad violence, who I'm gon' body? This hood politics
Acknowledge it, leave bodies chopped up in garbages
Seeds watch us, grow up and try to follow us
Police watch us {*siren*} , roll up and try knockin' us
One knee I ducked, could it be my time is up?
But my luck, I got up, the cop shot again
Bus stop glass bursts, a fiend drops his Heineken
Ricochetin' between the spots that I'm hidin' in
Blackin' out as I shoot back – fuck gettin' hit! {*more sirens*}
This is my hood, I'ma rep to the death of it
'Til everybody come home, little niggas is grown
Hoodrats, don't abortion your womb
We need more warriors soon
Sent from the stars, sun and the moon
In this life of police chases, street sweepers and coppers
Stick-up kids with no conscience, leavin' victims with doctors
IF YOU REALLY THINK YOU READY TO DIE, WITH 9's OUT
THIS IS WHAT NAS IS 'BOUT, NIGGA, THE TIME IS NOW!

[Hook]
Yo, all I need is one mic..
All I need is one mic.. (that's all I need)
All I need is one mic.. (all I need niggas)
All I need is one mic.. (yeah)

[Verse 2]
All I need is one blunt, one page and one pen
One prayer; tell God forgive me for one sin
Matter of fact, maybe more than one
Look back at all the hatred against me – fuck all of them!
Jesus died at age 33, there's 33 shots
From twin Glocks, there's 16 apiece, that's 32
Which means one of my guns was holdin' 17
27 hit your crew, six went into you
Everybody gotta die sometime, hope your funeral
Never gets shot up, bullets tear through the innocent
Nothin' is fair, niggas roll up, shootin' from wheelchairs
My heart is racin', tastin' revenge in the air
I let this shit slide for too many years, too many times
Now I'm strapped with a couple of MAC's, too many 9's
If y'all niggas really with me, get busy, load up the semi's
Do more than just hold it, explode the clip until you empty
There's nothin' in our way: they bust, we bust
They rush, we rush, lead flyin', feel it? I feel it in my gut
THAT WE TAKE THESE BITCHES TO WAR, LIE 'EM DOWN
CAUSE WE STRONGER NOW, MY NIGGA, THE TIME IS NOW!

[Hook]
All I need is one mic.. (that's all I need niggas, that's all I need)
All I need is one mic.. (there's nuttin else in the world)
All I need is one mic.. (that's all a nigga need to do his thing y'know)
All I need is one mic.. (this is all I need...)

[Verse 3]
ALL I NEED IS ONE LIFE, ONE TRY, ONE BREATH, I'M ONE MAN
WHAT I STAND FOR SPEAKS FOR ITSELF
THEY DON'T UNDERSTAND
Don't wanna see me on top, too egotistical
Talkin' all that slick shit the same way these bitches do
Wonder what my secrets is
Niggas'll move on you, only if they know what your weakness is
I have none – too late to grab guns
I'm blastin' ‘cause I'm a cool nigga
Thought I wouldn't have that ass done? Fooled you niggas
What you call an infinite brawl, eternal souls clashin'
War gets deep, some beef is everlastin'
Complete with thick scars
Brothers knifin' each other up in prison yards
Drama, where does it start?
You know the block was ill as a youngster
Every night it was like a cop would get killed
Body found in the dumpster
For real a hustler, purchased my Range
Niggas throwin' dirt on my name
Jealous ‘cause fiends got they work and complain
Bitches left me ‘cause they thought I was finished
Shoulda knew she wasn't true
She came to me when her man caught a sentence
Diamonds are blindin', I never make the same mistakes
Movin' with a change of pace
Lighter load, see now the king is straight
Swellin' my melon, ‘cause none of these niggas real
Heard they were tellin' police, how can a kingpin squeal?
This is crazy, I'm on the right track, I'm finally found
You need some soul-searchin', the time is now

[Hook]
All I need is one mic.. (yeah, yeah yeah yeah)
All I need is one mic.. (that's all I ever needed in this world, fuck cash)
All I need is one mic.. (fuck the cars, the jewelry)
All I need is one mic.. (to spread my voice to the whole world, baby, uh)



[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Verse 1]
Freedom or jail, clips inserted, a baby's being born
Same time a man is murdered—the beginning and end
As far as rap go, it's only natural I explain
My plateau, and also, what defines my name
First it was Nasty, but times have changed
Ask me now, I'm the artist, but hardcore, my sign is for pain
I spent time in the game, kept my mind on fame
Saw fiends shoot up and do lines of cocaine
Saw my close friends shot, flatline, am I sane?
That depends, carry MAC-10's to practice my aim
On rooftops, tape CD covers to trees
Line the barrel up with your weak picture then squeeze
Street scriptures for lost souls, in the crossroads
To the corner thugs hustling for cars that cost dough
To the big dogs living large, taking in light
Pushing big toys, getting nice, enjoying your life
It's what you make it, suicide, few try to take it
Belt tied around their neck in jail cells naked
Heaven and Hell, rap legend, presence is felt
And of course N-A-S are the letters that spell - NAS, NAS

[Scratched Hook]
"Nas is like" "life or death"
"I'm a rebel"
"My poetry's deep, I never fell"
"Nas is like" "Nas is like"
"Half man half amazing"
"No doubt"

[Verse 2]
"Nas is like…" Earth, Wind & Fire, rims and tires
Bulletproof glass, inside is the realest driver
Planets in orbit, line 'em up with the stars
Tarot cards, you can see the pharaoh Nas
"Nas is like…" Iron Mike, messiah type
Before the Christ, after the death
The last one left, let my cash invest in stock
Came a long way from blastin' TEC's on blocks
Went from Seiko to Rolex, owning acres
From the projects with no chips, to large cake dough
Dimes giving fellatio, siete zeros
Bet my 9 spit for the pesos, but what's it all worth?
Can't take it with you under this earth
Rich men died and tried, but none of it worked
They just rob your grave, I'd rather be alive and paid
Before my number's called, history's made
Some'll fall, but I rise, thug or die
Making choices that determine my future under the sky
To rob, steal or kill, I'm wondering why
It's a dirty game, is any man worthy of fame?
Much success to you, even if you wish me the opposite
Sooner or later we'll all see who the prophet is

[Scratched Hook]
"Nas is like" "life or death"
"I'm a rebel"
"My poetry's deep, I never fell"
"Nas is like" "Nas is like"
"Half man half amazing"
"No doubt"

[Verse 3]
"Nas is like…" Sex to a nympho, but nothing sweet
I'm like beef, bustin' heat through your windows
I'm like a street sweeper, green leaf breather
Like Greeks in Egypt
Learning something deep from they teachers
I'm like crime, like your 9, your man you would die for
Always got you, I’m like Pac dude you would cry for
I'm like a whole lot of loot, I'm like crisp money
Corporate accounts from a rich company
I'm like ecstasy for ladies, I'm like all races
Combined in one man; like the '99 Summer Jam
Bulletproof Hummer man
I'm like being locked down around new faces
And none of 'em fam
I'm the feeling of a millionaire spending a hundred grand
I'm a poor man's dream, a thug poet
Live it and I write down and I watch it blow up
Y'all know what I'm like
Y'all play it your system every night, now…

[Scratched Hook]
"Nas is like" "life or death"
"I'm a rebel"
"My poetry's deep, I never fell"
"Nas is like" "Nas is like"
"Half man half amazing"
"No doubt"



[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Intro]
Aight, fuck that shit! Word, word
Fuck that other shit, y'know what I'm sayin'?
We gonna do a lil somethin' like this
Y'know what I'm sayin'?
(Y'all doing that other shit)
Keep it on and on and on and on and
Know'm sayin'? Big Nas, Grand Wizard, what is it?
(It's like…) Haha, you know what I'm sayin'?
Yo, go ahead and rip that shit, dun!

[Verse 1]
I rap for listeners, bluntheads, fly ladies, and prisoners
Henessey-holders and old-school niggas, then I be dissin' a
Unofficial that smoke Woolie Thai
I dropped out of Cooley High
Gassed up by a cokehead cutie pie
Jungle survivor, fuck who's the live-er
My man put the battery in my back, a difference from Energizer
Sentence begins indented with formality
My duration's infinite, moneywise or physiology
Poetry, that's a part of me, retardedly bop
I drop the ancient manifested hip-hop straight off the block
I reminisce on park jams, my man was shot for his sheep coat
Chocolate blunts make me see him drop in my weed smoke
It's real, grew up in trife life, did times or white lines
The hype pipes, murderous nighttimes
And knife fights and blight crimes
Chill on the block with Cognac, hold strap
With my peeps that's into drug money market interact
No sign of the beast in the blue Chrysler
I guess that means peace
For niggas, no sheisty vice to just snipe ya
Start off the dice-rollin' mats for craps to cee-lo
With side-bets, I roll a deuce, nothin' below
(Peace God!) Peace God – now the shit is explained
I'm takin' niggas on a trip straight through memory lane
It's like that, y'all…

[Hook]
"Now let me take a trip down memory lane"
"Comin' outta Queensbridge"

[Verse 2]
One for the money, two for pussy and foreign cars
Three for Alizé, niggas deceased or behind bars
I rap divine, God, check the prognosis: is it real or showbiz?
My window faces shootouts, drug overdoses
Live amongst no roses, only the drama
For real, a nickel-plate is my fate, my medicine is the ganja
Here's my basis, my razor embraces, many faces
You're telephone blown, black, stitches or fat shoelaces
Peoples are petro, dramatic automatic .44 I let blow
And back down po-po when I'm vexed so
My pen taps the paper, then my brain's blank
I see dark streets, hustlin' brothers who keep the same rank
Pumpin' for somethin', some'll prosper, some fail
Judges hangin' niggas, uncorrect bails for direct sales
My intellect prevails from a hangin' cross with nails
I reinforce the frail, with lyrics that's real
Word to Christ, a disciple of streets, trifle on beats
I decipher prophecies through a mic and say "peace"
I hung around the older crews
While they sling smack to dingbats
They spoke of Fat Cat; that nigga's name made bell rings, black
Some fiends scream about Supreme Team, a Jamaica Queens thing
Uptown was Alpo, son, heard he was kingpin
Yo, fuck, rap is real!
Watch the herbs stand still
Never talkin' to snakes, ‘cause the words of man kill
True in the game, as long as blood is blue in my veins
I pour my Heineken brew to my deceased crew on memory lane

[Hook]
"Now let me take a trip down memory lane"
"Comin' outta Queensbridge"
"Now let me take a trip down memory lane"
"Comin' outta Queensbridge"

[Outro: DJ Premier scracthing]
"Comin' out of Queensbridge" (X4)
"The most dangerous MC is…"
"Comin' out of Queensbridge"
"The most dangerous MC is…"
"Comin' out of Queensbridge"
"The most dangerous MC is…"
"Comin' out of Queensbridge"
"The most dangerous MC is…"
"Me number one, and you know where me from"



[Intro]
Freedom or jail, clips inserted
A baby's being born same time a man is murdered
The beginning and end, as far as rap goes
It's only natural, I explain my plateau
And also what defines my name

[Hook: J. Cole (Sampled)]
Yeah, long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
Pac was like Jesus, Nas wrote the Bible
Now what you're 'bout to hear's a tale of glory and sin
No I.D. my mentor now let the story begin

[Verse: Nas]
I ain't mad at you, young king, this unsung song is haunting
Along comes a one son called a offspring
The Earth spins, my Old Earth grin, sung a church hymn
She birthed in September, took my first wind, again, the Earth spins
I jumped in my first Benz, fled out, lead out
Screams got in the game and took bread out
The nerve of these niggas, weak flow, yo Cole let's murder this sequel
Freedom or jail from Fayetteville to QB though
Cause back when I was young there was massive niggas
But I passed them niggas, just being nasty nigga
Military hat, fatigue pants sagging, Henny'd up
Execs asking will he live to see his own release date happen
Straight off the corner with the armor, arm and hammer
But I had a appeal, I was a charmer
Yet still being my mama's son was my biggest honor
This shit was just kinda just a hobby in my project lobby
We was trying to be the Queensbridge Cosby's
But the street life robbed me of that, so I had to put it in raps
And who could I ask for help? Older niggas was getting mad
But that's the gift and the curse, that's the good and the bad
At least you got Jay, but he already one of the greats
And it's hard for the great to tell somebody how to be great
Nigga I tried and niggas threw that shit right back in my face
They took my cosign, but they ain't let me EP their tapes
And when they joint tanked, that's when they point blame
So point blank, young Cole, you won't be the same
The first album freedoms and them fourth album pressures
A big difference between 'em but I get why you said it
Radio records are needed, I just wanted it to bring the warning
Global warming to that cold world you was breathing
That's some advice I never got
If I don't sell another record, I'll just steady rock
While you was writing down my rhymes I was just trying to show you
That if you say what's on your mind, you can stand the test of time
Now I'm playing Born Sinner loud, saw you live, rock the crowd
Like wow, you made your nigga Nas proud

[Bridge: Nas]
So you ain't let Nas down
It's just part of the game, becoming a rap king, my nigga
You ain't let Nas down
How that sound? Here the crown, pass it to you like nothing, nigga
You ain't let Nas down

[Outro: Nas]
Long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
Slick Rick was like Jesus, G Rap wrote the Bible
Now what you're 'bout to hear's a tale of glory and sin
Large Professor's my mentor, that's how the story end



[Produced by Large Professor]

[Intro]
Check me out, y'all
Nasty Nas in your area
About to cause mass hysteria

[Verse 1]
Before a blunt, I take out my fronts
Then I start to front; matter of fact, I be on a manhunt
You couldn't catch me in the streets without a ton of reefer
That's like Malcolm X catching the Jungle Fever
King poetic; too much flavor, I'm major
Atlanta ain't Brave-r, I'll pull a number, like a pager
‘Cause I'm an ace when I face the bass
40-side is the place that is giving me grace
Now wait, another dose and you might be dead
And I'm a Nike-head, I wear chains that excite the Feds
And ain't a damn thing gonna change
I'm a performer, strange
So the mic warmer was born to gain
Nas, why did you do it? You know
You got the mad-phat fluid when you rhyme; it's halftime

[Hook]
It's halftime
This is how it feel
Check it out, how it feel

[Verse 2]
It's like that, you know it's like that
I got it hemmed, now you never get the mic back
When I attack, there ain't an army that could strike back
So I react never calmly on a hype track
I set it off with my own rhyme
‘Cause I'm as ill as a convict who kills for phone time
I'm max like cassettes, I flex like sex
In your stereo sets, Nas'll catch wreck
I used to hustle; now all I do is relax and strive
When I was young I was a fan of the Jackson 5
I drop jewels, wear jewels, hope to never run it
With more kicks than a baby in a mother's stomach
Nasty Nas has to rise, ‘cause I'm wise
This is exercise 'til the microphone dies
Back in '83 I was an MC sparkin'
But I was too scared to grab the mics in the parks, and
Kick my little raps ‘cause I thought niggas wouldn't understand
And now in every jam I'm the fuckin' man
I rap in front of more niggas than in the slave ships
I used to watch "CHiPs", now I load Glock clips
I got to have it, I miss Mr. Magic
Versatile, my style switches, like a faggot
But not bisexual; I'm an intellectual
Of rap I'm a professional, and that's no question, yo
These are the lyrics of the man
You can't near it, understand?
‘Cause in the streets I'm well-known, like the number man
Am I in place with the bass and format?
Explore rap and tell me, "Nas ain't all that."
And next time I rhyme, I be foul
Whenever I freestyle I see trial, niggas say I'm wild
I hate a rhyme-biter's rhyme
Stay tuned, I assume; the real rap comes at halftime

[Hook]
It's halftime
This is how it feel
Check it out, how it feel

[Verse 3]
I got it going on, even flip a morning song
Every afternoon, I kick half the tune
And in the darkness, I'm heartless, like when the NARC's hit
Word to Marcus Garvey; I hardly sparked it
‘Cause when I blast the herb, that's my word
I be slayin' them fast, doing this that and the third
But chill, pass the Andre, and let's slay
I bag bitches up at John Jay, and hit a matinee
Putting hits on 5-0
‘Cause when it's my time to go, I wait for God with the .44
And biters can't come near
And yo, go to hell to the foul cop who shot Garcia
I won't plant seeds
Don't need an extra mouth I can't feed
That's extra Phillie change, more cash for damp weed
This goes out to Manhattan, the island of Staten
Brooklyn and Queens is living fat, and
The Boogie Down, enough props, enough clout
Ill Will, rest in peace! Yo, I'm out



[Produced by Heavy D, Da Internz & Salaam Remi]

[Intro: Super Cat]
He's the heartbeat of the people
The ghetto people, and when I say ghetto people
The people who cannot afford to go to big concert
Some of these people do not even have TV, so they can't afford cable
Some of them can afford a radio
So the only thing they can listen to is the music
People the ghetto, people from the projects, street people
Hortical ghetto youth who know what it is to sing about suffering and reality

[Sample from "Dance Inna New York" by Super Cat]
New York girl, dem a mad over we
New York girl, dem a mad over we
New York girl, dem a mad over we
New York girl, dem a mad over we

[Hook: Sample from "Dance Inna New York" by Super Cat]
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don, dance
Inna New York City-city, New York City-city (YEAH!)
(YEAH!) New York City-city, New York City-city

[Verse 1]
Smoking a escubano, guzzle my second bottle
Hope I don’t catch a homo
Grossing our net, simultaneously making me climb higher
Heinous crimes behind me, search but can't find me, fuck sadness
Had this been you having this lavish
Habitual happiness at me you wouldn’t look backwards
You would have sex on condominium roof decks
So anyone move next, I'll hit you with two TECs
Rocking Roberto Cavalli, no shirt on, convertible Mazi
My Colombiana mommy riding beside me
Every tat mean something, that’s my word on my body
I’ll have to lean something with that Mossberg shotty
My niggas is ignant, put lead in your pigment
Just cause y'all was mad at all the years I was getting it
In '97 the six, '98 the Bentley
Now it’s the Ghost Phantom, and y'all can't stand him but

[Hook]
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don, dance
Inna New York City-city, New York City-city
New York City-city, New York City-city (yeah)

[Verse 2]
Army jacket swag, army jacket green and black
With the square top pocket that snaps
Where the gas at?
Pass that, not you, you hold cracks in your asscrack
I never did that, my sock's where my stash was at
Yo, I used to listen to that Red Alert and Rap Attack
I fell in love with all that poetry I mastered that
Cutting school where Preme team and Fat Cat was at
Future not crystal clear yet, Baccarat
Now I'm the one who repping Queens
Way beyond your wildest dreams
Bottles on bottles with sparklers surround my team
That long cash get the baddest bitches out they jeans
Twenty years in this game, looking seventeen
I don't lean: no codeine, promethazine
I just blow green, pick which bitch to bless the king
Although he’s on to another chapter
Heavy D gave this beat to Salaam for me to rap to, raaaahhh

[Hook]
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don, dance
Inna New York City-city, New York City-city
New York City-city, New York City-city

[Verse 3]
Yeah, yeah
New York is like an Island, a big Rikers Island
The cops be out wilding, all I hear is sirens
It's all about surviving
Same old two-step, try to stay alive when they be out robbing
I been out rhyming since born knowledge
Like prophet Muhammad said the ink from a scholar
Worth more than the blood of a martyr, so I'ma
Keep it on 'til I see a billion dollars
Keep your friends close and your enemies closer
Love model chocha, mommy pop it like she 'pose to
Eyes red shot like I'm never sober
Big time smoker, Indonesian doja
Mini me's you can hold up
Before you end up wet up from my soldier
Don shit, under fire I remain on some calm shit
This for every ghetto in the hood
Nas the Don, Super Cat the Don Dada, understood

[Hook]
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don
Nas di don Nas di don Nas di don, dance
Inna New York City-city, New York City-city
New York City-city, New York City-city, New York...



[Produced by Dave Atkinson & Trackmasters]

[Intro: AZ]
This is what, this what they want, huh?
This is what it's all about?
Time to take Affirmative Action, son
They just don't understand, you kna'mean?
Niggas comin' sideways, thinkin' stuff is sweet, man
Niggas don't understand the four devils
Lust, envy, hate, jealousy—wicked niggas, man

[Verse 1: AZ]
Yo, sit back, relax, catch your contact
Sip your con-gi-ac
And let's all wash this money through this laundry mat
Sneak attack the new cats in rap, worth top dollar
In fact, touch mines and I'll react like a Rottweiler
Who could relate? We play for high stakes at gunpoint
Catch 'em and break, undress 'em
Tie 'em with tape, no escape
The Corleone, fettuccine Capone
Roam in your own zone
Or get kidnapped and clapped in your dome
We got it sewn, The Firm art of war is unknown
Lower your tone, face it, homicide cases get blown
Aristocrats, politickin' daily with diplomats
See me, I'm an official mack, Lex Coupe triple black

[Verse 2: Cormega]
Criminal thoughts in the blue Porsche
My destiny's to be the new boss
That nigga Paulie gotta die, he too soft
That nigga's dead on, a ki of heroin
They found his head on the couch
With his dick in his mouth; I put the hit out
Yo, the smoothest killer since Bugsy
Bitches love me, and Queens where my drugs be
I wear Guess jeans and rugbies
Yo, my people from Medina, they will see ya
When you re-up, bring your heater
All your cream go between us
Real shit, my Desert Eagle got a ill grip
I chill with niggas that hit Dominican spots and steal bricks
My red beam made a dread scream and sprayed a fed team
Corleone be turnin' niggas to fiends
Yukons and ninja black Lexus
Mega the pretty boy, with mafia connections
It's The Firm, nigga, set it

[Verse 3: Nas]
Yo, my mind is seeing through your design like Blind Fury
I shine jewelry, sippin' on crushed grapes, we lust papes
And push cakes inside the casket at Just wake
It's sickenin', he just finished bidding upstate
And now the projects is talking that somebody-gotta-die shit
It's logic as long as it's nobody that's in my clique
My man Smoke know how to expand coke in Mr. Coffee
Feds cost me two mill' to get the system off me
Life's a bitch, but God forbid the bitch divorce me
I'll be flooded with ice, so hell fire can't scorch me
Cuban cigars meeting Foxy at the Mosque
Moving cars, your top papi Señor Escobar

[Verse 4: Foxy Brown]
In the black Camaro
Firm deep, all my niggas hail the blackest sparrow
Wallabee's be the apparel
Through the darkest tunnel
I got visions of multi millions in the biggest bundle
In the Lex pushed by my nigga Jungle
E Money bags got Moet Chandon
Bundle of sixty-two
They ain't got a clue what we about to do
My whole team, we shittin' hard like Czar
Sosa, Foxy Brown, Cormega and Escobar
I keep a fat marquess piece, laced in all the illest snake skin
Armani sweaters, Carolina Herrera
Be The Firm, baby, from BK to the Bridge, my nigga Wiz
Operation Firm Biz, so what the deal is?
I keep a phat jew-el, sippin' Crist-ies
Sittin' on top of fifty grand in the Nautica Van
We stay incogni' like all them thug niggas in Marcy
The gods, they praise Allah with visions of Gandhi
Bet it on my whole crew is Don Juan
On Cayman Island with a case of Cristal
And Baba Shallah spoke
Nigga with them Cubans that snort coke
Raw though, an ounce mixed with leak, that's pure though
Flippin' the bigger picture
The bigger nigga with the cheddar was mad dripper
He had a fuckin' villa in Manilla
We got to flee to Panama, but wait, it's half-and-half
Ki's is one and two-fifth, so how we flip?
32 grams raw, chop it in half, get 16
Double it times three, we got 48
Which mean a whole lot of cream
Divide the profit by four
Subtract it by eight, we back to 16
Now add the other two that 'Mega bringing through
So let's see, if we flip this other ki
Then that's more for me, mad coke and mad leak
Plus a five hundred cut in half is two-fifty
Now triple that times three
We got three quarters of another ki

[Outro: Foxy Brown]
The Firm, baby, volume one



[Produced by Noah "40" Shebib & Salaam]

[Intro: Sample from "Goodbye Love" by Guy]
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby

[Verse 1]
Bye baby, I guess you knew why I walked away
When we walked to the altar, that was an awesome day
Did counseling, couldn't force me to stay
Something happens when you say I do, we go astray
Why did we mess it up? We was friends, we had it all
Reason you don't trust men, that was your daddy fault
He in the grave – let it go, he no longer livin'
Said you caught him cheating with Mom, fucking other women
Fuck that gotta do with us? Here's the keys to the newest truck
Birkin bags, we burnin' cash, now baby, do it up
No matter who you fuck, that was before me
Wanted you as my shorty since before I saw you screamin'
"Hate you so much right now"
Should've saw the meaning, angry black woman
Actions of a demon, I'm leavin'

[Hook: sample from "Goodbye Love" by Guy] + (Nas)
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby (Bye baby)
You know I'm saying bye-bye (Bye-bye baby)
Cause I'm saying bye-bye (Bye baby)
Cause I'm saying bye-bye
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby

[Verse 2]
Bye baby, I guess you know why I had to leave
Seven months in your pregnancy, 'bout to have my seed
Let's take it back some years, rewind it to the happy years
You and your Star Trak fam, I'm thinking you cats are weird
Same time, different year, I was digging y'all flow
Then I tatted you on my arm so niggas would know
I thought no one could stop us, matching gold watches
I was your Johnny Depp, you was my Janis Joplin
Yet the cuter version, yet I knew you personally
Better than you knew yourself – and I knew this for certain
Crib in the Dominican, you got away from everybody
You screaming at the racist cops in Miami was probably
The highlight of my life, like "Ha, yo, look at my wife!"
Gangsta, me and 20 cops 'bout to fight, crazy night
Bailed you out, next morning we got clean
Like it never happened, and later we at that Heat game
Just another day in the life of two people in love
But it wasn't enough, so baby, guess what...

[Hook: sample from "Goodbye Love" by Guy] + (Nas)
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby (Bye baby)
OH! OH! AHHHHHHHH! Bye-bye (Bye-bye baby)
I can't believe that this is happenin to us
Cause I'm saying bye-bye (Bye baby)
Cause I'm saying bye-bye
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby

[Verse 3]
Listen, could you imagine writing your deposition
Divorce lawyer telling you how this thing gonna be endin'?
With you paying out the ass and I'm talking half
Not some, but half, no, serious, half
Half of your soul, half of your heart, you leaving behind
It’s either that or die, I wanted peace of mind
And all I seen was selfish cowards
Under their breath, saying, "Why did Nas trust her?"
But look at yourself! Speak louder, bruh!
You live with your baby moms
And scared to make an honest woman out of her
And make her your bride, fake pimps, you ain't even alive
At least I can say I tried plus enjoyed the ride
Plus we got our little boy, my little joy and pride
He got my nose, my grill, your color, your eyes
Next go round I hope I pick the truest type
And watch me do it all again – it’s a beautiful life, aight?
Goodbye!

[Hook: sample from "Goodbye Love" by Guy] + (Nas)
(Bye baby) Baby.. baby
You know I'm saying bye-bye (Bye-bye baby)
I can't believe that this is happenin to us
Cause I'm saying bye-bye (Bye baby)
I guess you knew and blew a good thing
You know I'm saying bye-bye
I guess you knew and blew a good thing, baby



[Produced by D Moet, Pretty Boy & Trackmasters]

[Intro: Nas and Puff Daddy]
Escobar Season has returned
It's been a long time, been a long time comin'
It's life or death for me now
But you know, there's no turnin' back now
This is what makes me, this is what I am
Feel me? Let's go

[Hook 1: Puff Daddy and Nas]
You can hate me now, (Q.B.)
But I won't stop now (Real niggas)
'Cause I can't stop now, (Bravehearts)
You can hate me now (C'mon)
But I won't stop now
'Cause I can't stop now
You can hate me now
You can hate me now

[Ad-lib over hook: Puff Daddy]
Well, you hate me, I'm gon' hate you too
It's as simple as that
Die motherfucker, die motherfucker, die!
You don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck
Go down any way you want it to go down
Weak, jealous motherfuckers! Fuck y'all!

[Verse 1: Nas]
Don't hate me, hate the money I see, clothes that I buy
Ice that I wear, flows that I try
Close your eyes, picture me rollin', Sixes, money foldin'
Bitches, honeys that swollen to riches, Nas get in ya
Most critically acclaimed Pulitzer Prize winner
Best storyteller, thug narrator, my style's greater
Model dater, big threat to a lot of you haters
Commentators ringside try watchin' my paper
Almost a decade, quite impressive
Most of the best is in the essence for this rap shit that I stand for
Expandin' more to the big screen, Bill Gates dreams
But it seems you'd rather see me in jail with state greens
Want me off the scene fast, but good things last
Like your favorite MC still makin' some mean cash
First rapper to bring a platinum plaque back to the projects
But you still wanna hate, be my guest, I suggest

[Ad-libs: Puff Daddy]
Money is power, motherfucker!
I got millions of thugs on salary, bitch!

[Hook 2: Puff Daddy]
You can hate me now, (I won't stop)
But I won't stop now (I can't stop)
'Cause I can't stop now, (You can hate me)
You can hate me now (I hate you too)
But I won't stop now (You can hate me now)
'Cause I can't stop now (You can hate me now)
You can hate me now
You can hate me now

[Ad-Libs: Nas and Puff Daddy]
Do it now! I told you, do it now!
Let's go

[Verse 2: Nas]
You wanna hate me, then hate me; what can I do
But keep gettin' money? Funny, I was just like you
I had to hustle hard, never give up, until I made it
Now y'all sayin': "That's a clever nigga, nothin' to play with."
Hate on me, I blew but I'm the same O.G.
People warn me, when you're on top there's envy
Took my niggas out the hood, but you doubt on us
Sayin' we left the hood but can't get it out of us
My bad, should I step out my shoes, give 'em to you?
Here's my cars and my house, you can live in that too
Criticize when I flow for the streets, hate my dress code
Gucci this, Fendi that – what you expect, ho?
Nickname Esco, took this game to its threshold
Best flow, I bet the whole U.S. know
Try to make it like you the realest, but who the illest?
Think we all know the answer to that, 'cause niggas feel this, right?

[Ad-libs: Puff Daddy]
You think I'ma come this far
And let you niggas stop me now?
I hate you too!

[Hook 2: Puff Daddy]
You can hate me now, (I won't stop)
But I won't stop now (I can't stop)
'Cause I can't stop now, (You can hate me)
You can hate me now (I hate you too)
But I won't stop now (You can hate me now)
'Cause I can't stop now (You can hate me now)
You can hate me now
You can hate me now

[Ad-libs: Puff Daddy]
I like this, I like the way this feels

[Verse 3: Nas]
It's a thin line between paper and hate
Friends and snakes, nine milli's and thirty-eights
Hell or the Pearly Gates; I was destined to come
Predicted, blame God, he blew breath in my lungs
Second to none, wicked turn wives to widows
Shoot through satin pillows, the desolate one
Took a little time to claim my spot
Chairman of the board until this game stop, and I side with the Lord
Ride for the cause while drivin' niggas shot at my doors
Plottin' I'm sure, to catch me with they Glocks to my jaws
Tried stickin' me up, but I flipped on these ducks
Instead of me, ambulances were pickin' them up
Niggas fear what they don't understand
Hate what they can't conquer, guess it's just the theory of man
Became a monster, on top of the world, never fallin'
I'm as real as they come, from day one, forever ballin', c'mon!

[Ad-libs: Puff Daddy]
You ain't never seen a nigga like me ever in your life
And that's what you can't understand!

[Hook 2: Puff Daddy]
You can hate me now, (I won't stop)
But I won't stop now (I can't stop)
'Cause I can't stop now, (You can hate me)
You can hate me now (I hate you too)
But I won't stop now (You can hate me now)
'Cause I can't stop now (You can hate me now)
You can hate me now
You can hate me now

[Outro: Puff Daddy and Nas]
You can hate me now, (C'mon, niggas!)
But I won't stop now (Do it now! Get this shit over with!)
It ain't gon' never stop, niggas!



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Hook: Children's Choir]
I know I can
Be what I wanna be
If I work hard at it
I'll be where I wanna be
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Verse 1]
Be, b-boys and girls, listen up
You can be anything in the world, in God we trust
An architect, doctor, maybe an actress
But nothing comes easy, it takes much practice
Like, I met a woman who's becoming a star
She was very beautiful, leaving people in awe
Singing songs, Lena Horne, but the younger version
Hung with the wrong person, got her strung on that
Heroin, cocaine, sniffing up drugs, all in her nose
Could've died, so young, now looks ugly and old
No fun 'cause when she reaches for hugs, people hold their breath
'Cause she smells of corrosion and death
Watch the company you keep and the crowd you bring
'Cause they came to do drugs and you came to sing
So if you gonna be the best, I'ma tell you how
Put your hands in the air, and take the vow

[Hook]
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Verse 2]
Be, b-boys and girls, listen again
This is for grown-looking girls who's only 10
The ones who watch videos and do what they see
As cute as can be, up in the club with fake ID
Careful, 'fore you meet a man with HIV
You can host the TV like Oprah Winfrey
Whatever you decide, be careful, some men be
Rapists, so act your age, don't pretend to be
Older than you are, give yourself time to grow
You thinking he can give you wealth, but so
Young boys, you can use a lot of help, you know
You thinking life's all about smoking weed and ice
You don't wanna be my age and can't read and write
Begging different women for a place to sleep at night
Smart boys turn to men and do whatever they wish
If you believe you can achieve, then say it like this

[Hook]
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)
Now, go…
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Verse 3]
Be, be-fore we came to this country
We were kings and queens, never porch monkeys
There was empires in Africa called Kush
Timbuktu, where every race came to get books
To learn from black teachers who taught Greeks and Romans
Asian Arabs and gave them gold, when
Gold was converted to money it all changed
Money then became empowerment for Europeans
The Persian military invaded
They heard about the gold, the teachings, and everything sacred
Africa was almost robbed naked
Slavery was money, so they began making slave ships
Egypt was the place that Alexander the Great went
He was so shocked at the mountains with black faces
Shot up they nose to impose what basically
Still goes on today, you see?
If the truth is told, the youth can grow
They learn to survive until they gain control
Nobody says you have to be gangstas, hoes
Read more, learn more, change the globe
Ghetto children, do your thing
Hold your head up, little man, you're a king
Young Princess when you get your wedding ring
Your man is saying "She's my Queen"

[Hook]
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Outro]
Save the music, y'all
Save the music, y'all
Save the music, y'all
Save the music, y'all
Save the music



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Intro]
(Y'all ready for Nas?
Queensbridge, y'all ready to see Nasty Nas?
Uh huh, they ready)
Yeah, word
Got some Remy Martin
And some good-ass cigars, check it out

[Verse 1]
Ayo, late night, candlelight, fiend with diesel in his needle
Queensbridge leader, no equal
I come from the Wheel of Ezekiel
To pop thousand-dollar bottles of Scotch
Smoke pot and heal the people
Any rebuttal to what I utter get box-cutter'd
Count how many bad honies I slut, it's a high number
Name a nigga under the same sky that I'm under
Who gets money, remain fly, yeah, I wonder
Eyes flutter, it's love when Nas pops up
Stars get starstruck, panties start drippin'
The ways of Carlito, blaze, torpedo cigars
Drop Rolls, hoes drop clothes
Louis the XIII, freaks, women nice size
I ride like Porsches, thick, brown and gorgeous
It ain't my fault, semi-automatic weapons I brought
The world crazy, I'm rich and I'm girl-crazy
Dick 'em, convince ‘em all to praise me
They ideology is confusion, I lose 'em
Fellates me, who hate me? My gun off safety
Since the Tunnel and Skate Key, my jewelry in HD

[Verse 2]
Silent rage, pristine in my vintage shades
I'm not in the winters of my life or the beginning stage
I am the dragon
Maserati, pumpin' Biggie, the great legend
Blastin', I'm after the actress who played Faith Evans
My little Jackie Onassis, dig?
I'm so high I never land, like Mike Jackson’s crib
Vest on, .45, still crack ya rib sacrilege
Talk trash about the Nasty kid
Past nasty now, I'm gross and repulsive
Talk money, is you jokin?
Cash everywhere, in my bank, in the sofa
In the walls, in the cars, in my wallet, in my pocket
On the floors, ceilings, the safe, bitch, I got it
You envy, but don't offend me
I'm skinny, but still I'm too big for a Bentley
You are your car, what could represent me?
Too Godly to be a Bugatti, you honestly
Must design me somethin Tommy Mottonic from Queens
Had before the 90's
Drug dealer car, rush to the bar
Move, niggas! We don’t give a fuck who you are
Black card heavy like a magnet,  in my stitched denims
Pretty women see them saggin'
Bet a hundred stacks niggas'll run it back
Just havin' fun, I ain't even begun to black
Light another blunt in fact, haha...

[Interlude]
(Nasty) Nasty kid
(Nasty) Yeah...
(Nasty) The kid! (Nasty) Yeah...
(Nasty) Nasty kid (Nasty)

[Verse 3]
For the hustlers, thick as yellow bitches for the suck of it
Got a bunch of niggas in prison braggin'
Saying, "It was Nas I used to hustle with"
I display fashions while my lungs engage hashish
Guns on my waist, past this
Since I'm cakin' up, put funds in my safe, laughin'
And joining the blunt passin' you niggas was straight assin'
Excuse the vulgarity, I'm still not fully adjusted
Or used to the new fans hearin me spit rapidly
I never see the whips niggas be claimin' they drivin'
I guess entertainment means blatantly lyin'
Fake it 'til you make it, I've driven those toys
Been in the wars, in the streets, cops kickin' in doors
For my deen nigga, your flow cheap as limousine liquor
I’m no fake rap CD listener, sit back and roll a mean swisher
For my G's, tell these clowns make room for the king, nigga



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Intro]
Bravehearts, Bravehearts, Bravehearts…

[Verse 1]
Now let's get it all in perspective
For all y'all enjoyment, a song y'all can step with
Y'all appointed me to bring rap justice
But I ain't five-O, y'all know it's Nas, yo
Grey Goose and a whole lot of hydro
Only describe us as soldier survivors
Stay laced in the best, well-dressed
With finesse in a white tee, lookin' for wifey
Thug girl who fly and talks so nicely
Put her in the coupe so she can feel the nice breeze
We can drive through the city, no doubt
But don't say my car's topless, say the titties is out
Newness, here's the anthem
Put your hand up that you shoot with, count your loot with
Push the pool stick in your new crib
Same hand that you hoop with, swing around like you stupid
King of the town? Yeah, I been that
You know I click-clack — where you and your mens at?
Do the Smurf, do the Wop, Baseball Bat
Rooftop like we bringin' '88 back

[Hook]
They shootin'! Aw, made you look
You a slave to a page in my rhyme book
Gettin' big money, playboy, your time's up
Where them gangstas? Where them dimes at?
They shootin'! Aw, made you look
You a slave to a page in my rhyme book
Gettin' big money, playboy, your time's up
Where them gangstas? Where them dimes at?

[Verse 2]
This ain't rappin', this is Street Hop
Now get up off yo' ass like your seat's hot
My live niggas lit up the reefer
Trunk of the car, we got the streetsweeper
Don't start none, won't be none
No reason for your mans to panic
You don't wanna see no ambulances
Knock a pimp's drink down in his pimp cup
That's the way you get Timberland'd up
Let the music diffuse all the tension
Baller convention, free admission
Hustlers, dealers and killers can move swift
Girls get close, you can feel where the tool's kept
All my just-comin' homies, parolees
Get money, leave the beef alone slowly
Get out my face, you people so phony
Pull out my waist, the Eagle four-forty

[Hook]
They shootin'! Aw, made you look
You a slave to a page in my rhyme book
Gettin' big money, playboy, your time's up
Where them gangstas? Where them dimes at?
They shootin'! Aw, made you look
You a slave to a page in my rhyme book
Gettin' big money, playboy, your time's up
Where them gangstas? Where them dimes at?

[Verse 3]
I see niggas runnin', yo, my mood is real rude
I lay you out, show you what steel do
Mobsters don't box, my pump shot obliges
Every invitation to fight you punk-asses
Like Pun said: you ain't even en mi clasa
Maybach Benz, back seat, TV plasma
Ladies lookin' for athletes or rappers
Whatever you choose, whatever you do
Make sure he a thug and intelligent too
Like a real thoroughbred is
Show me love, let me feel how the head is
Females who's the sexiest is always the nastiest

[Outro]
And I like a little sassiness
A lot of class; Mami, reach in your bag, pass the fifth
I'm a leader at last, this a don you with
My 9's will spit, niggas lose consciousness



[Produced by Large Professor]

[Hook: Grand Wizard + Nas]
One time for your mind, one time
Yeah, whatever
One time for your mind, one time
Yo, whatever
One time for your mind, one time
Hey yo, Nas? Kick that fuckin' rhyme!

[Verse 1]
Check it out, when I'm chilling, I grab the buddha
Get my crew to buy beers
And watch a flick, illin' and root for the villain, huh
Plus every morning, I go out and love it sort of chilly
Then I send a shorty from my block to the store for Phillies
After being blessed by the herb's essence
I'm back to my rest, ten minutes, some odd seconds
That's where I got the honey at, spends the night for sexin'
Keep lubrication, Lifestyle protection
Hitting up my stereo's remote control quickly
Ron G's in the cassette deck, rocking the shit, G
I try to stay mellow, rock, well a cappella rhymes'll
Make me richer than a slipper made Cinderella, fella
Go get your crew, Hobbes, I'm prepared to bomb troops
Y'all niggas was born, I shot my way out my mom dukes
When I was ten I was a hip-hoppin' shorty wop
Known for rocking microphones and twisting off a 40 top

[Hook: Grand Wizard + Nas]
One time for your mind, one time
Yeah, whatever
One time for your mind, one time
It sounds clever
Hey yo, Nas? Fuck that, man, that shit is phat
But kick that for them gangstas; fuck all that!
Right, right

[Verse 2]
What up, niggas, how y'all? It's Nasty, the villain
I'm still writing rhymes, but besides that I'm chillin'
I'm tryin' to get this money, God
You know the hard times, kid
Shit, cold, be starving make you wanna do crimes kid
But I'ma lamp, ‘cause a crime couldn't beat a rhyme
Niggas catching 3 to 9's, Muslims yelling "Free the mind"
And I'm from Queensbridge, been to many places
As a kid when I would say that out of town, niggas chased us
But now I know the time, got a older mind
Plus control a 9, fine, see now I represent mine
I'm new on the rap scene, brothers never heard of me
Yet I'm a menace, yo, police wanna murder me
Heini Dark drinker, represent the thinker
My pen rides the paper, it even has blinkers
Think I'll dim the lights, then inhale, it stimulates
Floating like I'm on the North 95 Interstate
Never plan to stop, when I write my hand is hot
And expand a lot from the Wiz to Camelot
The parlayer, I'll make your heads bop, pa
I shine a light on perpetrators, like a cop's car
From day to night, I play the mic and you'll thank God
I wreck shit so much, the microphone'll need a paint job
My brain is incarcerated
Live at any jam, I couldn't count all the parks I've raided
I hold a MAC-11, and attack a reverend
I contact eleven L's and max in heaven

[Hook: Grand Wizard + Nas]
One time for your mind, one time
It sounds clever
One time for your mind, one time
Yeah, whatever
One time for your mind, one time
Yo, from '92 to '99

[Outro]
Yeah, that shit was crazy fat, pa
Know what I’m sayin'?
But check it, you got another verse for me
I want you to kick it, you know what I'm sayin'?
Kick that shit for the projects



[Produced by J.U.S.T.I.C.E. League]

[Verse 1]
PS 111 had free lunch
Embarrassed but managed to get a plate...
We was kids hungry
Mom's working, I was famished
She getting home late...
So I decided now I'm in charge
Either stay full or starve
Corner store like "Mister, spare-a-quarter"
Before Air Jordans, Kareem Abdul-Jabbars
Trying to cop quarters and trying to move that hard
Roll with a shooting squad
How could I not succumb? How could I not partake?
Fifteen I got a gun
Sixteen I robbed a train
Licked off a shot for fun
What's got inside my brain?
A hustler's job ain't done, til he becomes a king
But I'm a righteous son, despite I'm in the midst of
Dudes who switch up and change
They wanna carry me like I'm some kind of lame
I never let them though, I just forgive them though
Either that or the pistol blow

[Break: sample]
"Say YEAH! Haha, thank ya! Ahhh, Hallelujah!
Y'all don't hear me now! Somebody help me!"

[Verse 2]
I remember early mornings, syrup sandwiches, sugar water, yeah
Walking up the dark stairwells, elevators was out of order, yeah
Worth two hundred million now
Bicentennial nigga, flat screens and condominiums
Brazilian women on Xannies they pulling off panties
I'm pushing forty, she only twenty-one
Don't applaud me, I'm exhausted G
Me and my red cup, my blunt and my red cup
Y'all wouldn't know me without one, I keep a fresh cut
Remember talking to Biggie inside his Lex truck
Said stay fly when you bummy, keep your pajamas Armani
Hood forever, I just act like I'm civilized
Really what's in my mind is organizing a billion Black motherfuckers
To take over J.P. and Morgan, Goldman and Sachs
And teach the world facts and give Saudi they oil back

[Break: sample]
"Say YEAH! Haha, thank ya! Ahhh, Hallelujah!
Y'all don't hear me now! Somebody help me!"

[Verse 3]
1990's Polo Ralph Lauren on him
Gone a few years, the whole world snoring on him
Girls all up on him
I spread em, hit 'em and dead 'em
She says, third leg from a legend is sheer heaven
She says, it is the greatest loving
The tales you hear is the truth on me
Who wasn't the most faithful husband
Reveal my life, you will forgive me
You will love me, hate me, judge me, relate to me
Only a few will, this how it sounds when you're too real
They think it's just music still
Well I am a graphic classic song composer
Music notes on sheets, I wrote this piece to get closure
Some of y'all might know Kelis
This goes to her with love, also goes to y'all, let's see
The craziest things already happened to me
So either you'll be laughing at me or you're laughing with me, HA!

[Break: sample]
"Say YEAH! Haha, thank ya! Ahhh, Hallelujah!
Y'all don't hear me now! Somebody help me!"



[Produced by Faith N & Nas]

[Nas]
Street's disciple, my raps are trifle
I shoot slugs from my brain just like a rifle
Stampede the stage, I leave the microphone split
Play Mr. Tuffy while I'm on some Pretty Tone shit
Verbal assassin, my architect pleases
When I was 12, I went to…

[Hector]
And you're sitting at home doing this shit
I should be earning a medal for this
Stop fuckin' around and be a man
There ain't nothin' out here for you

[Zoro]
Oh yes, there is… This

[Jungle]
Yo, Nas, yo, what the fuck is this bullshit on the radio, son?

[Nas]
Chill, chill! That's the shit, God, chill

[AZ]
Ayo, yo, pull down the shade, man
Let's count this money, nigga
Ayo, Nas, put the Jacksons and the Grants over there!
You know what I'm sayin'?
‘Cause we spendin' the Jacksons
You know how we get down, baby

[Nas]
True, true

[Jungle]
Nas, yo, Nas, man
Shit is mad real right now in the projects
For a nigga, yo, word to mother
All them crab-ass rappers be comin' up to me
Man, word to mother, man
I think we need to let them niggas know it's real, man

[Nas]
True indeed, knamsayin'?
But when it's real you doin' this
Even without a record contract, knamsayin'?

[AZ]
No question

[Nas]
Been doing this since back then

[AZ]
I'm sayin' regardless how it go down we gon' keep it real
We tryin' to see many mansions and Coupes, kid

[Nas]
No doubt, we gon' keep it real, true, true

[Jungle]
Ayo, where's Grand Wizard and Mayo at, man?
Takin' niggas a long time, man

[Nas]
Who got the Phillies? Take this Hennessy

[AZ]
Ayo, dunn
C'mon, c'mon, man, stop wavin' that, man!
Stop pointin' that at me, dunn, take the clip out!

[Nas]
Nigga, alright, but take this Hennessy, man!

[AZ]
I'm sayin' take the clip, man, c'mon, take it out!

[Nas]
Light them Phillies up, man!
Niggas stop fuckin' burnin' Phillies, man
Light some Phillies up then!

[Jungle]
Pass that henrock, pass that henrock!
Nigga, act like you know!

[AZ]
Yo, we drinkin' this straight up with no chaser
I ain't fuckin' with you, nigga

[Nas]
I'm saying though, man

[AZ]
What is it, what is it, baby?

[Jungle]
What is it, son, what is it?

[AZ]
You know what time it is

[Nas]
I'm saying, man, you know what I'm saying?
Niggas don't listen, man
Representin', it's Illmatic



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Hook: James Brown sample]
Get, get, get down!

[Verse 1: Nas]
New York streets where killers will walk like Pistol Pete
And Pappy Mason, gave the young boys admiration
Prince from Queens and Fritz from Harlem
Street legends, the drugs kept the hood from starvin'
Pushin' cars, Nicky Barnes was the '70s
But there's a long list of high-profile celebrities
Worldwide on the thorough side of things
Livest kings, some died, one guy, one time
One day grabs me, as I'm about to blast heat
40-side of Vernon, I turned while he asked me
"What you up to? The cops gon' bust you."
I was a teen drunk off brew
Stumbled I wondered if God sent him
'Cause two squad cars entered the block
And looked at us; I ain't flinch when they watched
I took it upstairs, the bathroom mirror, brushed my hair
Starin' at a young disciple
I almost gave my life to what the dice do
Yeah man, throwin' them bones
Hopin' my ace get his case thrown
His girl ain't wait for him, she in the world straight hoein'
While he lookin' at centerfolds of pretty girls showin'
They little cooch; gangstas don't die, he's living proof
The D.A. who tried him was lyin'
A white dude, killed his mother during the case
Hung jury, now the D.A. is being replaced
Pre-trial hearing is over, it's real for the soldier
Walks in the courtroom, the look in his eyes is wild
Triple-homicide, I sit in the back aisle
I wanna crack a smile when I see him
Throw up a fist for Black Power, 'cause all we want is his freedom
He grabbed a court officer's gun and started squeezin'
Then he grabbed the judge, screams out, "Nobody leavin'
Everybody—"

[Hook: James Brown sample]
Get down, get down! Get down, get down!
Get, get, get, get, get, get, get down!
Everybody
Get down, get down! Get down, get down!
Get, get, get, get, get, get, get down!

[Verse 2: Nas]
Some niggas fuck their enemies in their ass when they catch 'em
Weird-ass niggas are dangerous so don't test 'em
They make you disappear, this a year that I won't forget
Sold CD's double platinum, met mo' execs
Southern niggas, independent label, real killas
Know the business, ran Tennessee for years, now they chillin'
They had the coke game somethin' crazy
Sold music out the trunk of their car, that shit amazed me
Put me onto heroin blunts, sherm or somethin'
Took a puff, what the fuck? I turned to punch him
Southern niggas ain't slow, nigga tried to play me
I left from around them dudes, they cool but they crazy
Now I'm back around the old school that raised me
New York gangsters, we loungin', out in L.A. see
A dude wrote my dog from Pelican Bay
The letter say, "Nas, I got your back, the fools don't play."
I rolled with some Crips down to a Crenshaw funeral
Never saw so many men slaughtered and I knew the ho
Responsible; the nigga still alive in a hospital
Midnight they crept in his room and shot the doctor too
See, my cousin's in the game, thuggin' and thangs
He plugged me with a dame who was half-Mexicano
Gave the ass up, I'm a mack daddy Soprano
She passed me the indigo, but the imbecile
Shoulda never tippy-toed, thought my eyes were closed
Openin' the hotel room door to let her goons in
But I moved in a manner on some Jet Li shit
I let the hammers blow, wet three kids
See honey thought I had somethin' to do with all the drama
'Cause I was with a crew that had her people killed
Called up my cousin, told him I ain't fuckin' with you
He responded "cool," but told me out here this how mothafuckas—

[Hook: James Brown sample]
Get down, get down! Get down, get down!
Get, get, get, get, get, get, get down!
Everybody
Get down, get down! Get down, get down!
Get, get, get, get, get, get, get down!

[Outro: Salaam Remi]
All I really gotta say is that
If that's how our people gon' get down, how we ever gon' get up?
How we ever gon' get up if that's how we get down?
A shame when you really look at it
My folk against your folk, but we all kinfolk
Somebody got to make a change



[Produced by No I.D.]

(Staaaaaaaay...)

[Hook]
(Staaaaaaaay...) Oooh-oooh-ooooh-ooooooh
Oooh-oooh-ooooooh, ooh-ooooh...
Staaaaaaaay... Oooh-oooh-ooooh-ooooooh
Oooh-oooh-ooooooh, ooooh-ooh-oh...

[Verse 1]
Peace to the Five Percenters, online engine inventors
Shout to them niggas, family men, bringing home dinners
Watch out for desperate lonely women, hurt your happy home
Miserable and alone, kissable, nice to bone
She not the type deserving of a throne
Her beauty is her curse, she fuck for shoes and a purse
Make me a movie first, can watch you on my phone
I shop in Barcelona, I spend some nights in Rome
Feel like a Knight from England
That's what I named my son, Knight
He was born to be one, that's how my game was won
White 740 Beamer, licked by an angel's tongue
I'm living dangerous son, she got a man, a famous one
Honey be pocket watching, she got a lot of options
Hard to make up her mind deciding which baller to rock with
Hot to death, slim pickings but I'm not impressed
She got the hottest sex, so I guess I'ma just.. stay

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
Even though I don't like you
Next Friday night can't wait to fight you
Locked up I would knife you, don't fuck with you
Last month I even bucked at you, you got locked
I felt bad, wait do I got love for you?
I might kill you but do I got love for you?
I want you dead under six feet of soil
At the same time, want you here to witness me while you in misery
We hate each other but it's love, what a thug mystery
Years ago they ate the hearts of a slain enemy
We enemies but your hatred could never enter me
Some seek fame cause they need validation
Some say hating is confused admiration
Spotlight on me, I still look twenty
Still get money, lady killer pushing a Bentley
Maybe niggas could see too much of they failures
Through a nigga who realer
I don't like you near bruh, but I need you to.. stay

[Hook]



[Produced By: Live Squad, Lo Ground & Top General Sounds]

[Hook]
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that

[Verse 1]
Yeah
I never brag how real I keep it, cause it's the best secret
I rock a vest prestigious, Cuban link flooded Jesus
In a Lex watching Kathie Lee and Regis
My actions are one with the seasons
A TEC squeezing executioner
Wintertime I rock a fur
Mega popular center of attraction
Climaxing, my bitches, they be laughing
They high from sniffing coke off a twenty-cent Andrew Jackson
City lights spark a New York night
Rossi and Martini sipping, Sergio Tacchini
Flipping mad pies, low price
I blow dice and throw them
.45 by my scrotum, manifest the Do or Die slogan
My niggas roll in ten M3's
Twenty Gods popping wheelies on Kawasakis
Hip hop's got me on some ol', spraying shots like a drum roll
Blanking out and never miscount the shells my gun hold
I don't stunt, I regulate
Henny and Sprite, I separate, watching crab niggas marinate
I'm all about TECs, a good jux and sex
Israelite books, holding government names from Ness
MC's are crawling out every hole in the slum
You be aight like blood money in a pimp's cum

[Hook]
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
For you wack MC's

[Verse 2]
Currency has made in trust of the Messiah
I'm spending it to get higher
Earth, Wind and Fire singing reasons why I'm
Up early, trustworthy is a nine that bust early
Sunshine on my grill, I spill Remy on imaginary graves
Put my hat on my waves, latter Day Saints say religious praise
I dolo, challenge any team or solo
You must be bugging out, new to my shit, home on a furlough
Ask around who's laid up, sharp and straight up
Mafioso, getting niggas' wakes sprayed up
Skies are misty, my life's predicted by a gypsy
I'll one day walk into shots, drunk off champagne from Sicily
This be the drama, I'mma pause like a comma
In a sentence, paragraph's indented
Bloodshot red eyes high, yellow envelopes of lye
Opening cigars let tobacco fly
Condos are tune-proof, we're looking out the sky's moonroof
Shitting like gin and prune juice
Yo the system wants the coon's noose, hang 'em high
Courtrooms filled up, it's off the hook while I
Just wrote a statement, like I'm facing twenty years
In the basement, chilling on the VI with Mumia
For wearing chrome, I told the judge snakes slither
Like Sharon Stone but like Capone I'm thrown, yo

[Hook]
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
For you wack MC's
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
For you wack MC's

[Verse 3]
Yo the time is wasting, I use the mind elevation
Dime sack lacing, court pen pacing
Individual, lyrical math abrasion
Psychic evaluation, the foulest nation
We living in dangerous lives, mad leak and battered wives
A lifestyle on bad streets is patternized
Wise men build and destroy
While the real McCoy dope fiend named Detroit is still dealing boy
Coke suppliers acting biased
Cause rumors say that nigga's wear wires and we liars
But every night the gat's fired and every day a rat's hired
I still remain the mack flyest in the phat Kani's
Just a killer in me, slash drug dealer MC
Ex-slug filler, semi mug peeler
Demi, bottles of Mo', yo simply follow me flow
Put poetry inside a crack pot and blow
Rough hoes pull crack out pussies and buttholes
Bring the G's and the D's roll, they can't touch those
Why shoot the breeze about it when you could be about it
My degrees are routed, toward the peasy haired brick houses
Instead of the fake medallions
Rich niggas transport in thousands
Foreign cash exchange amounting to millions
Doors is locked, rocks is chopped, watch the cameras in the ceilings
Trick bitches catching mad feelings
Peeling off in the Lex Jeep, techniques is four-wheeling
I bet it be some shit when we connect with Stretch
When we catch them sex niggas with the tecs you blessed word
So now it's on, never wasted a slug
Time is money when it comes to mine, take it in blood

[Hook]
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
For you wack MC's
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
I made it like that, I bought it like that, I'm living like that
For you wack MC's

[Outro]
Yea, Capone-n-Noreaga
Yeah yo offical Queensbridge murderers
Mobb Deep keep it real though
Mothafucking AZ yo
Mega, Mega, whatever
Scarlett O'Hara, Fox Boogie
East New York
Yambo, Brownsville
Wizard, Far Rockaway
Big Bow, Jersey
Connecticut, DC, Sudan
VA, NC, LA
So on and so on
Big Ha, Houston Fifth Ward
Black Ed, keep it real Moe



[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Intro]
Damn
Look how muh-fuckers use a nigga
Just use me for whatever the fuck they want
I don't get to say shit
Just grab me, just do what the fuck they want
Sell me, throw me away
Niggas just don't give a fuck about a nigga like me, right
Like I'm a f-, I'm a gun, shit
It's like I'm a motherfucking gun
I can't believe this shit
Word up, word up

[Verse 1]
I seen some cold nights and bloody days
They grab me and bullets spray
They use me wrong so I sing this song 'til this day
My body is cold steel for real
I was made to kill, that's why they keep me concealed
Under car seats they sneak me in clubs
Been in the hands of mad thugs
They feed me when they load me with mad slugs
Seventeen precisely, one in my head
They call me Desert Eagle, semi-auto with lead
I'm seven inches four pounds, been through so many towns
Ohio to Little Rock to Canarsie, living harshly
Beat up and battered they pull me out
I watch as niggas scattered, making me kill
But what I feel it never mattered
When I'm empty I'm quiet, finding myself fiending to be fired
A broken safety, niggas place me in shelves
Under beds so I beg for my next owner to be a thoroughbred
Keep me full up with hollow heads

[Hook]
How you like me now? I go blaow
It's that shit that moves crowds making every ghetto foul
I might have took your first child
Scarred your life, or crippled your style
I gave you power, I made you buck-wild
How you like me now? I go blaow
It's that shit that moves crowds making every ghetto foul
I might have took your first child
Scarred your life, or crippled your style
I gave you power, I made you buck-wild

[Verse 2]
Always I'm in some shit
My abdomen is the clip, the barrel is my dick uncircumcised
Pull my skin back and cock me
I bust off when they unlock me
Results of what happens to niggas shock me
I see niggas bleeding running from me in fear, stunningly tears
Fall down the eyes of these so-called tough guys, for years
I've been used in robberies, giving niggas heart to follow me
Placing peoples in graves, funerals made cause I was sprayed
I was laid in a shelf, with a grenade
Met a wrecked-up Tec with numbers on his chest that say
Five-two-oh-nine-three-eight-five and zero
Had a serial defaced, hoping one day police would place
Where he came from, a name or some sort of person to claim him
Tired of murdering, made him wanna be a plain gun
But yo, I had some other plans like the next time the beef is on
I make myself jam right in my owner's hand

[Hook]
How you like me now? I go blaow
It's that shit that moves crowds making every ghetto foul
I might have took your first child
Scarred your life, or crippled your style
I gave you power, I made you buck-wild
How you like me now? I go blaow
It's that shit that moves crowds making every ghetto foul
I might have took your first child
Scarred your life, or crippled your style
I gave you power, I made you buck-wild

[Verse 3]
Yo, weeks went by and I'm surprised
Still stuck in the shelf with all the things that an outlaw hides
Besides me it's bullets, two vests and then a nine
There's a grenade in a box, and that Tec that kept crying
Cause he ain't been cleaned in a year he's rusty, it's clear
He's bout to fall to pieces cause of his murder career
Yo I can hear somebody coming in, open the shelf
His eyes bubbling, he said it was on
I felt his palm troubled him shaking
Somebody stomped him out, his dome was aching
He placed me on his waist, the moment I've been waiting
My creation was for Blacks to kill Blacks
It's gats like me that accidentally go off, making niggas memories
But this time, it's done intentionally
He walked me outside, saw this cat
Cocked me back, said, "Remember me?"
He pulled the trigger but I held on, it felt wrong
Knowing niggas is waiting in hell for him
He squeezed harder, I didn't budge, sick of the blood
Sick of the thugs, sick of wrath of the next man's grudge
What the other kid did was pull out, no doubt
A newer me in better shape, before he lit out, he lead the chase
My owner fell to the floor his wig split so fast
I didn't know he was hit, it's over with
Heard mad niggas screaming, niggas running, cops is coming
Now I'm happy, until I felt somebody else grab me
Damn



[Hook: Aloe Blacc and Lin-Manuel Miranda]
I wrote my way out
When the world turned its back on me
I was up against the wall
I had no foundation
No friends and no family to catch my fall
Running on empty, with nothing left in me but doubt
I picked up a pen
And wrote my way out (I wrote my way out)

[Verse 1: Nas]
I picked up the pen like Hamilton
Street analyst, now I write words that try to channel 'em
No political power, just lyrical power
Sittin' on a crate on a corner, sippin' for hours
Schemin' on a come up, from evening'to sun up
My man awaitin' trial, misdemeanors we younger
Courtroom prejudice, insufficient evidence
Jailhouse lawyers, these images still relevant
Flickerin' lights inside my project hall
Sickenin', the mice crawl all night long
And '87 Reaganism, many pages I've written on
Writin' songs about rights and wrongs and bails bonds
Master bedroom, bigger than the crib that I was raised at
I'm the architect like I wrote the code to Waze app
I'm driven, black Elohim from the streets of Queens
The definition of what It Was Written means
Know what I mean?

[Hook: Aloe Blacc and Lin-Manuel Miranda]
I wrote my way out
When the world turned its back on me
I was up against the wall
I had no foundation
No friends and no family to catch my fall
Running on empty, there was nothing left in me but doubt
I picked up a pen
And I wrote my way out (I wrote my way out)

[Verse 2: Dave East]
I really wrote my way up out of 6E
Develop relationships with fiends, I know they miss me
Before the metrocards, it was tokens, I did the ten speed
Never had wrote a rhyme in my life, what was a sixteen?
At sixteen, arrested in housin', trips to the mountains
Came right back, trappin' off couches, watchin' for mouses
Only tools we was posed with, had a spot, smoke lit
The hate is just confusion, pay attention how them jokes switch
Diadora was my favorite, the Mark Buchanans
Mama couldn't afford them, I learned everythin' on the border
That's a big 8, Clicquot parties with private dancers with no mixtape
Bumble Bee Tuna, now we could get steak
I persevered, composition, I kept it close
Competition near, I'm a Spartan without the spear
Three hundred rhymes, it was written before I wrote it
Opportunity knockin', might miss it, that window closin'
This poetry in motion, I'm a poet

[Hook: Aloe Blacc and Lin-Manuel Miranda]
I wrote my way out
When the world turned its back on me
I was up against the wall
I had no foundation
No friends and no family to catch my fall
Running on empty, there was nothing left in me but doubt
I picked up a pen
And wrote my way out (I wrote my way out)

[Verse 3: Lin-Manuel Miranda]
High speed, dubbin' these rhymes in my dual cassette deck
Runnin' out of time like I'm Jonathan Larson's rent check
My mind is where the wild things are, Maurice Sendak
In withdrawal, I want it all, please give me that pen back
Y'all, I caught my first beatin' from the other kids when I was caught readin'
"Oh, you think you smart? Blah! Start bleedin'"
My pops tried in vain to get me to fight back
Sister tapped my brains, said, pssh, you'll get 'em right back
Oversensitive, defenseless, I made sense of it, I pencil in
The lengths to which I'd go to learn my strengths and knock 'em senseless
These sentences are endless, so what if they leave me friendless?
Damn, you got no chill, fuckin' right I'm relentless
I know Abuela's never really gonna win the lottery
So it's up to me to draw blood with this pen, hit an artery
This Puerto Rican's brains are leakin' through the speakers
And if he can be the shinin' beacon this side of the G.W.B and
Shine a light when it's gray out

[Bridge: Aloe Blacc and Lin-Manuel Miranda]
I wrote my way out
Oh, I was born in the eye of a storm
No lovin' arms to keep me warm
This hurricane in my brain is the burden I bear
I can do without, I'm here (I'm here)
Cause I wrote my way out

[Outro: Nas, Dave East, Lin-Manuel Miranda]
I picked up the pen like Hamilton
I wrote my way out of the projects
Wrote-wrote my way out of the projects
Picked up the pen like Hamilton
I wrote my way out of the
Wrote-wrote my way out of the projects
I wrote my way out
Picked up the pen like Hamilton
I wrote my way out of the

[Spoken: Nas & Lin-Manuel Miranda]
(I wrote my way out)
Really, I saw like a hole in the rap game, so if I wanted to put my little two cents in the game, then it would be from a different perspective
(I wrote my way out)
I thought that I would represent for my neighborhood and tell their story, be their voice, in a way that nobody has done it
Tell the real story



[Produced by No I.D.]

[Verse 1: Nas]
You cocked back
You thought you had it planned, you thought you had your man
He saw you coming, he ran when you tried to blast that man
You missed him by inches, he sprinted
Some of his boys on the corner was who your bullets entered
Two of em pull through but one didn't, son's finished, you took the life of him
The part about it that's crazy, you was aight with him
Tight with him, why was he in the way?
Why was he standing next to the enemy that specific day?
His style never hollas loud, stays reclusive
Good dude, got that look like he always about to do shit
Side of his mouth toothpick, one eyebrow raised
Got into it with dude who still tried to live out his old wild out days
They never had no probs
Somehow they rubbed each other wrong like a bad massage
These two different personalities had to collide
Niggas could not aim and innocent niggas died
You ask why, cause of a

[Hook: Nas]
Accident murderer, act like you killed on purpose
Liars brag, you put work in
You ain't mean to murk him, your gun's a virgin
Streets are full of em, read the bulletin
Accident murderer
You just an accident murderer

[Verse 2: Rick Ross]
We grew up doing graffiti, now hollow heads getting heated
Seated in foreign cars, constantly getting weeded
Proceeded to count profits, I know they got on binoculars
But fuck em all, we balling 'til they come lock us up
20 to life; I'm clubbing, blowing 20 tonight
We the mob, Bob Marley Marlin' all through the night
Addicted to wealth, never cold turkey to war
Snatch a TEC off the shelf, live forever; that's Insh'Allah
Memoirs of a rich nigga
Sweat suits, gold chains, old drug dealers
New Benz, chrome rims are for show, killer
You niggas accidental, shoppers in back of the limo
Pay your tithes, stay alive, can't be dodging my clique
Cut a check; I use your bitch for some bargaining chips
In a hole, sell your home, nigga go sell your soul
This forty-five in control, God forgives and I don't

[Hook]

[Bridge: Nas]
Accident murderer
Accident murderer, you just an accident murderer

[Verse 3: Nas]
Yo, for my nigga that got killed, got hit up
Vodka spills on the concrete, light a swisha, we miss ya
And for that girl who never made it home, shot in the dome
How they gon' kill that beautiful sista?
Violent adolescents, homicidal with weapons
Not a lot of knowledge inside of they minds, that I'm guessing
Tell me who you impressing
Shooters I knew them when they was babies, I used to test them
Make em throw up they hands, choke 'em out playing wrestling
Watch em grow to a man, I see them now they repping
But they cold-blooded, homie, wondering where the respect went
Can't play with these little niggas, gangsta little niggas
Can't hang with these little niggas, they're killing, they're reckless
Wish I could build with him, but will he change really?
Some real killers, I think of Wayne Perry
Think of my nigga Drawz, but you aren't a name to me
You ain't mean to kill him, it wasn't necessary
[Hook]



[Produced by Tracksmasters]

[Hook]
Street dreams are made of these
Niggas push Beamers and 300 E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reaching a key
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees, for niggas with big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's looking for something

[Verse 1]
My man put me up for the share, one-fourth of a square
Headed for Delaware with one change of gear
Nothing on my mind but the dime sack we blazed
With the glaze in my eye, that we find when we crave
Dollars and cents, a fugitive with two attempts
Jakes had no trace of the face, now they drew a print
Though I'm innocent til proven guilty
I'mma try to get filthy, purchase a club and start up a realty
For real G, I'mma fullfill my dream
If I conceal my scheme then precisely I'll build my cream
The first trip without the clique
Sent the bitch with the quarter brick this is it
Fresh face, NY plates got a crooked eye for the Jakes
I want it all, ArmorAll Benz and endless papes
God sake, what a nigga got to do to make a half million
Without the FBI catching feelings

[Hook]
Street dreams are made of these
Niggas push Beamers and 300 E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reaching a key
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees, for niggas with big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's looking for something

[Verse 2]
From Fat Cat to Pappy, niggas see the cat
Twenty-five to flat, push a thousand feet back
Holding gats wasn't making me fat, snitches on my back
Living with Moms, getting it on, flushing crack down the toilet
Two sips from being alcoholic
Nine hundred ninety nine thou from being rich but now I'm all for it
My man saw it like Dionne Warwick
A wiser team, for a wiser dream we could all score with
The cartel Argentina coke with the nina
Up in the hotel, smoking on Sessamina
Trina got the fishscale between her
The way the bitch shook her ass yo the dogs never seen her
She got me back living sweeter, fresh Caesar
Guess, David Robinson's, Wally moccasins
Bitches blow me while hopping in the drop-top BM
Word is bond son, I had that bitch down on my shit like this

[Hook]
Street dreams are made of these
Niggas push Beamers and 300 E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reaching a key
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees, for niggas with big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's looking for something

[Verse 3]
Growing up project-struck, looking for luck, dreaming
Scoping the large niggas beaming, check what I'm seeing
Cars, ghetto stars pushing ill Europeans
G'n, heard about them old timers OD'n
Young early 80's, throwing rocks at the crazy lady
Worshipping every word them rope-rocking niggas gave me
The street raised me up giving a fuck
I thought Jordan's and a gold chain was living it up
I knew the dopes, the pushers, the addicts, everybody
Cut out of class, just to smoke blunts and drink noddy
Ain't that funny, getting put on to crack money
With all the gunplay, painting the kettle black hungry
A case of beers in the staircase I wasted years
Some niggas went for theirs, flipping coke as they career
But I'm a rebel stressing, to pull out of the heat no doubt
With Jeeps tinted out, spending never holding out

[Hook]
Street dreams are made of these
Niggas push Beamers and 300 E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reaching a key
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees, for niggas with big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Niggas push Beamers and 300 E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reaching a key
Everybody's looking for something
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees, for niggas with big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's looking for something



[Intro]
It's like a cold story.. repeated over and over..
In the winters of my mind
This shit be real, man..
Shit's crazy out here..
Yo yo, yo what up y'all?
That's my niggas over there, word

[Verse 1]
If you scared to take chances, you'll never have the answers
I could tell the future of a dude how his stance is
Wonder will he shoot then you should study where his hands is
Is he gon' cock it and pop it? His waistband big
But he don't have that thing in him, slangin just ain't in him
Body language is off, he's soft
But soft niggas all a sudden start dumpin', frontin'
Cause he feel a way: my niggas say the eyes is a giveaway
One look could tell me if you really came to kill me
Be the quiet nigga lookin' lame with the milli
Who that over there creepin'? Who homie by the tree?
Better safe than sorry, look at p-noid me
Few machine guns close, we could squeeze all three
Be a cold day in hell before they creep on me
It’s a lesson every premonition
Lot of niggas killed ‘cause they wasn't payin' attention, listen

[Hook]
I want a bitch I can trust, some niggas I can trust
Accountants lookin' over my figures I can trust
A lawyer that’s fightin' for my decisions I can trust
Damn my nigga, trust, I can never get enough
Or Rugers I can trust, shooters I can trust
Goons that know how to spot out a Judas I can trust
And if I can't trust you, the fuck is you here for?
Some of you niggas’ true colors becomin' clear more

[Verse 2]
It’s been so long, can’t remember how we begun this war
This is a ever-lasting thunderstorm, cause guns went off
I see your moms, she still speak
She don’t know I ain’t cool with her son no more
It’s old shit, see forever we holdin' this grudge
Takes real men to squash beef, end it with hugs
We buried our dead, been years, why should I worry 'bout him?
Constantly watchin' my back, plus niggas tellin' I dread
Another day I put a family in black
Though I be calm and relaxed
Though I know somehow it will come back
Even if I’m in the right, ‘cause still a life is a life
What was it worth to see you covered in dirt?
It’s quite redundant, whether you the hunter or the hunted
Mothers cry, no statute of limitation on a homicide
Just tattoos of my niggas’ names
I wonder, will it change? Let’s ride…

[Hook]
I want a bitch I can trust, some niggas I can trust
Accountants lookin' over my figures I can trust
A lawyer that’s fightin' for my decisions I can trust
Damn my nigga, trust, I can never get enough
Or Rugers I can trust, shooters I can trust
Goons that know how to spot out a Judas I can trust
And if I can’t trust you, the fuck is you here for?
Some of you niggas’ true colors becomin' clear more

[Verse 3]
It’s rare I listen to niggas who never been in my position
A caterpillar can’t relate to what an eagle envisions
From the mind of a man who went at it with killers
Sit down, little man, let me school you in hood business
Seen a lot of niggas blow, lot of dreams folded
Some wasn’t humble, ate too much, got bloated
Ain’t too much left to buy, bought it, I’m loaded, I guess
Lear jets, I ask myself: do I need love or success?
They say the artist that truly suffers, his stuff is the best
‘Cause his heart bleed on his sleeve: pain, pistols and sex
Remember spray paintin' the word "fresh" and then starin' at it
Older folks angry, pointin', swearin' at it
Buildings I sprayed, nowadays drive the McLaren past it
Same old man from years ago told me life is short
So from infant to geriatric, trust your own judgment
Live with it and love it

[Hook]
I want a bitch I can trust, some niggas I can trust
Accountants lookin' over my figures I can trust
A lawyer that’s fightin' for my decisions I can trust
Damn my nigga, trust, I can never get enough
Or Rugers I can trust, shooters I can trust
Goons that know how to spot out a Judas I can trust
And if I can’t trust you, the fuck is you here for?
Some of you niggas’ true colors becomin' clear more



[Produced by will.i.am]

[Intro: will.i.am & Nas]
Hip hop, hip hop (Ugh!) is dead
(Had to flip this track again, y'all!)
Hip, hip hop, hip hop (Ugh!) is dead
Hip, hip hop (Ugh!)
Hip, hip hop is dead (NYC! Dirty South!)
Hip, hip hop (West Coast!)
Hip hop (Midwest!)
Hip hop (Let's go!)

[Hook: Nas & will.i.am]
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll load an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
(Hip hop just died this morning
And she's dead, she's dead)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, niggas smoke, chill, party and die in the same corner
Get cash, live fast, body their man's mama
Quick fast, trigger fingers on the llama
Revenge in their eyes, Hennessy and the ganja
Word to the wise with villain state of minds
Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind
Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind
(Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind)
Whenever, if ever, I roll up, it's sown up
Any ghetto will tell ya, "Nas helped grow us up"
My face once graced promotional Sony trucks
Hundred million and billin', I helped blow 'em up
Gave my man my right, I could have went left
So like my girl Foxy, the kid went deaf
So people, who's your top 10? Is it MC Shan? Is it MC Ren?

[Hook: Nas & will.i.am]
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll load an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
(Hip hop just died this morning
And she's dead, she's dead)

[Verse 2: Nas]
The bigger the cap, the bigger the peelin'
Come through, something ill, missing the ceilin'
What influenced my raps? Stick-ups and killings
Kidnappings, project buildings, drug dealings
Criticize that, why's that?
‘Cause Nas rap is compared to legitimized crap
‘Cause we love to talk on nasty chickens
Most intellectuals will only half listen
So you can't blame jazz musicians
Or David Stern with his NBA fashion issues
Oh, I think they like me, in my white tee
You can't ice me, we here for life, B
On my second marriage, hip hop's my first wifey
And for that, we not taking it lightly
If hip hop should die, we die together
Bodies in the morgue lie together, all together now

[Hook: Nas & will.i.am]
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll load an extended clip and body 'em all day
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
Roll to every station, wreck the DJ
(Hip hop just died this morning
And she's dead, she's dead)

[Verse 3: Nas]
Everybody sound the same, commercialize the game
Reminiscing when it wasn't all business
It forgot where it started
So we all gather here for the dearly departed
Hip-hopper since a toddler
One homeboy became a man, then a mobster
If it dies, let me get my last swig of vodka
RIP, we'll donate your lungs to a rasta
Went from turntables to MP3's
From "Beat Street"to commercials on Mickey D's
From gold cables to Jacobs
From plain facials to Botox and face lifts
I'm looking over my shoulder
It's about 80 people from my hood that showed up
And they came to show love
Sold out concert and the doors are closed shut



[Produced by No I.D.]

[Intro]
Oooooh-ooooh-oooooooh
42nd Street Terminal

{*Sounds of a subway train*}

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yo, yo, I live it and I speak it, my religion is reefer
Big money and the most uninhibited freak to sleep with
My visions are realistic, nothing is figurative
I can wish it into existence, God want this nigga to live
Blunt big as a dread, I get high and forget who bled
Who we stomp-kicked in the head and who we left for dead
Who are you niggas? Why argue niggas?
The truth is the truth, I really put my scars on niggas
They wear them lifetime, they tell they hoes, Nas did this
Pointing to they scars like, right here, baby, really Nas did this
Like a badge of honor, not bragging I'm just honest
War stories we tell them, nothing's realer than karma
Sip prohibition liquor, prohibition whiskey
Rap Jack Dempsey, matte black Bentley, pimply
Shatterin' your silence, passing round the chalice
Due to my Indian ancestry at the weed dispensery
Official kings and gents is who I mix and mingle with
Fuck your ice, I rock rubies, amethyst
I'll fuck your wife cause she a groupie, scandalous
This for my bad hood bitches, ghetto glamorous

[Break: Large Professor]
Yo, what we talkin 'bout niggas?
What we talkin 'bout niggas?
This is Nas, what, Nas
What, Nasty, what, recollect motherfucker

[Verse 2: Nas]
Uhh, uhh, uhh
At seventeen I made seventeen thousand living in public housing
Integrity intact, repping hard
They askin' how he disappear and reappear back on top
Sayin' Nas must have naked pictures of God or something
To keep winning is my way like Francis
As long as I'm breathing, I'll take chances
A soldier comin' home, twenty years old with no legs
Sayin' there's no sense to cry and complain, just go 'head
So much to write and say, yo I don't know where to start
So I'll begin with the basics and flow from the heart
I know you think my life is good cause my diamond piece
But my life been good since I started finding peace
I shouldn't even be smiling, I should be angry and depressed
I been rich longer than I been broke, I confess
I started out broke, got rich, lost paper then made it back
Like Trump being up down up, play with cash, huh

[Break: Large Professor]
My nigga's like a locomotive
Nas, we pushed it, mush it
Queensbridge to Bushwick
Harlem, Bronx, all that
You ain't even supposed to be here
You know where you at?

[Verse 3: Nas]
At night, New York, eat a slice too hot
Use my tongue to tear the skin hanging from the roof of my mouth
Shit was felicissimo melting pot, city sweltering hot
Staggering, drunker than those cops that 2Pac shot
I was a crook by the train with that iron thing, concealed reaching
Soon as I heard them iron wheels screeching
When it came to a halt whoever walked off got caught
Token man safe behind a locked door for sure
Minor thief shit, minor league shit, beasting
Looking for the juks young, but now we older chiefing
In my truck, play The Greatest Adventures of Slick Rick
Bugging on how his imagination was so sick
It's ghetto beef, sinister niggas snicker through yellow teeth
Alcohol aging my niggas faster than felonies
How dare I, must be, something in the air that corrupts me
Look at my upkeep, owned and sublease, I'm here y'all

[Outro]
This for my trapped in the 90s niggas
For my trapped in the 90s niggas
Ha for y'all niggas



[Produced by Megahertz]

[Intro: sample from "Woke Up This Morning" by Alabama 3] + (Nas)
Woke up this mornin (yeah)
You got yourself a gun (yeah, yeah, yeah)
Got yourself a gun

[Hook]
Yo, I'm livin' in this time behind enemy lines
So, I got mine, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You from the hood, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You want beef, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
And when I see you I'ma take what I want
So you tried to front, hope you (got yourself a gun)
You ain't real, hope you (got yourself a gun)

[Verse 1]
My first album had no famous guest appearances
The outcome: I'm crowned the best lyricist
Many years on this professional level
Why would you question who's better?
The world is still mine, tattoo's real
With "God's Son" across the belly, the boss of rap
You saw me in Belly with thoughts like that
To take it back to Africa, I did it with Biggie
Me and 2Pac were soldiers of the same struggle
You lames a huddle, your teams shook, y'all feel
The wrath of a killer, ‘cause this is my football field
Throwin' passes from a barrel, shoulder pads, apparel
But the QB don't stand for no quarterback
Every word is like a sawed-off blast ‘cause y'all all soft
And I'm the black hearse that came to haul y'all ass in
It's for the hood by the corner store
Many try, many die, come at Nas if you want a war, get it bloody!

[Hook]
Yo, I'm livin' in this time behind enemy lines
So, I got mine, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You from the hood, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You want beef, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
And when I see you I'ma take what I want
So you tried to front, hope you (got yourself a gun)
You ain't real, hope you (got yourself a gun)

[Verse 2]
I'm the N, the A to the S-I-R
And If I wasn't, I must've been Escobar
You know the kid got his chipped tooth fixed
Hair parted with a barber's preciseness
Bravehearted for life, it's
The return of the Golden Child, son of a blues player
So who are you, player? Y'all awaited the true savior
Puffin' that tropical, cups of that vodka, too
Papi chu', tore up, wake up in a hospital
Throw up? Never! 'Member I do this through righteous steps
You Judas thought I was gone, so in light of my death
Y'all been all happy-go-lucky, bunch of sambos
Call me "God's Son" with my pants low
I don't die slow, put them rags up like Petey Pablo
This is NASDAQ though, in my Nascar, with this Nas flow
What could beat that? Not a soul reppin'
Hit the record store, never let me go, get my whole collection, yo

[Hook]
Yo, I'm livin' in this time behind enemy lines
So, I got mine, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You from the hood, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You want beef, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
And when I see you I'ma take what I want
So you tried to front, hope you (got yourself a gun)
You ain't real, hope you (got yourself a gun)

[Verse 3]
It's the return of the prince, the boss
This is real hardcore, Kid Rock and Limp Bizkit soft
Sip Cris, get chips, wrist glist – I floss
Stick-shift look sick up in that Boxster Porsche
With the top cut off, rich kids go and cop The Source
They don't know about the blocks I'm on
And everybody wanna know where the kid go
Where he rest at, where he shop at and dress at
Know he got dough, where does he live? Is he still in the Bridge?
Does he really know how ill that he is?
Got all of y'all watchin' my moves, my watch and my jewels
Hop in my coupe, dodge interviews like that
It's not only my jewels, ice anything, plenty chains
Look at my tennis shoes, I iced that
Who am I? The back twister, lingerie ripper
Automatic leg-spreader, quicker brain-getter
Keepin' it gangsta with ya (uhh)

[Hook]
Yo, I'm livin' in this time behind enemy lines
So, I got mine, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You from the hood, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
You want beef, I hope you (got yourself a gun)
And when I see you I'ma take what I want
So you tried to front, hope you (got yourself a gun)
You ain't real, hope you (got yourself a gun)



[Hook]
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official

[Verse 1]
Y'all don't know about my Biggie wars
Who you thought "Kick in the Door" was for?
But that's my heart, y'all still trippin' off the Jigga shit
Real niggas listen up and I'ma tell you how the whole thing start
Off top I brung Queens up from hard times
Rockin' at the Fever, streets was all mine
It was my version of the blues, droppin' out schools
The crack epidemic had rap representin' the rules
So I got in them shoes, tried 'em, wore them
Wasn't a perfect fit so I couldn't sport 'em
Young murderers ride, I knew all them
Jungle got shot, Will died, we was warrin'
I wrote it in my album
I was 18 when Lake seen the Island, and Lord held me down and
My surroundings started changin', I had a baby
I was makin' my rounds with AZ
Niggas started noticin' my flow and was open when
The Golden Child closed 'em in
With more style than them older men
Puff tried to start a label, Prince Rakeem had formed Wu-Tang
Snoop and Dre had a new thing
So Puff drove his new Range through Queensbridge Projects
He let me drive it, before Ready to Die hit
Big and I hit blunts performin' at the Ark
Next thing you knew, Big blew and all the ballin' starts
He had Kim in his crew, I found Fox
Only niggas in New York with number one charts
Big was ahead of his time, him and Raekwon
My niggas; but dig it, they couldn't get along
That's when Ghostface said it on The Purple Tape
Bad Boy bitin' Nas album cover way
Big told me Rae was stealin' my slang
And Rae told me, out in Shaolin, Big would do the same thing
But I borrowed from both them niggas
Jigga started to flow like us, but hit with "Ain't No Niggas"
Had much Versace swagger
Big admired the Brooklynite and took him in as Iceberg the rapper
Today, don't know nothin' about this boss shit
There's more shit than wantin' to be this King of New York shit

[Hook]
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official

[Verse 2]
Rap became a version of Malcom and Martin
Rest in peace Will, Queensbridge live on
There's some ghetto secrets I can't rhyme in this song
There's some missing pieces I had to leave out
Had lost trust for Steve Stoute at some point 'til I got to know him
We old friends, but what's loyal?
Puff soaked Interscope offices with champagne bottles on Steve
And Steve thought the drama's on me
'Cause previously it would've been, against whoever
Friends forever
However, I learn, with some niggas it's all business
But I'm a street dude with morals
Then this nigga's with Jigga too much
He used to say Jay wanted my spot
I laughed, stayed home, never hung a lot
A quiet man who used to be alone plannin'
Baby moms thought I was too quiet, couldn't stand it
She hit the streets, later on she hittin' the sheets
With a rapper who wanted me on his songs, thinkin' he strong
I taught her how to watch for cars who might follow
Taught her street shit that I know
Her weakness was shine yo
But that's her, I ain't mad, baby, it made me stronger
Now I get my paper longer
Illmatic I was boss, It Was Written I flossed
One of the most creative LP's ever to hit stores
In the Firm I learned I Am NaStradamus
QB's Finest, Oochie Wally, faced more problems
I gave it all up so I can chill at home with Mama
She was gettin' old and sick so I stayed beside her
We had the best times, she asked would I make more songs
I told her not 'til I see her health get more strong
In the middle of that, Jay tried to sneak attack
Assassinate my character, degrade my hood
'Cause in order for him to be the Don, Nas had to go
The Gam-B-I-N-O rules I understood
What y'all want, see, I already had
The Gift and The Curse? Fuck that shit, the first shall be last
I'm the man's man, a rapper's rapper
G-O-D, S-O-N – they'll be none after
I was Scarface, Jay was Manolo
It hurt me when I had to kill him and his whole squad for dolo

[Hook]
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official
Lord have mercy, Jesus Christ
He's just nice, he just slice like a ginsu
Look at the life that I've been through
I'm the last real nigga alive, that's official



[Produced by Buckwild]

[Intro: Nas]
Yeah, Harlem, Bronx, Brooklyn

[Verse 1: Nas]
Let's make a bet, I know the reason you ain't make it yet
Your stage was set, but you ain't see the tedious ingredients
That go inside of a rider, you hiding from problems and
You never knew how to make dollars
You couldn't make orders at a drive-through McDonald's
I was fly at the Apollo with Black Jason, '89 with a bottle
Niggas jealous of Jason, dark green seven forty, no tint
Rollie on wrist, gleaming he rock the baldy
Used to ride with him to Brooklyn, Lewis and Halsey
Cop chocolate Thai, Vernon style and burn it down
My nigga hype in the federal joint, verdict out
Twenty years getting money in the Dirty South
That's alleged, you see my nigga's a stand up dude
So I'm yelling, "Free my nigga!"
My nephew godfather Malik, he jammed up too
For what his hands usually call for, but he ain't do it

[Hook: Victoria Monét]
Who you are ain't in the recipe to what I am
‘Cause where I'm from
Man, what I see, you wouldn't understand
Where I been and what I do
No matter how you try you never can
‘Cause where I'm from
Man, what I see, you wouldn't understand
Where I been, where I been

[Verse 2: Nas]
You ever been on the other end of a robber's revolver?
Not me, call me Lucky Nas Castellana
Or been shot in the medulla oblongata
And survived and praise God with a bullet I never collided
Some did and they lived, I salute the gods
Moët spilling, splashed by mistake on my Timb boots for y'all
N.Y. nigga, Adidas, jogging suit
Shelltoes, slim, fly nigga
Hudson River, rent a boat, t-shirt with a dinner coat
A vintage Fila like I'm the ghost of Domencio
On any day getting throat in a tinted vehicle
Like a old BK gangsta, but I'm the CEO
Of Nasty Nas Enterprises, mastermind, made men
My success symbolizes loyalty, great friends
Dedication, hard work, routine builds character
In a world full of snakes, rats and scavengers
Never make choices out of desperation, I think through it
Break through walls like Pink Floyd, and drink fluids
Of all kind of alcohol, y'all
Vineyards in France, yachts out in Cannes

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
Now holla at a millionaire
Rollie, Hublot and Audemar, deciding which one to wear
Who to screw, what to drive
550 with the cream guts inside
Or the Super Sport Range truck is fly
Diamond ring on my knuckles, like fire, bitch
Gats on us, I don't really trust these guys
Spend a couple bucks a night on bottles on cuties
If she beautiful, the lustful type, I'll hit it and bust inside
Fuck it, I'ma die one day
They gon' probably make that day a holiday
Until then, let's go on a shopping spree
Speaking for my real niggas
Only OG's, certified who kill niggas
When put in that seat, but tonight we on chill, nigga
Chill mode, spill more Spades
Listen to Yeezy and Hov, some Rozay
It's like we always on the grind with no brakes
So tonight we gon' act like we on vacation
With this on rotation

[Hook]

[Outro: Nas]
True B nigga, yeah
For my hood niggas, yeah, yeah
To my man Eric B, what up, yeah
The whole city, I see you
To my man Big Slate in the fed joint
My man Spunk, free my niggas
All my niggas, yeah
Club Vernon, I see you, I see you, yeah
And Baltum, I see you



[Intro: Nas]
All I do is stay focused
Looking straight forward at the world and beyond
I feel people pulling me down
I feel some pulling me up
I can't get stuck
I just keep moving forward
I got places to go man
Let's go

[Hook: Damian Marley]
When the armageddon's dark and dread
A lot of weak hearted weep and moan
Only the strong will continue
Do you have it in you?
Come, we've got a journey to go
And when the battle get sour and dread
A lot of weak hearted wither and  moan
Only the strong will continue
I know you have it in you
I know you have it in you

[Verse 1: Damian Marley]
Hey, the victory's found in truth
Like innocence found in youth
Self defeat is your own dispute
And man, you put yourself in your own shoes
Either you're winning or losing
Don't you get it confused
Play a star and you know your own movie
Playing of the role you choose, so
Stand up and fight if you know that you're right
And know you will never fail
Tipping the scale and the wind shall prevail
And the boat shall forever sail
Hey, there ain't no stopping or cruising
Even when you're battered and bruised
Outrun all the sprinters on Mount Olympus
My God's tougher than Zeus

[Hook: Damian Marley (Nas)]
When the Armageddon's dark and dread
(I get up and make it happen)
A lot of weak hearted wither and moan
(I get up and we get it cracking)
Only the strong will continue
Do you have it in you?
Come, we've got a journey to go
And when the battle get sour and dread
(I get up and I get it going)
A lot of weak hearted wither and moan
(We get up and we keep it flowing)
Only the strong will continue (yeah)
I know you have it in you (yeah, yeah)
I know you have it in you

[Verse 2: Nas]
As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
New York to Cali, for the money, power, respect
It's a journey, some'll get left behind
Cause in life, you cannot press rewind
Get it right, you only have one first chance
To make one first impression that lasts a lifetime
Reputation supersedes itself
Do you believe in Hell? Babylon greed for wealth
Do you deceive yourself and let your ego swell?
And disregard those who most need your help
Thick skin, the dark won't take my soul
Survive spiritual wars, see my welts
And the evil's felt, but the faith is stronger
I saw grown men fall when I was a youngster
But I clench my fists, ready to go against whoever
Tie my Timbs and rise in the end

[Hook: Damian Marley (Nas)]
When the armageddon's dark and dread
(I get up and make it happen)
A lot of weak hearted weep and moan
(I get up and we get it cracking)
Only the strong will continue
Do you have it in you?
Come, we've got a journey to go
And when the battle get sour and tread
(I get up and I get it going)
A lot of weak hearted wither and moan
(We get up and we keep it flowing)
Only the strong will continue (yeah)
I know you have it in you (yeah, yeah)
I know you have it in you

[Verse 3: Damian Marley]
No man live forever, but never say never
Every good he want better, must be a go getter
And always be clever in every endeavor
Cause drastic time call for drastic measure
Yuh birthright to pleasure From yuh navel string sever
The land and the treasure, work for whatever
Jah said don't be a beggar, the Alpha Omega
Will bless every soul no matter which name you prefer
The immortal stepper, believe in every skin no matter which color they are
We never let we don't know here which kind of weather
You're destined to rise like the Son of Rebecca
Don't stop for a second
Everyone reckon, it sure would be good to be there
Whether Zion or Mecca
When the gates are finally closed
And the saints go marching in

[Hook: Damian Marley (Nas)]

[Verse 4: Nas]
I'm a street lifer
Always harrassed by the cee cyphers
Chief like Geronimo with his peace pipe
I emerged from the street life
This for the homies who relate
Know what it be like
My QB life takin' a turn to the Louis XIII life
Twisted and mangled sort of like Bruce Lee life
Cursed with his son Brandon
If that's you and me, Knight, I pray our fates greater
I speak life I still matter as a rapper, not doubtin'
Even Toni Braxton signed a deal with Craig Kallman
How in, the hell am I supposed stay comfy
When I pay child support, alimony monthly?
Got Maseratis and Ferraris
Only like a woman who's a rider, But only ho's want me
Single life crazy, niggas wives on me
I say stay faithful, they say their man corny
So I'm, stuck with a married woman
So fine, cheatin while they husband
Rushing on the 40-yard line, wonder if
This is what my ex did the whole time
Good niggas seem to always end up
With some hard times, hope not
If a pimp slippin and a ho plot
Ain't nothin to a G in a two-tone drop, kid
And it don't stop, See a nigga dissapearin
With the baddest honeys in the whole spot, yeah



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Verse 1]
Rest in peace to Black Just
Riding through Jamaica Queens in his black truck
Timbs was forty below, waves to the side of his dome
Definition of good nigga, yo
Gangsters don’t die, niggas only become immortal
Angels don’t only fly, they walk right before you
In front of you
It’s foul what this money could do
Cash corrupts the loyal
I hung with E-Money too, the fucking truth
Fucking with Stretch from Live Squad, I could’ve died
The same night that Stretch died, I just got out of his ride
He dropped me off and drove to Springfield, November 30th
Another Queens king killed, it fucked me up, y’all
I was just trying to make it with Steve Stoute
The legal way, drug-free route, back in the days
They was sleeping on us, Brooklyn keep on taking it
Manhattan keep on making it, trying to leave Queens out
But we was pulling them Beems out, them M3’s out
Pumping bringing them D's out
Rastas selling chocolate weed inside of a weed house
Colosseum downstairs, gold teeth mouth
Astoria warriors, eight street, twin buildings
Vernon, can’t even count the Livingston children
Justice in Ravenswood, nice neighborhood
Caught sleeping out there, be a wrap though
Bridge niggas be up in Petey’s ten racks, yo
A simple bet on a serious cash flow
Get money, Manolo, welcome home Castro
Queensbridge unified all I ask for
Let’s do it for DU, say what up to Snacks, yo
I just salute real niggas when I pass through

[Verse 2]
Niggas is very hungry for that bank robbery
Bury money, trying to get to a Benz from a Hyundai
The Queens Courthouse right next to the cemetery
Niggas’ rap sheets look like obituaries
You be starving in Kew Gardens
Bolognas and milk from a small carton
You could still feel chills from the team on 118
My nigga Bim fly by like it’s a dream
His face on his Shirt Kings
Laced in a pinky ring, in his black Benz murking
Back when Black Rock and Ron was on the map
Cheeba in yellow sacks, dope sold in laundromats
Thugs bark, getting amped from weed
Over the heart of champions, see
Ever since back then, a nigga been about the dough
(You all know how the story GO!)

[Verse 3]
"Any other real niggas in the world besides us?" I ask
Probably is, but odds are we’ll never cross paths
Put your glass high if you made it out the stash spot
And here to tell a story and celebrate the glory
Drinks in the air for my niggas not here
This how we do, I see you DU
Queens to the heavens, salute the hood legends
Crack the Patrón, Hennessy and Glenlivets
Champagne bottles drowning out the sorrows
Hope the memories’ll get us through tomorrow
I’m a real OG cause back in '93
Niggas couldn’t fuck with me, sipping 'gnac since I was little
Laid back in a rental
Mouth shining, Eddie’s gold caps all up in the dental
Nigga getting money now
But you know I’m still mental but not simple
Put your glass high if you made it out the stash spot
And here to tell your story and celebrate the glory
Drinks in the air for my niggas not here
This for the fallen soldiers, hold it down, I told you
Pop another bottle and keep the smoke rolling

[Verse 4]
Watch the calm realist channel his mom’s spirit
Goosebumps cover me, mother’s here, I could feel her
Blood of Christ covers me, our savior and healer
Drug prices up or down, I know a few dealers
And some accident murderers, they act like they killed on purpose
Liars brag they put work in
You ain’t mean to murk him, your gun’s a virgin
Better stay on point, if not it’s curtains
Bebo Posse reincarnated through me probably
If music money didn’t stop me
I never claimed to be the toughest
Though I’m to blame for a few faces reconstructed
It’s the game that we was stuck with
Now I’m the only black in the club with rich Yuppie kids
Sad thing, this is the top, but where the hustlers went
No familiar faces around, ain’t gotta grab the musket
It’s all safe and sound, champagne by the bucket
Where them niggas I shouted out on my first shit
Bo cooking blow, fuck is Slate at? Where Turkey went?
Old videos show niggas that was murdered since
Another reason to get further bent
Put your glass high if you made it out the stash spot
And here to tell your story and celebrate the glory
Drinks in the air for my niggas not here
This for the fallen soldiers, hold it down, I told you
Pop another bottle and keep the smoke rolling



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Intro: Anthony Hamilton]
Lies and the pain
Betrayal; life

[Bridge: Anthony Hamilton]
In danger’s face
Look what you’re facing, gave your heart away
And all the remedies couldn’t ease the pain
All the hurt and betrayal; need to get away
In a world so cold
You gain your life just to lose your soul
Never thinking twice bout what the future holds
All the lies and the games not worth fighting for

[Refrain: Anthony Hamilton]
The world is an addiction
Serving up a fix
The world is an addiction
It's way too much for me

[Verse 1: Nas]
Snitches and rapists in the street, crime to the fullest
Asking niggas if they got any extra nine bullets
They deny me that
They know the bullets they loan me
Be the same ones that probably had them lying flat stretched out
Letter T
It's better to dead a beef than let it breathe
Then we don't succeed
Cause then you gotta murder dummies
Waste your time, they allergic to money
I'm never squirmish to blood
We can thug and get out of hand
What’s the options
Only conclusion is shooting
Bullets popping, hoodlums dropping
Fear any day that the feds will come knocking
Was young and nervous
Asking myself what’s my purpose
In the back of a paddy wagon, bracelets aching me
Pigs ignoring, I'm asking what precinct they taking me
These cops can’t relate to me
Death to prison, empty vacancy

[Refrain]

[Verse 2: Nas]
Thou shall not be selfish, real nigga commandments
Know a billionaire, he has everything but a fam
Guess how angry this man gets
Had so many bad chicks in his bed
Strange sex, same sex
Has addictions that are sadistic
Chain of events, habits
He puts cocaine on his prick and acts sick
Self-esteem needs boosting, alcohol consumption
Nicotine fusion, some athletes juicing
Pastors quote biblical chapters, Psalms
All along he’s into bestiality porn
And it’s wrong, so I keep the Cali weed in the bong
And I'm strong but the female anatomy got me sprung
And these women need shoes and baddest cars and condos
Fine clothes and these fiends needs to get high
So they find dough
To mainline dope, and y'all know

[Refrain]

[Verse 3: Nas]
So many vices, habits
Mine of course, bad chicks
My response to any advice on what is the essentials of life
I'm just rebellious, not selfish
Guess we all share different definitions of what wealth is
I need the best things in life, that's women, that’s cars, cigars
A vintage bottle on ice that’s priceless
The other night, just in the emergency room
A patient said she needs to see a doctor soon
Doctor busy operating on a lady who's sedated
He can barely concentrate cause he’s newly separated
His estranged wife likes entertaining her acquaintance
In the house they were married in, mad people waiting
Some young some old, heads and stomachs aching
Filling out an application cause they all need medication
But the doctor need love or a quick vacation
Calling up his travel agent
Same time, premedidating murdering his ex wife
Life, savage ain't it
Some need Xanax just to maintain it
We all need faith cause the world keep changing
Let go of the illusion, start some restraining

[Outro: Anthony Hamilton]
Just hold on



[Produced by Damian Marley]

[Hook 1: African Sample]

[Verse 1: Damien Marley]
These later days in Babylon as I watch your children grow
And the years them carry on and I miss you even more
Still I send them go to school and tell them
What dem fi know
All of mi friend dem mi salute, Daddi gon Lenny Screw
Another year has come and past, man a drop like morning dew
Uncle Warrick sick and gone when him couldn't catch a flu
Picka T you a mi don, respect long and overdue
When nothing never did a gwan you still have on somethin' new
Our friendship ever last all when one minus from few
Yes we surely had a blast, we're like family me and you
A nuh every path you cross lead to somebody whe true
Of the many that are called only chosen is a few

[Hook 2 - JR. GONG]
Of the real friends that serve you long
Your memories might fade
Your real friends will serve you long
Sunshine or rain
Your real friends will serve you long
Acquaintances will fade
Your real friends won't do you wrong
Real friend don't change

[Verse 2: Nas]
Only talking with winners, a loser or two got my number
Still they think they real but they just really awfully bitter
Salty niggas hate the smarter ones, these are the doubters
Who sour 'bout my run, I barely made it out the slums
My value high 'cause I do more than rap about a gun
I made money for niggas, y'all never looking out for none
I helped millionaires get to that very position
Some real millionaires see that's ill 'cause look at statistics
Real millionaires and I ain't talking ghetto riches, thorough business
You mistreating niggas, heard your folks bleed in prison
You ain't a G and if you was I don't recall
Who would roll with y'all, bunch of fucking know it  alls who's dough is small
Look what's it come to our rapport's good no more
We was good before till I saw what type a dude you took me for
We had a chance to take paper down, what I took was more
Because of hatred, opportunity wasted

[Hook 3 - JR. GONG]
Your real friends will serve you long
Your car and clothes will fade
Your real friend won't do you wrong
Real friend don't change Eh

[Verse 3: Damien Marley]
Your real friend won't run in war nuh care what the cost is
You real friends are in for all the wins and the losses
Fi Real! No question at all them ready fi rise the tallest
Take to the enemies all for one and one for all this
Real friend will hear you out, no secret feelings
Real friends won't sell you out, no bargain pleading
For real, always looking out a meal
When outside a drought your real friend won't hide you out, no

[Hook 4 - JR. GONG]
Your real friends will serve you long
When all else fails
Your real friend won't do you wrong
Real friend don't change

[Verse 4: Nas]
May laughter from backstabbers turn to tears faster
I wish for you no snake shall slither past ya you have to
Keep your vision clear cause only a coward lives in fear
My surroundings got only real powerful niggas here
Real men we have a code of ethics, no question
No jealousies, no feminine tendencies, we expecting
No gossip, no phony logic, no counting your homey pocket
Spare no expense for legal defense if your homey locked up
No keeping tabs on who was the last who looked out
Selfishness that's a character flaw, no holding out
Yo what happened to the honor, you're dealing withsensitive Primadonna drama
Teflon love for my dudes who solid

[Hook 5 - JR. GONG]
Your real friends will serve you long
Your memories might fade
Your real friends will serve you long
Sunshine or rain, eh
Your real friends will serve you long, woe ya woe
When all else fails
Your real friends won't do you wrong
Real friend don't change

[Verse 5 (bridge):  Damien Marley]
Now plentiful
Or scantily
My cup be full
Or emptily
With arm in arms
We'll all trod on
Through destiny
A friend that's true
Is there for me
Respect is due
They care for me
Should I be down
Or even out
They're next to me
Hey

[Hook OUT - Damien Marley]
Your real friends will serve you long
Your memories might fade
Your real friends will serve you long
Sunshine or rain, hey
Your real friends will serve you long, woe ya woe
When all else fails
Real friends won't do you wrong
Real friend don't change
Real friend don't change
Real friend don't change
Real friend don't change
Real friend don't change



[Produced by Large Professor]

[Verse 1]
Uh uh, yo
They plan was to knock me out the top of the game
But I overstand they truth is all lame
I hold cannons that shoot balls of flame
Right in they fat mouth then I carve my name
Nas – too real, Nas – true king
It's however you feel, go 'head, you swing
Your arms too short to box with God
I don't kill soloists, only kill squads
Fame went to they head, so now it's "Fuck Nas"
Yesterday you begged for a deal, today you tough guys
I seen it coming, soon as I popped my first bottle
I spotted my enemies tryna do what I do
Came in with my style, so I fathered you
I kept changing on the world since "... Barbeque"
Now you wanna hang with niggas I hung with
Fuck bitches I hit, it's funny I once said
If I, ever make a record, I take a cheque
And put something away for a rainy day to make my exit
But look at me now, ten years deep
Since the project bench with crack in my sock, asleep
I never asked to be top of rap's elite
Just a ghetto child tryna learn the traps of the streets
But look at me now

[Hook: sample of "Sugar Man" by Sixto Rodriguez]
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man

[Verse 2]
Now wait a sec', give me time to explain, women and fast cars
And diamond rings can poison a rap star
Was suicidal, high, smoking so much lye
I saw a dead bird flying through a broken sky
Wish I could flap wings and fly away
To where black kings in Ghana stay
So I could get old, my flesh rot away
But that'll be the day when it's peace
When my gat don't need to spray
When these streets are safe to play
Sex with death, indulge in these women
Vision my own skeleton swimming in eternal fire
Broads play with pentagrams in they vagina
Like the Exorcist, then they gave birth to my seeds
I beg for God's help, why they love hurting me?
I'm your disciple, a thug certainly
I'm the N, the A to the S-I-R
If I wasn't I must've been Escobar
.45 in my waist, staring at my reflection
In the mirror, sitting still in the chair like Mike Concepcion
When everything around me got cloudy
The chair became a king's throne, my destiny found me
It was clear why the struggle was so painful
Metamorphosis, this is what I changed to
And God, I'm so thankful

[Hook: sample]
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man
You're the man, you're the man



[Produced by Salaam]

[Hook: Nas]
Ayo, it's poison: ecstasy, coke, you say it's love, it is poison
Schools where I learned, they should be burned, it is poison
Physicians prescriptin' us medicine which is poison
Doctors injectin' our infants with the poison
Religion misoverstood is poison
Niggas up in my hood be gettin' shot, given poison

[Verse 1: Nas]
In hospitals, shots riddle the block, little
Children and elderly women run for they lives, drizzlin'
Rain come out the sky every time somebody dies
Must be out my fuckin' mind, what is this, the hundredth time?
Sendin' flowers to funerals, readin' Rest In Peace
You know, the usual, death comes in threes
"Life is short" is what some nigga said
Not if you measure life by how one lives and what he did
And funny how these black-killer companies is makin' money off us
Fast food, Cola, soda, Skull and Bone crosses – it's all poison

[Hook 2: Nas]
Ecstasy, coke, you say it's love, it is poison
Schools where I learned, they should be burned, it is poison
Physicians prescriptin' us medicine which is poison
Doctors injectin' our infants with the poison
Religion misoverstood is poison
Sisters up in my hood try to do good given choices

[Verse 2: Nas]
When pregnant, drop out of school or have abortions
Stop workin', hopin' that they find a man that will support them
Up late night, on they mother's cordless
Thinkin' a perm or bleachin' cream will make them better, when they're gorgeous
White girls tannin', liposuction
Fake titties are implanted, fake lips, that's life destruction
Light-skinned women, bi-racial
Hateful toward themselves, denyin' even their blood
I don't judge Tiger Woods
But I overstand the mental poison that's even worser than drugs

[Hook 3: Nas]
Yo, it's poison: ecstasy, coke, you say it's love, it is poison
Schools where I learned, they should be burned, it is poison
Physicians prescriptin' us medicine which is poison
Doctors injectin' our infants with the poison
Religion misoverstood is poison
Radio and TV poison, white Jesus poison
And any thoughts of takin' me down is poison
Who want beef now? My heat shall anoint 'em, PLAOW!

[Interlude: Nas]
Never to worry, all the wrong-doers got it coming back to 'em a thousand times over
Every dog has its day, and everything flips around
Even the most greatest nation in the world has it coming back to 'em
Everybody reaps what they sews, that's how it goes
Innocent lives will be taken
It may get worse, but we'll get through it, y'all, be strong!

[Verse 3: Nas]
The China-men built the railroad, the Indians saved the Pilgrim
And in return the Pilgrim killed 'em
They call it Thanksgiving, I call your holiday "hell-day"
‘Cause I'm from poverty, neglected by the wealthy
Me and my niggas share gifts every day like Christmas
Slay bitches, and party everyday like this is the last
I'm with my heckles, connectin' and we hittin' the lab
This is my level, fuck if it get you mad

[Hook 4: Nas]
It's all poison: all of my words to enemies, it is poison
Rappers only talk about ki's, it's all poison
How could you call yourself MCs? You ain't poison
Think about the kids you mislead with the poison
And any thoughts of takin' me down is all poison
Who want beef now? My heat shall anoint 'em, plaow!

[Bridge: Keon Bryce]
What goes around comes around, my nigga
And what goes up, it must come down, my nigga
The soldiers found below the ground, my nigga
Just hold it down, we older now, my nigga

[Verse 4: Nas]
This nigga Ike with the Iverson jersey, light-skinned with herpes
Fuckin' sisters in Harlem, Brooklyn and D.C.
This is the problem, ‘cause he never tell 'em he got it
From lettin' fags suck him off, Rikers Island in '93
Drives a Benz, hangs at all the parties
All the concerts, backstage where the stars be
Rockin' they shirts in bitches faces like clockwork
What's your name? Where you from?
Chain blingin', thinkin' girls everywhere is dumb
Takin' pride in ruinin' their lives
So they could never have babies and they could never be wives
He never used a condom; give him head? He got ya
Met the wrong bitch and now he dead from the monster AIDS
I contemplate, believin' in karma
Those on top could just break and won't be eatin' tomorrow
I know some bitches who be sleepin' on a nigga's dreams
They leave; when that nigga blow, she the first bitch on her knees
Knowin' dudes that's neglectin' their seeds
Instead of takin' care of 'em they're spendin' money on trees
I pray for you, deadbeat daddies
Cause when them kids get grown
It's too late for you: now you old and you gettin' shitted on
It's all scientific, mystic, you know, the Earth and the stars
Don't hesitate to say you heard it from Nas
What is destined shall be
George Bush-killer 'til George Bush kills me
Much blessings, be healthy, remember:

[Bridge: Keon Bryce]
What goes around comes around, my nigga
And what goes up, it must come down, my nigga
The soldiers found below the ground, my nigga
Just hold it down, we older now, my nigga



[Produced by Al Shux & Dan Wilson]

[Refrain: Nikki Flores]
Just like a rose
Everybody knows that you are so beautiful
But I feel a thorn on my hide
I should've known
We can't repair what we broke
But I held you close, too close
I should've left your roses at the door
They're sharper than before
And I don't want them no more
I should've left your roses at the door
They're sharper than before
And I don't need them no more

[Verse 1: Nas]
I have no time to give you guidance
Barely have any fuck time either
Hefner minded like I think you're fine, but
I seen the finest women that ever came out a beaver
Mind reader, can tell she vegan or not when I meet her
Or if she insecure, most are
If she's mixed, a possible psycho alert goes off
Not a judge, cause a judge don't wear no draws, yet he allows
Everything to go to your spouse when you end your vows
My tax bracket, not enough blacks have it
Who should I date -- Project chick or Cuban actress?
A White chick, they might flip talking that Blackness
Should only attract Black shit, I'm an ass magnet
If you mad at that, you'll be mad forever
Never played you, I prayed we would stay together
Wished it'd last forever, know what I mean
Heard you tear a rose from the roots, the rose screams

[Refrain: Nikki Flores]
Just like a rose
Everybody knows that you are so beautiful
But I feel a thorn on my hide
I should've known
We can't repair what we broke
But I held you close, too close

[Verse 2: Nas]
Them Xanax can't manage your maniac manic depressive expressions
They some silent killers, that stress shit
That put ulcers in a lot of niggas
I'm blowing medical, it helps chill a violent temper
I done went to hell and back, you always think you right
You know when you wrong, and still you want to fight
When people like my song, you want to kill 'em, right?
You resent me every time I make a million, right?
You want to experience life when you calling all the shots
Ordering bottles for all your girls up in the spot
Have your own cash, own your own Benz
Your own house, everything, me I understand
Thought you would bask in the glory as Queen Bee
Put you on under Martin Scorsese: Mean Street
The first movie he made, thought that was fly
I thought you was flyer, you a fucking liar

[Refrain: Nikki Flores]
Just like a rose
Everybody knows that you are so beautiful
But I feel a thorn on my hide
I should've known
We can't repair what we broke
But I held you close, too close
I should've left your roses at the door
They're sharper than before
And I don't want them no more
I should've left your roses at the door
They're sharper than before
And I don't need them no more



[Intro: Polow da Don]
QB, where the fuck y'all at?
Ha, ha, ha
Yeah, let's go, gets money!

[Hook: Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleaming, switching lanes, two-seater
Hate him or love him for the same reason
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in
So in God's Son we trust
Cause they know I'm gonna give em what they want
They looking for a (hero)
I guess that makes me a (hero)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Another chapter of the cleanest rapper, distinguished gentlemen
Crooks and Castle on his back, Maybacher
Exotic lady eye-catcher, holla at ya, call me the chiropractor
Working like Muay Thai class, get perspire out ya
And of course I've been the boss since back when
Rocking D Boy, Fila, velour in one-ninety black Benz
Now they shut down the stores when I'm shopping
Used to be train robbing, face covered in stocking
I'm him

[Hook: Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleaming, switching lanes, two-seater
Hate him or love him for the same reason
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in
So in God's Son we trust
Cause they know I'm gonna give em what they want
They looking for a (hero)
I guess that makes me a (hero)

[Verse 2: Nas]
Rubber-grip-holder, reloader, come at me
I'ma rip your soliders in half, silverback ape, nickel-plated mag
Young, rich and flashy; young bitch, I'm nasty
All black clothes 'til ice lay on me so classy
And every time I close my lids
I can still see the borough, I can still see the bridge
I can still see the dreams that my niggas ain't never lived to see
Tell them angels open the door for me
From nine Berettas and movin' raw to chilling in wine cellars
Sticks and humidors, that's what I call mature
That's what I call a G, that's what I call a pimp
That's what I call a gangsta, to the fullest shit
I try to make more cream
By every September 14th, that's my dream
So I can be more clean, as I grow yearly
I can see things more clearly, that's why they fear me
Let's go

[Hook: Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleaming, switching lanes, two-seater
Hate him or love him for the same reason
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in
So in God's Son we trust
Cause they know I'm gonna give em what they want
They looking for a (hero)
I guess that makes me a (hero)

[Verse 3: Nas]
This universal apartheid, I'm hog-tied, the corporate side
Blocking y'all from going to stores and buying it
First L.A. and Doug Morris was riding with it
But Newsweek article startled big wigs, they said "Nas, why is he trying it?"
My lawyers only see the Billboard charts as winning
Forgetting Nas the only true rebel since the beginning
Still in musical prison, in jail for the flow
Try telling Bob Dylan, Bruce or Billy Joel they can't sing what's in their soul
So "Untitled" it is
I never change nothing, but people remember this
If Nas can't say it, think about these talented kids
With new ideas being told what they can and can't spit
I can't sit and watch it, so shit, I'ma drop it
Like it or not, you ain't gotta cop it
I'm a hustler in the studio, cups of Don Julio
No matter what the CD called, I'm unbeatable y'all
Let's go

[Outro: Polow da Don]
Yeah, Nas, Polow da Don



[Produced by L.E.S & Wyldfyer]

[Intro: Jay-Z] & (Nas)
I know you can feel the magic, baby
Turn the motherfuckin' lights down
Esco, whattup? (Whattup, homie?)
I mean, it's what you expected, ain't it?
Let's go… uh, uh, uh, uh, uh, uh
Turn the music up in the headphones
Uh, yeah, that's perfect (Yeah, right)
Uh, we got to take our time and make a nigga wait on this motherfucker (Hahaha!)
Make niggas mad and shit like
Niggas usually just start rappin' after four bars, nigga, go in!
Start dancin' in this motherfucker
Yeah, (Yeah) we just come outta nowhere

[Hook: Jay-Z]
I feel like a black republican, money I got comin' in
Can't turn my back on the hood, I got love for them
Can't clean my act up for good, too much thug in 'em
Probably end up back in the hood, I'm like, "Fuck it then"

[Verse 1: Jay-Z]
Huddlin' over the oven, we was like brothers then, though you was nothin' other than a son of my mother's friend
We had covenant, who would've thought the love would end?
Like Ice Cold's album, all good things
Never thought we sing the same song that all hoods sang
Thought it was all wood-grain, all good brain
You wouldn't bicker like the other fools, talk good game
Never imagine all the disasters that one good reign
Could bring, should blame the game
And I could, it's kill or be killed, how could I refrain?
And forever be in debt, that's never a good thing
To the pressure for success can put a good strain
On a friend you call best, and yes, it could bring
Out the worst in every person, even the good and sane
Though we rehearsed it's just ain't the same
When you put in the game at age sixteen
Then you mix things: like cars, jewelry, and miss things
Jealousy, ego, and pride, and this brings
It all to a head like a coin, cha-ching
The root of evil strikes again, this could sting
Now the team got beef between the Post and the Point
This puts the ring in jeopardy – indefinitely

[Hook: Jay-Z]

[Hook: Nas]
I feel like a black militant takin' over the government
Can't turn my back on the hood, too much love for them
Can't clean my act up for good, too much thug in 'em
Probably end up back in the hood, I'm like, "Fuck it then"

[Verse 2: Nas]
I'm back in the hood, they like, "Hey Nas"
Blowin' on purp, reflecting on they lives
Couple of fat cats, couple of A.I.'s
Dreamin' of fly shit instead of them gray skies
Gray fives, hatah's wishin' our reign dies
Pitch, sling pies, and niggas they sing, "Why"?
Guess they ain't strong enough to handle their jail time
Weak minds keep tryin', follow the street signs
I'm standing on the roof of my building
I'm feelin' the whirlwind of beef, I inhale it
Just like an acrobat ready to hurl myself
Through the hoops of fire
Sippin' 80 proof, bulletproof under my attire
Could it be the forces of darkness against hood angels of good that forms street politics?
Makes a sweet honest kid, turn illegal for commerce
To get his feet out of them Converse – that's my word

[Hook: Jay-Z]

[Hook: Nas]



[Intro]
Alchemist, you know me, man
I'm the type of nigga that write rhymes
Right on the spot in the studio soon as I hear the track
You know what I'm sayin'?
Word, but I wanted to bring
A couple of books to the studio today, man
I found these shits up in the crib, man, in boxes, man
I don't even remember when I was writin' these shits
Or what's in these shits, man
Probably a bunch of bullshit, man… fuck it, check it

[Verse 1]
How can I trust you when I can't trust me?
Picture myself a old man, a O.G.
Some niggas will conversate with liars all day
Time pass— (Nah, let me start somethin' else)
Soul on ice, death threats given by clowns
I guess livin' is prison when you live around clowns
I'm hexed, cursed, worse I been blessed first
I thought I was abnormal
‘Cause I would overcome any tasked called to
So there it is, I'm a prince, I'm against lames
Who do minor shit, swear they on the top of they game
Your rhymin' is called "Vagina Monologue," it kinda supports
Theories of scary niggas who should lie in the morgue
Rarely y'all come in contact with the real
Since Pun passed, he was the last shine of sun I could feel
Yo, said there's a few left since music's expressions of life
Damn, I wish I took more time to write in my book of rhymes

[Break]
Oh shit, Tina!
I been lookin' for this bitch number, damn
No, this rhyme is weak
This is weak, I remember this bullshit right here
(My book of rhymes)
Gandhi was a… what the fuck?

[Verse 2]
Gandhi was a fool, nigga, fight to the death
The US Army is a school that teach you plights of conquest
(I wonder when I wrote this… nah, it's weak)
The money's your religion, sky the limit, live life
Numbers is big business, makes the poor live trife
The glimmers of hope provoke those without dollars to dream
Through your existence become wealthy, knowledge is king
Pimps and card sharks, thiefs, murderers with hard luck
Addicts and fiends prostitutes passin' for teens is my society
Cops that shoot blacks is routine for notoriety
Grow up watchin' well-dressed niggas with charms
Beautiful ladies on their arms
Dangerous new cars was my fantasy for Nas
Rubbin' my lips with Campophenique
Still behind the ears wet, turned out to be
Pioneers vets amongst hustlers, crack sellers, and liars and squares
(Nah, that was weak there)
My people be projects or jail, never Harvard or Yale
Pardon me type in my two-way while I'm chargin' my cell
It's hard to be iced up with Gucci, God, poverty's real
I can't fight you, ‘cause you would sue me, niggas be groupies
I see imitators tryin' to make albums, spittin' my style
And they don't even realize that I notice they stealin' Nas' shit
I pump some Rick James with that Teena Marie
My nina lean on me like Scoob and Scrap
This can't be my book of rhymes

[Break]
This can't be my book of rhymes, writin' this bullshit!
(My book of rhymes)
Nah, neva that! Fuck that!
Aw, why you laughin', Alchemist?
Hah, you a funny nigga...
Naw, yeah (My book of rhymes)
I'm tellin' you, I'ma come up with some new shit now
Fuck that! I'ma write again now, fuck that!
I musta been high on some shit… what the fuck is this?!

[Verse 3]
Look how we treat pregnancy, women in the hood
Our values so low, our values are no good
Things our mothers told us we should've heeded
‘Cause now we need it, we older, almost able t—
I'm jealous of you, how come you so beautiful?
Smellin' fresh, youthful, intelligent, while I'm stressin' and shit
Ayo, I envy you ‘cause all you do is smile
And things come your way
Such a innocent child is what some say
I get upset ‘cause I just want to be treated the way you are
Like a star, not a worry in this world thus far
But wait a minute, we both need your mother's attention
I must be crazy, jealous of my own baby infant (Kinda crazy)



[Intro]
Light it, uhh
Light it up, uhh

[Verse 1]
The whole city is mine, prettiest Don
I don't like the way P. Diddy did Shyne with different lawyers
Why it's mentioned in my rhymes? Fuck it
It's just an intro, hate it or love it, like it, bump it or dump it
Write it, across the stomach spell "God son"
Life is like a jungle, black, it's like the habitat of Tarzan
Matter of fact it's harder than most can imagine
Most of my niggas packed in correctional facilities
Half of them passed on, Mack strong, couple of shots
Made the ghost leave a body, now they hauntin' the block
Where they used to stand at
Somebody's takin' they place, a younger man perhaps
Hand slaps, can't understand that
Same walk, same talk, I wonder: can that be possible?
A thug dies, another step inside his shoes
And they will hurt you, layin' low with a bottle
I'm blowin' circles, my state of mind purple

[Hook]
Light it, light it, uhh
Yeah… light it up
Light it up, uhh

[Verse 2]
Y'all just wanna deal with drama
Talk about niggas who got things, y'all ready to kill his mama
Everything you into is underworld related
You sell your man out, not even your girl is sacred
You don't trust a soul, hold up, you moldin' soldiers
To pull guns quick and always look behind the shoulder
Think of how many dudes died tryin' to be down with you
Everybody's under six feet of ground but you
Still standin', still roamin' through the streets, that's real
You a survivor, knowin' all the beef is ill
You got a bunch of thugs with you even now that's ready
Trustin' your judgment, quick to put it down, they deadly
The hood love you, but behind your back they pray for the day
A bullet hit your heart and ambulances take you away
That ain't love, it's hate, think of all the mothers at wakes
Whose sons you killed – and you ain't got a cut on your face?
Unmarked police cars roam the streets hard, the heat is God
Somebody tell these shorties reach for the stars
Instead they tell 'em how to reach through the bars holdin' a mirror
Lookin' down a tear in jail, makin' weapons to kill ya
Weed smoke, three tokes, nigga, pour more Henny
He sighs with eyes that seen a war too many
Cold-blooded murderers, universal
Hood to hood, blowin' smoke, state of mind is purple

[Hook]
Light it up, light it up, light it up, uhh
Light it up… light it up, light it up, uhh
Uhh… uhh, uhh, light it, light it, uhh

[Verse 3]
These hot-headed youngsters always get into trouble
Reactin' before thinkin', they easily irritated
And murder's premeditated
It's a fact that we sinkin' when we should be climbin'
In a nutshell, it's just jail, drug sales, liquor and diamonds
Niggas rewindin' instead of movin' forward
To blow up, so what's the science?
People shoutin', police pushin' the crowd
And on the ground's a young soldier with meat hangin' out him
Am I hallucinatin' off the hazin'?
Or did I just see a nigga shoot another nigga's face in?
It's a ugly nation, cops circle the block with mug shots
Photograph pictures of suspect faces
It's usually two or three niggas who innocent
But if they lock the wrong ones up, then someone'll snitch
A divide-and-fall strategy, they aren't fair
I dig in my bag of weed that's covered with orange hair
This Color Purple, I'll make whoopee give me the pussy
Celie, Oprah and Danny Glover gots to feel me
This is how I escape the madness
Too much of anything'll hurt you, so my state of mind's all purple



[Produced by DJ Hot Day, Rodney Jerkins & Salaam Remi]

[Intro: Nas]
DJ Hot Day...

[Hook: Mary J. Blige]
This kind of love is a once in a lifetime groove
Reach out and touch the love that I have for you, aww baby
I see you standing there
So lost and all alone
I wanna take you in my arms
And tell you that you’re home
I look into your eyes
I said I know you very well
I see a mirror of my life
A reflection of myself

[Verse 1: Nas]
3:45AM can't sleep, can't dream
I'm stuck, money problems pop up
How will I survive?
Guess it's best to decide not to decide
So that's my decision
Whatever happens happens
I keep making my millions
Can see myself in Presidential campaign dinners
But I'm passing blunts around a bunch of gang members
When you're too hood to be in them Hollywood circles
And you're too rich to be in that hood that birthed you
And you become better than legends you thought were the greatest
And outgrow women you loved and thought you could stay with
Life become clearer when you wipe down your mirror
And leave notes around for yourself to remember
I like to teach and build
With brothers about how easy it is to reach a mil
All you need is some skill, then it’s grind time
Imagination better than knowledge, says Einstein
It’s all in the mind
Nasty the nicest, I'm somewhat of a psychic
Just one minute after it's heard
You all'll recite it, you all'll repeat it
You'll call me a genius, if you didn't
Now that I said it I forced you to think it
Write in my little vignettes, sipping Moët
Bitch when you vision me, you vision the best
When I was young they called me Olu’s son
Now he's Nas' father, I was the good seed
He was the wise gardener

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
Yeah, what y'all know about this..
Yo, beautiful life, often I dream that I can bring my niggas
Conservatives don’t understand slang linguistics
The burbs talking like the hood will change with quickness
Love the skinny model chicks but I prefer the thickness
So what I rap about my riches and I'm ostentatious
Get out a gangsta's business, seems to me your thoughts are basic
Try to compare what you live to the life I master
See the fly shit I wear, you try to rock it after
Big bracelets, golden Egyptian faces
White wine spritzers and Switzerland on vacation
The strip club scene favors Josephine Baker
Dope fiend neighbors, growing up I seen paper
I describe it, hope you can visualize it
This is reminiscent to all the parks in the project
When my British Knights can rival your Foamposites
Don’t make me pull my Lottos out the closet
Don't make me pull my Lottos out the closet..
Ha ha ha...

[Hook]

[Outro: Mary J. Blige]
You remind me, ohhhhhhhhhh
Yes it's true baby, ahh yeah



[Verse]
Listen up, gangstas and honeys with your hair done
Pull up a chair, hon', and put it in the air, son
Dog, whatever they call you, God, just listen
I spit a story backwards, it starts at the endin'
The bullet goes back in the gun
The bullet hole's closin' this chest of a nigga
Now he back to square one
Screamin', "shoot don't please"
I put my fifth back on my hip
It's like a VCR rewindin' a hit
He put his hands back on his bitch
My caravan doors open up
I jumped back in the van and closed it shut
Goin' reverse, slowly prepared
My nigga Jungle utters out somethin' crazy like, "go he there"
Sittin' in back of this chair, we hittin' the roach
The smoke goes back in the blunt
The blunt gets bigger in growth
Jungle unrolls it, put his weed back in the jar
The blunt turns back into a cigar
We listen to Stevie, it sounded like heavy metal fans
Spinnin' records backwards of AC/DC
I give my niggas dap, jump out the van, back first
Back upstairs, took off the black shirt
I'm in the crib with the phone to my ear
Listen up so y'all can figure out the poem real clear
The voice on the phone was like, "outside right we"
So with my mouth wide, holdin' my heat
Bullets I had plenty to squeeze, plenty for you
‘Cause Jungle said, "block your on enemy's the"
Hung up the phone, then the phone rang
I'm laid in the bed, thinkin' about this pretty young thing
Who left, she came back, her clothes just fell to the rug
She fell to my bed and gave me a hug
I told her, "no hell," she talkin' about, "me kiss"
Bobbed her head then spit the nut back in my dick
Started suckin' with no hands, a whole lot of spit
Then got up and put her bra back on her tits
Got fully dressed and told me, "stressed really I'm"
Picked up her Gucci bag and left a nigga behind
Walkin' through the door, she rang the bell twice
I vomited vodka back in my glass with juice and ice
The clock went back from three to two to one
And that's about the time the story begun
That's when I first heard the voicemail on the cell
It said: "Son, we found that nigga we gotta kill."

[Outro]
Ayo son, ayo son, you hear me, you hear me?
Listen, man, this dude right on the block
Right now, man, I found him, right now
I see him right now, let's kill him!
"Yo, this Nas, leave it: peace."



[Produced by No I.D.]

[Intro: Sample from "Raptivity" by Ronnie Gee]
Warning-Warning-Warning-Warning
New York-New York-New York-New York
The sound-The sound-The sound
You about to hear-to hear-to hear-to hear-to hear-to hear-to hear

[Refrain: Sample from "The Bridge" & "Live Routine" by MC Shan]
"You love to hear the story
How it all, how it all, got started, got started"
(Start it off)
"You love to hear the story
How it all, how it all, got started, got started" (Ah yeah!)
"You love to hear the story
How it all got started"
(Start it off, start it off, start it off, start it off)
"Back when-Back when-Back when-Back when-Back when
Back when-Back when-Back when-Back when-Back when"

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, yeah
The ill reminisce and think about the fly days
Nothing like them 80's summer NY days
Hop on the MB5 days
Mopeds, Pro Keds, city split five ways
How it all started, fifth floor apartment
A jigsaw puzzle aerial view of the projects
A kid saw struggle, buried a few of his partners
Now I chill in resorts, enjoying massages
Check out the oracle bred from city housing
Nas, I arise the dead by thousands
I remember seeing Shan chilling near his Audi
Hollis had Run and them but I proudly
Put a poster up of Shan and Marley, that was art kid
You love to hear the story how it started
The bubbly I'm pouring wasn't popped yet
Before there was an audience to watch us
I assure you there was a process

[Refrain]

[Verse 2: Nas]
To call them fake today is hate, real niggas extinct
Pac left me inside a rap world with niggas that wink
At other rappers, undercover niggas spit every way
Won't be surprised if all their rides have federal plates
Let alone their wardrobes and Studio 4 flow
It was real when I appeared, it would've been some jaws broke
Nas, my real name, stage name, same thing
How could you let these lames claim king, I'm so ashamed, man
I light a L for Vernon
For niggas who would burn in Hell for Vernon
10th Street, 12th Street, Nightmare on Elm Street
Pimps creep, delve deep inside the editorials
Of the ghetto queens, kings, stories true
Who possesses the testicular fortitude
To blow away myths that's a hindrance to all of you
You blame your own shortcomings on sex and race
The mafia, homosexuals and all the Jews
It's hogwash point of views, stereotypical
Anti-Semitic like the foul words Gibson spewed
And it's pathetic, I don't get the credit I deserve
That's why I hate doing interviews
But I don't sweat it, study long, study raw
My man Dion said Nas over-think the songs he writing
I'm not a wack performer standing near a corny hype man
I got the Donism in me, I'm here to enlighten

[Refrain]



[Produced by Jay Electronica]

[Verse: Nas]
Ayo, Queens get the money, niggas still screaming, paper chasing
Where presidential candidates is planning wars with other nations
Over steak with Masons
Pregnant teens give birth to intelligent gangsters, they daddy's faceless
Play this by your stomach, let my words massage it and rub it
I'll be his daddy if there's nobody there to love it
Tell him his name's Nasir, tell him how he got here
Mama was just having fun with someone above her years
Niggas is still hating, talking that Nas done fell off with rhyming
He'd rather floss with diamonds
They pray "Please God, let him spit that Uzi in the army lining
That shorty doo-wop rolling oo-wop in the park reclining"
Take 27 emcee's put them in a line and they're out of alignment
My assignment since he said retirement
Hiding behind 8 Mile and The Chronic
Gets rich but dies rhyming, this is high science
Now add 23 more from Queens to B-more
I'm over their heads like a bulimic on a seesaw
Now that's 50 porch monkeys ate up at the same time
Nasty Nasdaq, y'all going to bow holmes, it's Dow Jones
.80 cal chrome, needed time alone to zone
The mack left his iPhone and his 9 at home
My queen used the milkshake to bring y'all to my slaughter houses
I do this for the group home kids in boarding houses
This is that nigga shit that's on the album
For the niggas inside the chalk line in 40 houses
Bring back Arsenio
Hip-hop was aborted so Nas breathes life, back into the embryo
Let us make man in our image
Spit it, I'm Huey P in Louis V at the eulogy throwing Molotovs for Emmett
You ain't as hot as I is
All of these false prophets is not messiahs
You don't know how high the sky is
The square mileage of Earth or what pi is
I'm the shaky hand that touched George Foreman in Zaire
The same hand that punched down devils that brought down the Towers



[Produced by Damien Marley]

[Verse 1: Damian Marley Nas]
As we enter
Come now we take you on the biggest adventure
Must be dementia, that you ever thought
You could touch our credentials, what's the initials?
Q.B., Jamrock the lyrical official
Send out the order, laws and the rituals
Burn candles, say prayers, paint murals
It is truth we big news, we hood heroes
Break past the anchor, we come to conquer
Man a badman, we no play Willy Wonka
And I got the guns I got the ganja
And we could blaze it up on your block if you wanna
Or haze it up stash box in a Hummer
Or you could run up and get done up
Or get something that you want none of
Unlimited amount you collect from us
Direct from us, street intellectuals
And I'm shrewd about decimals
And my man'll speak Patois
And I can speak rap star
Y'all feel me even if it's in Swahili
Habari Gani Mzuri Sana
Switch up the language and move to Ghana
Salute and honor, real revolution rhymers
Rhythm piranhas like two Obamas unfold the drama

[Hook: Nas]
Word is out, hysteria you heard about
Nas and Jr. Gong gonna turn it out
Body the verse until they scream "murder" out
The kings is back, time to return the crown
Who want it? Tuck your chain, when dude coming
Renegades that'll peel you back like new hundreds
Bet your jewels on it, you don't want to lose on it
Either move on or move on it

[Verse 2: Damian Marley Nas]
Queens to Kingston
Gunshot we use and govern the kingdom
Rise of the Winston, I can see the fear up in your eyes
Realize you can die any instant
And I can hear the sound of a voice
When you must lose your life like mice in the kitchen
Snitching, I can see him pissing on hisself
And he's wetting up his thighs and he trying to resist it
Switching, I can smell him digging up shit like a fly
Come around and be persistent
That's how you end up in a hit list
In a bad man business
No evidence crime scene, fingerprint-less
Flow effortless casual like the weekends
No pressure when we're comfy and decent
We set this off beasting hunting season
And, frankly speaking

[Hook: Nas] (x2)
Word is out, hysteria you heard about
Nas and Jr. Gong gonna turn it out
Body the verse until they scream "murder" out
The kings is back, time to return the crown
Who want it? Tuck your chain, when dude coming
Renegades that'll peel you back like new hundreds
Bet your jewels on it, you don't want to lose on it
Either move on or move on it



[Hook: Jully Black + (un-credited male vocals)]
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I pack up my bags and leave this world behind?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Or save it all for you?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I fill the tank up, put gas
And be out the front door in a flash?
Before reconsidering this hell with you
It ain't you, it's the thing you do (do)
It's tearing my heart in two
I would've fell with you, to Hell with you

[Verse 1: Nas]
If Heaven was a mile away, and you could ride by the gates
Would you try to run inside when it opens
Would you try to die today?
Would you pray louder, finally believe in His power
Even if you couldn't see Him, but you could feel Him
Would you still doubt Him?
How would you start actin'?
Would you try to put the keys down, thinkin' every drug sale that you make in the streets he can see now?
Would a fiend even want to get high? Would he stop smokin'
If he knew on his own two feet he could just stroll in?
To get away and escape from the craziness
And I bet you there's a Heaven for a atheist
It's hard takin' this, racist planet
Where they take a younger brother in a hand-cuff
Even if he innocent, "Nigga, get on the car!
Put your motherfuckin' hands up!"
Thinkin' I'ma lose it, my mom's in chemo
Three times a week yo, keep tryin', but people, it's hard
And God, your young soldier's not so bold but needs you
This world's my home, but world, I will leave you

[Hook: Jully Black + (un-credited male vocals)]
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I pack up my bags and leave this world behind?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Or save it all for you?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I fill the tank up, put gas
And be out the front door in a flash?
Before reconsidering this hell with you
It ain't you, it's the thing you do (do)
It's tearing my heart in two
I would've fell with you, to Hell with you

[Verse 2: Nas]
Nigga, what you think, I'ma stop building?
I'ma stop feelin' like I'm Amistad's great-great-grandchildren?
How I'm not gonna want to make millions
Since the quarter water days, in the hallways
Makin' fake gold caps
With the Reeses Pieces wrapper in my mouth all day
But then my style has quite a while
That same type as Ill and Al Skratch
Game time took 'em cats, never looked back
Cristal, blowin' dub sacks
That's when it all just hit me: you see, the broads and Bentleys
Is nothin' unless my niggas spend it all with me
I'd give it all away quickly
Just to hear them all about some new kicks free
Of any autographs, and not to be recognized, forgive me
It's becomin' unbearable, makin' hits is easy
Put a famous bitch on a hook, there you go with a platinum CD
I know you heard the noise, preachers touchin' on alter boys
Sodomizin', not realizin' God is watchin', before the Lord
How could they do the Devil's work?
A man give another man head in Church
Hell, it hurts just to fathom the thought, wishin' that I fled the earth

[Hook: Jully Black + (un-credited male vocals)]
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I pack up my bags and leave this world behind?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Or save it all for you?
(If Heaven was a mile away)
Would I fill the tank up, put gas
And be out the front door in a flash?
Before reconsidering this hell with you
It ain't you, it's the thing you do (do)
It's tearing my heart in two
I would've fell with you, to Hell with you

[Outro: Nas]
You trapped in your own hell
Every day I wake up I'm blessed
Every day you wake up and breathe another breath, you blessed
To all them niggas runnin' around
Talkin' about, "I'm fucked up," "I got to get on," "I got to…"
"I'm in the grind," "I'm fucked up"
Yeah, we all in the grind
But look at the beautiful shit around you, it's a beautiful life
All my niggas locked up, keep ya heads up
Heaven's just a mile away
I'm talkin' Heaven on Earth, ain't got nothin' to do with money
Got nothin' to do with nothin' material
I'm talkin' about Heaven in your own heart
In your own world, baby, in your own existence
To my moms, look at me, baby
I love you, girl, your boy's shinin', God's son



[Sample]
The Wiz f/ Nipsey Russell - "What Would I Do If I Could Feel"

"But that's the whole tragic point my friends
What would I do if I could suddenly feel
And to know once again that what I feel is real?
I could cry, I could smile
I might lay back for awhile
Tell me what, what, what would I do if I could feel?"

[Verse 1]
I was young, I was survivin' the times
Waitin' for my moment, I was destined to shine
Little Ray had an NSX, I was hopin' I'm next
Wantin' bracelets, never had a rope on my neck
Unless I was holdin' Taiyeh chain – Rest In Peace
Even though that night you flipped on us, you warned us
If you came back and we still on the corners, we goners
Movin' on to move your arm in your watch
To another time on the block
‘Cause this 40 Side where they say shorty rhyme
Tragedy, he used to come through all the time
I'm talkin' Juice Crew, not what the word define
He had a sister named Erin, for sure was fine
That was my first crush, I bought my first mic
I wrote my first verse, I was about nine
I was about mine, fantasize house buyin'
Met Paul, he wore some big glasses
Him and Melquan took me where G Rap lived
I was happy just gettin' some answers
I ain't even know what a record advance was
I'm seein' hoes sex in the studio bathroom
With rap dudes, thinkin', "Wow, she moved me!"
Same girl then right now's a groupie
Back then she was like the star in a movie
Large jewelry and expensive Gucci
Next stop, Paid In Full posse recruits me
Knew they were some millionaires, their ropes were dookie
Eric B man lookin' like touch it, he shoot me
You see, every time Ra didn't show
I get to record demos at attempts to blow
I wonder, could they tell? How did they know?
Sixteen years later, here I go

[Hook]
[Nipsey Russell]
"What-what, what-what, what would I do?" 4X

[Verse 2]
I'm with Akinyele in the street, tryin' to get us a deal
G Rap tried to get us to sign to Cold Chill
But Fly Ty didn't have the contract we wanted
Clark Kent just signed Das, he didn't want us
Russell said I sounded like G, the nigga fronted
Reef and Matty C offered me a little money
Shit a little funny, feel a little laughter
Rebel of Hip-Hop comin' through a white rapper
My boy MC Serch, nevertheless
Took me to Columbia, back then CBS
Chris Schwartz, RuffHouse, he was the best man
Now buggin' because the label had just dropped Def Jam
Could you picture Russell needin' a check, man?
But he smart, he plotted a plan for Polygram
Life is ill, again life's a movie
Then the roster's Cypress Hill, Nas and Fugees
Before I sold records, no promotion
The rap world like, "What's all this commotion?"
Went plat, mad bottles I'm toastin'
20/20 hindsight, but how did they know then?

[Hook]
[Nipsey Russell]
"What-what, what-what, what would I do?" 4X

[Verse 3]
Invincible, lyrical, miracle man
Uh, but back to the matter at hand
‘Cause 10 years ago we all strived to be 25
Some cats didn't make it alive
Dated some stars but respect their privacy
Copped mad cars, layin' back in the driver's seat
Held myself down, just steerin' the wheel
Here I am, completed my whole record deal

[Hook: Nipsey Russell]
"What-what, what-what, what would I do?" 4X

[Outro]
"What would I do
If I could reach inside of me
And to know how it feels
To say I like what I see?"



[Produced by Swizz Beatz]

[Intro: Miguel] + (Nas)
Bad bitches, champagne wishes
Freaks only, baby -- let me take pictures
(Life is good, life is good, life is good)
Life is good, life is good
Life is good, li-life is good
Swizzy!

[Hook: Swizz Beatz] + (*Miguel)
Cîroc on splash (splash), summer on smash (smash)
Top all gone, got the on summer on smash
Tank top on (on) summer on smash
My neck got a whole lot of glass
Got the summer on smash, summer on smash
Y’all know who got the summer on smash (WE DO!)
Look at baby girl showing that ass
Should let the world know that summer on smash
Got the summer on smash, summer on smash
(*Life is good, life is good)
Everybody get the summer on smash
(*Life is good, li-Life is good)
We got the summer on smash (smash)
Summer on smash (smash)
Y'all know who got the summer on smash
(*Life is good!) (we do!)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Got the summer on smash, eighteen karats
Lil' overweight, hit the gym
Let's go get the abs in
Louis belt hangs on the waist, it ain't even fastened
I'm trying to get every number from every woman passing me by
She's fly; Black, Asian, Boricua
Italian, mixed chicks, Middle Eastern
Eritrean, Ethiopian, how you opening?
Just rolled four with them, 'bout to smoke again
Rose-gold Rollie, riding the top down
How does Pucci bathing suits on a yacht, sound?
Send a massive e-mail to the females
Tell 'em where to meet us, give 'em the details

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
We got the jam here, check it
It's the summertime, women damn near naked
It's single season, they choosing who to mess with
I just smashed another belt for the record, respect it
Nas get you out your seats, play this in your Jeeps
My people in the streets, I make it feel like it’s the beach
My goons close by, I'm daring one of y'all to reach
I’m protected like the President, ain't gotta give a speech
Got a compass on the wrist, Illmatic on the feets
And they ain't even out yet, she like Cîroc peach
Chain-smoke cigars, count a whole lot of cash
And y’all already know who got the summer on smash

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Miguel]
I gotta do something kinda unexpected, huh?
Bad bitches, champagne wishes
Freaks only baby, let me take pictures
Skin, sin, wait, do you know whose pool you're in?
Beaches in Brazil, steaks on a grill
Your body is a weapon that you can’t conceal
Real make money when the freaks call
Summer on Mars, it’s totally Total Recall
Like, pura vida, she wanna flyyyy
Caliente, Mami vente, vente comigo, ayooooooooooooo

[Hook]

[Outro: Miguel]
Life is good, life is good
Life is good, li-life is good!



[Produced by DJ Premier]

[Intro: Nas]
Uh... Whattup? Whattup? (yo)
It's time man (yo, word, it's time?)
Straight up (it's time, man)
Aight, set that shit off (yo, set it off then, nigga)
Set it off (set if off)

[Verse 1]
Broken glass in the hallway, bloodstained floors
Neighbors, look at every bag you bring through your doors
Lock the top lock, momma shoulda cuffed me to the radiator
Why not? It might've saved later from my block
N.Y. cops, hookers crawlin' off the stroll, coughin'
Stitches in they head, stinkin' and I dread thinkin' they be snitchin'
But who else, could it be, shook at these, unmarked vans
Parked in the dark -- NARC's, where's your heart?
Hustlers starve; they bust a U-ey, I jog
To my building -- come out later wearin' camouflage
See the sergeant and the captain -- strangle men
Niggas gaspin' for air; til they move no more and just stare
With dead eyes -- tired of riots, shit is quiet
Simple-minded fools infiltrate grimy crews
Overcrowded cribs, uncles home from bids, sister's pregnant
Father's on drugs, moms is smokin', beds is piss-infested
Had eight partners growin' up, eight turned to seven
Seven turned to six niggas, got two in heaven
Six of us, holdin' it, now it's five rollin' thick
The sixth one's parole flipped; five niggas, went to four quick
When he went O.T., college life, converted into gangbangin'
Four niggas still hangin', years passin' and slang changin'
Three of us now, fourth nigga ain't around
We all thought he was real -- he did the snake shit
Fake shit -- beat his ass down, yo his mouth
Could've got us all wasted, what a fuckin' clown
All I got left in the end is two of my best friends
And we all goin' out, to the death for these ends
What?

[Chorus (repeats in bridge)]
New York, New York (New York state of mind)
New York, New York (New York state of mind)

[Bridge]
You heard about it, you see about it
You read about it, it's in your papers
It's in your daily news ("Get money!")
New York chronicles, every day
The crime rate, the murder rate
The money rate, the paper chase (aight?)
You know what I mean?
New York state of mind, baby (oh, yeah)
Check it out (yeah)

[Verse 2: Nas]
I'm at the, gamblin' spot, my hands on a knot
New York Yankee cap cover my eyes, stand in one spot
I take a nigga dough, send him home to a shoebox
You lost that nigga I put your dollar in the jukebox
Hear my favorite song, all these niggas sing along
All the cigarette smoke's cloggin' my lungs
Hoodrats flashin' they tongue
Young thugs blastin' they gun, we got reputations
Bitches and niggas both on parole or probation
Shit is sick, niggas got gats, army fatigues
I got my eyes glued on, whoever walk in or leave
Cause I ain't playin', niggas'll run up in here and shoot up this shit
Stick yo' ass up, niggas'll find the loot in your kicks
Bunch of triple-cross niggas, just New York niggas
Lift you off your feet when they was just talkin' with you
Some of these dudes the Feds be on em, you knew em for years
Be the type when you walk in a pub, they offer you beers
That ain't gangsta, niggas is up North with tatted tears
Your name's on the affadavit, you ratted kid
Faggot-ass niggas that be scared to do they bids
Fuck you, we run you out of N.Y, you can't live
Got your quiet niggas, that relocated down South
Comin' back to floss, then you got the jealous loudmouths
All of a sudden we got Crips and Bloods, D.T.'s
Runnin' round quick to split your mug, it's ea-sy to score
But it's hard to get the shit off
Niggas fightin over hundred sales, jump in the car and drive off
When the fiend come around the block, happy as hell
Niggas, mad cause they ain't get a piece of that sale
Cutthroat connivers, universal, ghetto survivors
Go to any hood that's live and make it liver
A lot of niggas scheamin', some real, some niggas frontin'
But I'm a big dreamer, so watch me come up with somethin'

[Chorus]
New York, New York
New York, New York



[Intro]
Turn your radios up
You are now allowed to listen to the radio
The real niggas are back on the radio

[Verse 1: Nas]
Uh, no slackin', no beggin', no askin', no fastin'
No disrespect to Islam nor Imam or Pastor
No answers to questions the media's askin'
Why we fight each other in public in front of these arrogant fascists?
They love it; puttin old niggas verse the youngest
Most of our elders failed us, how could they judge us? Niggas
There's verbal books published by niggas, produced by niggas
Genuine niggas, so I salute my niggas
Not mad cause Eminem said nigga, cause he my nigga
Wigga, cracker, friend - we all black within, okay?
We all African, okay
Some Africans don't like us no way!
A killng happened in Johannesburg, yesterday
Slain artist named Lucky Dube, hijacked
Some say N-double A-C-P, keep us sidetracked
But I don't buy that, I buy Aston Martins
Faster cars than, NASCAR cars and, sparkin while ridin
Critics, eat a dick! Journalists see I'm rich
With this N-word jargon I'm just starting, bitch!

[Hook]
I'm a nigga, he's a nigga, she's a nigga, we some niggers
Wouldn't you like to be a nigga, too?
To all my kike niggers, spic niggers, guinea niggers, chink niggers
That's right, y'all my niggas, too
I'm a nigga, he's a nigga, she's a nigga, we some niggers
Wouldn't you like to be a nigga, too
They like to strangle niggers, blamin' niggers, shootin' niggers, hangin' niggers
Still you wanna be a nigga, too? True

[Verse 2: Nas]
Wake up in the morning, shake my third leg in the toilet
Uzi on the nightstand, I'm the man you go to war with
Not the man you go to war against, patience, I'll get you
If that means I can't sleep a whole year, I'mma get you
I'm official not "A-Tisket" or "A-Tasket"
I'll put you in the casket, with the biscuit or the ratchet
They smoke hibiscus, they plants or trees, advanc-ed weed
Don't forsake us, you all are fake bloods like move make-up
I flow tighter as Tootie's braces, who be hatin us?
I be on a state bus in shackles if my .8 bust
Cause y'all some tellers, opposite of bankers
I'm the shit for ages, my clique still real QB gangsters
Clique still movin' like Freemasons
So if I'm on the flow for the law, there's lodges all across the nation
Nas is bred for the plan, to hold the Grand
Dragon's head in my hand, come and get me, here I am



[Intro]
One more time, one more time
Uh, one more time
Uh, one more time

[Verse 1]
I dream of the day I can go back to when I was born
Layin' in your arms, wishin' you was here today, Mom
Wish you'd appear, just for a second from Heaven
My tears would be gone, I wouldn't be rappin' this song
I'd be happy drivin' up to your eight-bedroom mansion
Up late, laughin' about the hard times we faced
The galaxy is so enchantin' beyond, Galileo's understandin'
Past the Milky Way and all the planets
There's somethin' out there greater, but only God knows
Scientists claim we came from apes, but they lies though
That was part of our conversation
I spark one up and start blazin'
Thinkin' of how amazin' she was, an angel gave me love
I'm thankful to ever know a woman so real
I pray, when I marry, my wife'll have one of your skills
But Mom, you could never be replaced
I'd give my life up just to see you one more day, to have—

[Hook]
One more dance with you, Momma
If I could only have
One more dance with you, Momma
Praying, wishing that I could have
One more dance with you, Momma
If I could only have
One more dance with you, Momma

[Verse 2]
I wish you were here, I miss you more each second I breathe
You resting in peace, forever, I accepted you free
A blessing to me, I see you dressed in all white
Smilin' at me, happy, knowin' everything's all right
If only I could hear your voice and your laughter
Just one more time, my chest would be filled up with sunshine
April 7th '02, that's when the gates of Heaven opened up
For you to stroll through, beautiful Anne Jones
Job is done, raising ghetto kids in the hood
You was my strength to carry on, and now I'm good
Job well done, you lived through your sons and grandchildren
Jesus finally got his bride, Mommy, dance with him!
And you've been my guide through all the trouble I faced
They playin' our song, the life-beat, my hand on your waist
I grab your other hand, I'm tryin' not to step on your toes
Spin you around with my eyes closed, dreaming I can have—

[Hook]
One more dance with you, Momma
If I could only have
One more dance with you, Momma
Praying, wishing that I could have
One more dance with you, Momma
If I could only have
One more dance with you, Momma

[Outro]
I love you forever, Mom
You will always live through me, always



[Intro]
Tougher than concrete
Eh bwoy
Go labbajuice
Watch ya
Check it!
Boom

[Verse 1: Damian Marley]
You Nah Mean
Mi dip out a whole fourteen
Nah Mean
And reload man extra magazine
Nah Mean
And wounded them housing scheme
Nah Mean
Nuff a dem a move sideway and lean
Nah Mean
Can't come bout when man deh in
Nah Mean
We nuh like dem colonial regime
Nah Mean
Ethiopian nuh like Mussoline
Nah Mean
Mi Queen hafi rock and come in
Nah Mean
And jump pon mi big trampoline
Nah Mean
And boost up her self-esteem
Nah Mean
Nuff a wonder how man kitchen so clean
Nah Mean
And which recipe dat a steam
Nah Mean
The lyrics dem a flow like a stream
Nah Mean
Mek you feel like you living in a dream
Nah Mean
It come to the crop man a cream
Nah Mean
It come to discipline man a Dean
Nah Mean
Mi tougher than a Hummer limousine
Nah Mean
We stepping we fresh and we clean
Nah Mean
I burn the stinkest of green
Nah Mean
Better listen up careful and keen
Nah Mean
A Puppa Nas a rock and come in
Nah Mean

[Verse 2: Nas]
We celebrate like I finished probation, boy boy
Knotty Head with no chaser, boy boy
From the mouth I can spit out a razor, boy boy
Open up your facial like your boy Roy
In his prime
Eat food, dinnertime
Jr. Gong pass the Guinness
Handle business, black Velvet sippers
Females never bid us farewell, they with us
Cause we arrive on the scene just like a high beam
Nah Mean
Don't let us have to make the 9 scream
Nah Mean
At your racial policing regime
Nah Mean
Spiritual like a Elohim
Nah Mean
In a casino or a yacht wherever I'm seen
My brothers and sisters are never forgot
Nah Mean
Don't wanna hear another soldier drop
Nah Mean
Another dope addict get shot with the morphine
And Feds are indicting my block
Nah Mean
They're wearing red from they shoes to they top
Nah Mean
I'm wishing that all the violence would stop
Nah Mean

[Verse 3: Damian Marley]
We nuh like the sound of siren
Nah Mean
And some bwoy soft like ice cream
Nah Mean
From a bwoy mek the Feds intervene
Nah Mean
We send a bwoy go tek intravene
Nah Mean
Parabellum dem a itch up inna spleen
Nah Mean
Inna Queens gunman reign Supreme
Nah Mean
Kingstonians are real blood fiends
Nah Mean
The world is a big crime scene
Nah Mean

[Bridge]
Yo Yo Mr. President
What you doing for my residence?
Yo Mr. Minister
Why you being sinister?
Yo Yo Mr. President
What you doing for my residence?
Yo Mr. Minister
Why you being sinister?

[Verse 4: Damian Marley]
Say man a di real Buffalo inna Rastafari regime
Bush Bungalow is where mi dwell with mi Queen
Trash to the bone down inna camouflage green
Nuff a dem that can't go the places we been
Nuff a dem that can't see the sights that we seen
That's why them face all a twist up and a lean
Nah Mean
Dem better mind we kick it off clean
Nah Mean
Man a gangster just like Gambine
Dat mean
Dem can't serve "congo dread" court supine
Nah Mean
A who you want come in convene
Nah Mean
Attorney have to rock and come in
Nah Mean
Mi pocket dem green like sperling
Nah Mean
Mi regular fly out and fly in
Nah Mean
The stadium pack like sardine
Nah Mean
Can't catch mi speed a fassy hole need caffeine
Nah Mean
Run out a breath and antihistamine
Nah Mean
Wash over gold dem come in like Listerine
Nah Mean
You think a lie we badder than Al Pacine
Nah Mean

[Verse 5: Nas]
It's genocide, it's a Genocide
It's a genocide, it's a genocide
Fifth floor cooking raw had my own supply
Cause of capitalist ways, that was back in the days
So now I do rap and it pays



[Intro]
[Girl 1] HELLO?!
[Girl 2] Whassup girl
[G1] Ain't nothin - this nigga in here stressin
Talkin that old off the wall back to Africa shit again
[G2] What, that God Body shit?
[G1] Yeah, that dumb shit
I'm tryin to get up OUTTA here
[G2] I hear that.. but yo, you know the spot is pumpin tonight
[G1] Word f'real where?
[G2] You know, where the real niggas is poppin the Cristal
Not that White Star!
[G1] Ha hah! Word where the real niggas at?

[Jo-Jo Hailey]
Listen.. to reason
Pretty baby baby listen

[Verse 1]
A young wild beautiful love child
You like them thug style link rockin, then mink coppin
Hit you on the sink a hundred dollar drink poppin
The head'll make you take him shoppin, a foul doctrine
Reminiscent of my first time up in a chick
You was innocent, but now you rent-a-dick, wear the tightest shit
Chanel lookin real, airbrushed nails
Hit the gym, hit the scales, heaven-sent but negligent (so fine..)
To see a prophecy, your ebony tone is lockin me
The way you moan make me daydream of you on top of me
Wishin I could be the one man; but you juggle
Way too many Willies all in one hand
You wanna run up in clubs, gettin rubbed on
Niggas pull your hair, shake your fat rear
Get your fuck on - followin week, you back there
But what you stuck on, weed, clowns and cars
Puffin with some lil nigga, husband not knowin she's out
Could you believe Eve, Mother Earth of the seas
Niggas thirst you, you just let em hurt you and leave
What up mah, frontin like you naive
Push your man's whip, calling police when you flip
Can't understand it, yo it should be a throne for us
But for now that's a whole different zone from us, word!

[Hook: Jo-Jo Hailey]
Diamonds all shinin, lookin all fine
Pretty little face, get a little high
Young girl stugglin, tryin to survive
Mother of the Earth, she made you and I
Just tired of playin the same ol' games
Messin with my mind, emotional thangs
And there goes.. a black girl.. lost

[Verse 2]
Like Isis, she got you heartbroke and felt lifeless
Grow up girl instead you want revenge so now you act the nicest
To who'sever gettin down and trifless
To get his mind all you do is give him somethin priceless
Cause in time he'll realize the thighs is all he needs
More than weed, then you hit him off with lies and greed (deceit, yeah)
There you go again, startin wars, makin me more yours
Seem to get a kick out of keepin me on all fours
Face glistenin, I'm addicted to you
Original, Wisdom Body got me picturin you
Igloos of ice trickin on you, you never listen
To this nigga spendin Franklins on tennis anklets
Must've had a bad deal in the past though
Can't even keep it real with a nigga with cash flow
Say men are all the same, what we need to do is break this chain
You got a job part-time and school's your night thing
With dreams to settle down, it ain't far from now
You gettin interviewed, but your boss is into gettin screwed
Typical day that the black girl sees
Comin home wantin more from a college degree

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Where are you focused, on legit niggas and where the coke is
Nice and Thug Life niggas, yo you seem hopeless
Your value - too much to be measured, I wonder how you
Could ever be played, your pussy worth gold amountin to
More than the world, but not knowin nothin about you
You leavin the crib, takin all your kids out to
Drop them off, lettin some nigga knock you off
So hot and soft, that's the same thing that got you lost (you should be ashamed)
Growin up seein it, it should remind you, you bein lied to
Everything that move be inside you
Sacred as you are, left with these wannabes to guide you
I watched you, hard to knock you, I tried not to
They spot you out dancin topless in your drawers
Damn look, there goes a black girl lost

[Outro: Jo-Jo Hailey]
You should be ashamed of yourself
The way you carry yourself
The way you hang out all night long
Doin silly things that is wrong
Black girl



[Hook]
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally

He really really really work my body
He really really really turned me out
He really really really got to gut me
He really really made me scream and shout
He really taught me how to work my body
He really taught me how to go down south
He really really tried to hurt me hurt me
I really love his thug and gangsta style

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yo we got chicks in the living room getting it on and
They ain't leaving till 6 in the morning
"O" is for oochie
Oh you ain't know how many O's in the bankroll
Sort of like the game show, Who Wants to Be a Millionaire?
But my name ain't Regis
Nas the one they call when they want their thing beat up
Honeys with bodies with Bravehearts, guns in the party
Waves, braids, and baldies, trademark's the army
Is that Horse? It must be, I heard he husky
Yeah, there go Jungle, eyes red looking for trouble
And that's Nas dancing with dimes but who his man is?
The imperial thug, it's cold D Grand Wiz
We taking honeys to the crib tonight
Guarantee we gon' get up in they rib tonight
Check the new slang, it's changed, the Braveheart gang, man
When you see me pass then holler oochie bang bang

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Wiz]
Yeah what up ma
Take a look, you hypnotized
On how my long dick stretch your insides
For real ma, with your thick lips and thick thighs
Stroke both holes, pass it to Nas
Or pass it to Naish, or pass it to Jung
Or pass it to Horse, then that ass getting tossed
Fuck a Hustler book, Penthouse or Black Tail
I got bitches sending my niggas flicks in jail
I fuck a bitch face more than her waist for real
And ain't no pussy like new pussy that's how a nigga feel
Bust three times, throw her the peace sign, she sleep
Then my dick sleep and I ain't gotta call her for weeks
Long leg hoes, mo'head hoes, married bitches
Me and my dog fucking them both they got us switching
Is the nigga gangsta? Yeah, that's how I'm living
That's how I'm playing - I got these freak fucking hoes singing

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Jungle]
Little young thing go around my dick with your tongue ring
Deep throat my nine inch, gut from the front and
Grind from the side and fuck from behind and
Grab her hair slap her ass, she screaming like she dying
Make her cum four times without even trying
I'll beat that pussy up there's no denying
Hit her where she doodie at, make the booty fat
Little cutie rat walking by with the doobie wrap
Tight blue jeans, Air Max, small Gucci bag
No loot and no job, stay home giving blow jobs
Like no prob, it's simple
Holla out the window it's the project nympho
Fuck my whole crew, you know how we do
You got that good pussy I can share with my people
Be a brave girl, do your thang
Let them titties hang, I'll have all the bitches saying

[Hook]

[Verse 4: Horse]
When it comes to sex I'm similar to the Thriller in Manilla
Bitches call me Horse the pussy filler
I'll fuck a big boned or slim chick
Beat that pussy up real quick then send home the bitch
Ain't no sleeping in my bedroom when Henny's in my dick
When Flex drop the bomb I bust a nut on this bitch
Deep throat, ceaser gold or pun wicked hoes
Who like the way I thug and the way I flow
I like head in the Benz, the four door or the Coupe
Head in the staircase, the cellar or the roof
Head in the studio, the bathroom or the booth
Head from a project chick or one with crazy loot
Like Nia Long in a cherry thong with the lights on
Sipping Perignon with Kelly Price on
I pull out my python, I hit it while my wife's gone
Long dick the bitch all night, I'll make her pussy sing the song

[Hook]



[Produced By: J Dilla]

[Verse 1]
United States in fear
London knows I'm a phantom, South Korea knows I'm here
Posted, planted without exception
Rise to your feet for this rarity
Nas and Dilla beat, the fly soliloquy
Some real nigga talkin'
This don't happen too often, take precaution
Liars and frauds got you exhausted
You've been accosted
Who told you I'd lost it?
I just put it down for a second, damn
Can the king lounge for a second, kick his hooves up?
Grow stubble on the face for once without a smooth cut?
Grow a little gut, can't even enjoy the fruit of my labor
Before they call me Luke and hand me my lightsaber
The ruler's back, you can tell by the trumpets
Prince of Wales sent me tea, biscuits, crumpets
Jewelry cost more than the car, car cost 200
Get out your chair, the season of Nasir

[Hook]
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
The season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
This is the season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
The season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)

[Verse 2]
Jay Elec doesn't write it
HOV couldn't write it, he vacationin'
Jungle the only brother I take shit from
Hassan give me lines, we talk all the time
So I guess if he inspired my song it ain't mine
Let me make this clear, they fear the gifted
Some say Shakespeare never existed
Wow, now, look at the amount of resistance
Attempts to chisel my face, from the mountain you guessed it
Bitch you guessed it
There, did I answer your questions?
So, now that's out the way let's get back to my message
Now I'm 40 and a little change
Ride around, sport a new Benz, a little Range
Havin' fun, my little man gettin' big
He and my daughter down, when we talk it's real
Nothin' is watered down, young boy swag
I'm here today as well as the 90's
But the past, like my ass, is behind me
Ignite the pyrex
Try to bite this, get Nasty Nas-itis
Arthritis when you try to write this
Asking why is the Feds at my niggas?
Why the Feds at my niggas?
I know by now I should be talkin' bread, crack, and figures
But not stressin', knot stressin'
I'm survivin', I'm survivin'
It's funny when I catch cops textin' and drivin'
Who questions and penalizes them?
One day we'll have their ass in court and we'll be tryin' them
Hey yo, it's love for Detroit, Mo-Town, Motor City
Dilla lives on, it's like he wrote it with me
The soulful sample complements my rhyme so well
Slacks by Zegna, or YSL
Matchin' the Saint Laurents, I'm fly as hell
Hands in the air, the season of Nasir

[Hook]
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
The season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
This is the season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)
The season
(Da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da-da-da)

[Outro]
Yeah, It's that time, yeah, Dilla rest in peace, what up Detroit?
Fly ladies, dope dealers and killers
Worldwide, NY, yeah, yeah, the season, yeah, this is the season



[Intro]
This is a journey
Into the world's most largest and notorious projects
Queensbridge
Listen while Nas saves his hood from the most cowardest rappers

[Verse 1]
He held a mass appeal and a little boy smile
Depressed has a complex his mouth was foul
You need to stay around I feel like tellin' some stories
First there's this arrogant fuck, his name's Cory
Hung around my man's Lakey and Big Trevor
Trevor's still locked up, Lake's gettin' his cheddar
Corey changed his name to ahh, whatever
Cornchip, Buckwheat look-a-like, it's Mega
Right, Mega was his name, sorry about that
(But it's so hard) to put a coward's name in my rap
Always actin' tough, a jokester be frontin'
He got snuffed, he got shot in the thigh, he did nothin'
But that's Nas always looking out for bredren
Cause when bredren don't return love it don't stress him
Cause gangsta's do gangsta shit, real recognize real
Still laughin' to the bank and shit
Back to Cor', got him a deal but his rhymes was wack
Def Jam mad that he signed the contract
Now he got jealous and mad at my shine
Making silly tapes, I'm always on his mind
Nonsense, not to be obnoxious kid
Mega for the record you could suck my dick
Bitch, you from around the way it's sad what this do to me
But Queensbridge, we gotta have unity

[Refrain 2X]
They say (the bridge is over, the bridge is over)
Nah this is the time we destroy and rebuild it
They say (the bridge is over, the bridge is over)
Nah we the strongest hood but weak niggas kill it
So they say (the bridge is over, the bridge is over)

[Verse 2]
Since we on the subject of traders and flunkies
Mega ain't the only faggot in my hood, dummies
There's plenty that wanna be me but cannot
Its like King Arthur and Knight Sir Lancelot
Lefty and Donnie Brasco, Gotti and Paul
Before I woulda told you Prodigy's my dog
Through the ups and downs, robberies and all
Though I always knew he wanted my downfall
He would say his little slick shit and act real funny
For what, nigga? You're butt and it got back to me
Askin' a Braveheart to get back your jewelry
You ain't from my hood, don't even rep Q.B
Nature moved to Marcy
(Man dick riding Nature) nothing else to say
Man Nature moved to Marcy (far.. far away)
(Backward ass niggas, man fuck them niggas
Go head with the program man proceed)
Old lady pocketbook snatcher, car thief
Of course we ain't friends, you never stood on no blocks
Streets or corners with zombies, ghouls and gangstas
Cops, drug dealers with pools of blood anger
Just fills me when niggas let out of town to set shot
And get filthy rich, its just not
No more morals, no loyalty, no more community
Queensbridge, we gotta have unity

[Refrain]

[Verse 3]
I put the name on the map after Marley and Shan
Q.B. before the ROC had one jam
Before the Death Row and Bad Boy beef
Had streets locked with raw talent, I laugh at the weak
So this about cleanin' up house, my own backyard
Famous home of rap stars well known be getting robbed
P, how many times ain't you shamed that
Jungle was bustin' his gun to get your weak chain back
They don't respect you a cheque's due for me for your fame
Mega I hope you blow so I'm saying your name
Hoes play your position cause you'll never be King
Even Jigga want the crown: "How that sound?" Poor thing!
I'm representin' Queensbridge U.S.A
Where two SK's go off every day ruthless-lay
All you little roaches and rats
Besides my man Ricky, Nas the true ruler is back
So haters say

[Refrain]

[Outro]
"The Bridge is over," my dick!
The Bridge'll never be over, long as I'm alive and breathin'!
Braveheart to the graveyard!
I'm the William Wallace of this shit
Ayo P, Prodigy I got love for you man, I love you man
You know what I'm sayin'?
Just get them unloyal niggas from out your circle!
You can't save everybody!
Niggas invited you to the hood - rep it right my nigga!
Be untouchable, my nigga
So it be Mobb for life for real, and that's real!
Ayo Nature, I can't hold your hand through this shit man!
I'm not your father, man!
Be your own man, stand on your own two!
I believe in you, believe in yourself, nigga, or dont even rep this, man!
Ayo Mega you wanna be a gangsta?
There's real gangsta shit going on in the streets man!
Yo niggas is in the grind! Where you be at man?
Niggas be buckin'!
Why you never buckin'? Where you be at, man?
All of a sudden you the motherfuckin' Nino Brown of the fuckin' hood?
Its disgusting, man!
Stay out the magazines! Keep my name out your motherfuckin' mouth!
Theres no more room for jealousy, we destroyin' and rebuildin':
That means the cowards get out and real niggas stay!
Niggas been hating me since I been nine
Shining with suede motherfucking Bally's on and silks
I'mma always be the young don
Don't be like the niggas on the other side:
Hating me cause I'm beautiful! Real niggas in Queensbridge:
You niggas come up and get this money and move on baby!
Q.B



[Produced by L.E.S]

[Verse 1]
Uh
Pacino life, G a roll, casino dice
At the Mirage, Vegas strip, neon lights
Gamblers, puffin cigars, couples and stars
Flashin cameras, dealers, shufflin cards
Spent the weekend, already miss New York and it's odd
Cause I'm the first to say it got too many hustlers who rob
I never hang out, when we do we bust the .45
Cause shells comin back at us while we jump in the ride
Flyin, duckin, our bitches in the club cluckin
Tellin my wife who I was dancin with like I was fuckin
Flew back, Monday evening from Nevada where the sun was beamin
To the concrete jungle of cement
Limousine's from LaGuardia airport, sleepin'
Told my dogs peace, kept it movin, I was beat when
Got to my crib, where the hell my keys went?
Ringin the bell, heard a yell but wasn't sure
Dropped my luggage to the ground, put my ear to the door
Slow music, H-Town, no that's down low
My baby's, drop Mercedes is parked, I creep around yo
To the back, she must be inside and can't hear
Probably upstairs, in the mirror, doin her hair
I walked in through the back door entrance
Shocked it was unlocked, when I walked in, I smelled incense
Chased by a weed aroma, empty Guinnesses
And lipstick marks on like three empty Coronas
A pair of blue jeans on the carpet; size 12 Timberlands
Somethin swingin on the ceilin fan, I stopped it
Swingin slower and slower
On the last swing I saw it was a G-string and heard laughin
Thought about my nine-side Glock but somethin made me disregard it
Started my way up to where the noise and music was at
Froze, I couldn't react
Bedroom door opened a crack, seen wifey layin with some nigga
Mumblin shit, he had one hand on her ass
And she was rubbin his dick, toastin wine glasses
Cherry scented candles was lit, couldn't handle the shit
Searchin for words I found none, without a sound
I left the house with a sick smile and took my gun
Now I'm out buggin, whylin, what I'm gon do?
Call my man Horse, meet me outside, I'm comin through

{Nas singing}
I thought you loved me
I thought you cared for me
I thought you needed me
Did you believe in me? * repeat 2X *

[Verse 2]
Got up with Horse, showed a look on my face was mad lost
I ain't know whether to cry or just, try to laugh it off
"Son you home early -- they wiped you out that quick?"
I said, "Nah," showed him the plastic with nine in the clip
Hopped in the whip, popped in the disc, pressed play
To the Grand Central, from the Van Wyck Expressway
I said, "Bet you'll never guess in a million years
What I just saw happenin -- and probably still is
Snuck in my crib - some nigga fuckin my wiz
I saw dem, they ain't see me, I ducked and I slid
I'ma grab shorty, I need you to grab the nigga for me"
Just when I thought I found love, she shitted on me
Shopped in Vegas, a present, for our engagement
20 G's on a ring I would have hit her today with
My surprise couldn't match the one she had for me
We pulled up, he was walkin out the house backwardly
Parked in the back of my house, they couldn't see us
Ran to the side of my house, cocked the heater
Walked to the front when I talked he had jumped
Bitch tried to slam the door shut, got caught in Horse foot
Shot the Spanish kid in the rib, drug him in
Grabbed her face, say goodbye to your undercover friend
One between the eye, she's died, by mistake
Must've held the gat too tight, pointed at her face
Heard somebody knock -- Horse helped me hide the bodies
Heard si-rens, I guess we goin out we out like kamikazes
We surrounded, red lights flashin, who's inside?
Came out a bullhorn, I'm contemplatin suicide
Horse asked me for the Mac, he gave me dap, one love
Cocked the strap, then he ran out the back
Mad shots couldn't tell what was goin on
Sat on the floor near my dead girl, put her in my arms
Pulled her ring out my pocket I was savin
Put it on her ring finger cocked the Glock, and started prayin
To Muhammad and Allah, the most beneficial
Through you, all things are possible, I know you're listenin
I never meant for this to happen, I never dreamed
This'd be my fate, such a grotesque, murder scene
On that note, same time, the cops busted in
Kissed my lady, her blood on my lips, I said "Amen"
Put the nine to my head, pulled the hammer, held her close
Squeeze the toast, said to her, "Now unto God, we elope"

.. we elope

** cop says "stupid fucking niggers" as he walks in **



[Hook: Damian Marley] (x2)
Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today? yeah, now

[Verse 1: Nas, Damian Marley]
The black oasis, Ancient Africa the sacred
Awaking, the sleeping giant, science, art is your creation
I dreamed that we could visit old Kemet
Your history is too complex and rigid for some Western critics
They want the whole subject diminished
But Africa's the origin of all the world's religions
We praise bridges that carried us over
The battle fronts of Sudanic soldiers
The task put before us, do you hear me now?

[Hook: Damian Marley]
Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today? yeah, now
Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today?

[Verse 2: Nas]
Who are we today? The slums, diseases, AIDS
We need that all to fade, we cannot be afraid
So who are we today?
We are the morning after, the makeshift youth
The slave ship captured, our diaspora is the final chapter
The ancestral lineage built pyramids
America's first immigrants
The kings, sons and daughters from Nile waters
The first architect, the first philosophers
Astronomers, the first prophets and the doctors were us, us

[Bridge: Damian Marley]
Now can we all pray?
Each in his own way
Teaching and learning
We can work it out
We'll have a warm bed
We'll have some warm bread
Shelter from the storm dread
And we can work it out
Mother nature feeds all
In famine and drought
Tell those selfish in ways, not to share us out
What's a tree without root?
Lion without tooth?
A lie without truth?
You hear me out!

[Chorus: Damian Marley]
Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today? yeah, Lord
Africa must wake up the sleeping sons of Jacob
What tomorrow may bring. may some more love come
Yesterday we were kings, I tell ya young bloods
The world is yours today...]

[Bridge: K'naan x2] (x2)
Dadyahow daali waayey, nabada diideen
Oo ninkii doortay dinta, waadinka dillee
Oo dal markii ladhiso, waadinka dunshee
Oo daacad ninkii damcay, waadinka dooxee
[Translation]
Oh ye people restless in the refusal of peace
And when a man chooses religion, aren't you the ones to kill him?
And when a country is built, aren't you the one's to tear it down?
And when one attempts to tell the truth, aren't you the one's to cut him down?

[Guitar/Instrumental break]

[Break: Nas]
We want to thank y'all, everybody out there
This is Nas, Damian Marley
Distant Relatives
We're all distant relatives, no matter where you from, where you live
How near or far
Africa, China, Japan, Afghanistan, Israel
We're all fam, we're all distant relatives
So that's why we came together -- one of the reasons
Why myself and Damian came together
Cause we all come from one place, and that's Africa
That's right, you too. And you
The whole world!
We're all family, we're just spread out all over the place
So to all my distant relatives, let's take it back home!

[Hook: Damian Marley]
I say! Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today? yeah, now
Africa must wake up, the sleeping sons of Jacob
For what tomorrow may bring, may a better day come
Yesterday we were kings, can you tell me young ones
Who are we today? Who are we today?

[Outro: Damian Marley]
Morning to ya! Morning to ya man!
Morning to ya love!



[Verse 1]
Through the lights, cameras, and action, glamour, glitters, and gold
I unfold the scroll, plant seeds to stampede the globe
When I'm deceased, by then the beast arise like yeast
To conquer peace leaving savages to roam in the streets
Live on the run, police paying me to give in my gun
Trick my wisdom with the system that imprisoned my son
Smoke a gold leaf, I hold heat, nonchalantly
I'm raunchy, but things I do is real it never haunts me
While, funny style niggas roll in the pile
Rooster heads profile on a bus to Rikers Isle
Holdin’ weed inside they pussy with they minds on the pretty things in life
Gettin' props is a true thug's wife
It's like a cycle, niggas come home, some'll go in
Do a bullet, come back and do the same shit again
From the womb to the tomb, I presume the unpredictable
Gun salute life rapidly, that's the ritual

[Hook 4X]
Here's a toast to my foes, trees, & women
(Déjà Vu)
It's like a whole new beginning...

[Verse 2]
Blunts, thugs and alcohol, what a mixture
Just picture, ya life as a whole judged in court they convict ya
They telling you your state of mind, like you worthless
So he curses, his mom saying Bible verses
That's all she works with
But miracles never leave the churches
Instead, it hits the pockets of the Preacher just to purchase
A house, with a swimming pool, labels me a sinning fool
I'm just a nigga who inherited a winning jewel
To be a trendsetter, whenever subject to
Respect this and all respect due is the essential
To street life, hustlin’, the struggle, broke ghettos
Boiling coke settles slow inside a glass kettle
Darren Levy on my TV, lifestyles of living easy
Got my crew tense, plottin’ to jips, to get whips with BBs
Pushing cakes, knew anorexics with ten plates
Celebrating elevation in the seeds that we make
So How You Like That?

[Hook 4X]
Here's a toast to my foes, trees, & women
(Déjà Vu)
It's like a whole new beginning...

[Verse 3]
Escobar life, gems and raw Tims
Gators for pretty boy haters
In Vegas with chicks trickin’ fortunes
I'm glistening, housing cops whistling
Still I'm drifting in a high, blunts is like insulin
95-I, I drive high, zoning
Stash box zone in my trunk, I flash not, teeth golden
Look at me now, Ma
Blowin’ but for how far?
Cars, cash, and bitches got me out more
And things you never dreamed I can vouch for
Snake niggas slither on the A-alikes
I ain't a Christian, but I find that we pray alike
Never the one to ask for the time to a saint
A mask and nine, I think, will make my problems sink
Down a canal, similar to how we drink
Distinct diamond-flooded Sphinx shines on my links
Drug money, snortin’ bitches, in the end of times
Got my nine, 'til I flatline, nigga, give me mine

Déjà vu (Repeat until end)



[Produced by Kanye West]

[Sampled hook and Kanye intro]
Some people really
Some people really
Some people really are still dreaming
As the sun sets
And the night falls
And them hoes call

[Verse 1: Kanye West]
He pulled up at 6:30 in a 745
As he waving "Shorty, hi", you know he showin' his bling out
She got in the car, he drove, he pulled his thing out
His girl caught feelings, she mad, she threw the ring out
How she found out she dreamt the whole thing out
Y'all be going through problems, you gotta work the kinks out
When you go to sleep? What do you think 'bout?
If y'all get a divorce
She gon' take everything except the kitchen sink out
Make it so cold that you gotta pull your mink out
Or grab your roller skates and turn a roller rink out
You now back up in the club, in the club, tryna min-gle
Meanwhile, she out doing the same thing now
Nightmares from your dream gal make you scream out

[Adlibs over sampled hook]
One two, one two
Some dreams stay dreams, some dreams come true
One two, one two
Some dreams stay dreams, some dreams come true
Some people really
Some people really
Some people really are still dreaming

[Verse 2: Nas]
How you a man waiting for the next man to get rich?
Your plan is to stick out your hand real quick
So if he feed your family and he serve you shit
Then he need that head you get and he deserve your bitch
Since you wishin' cash fall from the sky all your life
Dwellin' on the past when you was alright
When you was getting cash but wasn't too bright
Now your luck down, you feel like bustin' them shells
Nobody owe you, can't do nothin' for self
Want niggas to show you, how to come up with green
I schemed since I'm 14, what the fuck was your dream?
Rental cars, little broads, saying you was seen
With little niggas with a chain, you was doing your thing
How high was I? You the thousandth guy
That came around thinking we can see eye to eye
We on a different echelon
Could've got bread together, now you get skedded on

[Refrain: Sample of Kanye West and Nas]

[Verse 3: Nas]
She had several cars, she had credit cards
A castle, large master bathroom, getting a pedicure
Bellinis by the glassful, said she been meaning to ask who
Who in need of cash who, who could blast tools
And I'm eating cashews, knew she was bad news
But we mad cool, nothin' sexual
‘Cause I knew her since high school
Grew up with my dudes, like one of my crew
She worked for Fox News
One of her mans that she lent her drop to
Won't come back with it, so she want him clapped in it
Says it's important that it looks like an accident
She was snorting and her eyes had bags in it
She was recording, had a wire, askin' shit
Four days before I came by she got bagged with bricks
Crossed the line from her world of news castin'
To a world of entrapment, a good girl gone backwards

[Refrain: sample + Kanye and Nas]

[Sample of "They are still dreaming" to end]



[Produced by Trackmasters]

[Verse 1: Nas]
They never realized how real Nas is so decisive
It's just the likeness of Israelites mist that made me write this
A slight twist of lime rhyme, be chasing down your primetime
Food for thought or rather mind wine
The Don Juan features the freak shit, my thesis
On how we creep quick, fucking your wife that ain't so secret
It's mandatory, see that pussy, they hand it to me
I got no game it's just some bitches understand my story
There ain't no drama that my niggas never handle for me
My gator brand is Mauri, walking through rough land before me
Where the snakes put a smile on they face
Hoping and praying I'm stuck
Scoping they lay in the cut, weighing my luck
Player haters play this in cell blocks and rock stages
Winking at some females cops with cocked gauges
Really it's papers I'm addicted to
Wasn't for rap then I'll be sticking you
The Mac inside the Triple Goose
Facedown on the floor's the routine
Don't want hear nobody blow steam
Just cream or it's a smoke screen
Imagine that, that's why I hardly kick the bragging raps
I zone, to each his own and this ghetto inhabitant

[Hook: Nas and Foxy Brown]
Gotta watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways
Watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways

[Verse 2: Nas]
Now how can I perfect this?
Living reckless, die for my necklace
Crime infected, driving a Lexus with a death wish
Jetting, checking my message on the speaker
Bopping to "Mona Lisa", brown reefer, ten G's, gun and my Visa
CD cranking, doing 90 on the Franklin D. Roosevelt
No seatbelt, drinking and thinking
My man caught a bad one son, niggas is frightened
Secret indictments, as on to one seeking enlightment
My Movado says seven, the God hour that's if you follow
Traditions started by the school not far from the Apollo
My 'fuck tomorrow' motto through the eyes of Pablo
Escobar, the desperado, word to Cus D'Amato

[Hook: Nas and Foxy Brown]
Gotta watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways
Watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways

[Verse 3: Nas]
Some niggas watch you
See you when you think you on the low
Ain't hard to spot you, you swore to keep it real after you blow
Three keys, new V's, went to Anguilla with your ho
Stayed around the hood, smoothest cat getting the dough
Them oldtimers advise you to them problems that's ahead
Drama with the Feds, not listening just bobbing your head
Your Roley shining, thinking to yourself 'nobody's taking mine'
At the same time your ho is getting snatched from behind
Put in a van, where's the hundred grand, strippin' her hand
From all the ice, wouldn't you know
You knew these niggas all your life
What made them mark you victim
You fucked up somewhere down the line
Now they had to target your Wisdom
She took 'em to your place, straight to your safe
You doubted it could happen, sick of yapping
Jump in your ride, headed to your side
Puffin' ganja, get to your crib, can't find her
Just a reminder: shouldn't have your stash house where you crash out
Could have passed out, your coke was gone, now you assed out
Dead bitches tell no lies, you should use your eyes

[Hook: Nas and Foxy Brown]
Gotta watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways
Watch dem niggas that be close to you
And make sure they do what they supposed to do
Cause you know they be thinking about smoking you
Never personal, nowadays, it's the ways



[Produced by No I.D.]

[Verse 1: Nas]
At times I window watch at the Wynn hotel
Lots of thinking happens in life, will I win or fail?
Mind of a shooter, CFO also
Ethiopian food flown in, it's unlawful
Money is attractive, honey dress strapless
Agent Provocateur underwear: she's classic
Stroll up in the party: titanium black card
Romanian ladies like Casablanca, Casbah
'Cept we in the VIP area, that's ours
You know the real rap gods, typical trap star turned rap star
These old heads got stories, the days they was kings
I pray secret indictments don't take away their dreams
You 16, you could do 20, come home young
Catch 20 years when you 40? Holmes, you're done
What have we become? Rap stars from trap stars
Black gods to Ansars to Sunnis back to goonies
A 360 in the streets real grizzly
Shooters is cold, kid, the old shit was learning
Student enrollment to focus, yet hooligans roll with
Toasters to pop your medullas off of your shoulders
This ain't the Truman Show; it's the human show
Ask the F.B.I. agent at his cubicle
Chewing on his pencil eraser with intents to erase you
It's U.S.A. against the gangsta, where's the love?

[Hook: Cocaine 80s]
Love, I'll trade you love
I've traded fire with you long enough
Is that all you brung, without love?
That's fucked up, but I saved your soul
Roll that up

[Verse 2: Nas]
Sometimes I sit on the bench just to watch the game
Feet on cement, there ain't a mobster living I could name
Who made it out rich, in his absence I do not proclaim
To not have a heart like wild animals not tamed
Maybe just a typical thug nigga was my rank
'Cept I had a vision above niggas, what I think
It's crazy how many brothers come where I come from
Some made it out big, some dead, some unsung
Shots for soldiers on 23 hours lock-up
Younger generation, they want to mimic and mock us
Laughing, separating themselves like they not us, like
"Cops'll look at you like they look at me? That's preposterous"
Ain't it gangsta how your man made it? I'm humble
One gun, one crazy ass nigga, that's Jungle
Now we having babies, cause growing up it was just us
No uncles or cousins to fight with us, we was fucked up
But still it was beautiful, the love is mutual
Even though me and Jung ain't show up to your funeral
I hold your son hand, tell him he the man, we love you
Your pops was king, you have a whole lot to live up to
The G is in your genes, already you tuck
Inherit your dad's swag, his George Jefferson's strut
Stay flyest, they gon' want to know what in your diet
Don't be surprised if they want to check your shit and your vomit
Tell them you let it marinate, they swear you made them a promise
No matter what they do, you just stay a man of honor
I'm a street corner nigga, New York Knicks loyalist
Corona sipper, pass it, I'ma blow it with you
It ain't the Truman show; it's the human show
As the F.B.I. agent at his cubicle
Chews on his pencil eraser with intents to erase you
Young brother go and get your paper, I got love

[Hook: Cocaine 80s]
Love, I'll trade you love
I've traded fire with you long enough
Is that all you brung, without love?
That's fucked up, but I saved your soul
Roll that up
... Roll that up



[Intro]
Yo, I wonder if Langston Hughes and Alex Haley
Got blazed before they told stories
I'mma get blazed before I tell y'all stories
I saw on TV today, this man lost his son, his son died
So he had him cremated
Took his ashes and then made it to a diamond ring
Now he watches his son shine everyday
I just thought about that
While I sit here ashing in this ash tray, yeah

[Verse 1]
The making of a mad band, intricate stories of DeVante Swing
Ava Gardner, the crashin' of James Dean
Bobby Brown influenced by Rick James and it goes
Prince wanted Alexander O'Neal to be Morris Day or Jerome
But Alex was putting coke in his nose, nigga whylin'
Could be a myth, but I swear that the source was close
Phyllis Hyman killed herself, it was crazy
Mommy was bad they say
Donny Hathaway free-fall from a balcony, he swings

[Hook]
As the blunt ash falls into the ash tray
I could see my whole life fly past me
Did I? Did I keep it gangsta or keep it classy?
And will the money and fame outlast me?
The blunts ash falls down in the ash tray
Well, I see my whole life fly past me
I'm asking, did I keep it gangsta or keep it classy?
Did I? Anything else you wanna know, just ask me

[Verse 2]
Sam trusted Womack with his main lady
He tossing in the grave like, "This is how you repay me?!"
A change gon' come, wish you didn't trust me so much
Marvin said "No mountain's high enough," fly stuff
David Ruffin was punchin' Tammi Terrell
Gave her concussions
While the Funk Brothers was laying down the percussion
When Flo from the Surpremes died, Diana Ross cried
Many people said that she was laughin' inside

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
John F. Kennedy's enemies dealt with treachery
It interests me. Judy Campbell in Gucci sandals
She's what a temptress be
The death of Ennis Cosby, what a mystery!
Or the Chicagoan Harold Washington
Someone is sabotaging 'em
Watch out for the traps
Larry Troutman killed his brother Roger Troutman
Then he killed himself, that's the end of Zapp
And I wouldn't change a thing, mistakes of the greats
This is what came from their pain
From their hurt we gain, an unfair exchange

[Hook]

[Outro]
I could smell old bogey cigars
Long record perfumes, smelling just as sweet
Me and my wife K, flying in a drop-top
Like Ruby and Ossie Davis, baby – know what I mean?
Yo, man, I get smoked out, and start thinking 'bout
Hattie McDaniel got a Oscar
For playing Mammy in "Gone with the Wind"
And she didn't get allowed
Wasn't even allowed to go to the premier
Believe that? Couldn't go to premier to her joint
Man, you know they were strong back then, man
Blunt from my ash tray, nothing gon' to live past me, yeah



[Produced by Salaam Remi & Nas]

("HIT MEH!!")

[Verse 1]

Redhead Kingpin, Tim Dog, have you seen 'em?
Kwame, King Tee or King Sun
Super Lover Cee, Casanova Rud
Antoinette, Rob Base never showin up
You see Black Sheep, Group Home, Busy Bee?
Ask Ill and Al Skratch, "Where My Homiez?:
Leave it to y'all, these niggas left for dead
Last week my man swore he saw Special Ed
Rap is like a ghost town, real mystic
Like these folks never existed
They the reason that rap became addictive
Play they CD or wax and get lifted
I recommend when your kid turn ten
Let him hear Spice 1, made plenty noise
Positive K, Father MC, the Skinny Boys

Where are they now?

[James Brown sample]

[Verse 2]

See I remember them forever
The original Spinderella
Lakim Shabazz, 9 MM
Fu-Schnickens, Buckshot, Finesse & Synquis
.Who was a "Rappin' Duke?" Da-ha!
Silk Tymes Leather was cute
Body & Soul was Dee from Pump It Up's group
Oaktown 357, J.J. Fad too
Had pop hits and gold ropes
Where my man Young MC and Tone Loc?
Kris Kross, the BO$$, Divine Styler
Def Jef of course let's break it down ta
Mic Geronimo, Pharcyde and Coolio
I heard Craig Mack back in the studio
Have you seen these lost MC's?
Funky Four Plus One, Force M.D.'s
Miss Melody, I hope she packin' a bankroll
As well as Educated Rapper, Ice and Kangol
Shanté, she from around my way yo
EPMD, K-Solo, where are they now?

[Verse 3]

QB
First off this ain't no diss record
This for some of my homies that were misrepresented
Legends of the game, y'know?
What up to Moe Dee the legend? Rest in peace Cowboy!
Yeah, all the rappers...male, female, DJ's, e'rybody!
Rest in peace Jam-Master Jay, the whole crew, word up
Juice Crew All-Stars, MC Shan, Tragedy, Craig G
Yeah nigga, yeah nigga
Shan whaddup baby?
Where are they now?



[Produced by Precision]

[Verse 1]
Pushin' drop-tops, Stacy Lattisaw tapes, the 80's had us all apes
Youngest gorillas up to bat at home plate
That was a uncanny era, guns in my pants, yeah
X-Clan hair, with dreads at the top of my fade
Homicidal feds on the blocks where I played b-ball
That's when I wondered was I here for the cause or because
'Cause Ray Charles could see the ghetto
Was told to stay strong and I could beat the devil
'Cause yo, I used to play Apollo balcony seats
Watchin' niggas swing razors in the front row
Then out in the streets, the car show, 560's, chemical afros
Acuras pumpin' Super Lover Cee and Casanova
Live chicks be asses bustin' out of they clothes
Wearin' lip gloss, big door knockers peelin' they earlobes
So where them years go?
Where the Old Gold beers and cheers go?
But now them shorties here though, so

[Hook]
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers stay drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride; one mo' time
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers still drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride, right?

[Verse 2]
Political thugs in shark suits persuade us to pull triggers
In army boots, yellin', "Join the armed forces!"
We lost the Vietnam War, intoxicated poisons
Needles in arms of veterans instead of bigger fortunes
There's still a lot of nigga crawlin' in the corporate offices
War in the ghetto, we crabs in a barrel, they torture us
They won't be servin' the beast too long
The murderers wearin' police uniforms, Confederate flags I burn
Beat Street breakers were dancin' to the music I chose
And Peachtree, Atlanta crackheads was tootin' they nose
In frozen corners of Chicago
Loaded-up llamas, children with fo'-fo's and double-revolvers
We devil incarnates headed for jail
Where Shell gas company in South Africa be havin' us killed
Your paper money was the death of Christ
And all these shorties comin' up just resurrect your life
It's like a cycle

[Hook]
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers stay drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride; one mo' time
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers still drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride, right?

[Verse 3]
Niggas used to wear rags on they hair when it was fried up
That's when we were lied to, buyin' hair products
Back before my generation, when our blackness started disintegratin' till awareness started penetratin'
The styles come from prison, they used potatoes makin' liquor
Just to prove we some creative niggas
Turnin' nothin' into somethin' is God work
And you get nothin' without struggle and hard work
War is necessary to my niggas in chains
From Green to Sing-Sing I'm wantin' y'all to know one thing
The hardest thing is to forgive, but God does
Even if you murdered or robbed, yeah it's wrong, but God loves
Take one step toward him, He takes two toward you
Even when all else fail, God support you
I done it, got "God's Son" on my stomach
My heart and my lungs was affected
From Henny's and gettin' blunted
Do your body right and it loves you back
You only get one life, and yo, because of that
I'm still blazin', goin' out for the cause
Still rockin' stockin' caps, not for the waves, obeyin' no laws
And it's like that

[Hook]
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers stay drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride; one mo' time
The doo rags are back, fitted hats, snorkels and furs
Rikers Island buses still packed, what's the word?
The drinkers still drinkin', or puffin' they herb
And I'm still enjoyin' life's ride, right?



[Intro: Nas]
Lord Lord y'all, what I'm gonna do?
Lord Lord y'all, Shit is all true

[Nas]
Mmm... Fried chicken, fly vixen
Give me heart disease but need you in my kitchen
You a bird but you ain't a ki'
Got wings but you can't fly away from me
Driving in your bucket seats
All the way from Kentucky to fuck with me
Look what you done to me, was number one to me
After you shower, you and your gold medal flour
Then you rub your hot oil for about a half an hour
You in your hot tub I'm looking at you salivatin'
Dry you off I got your paper towel waitin'
Lay you down cause you're red hot
Louisiana style you make my head rot
Then I flock to the bed then plop!
When we done I need rest
Don't know what part of you I love best
Your legs or your breast
Mrs. Fried Chicken, you gonna be a nigga death
Created by southern black women to serve massa' guest
You gonna be a nigga death
Mrs. Fried Chicken you was my addiction
Dripping with high cholest-
Like Greeks with his falafel, Italian with his to-mato pasta
What roti is to a rasta
Trapping me; You and your friend mac' and cheese
Candy yams, collard greens but you knocking me to my knees
It's killing me when I'm inside
Nothing I need more than a fish fry

[Busta Rhymes]
Shit, it taste good I can't lie
It's like you're walking out the tanning salon
When I pull you out the oven from baking I got you on my mind
Rubbing that sun tan lotion all up over your body
So amazing how you sparkle when I glaze you swine
Hey, my pretty HamHock
It's so feminine the way you submitted and how you gave me power
To massaging me to shower you with lemon water
Marinate you with seasoning and dipping you in chowder
Baby it's like you at the spa the way you gently lay in the pan
While enjoying your butter milk treatment
I sit and watch the grease sizzle bubbling on your skin
Despite the funny fragrance still I lick my finger frequent
In any event, I'm reflecting on all the signs
That I got saying that I shouldn't fuck with you
But the way you that you would taste made you hard to resist
When I put my mouth on you but that's another issue
Butterflies up in my stomach, when I laid eyes on you
Or was it infection manifesting
Confused over the feeling, impatiently eating you
Trichina worm chewing on the wall of my intestine
I'm a eat you until there's nothing left
Until my very last breath, you gonna be a nigga death
Despite I prepare it the best specialize in cooking swine as a chef
You gonna be a nigga death
Who cares if the swine is mixed with rat, cat and dog combined
Yes, I'm a eat the shit to death

Ain't that some shit
I'm a eat some shit until what I'm eating kills me
And I choose to do that, why?
Cause that's just what niggas do



[Intro: Nas]
Yeah, hahaha
"When I flow for the street.." - ".. who else could it be"
"Nas.."

[Verse 1]
Yo explode, my thoughts were drunken from quarts of beers
Was years back, before Nasir would explore a career in rap
As a music dude, I mastered this Rubik's Cube
Godzilla, fought Gargantua, eyes glued to the tube
Was a, long time ago, John Boy Ice
Geronimo po-lice jumpin out Chryslers, e-z wider paper
Pops puffin his cess, punchin his chest like a gorilla
Outside was psychoes, killers
Saw Divine, Goon, and Chongo, Lil' Turkey
R.I.P. Tyrone, 'member no cursin front of Ms. Vercey
Big Percy, Crazy Paul, the Sledge Sisters
My building was 40-16, once in the blue, hallways was clean
I knew, all that I'd seen had meant somethin
Learned early, to fear none little Nas was huntin
Livin carefree laughin, got jokes on the daily
Y'all actin like some old folks y'all don't hear me
Yo I'm in my second childhood

[Hook: repeat 2X]
"When I flow the for the street.." - ".. who else could it be"
"N-A-S" - "Nas.."
"Resurrect, through the birth of my seed.." - "Queensbridge"
"Make everything right.." - "Get yours, nigga"

[Verse 2]
Yo, dude is 31, livin in his moms crib
Ex-convict, was paroled there after his long bid
Cornrows in his hair, still slingin, got a crew
They break his moms furniture, watchin Comicview
Got babies by different ladies high smokin L's
In the same spot he stood since eighty-five, well
When his stash slow, he be crazy
Say he by his moms, hit her on her payday
Junior high school dropout, teachers never cared
They was paid just to show up and leave, no one succeeds
So he moves with his peers, different blocks, different years
Sittin on, different benches like it's musical chairs
All his peoples moved on in life, he's on the corners at night
With young dudes it's them he wanna be like
It's sad but it's fun to him right? He never grew up
31 and can't give his youth up, he's in his second childhood

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Baby girl she's always talkin name droppin hangin late
Drinkin smokin hates her baby daddy, craves shoppin
E poppin Ecstasy takin, won't finish her education
Best friend she keeps changin, stuck with limitations
Lustin men, many hotels, Fendi, Chanel
With nothin in her bank account frontin she do well
Her kid suffers he don't get that love he deserve
He the Sun, she the Earth, single mom, even worse
No job never stay workin, mad purty
Shorty they call her the brain surgeon
Time flyin she the same person, never matures
All her friends married doin well
She's in the streets yakkety yakkin like she was 12
Honey is twenty-seven, argues fights
Selfish in her own right for life
Guess she's in her second childhood

[Hook]



[Produced by Havoc]

[Intro: Prodigy & (Havoc)]
Fresh out the  motherfuckin' pack (Right out the pack son)
For niggas don't know how to act (No doubt son)
Fresh out the  motherfuckin' pack (No doubt son)
For niggas don't know how to act

[Verse 1: Prodigy]
Yo, NYC, U-N-I-verse, seriously
Havoc and P, Queens niggas so it seem to be
Monopolize, strategies of war, exercise
Mega got word back from Noreaga
The D.A. got video cassette tape of
The god with the God-U-Now, pullin' a caper
Runnin' up in the spot, mask and duct taped up
Pig-tied they motherfuckin' wrists to they ankles
I been through, crime shit my niggas into
Peep the issue, situation like this, we stickin him too
JFK on our way to L.A
Got links with big cats down in Santa Barbré
My crew do it the Mobb way, every day
Crime pay, who wanted gunplay? Thrill me
Niggas kill me, grillin' me, you wanna look? Peep the nine milli
Now undress, you know the drill-y
Niggas suspect, weak links pose threats
I have yet to met challenger who go against my set
Gemstars razor sharp like Gillette, shavin' closely on
Any character approach me
I let the streets get the best of me, infamy, my destiny
While cat burg-lars tryin' to sneak peep the recipe
Inside my rap cookbook, paragraphs is gourmet
You pay about $5,000 a plate

[Verse 2: Havoc]
No doubt kid, I hit them niggas like a bid
The prosecutor, runnin' up in your crib
Do your dirt, I do my dirt all by my lonely
It's only me, and the gat that's holdin' me
We got it locked beyond measure, your clique's under pressure
Extort you for your treasure, smack you with the undresser
Represent your clique, go ahead, get that ass whipped
(Floatin' in the river with your body wrapped in plastic)
Wannabe thug, get smacked for back talkin'
QB represent fuck that, it can happen
While you rappin', I'm busy tryin' to sneak the gat in
Contamin', cut the party short while you jammin'
We think smarter, reach harder
Got the .44, bodyguard of somethin' you don't want a part of
If I was you, then I would do what I have to
But you ain't me, you hesitated so I clapped you
Then stepped off casually, naturally me

[Verse 3: Nas]
Niggas thinkin' shit sweet
I carry big heat, wavy hair, chipped teeth
Up in this bitch deep, Queens murder cliques meet
Yellow tapes on black gates
Mediterranean, projects is like Kuwait
I escape into zones, that's irregular
Why debate on the phone, I'm solar cellular
Escobar 600
You just a crumb inside a world where the rich run it
Curriculum of a mathologist
Deep throats, they try to swallow this
Anthropologists, dynasties of great knowledgists
I preserve in my dome, niggas mics is full of silicone
Spot's blown, guerilla ice on this killer's life
I put my word on it
Now you can sleep on or rock or swerve on it
Nas is menage a trois' on Mount Airy lodges
We like a smooth fam', but rougher than El DeBarge's
Catchin charges, of marksmen, living heartless
Grab a cartridge, cock my shit on some Mob shit
We mobbing
Putting niggas in mausoleums
From Queens cross the Throgs Neck, heads bop, I see 'em

[Outro: Prodigy & (Havoc)]
For niggas don't know how to act
To all my niggas on the block slangin' crack
Rest in peace to my niggas layin' on they back
To all the niggas who bust gat
(Live nigga rap)
For niggas don't know how to act
To all my niggas on the block slangin' crack
Rest in peace to my niggas on they back
To all the niggas who bust gat
(Live nigga rap)
For niggas don't know how to act
To all the niggas on the block slangin' crack
Rest in peace to my niggas on they back
To all the niggas who bust gat
(If you's a live nigga)



[Intro: Nas]
I want you to close your eyes
And vision the most beautiful place in the world
If you in the hood on the ghetto street corner
Come on this journey, the best journey
Acres of land and swimming pools and all that
Check it out

[Verse 1: Nas]
I'm capable of anything, my imagination can give me wings
To fly like doves over the streets, watchin' many things
Kids walkin' home from school on drug block
Missionaries pass out papers that read "Love God"
I see faces, cases, judges, and juries, masons, lawyers and cops
I watch because every thug's face is my mirror
But this was one in particular
This kid, he was the vintage stick 'em up pro
Sixteen years old, did his jail sentence, nowhere to go
Every morning, calls his comrade to come and get him to smoke
He insane, already gone mad blames himself for his setbacks
Dangerous street corners where it sets at
Slang from dust to dawn, detectives act like they maniacs
Chasin' him, his asthma's flarin'
Smokin' like a chimney, on Remy, of course he not carin'
He need a place to go to keep his mind expandin'
I give him a helping hand, bring him out to Thugz Mansion

[Hook: J. Phoenix]
Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Every hour, 'cause it's all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Every wrong done will be alright
Nothing but peace, love, and street passion
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion

[Verse 2: 2Pac]
Dear Mama, don't cry, your baby boy's doin' good
Tell the homies I'm in Heaven and they ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night, it had me shook
Drippin' peppermint Schnapps, with Jackie Wilson and Sam Cooke
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin' there kickin' it with Malcolm 'til the day came
Little LaTasha sho' grown
Tell the lady in the liquor store that she's forgiven, so come home
Maybe in time you'll understand
Only God can save us, when Miles Davis cuttin' lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past
That passed on, they in Heaven, found peace at last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in Heaven
So right before I sleep, dear God, what I'm askin'
Remember this face, save me a place in Thugz Mansion

[Hook: J. Phoenix]
Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Every hour, 'cause it's all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Every wrong done will be alright
Nothing but peace, love, and street passion
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion

[Verse 3: Nas]
A place where death doesn't reside, just thugs who collide
Not to start beef but spark trees, no cops rollin' by
No policemen, no homicide, no chalk on the streets
No reason for nobody's momma to cry
See, I'm a good guy, I'm tryin' to stick around for my daughter
But if I should die, I know all of my albums support her
This whole year's been crazy, asked the Holy Spirit to save me
Only difference from me and Ossie Davis, gray hair maybe
'Cause I feel like my eyes saw too much sufferin'
I'm just twenty-some-odd years, I done lost my mother and
I cried tears of joy, I know she smiles on her boy
I dream of you more, my love goes to Afeni Shakur
'Cause like Ann Jones, she raised a ghetto king in a war
And just for that alone she shouldn't feel no pain no more
'Cause one day we'll all be together, sippin' heavenly champagne
Where angels soar with golden wings – in Thugz Mansion

[Hook: J. Phoenix]
Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Every hour, 'cause it's all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Every wrong done will be alright
Nothing but peace, love, and street passion
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion



[Intro]
Uhh, y'know
I still run with that, that blood of a slave, boilin in my veins
It's just hot - until a nigga can't take it no more
Blood of a slave, heart of a King - turn my voice up

[Verse]
Ay yo, the brother's "Stillmatic"
I crawled up out of that grave, wipin the dirt, cleanin my shirt
They thought I'd make another "Illmatic"
But it's always forward I'm movin
Never backwards stupid here's another classic
C-notes is fallin from the sky, by now the credits roll
They're starrin Nas, executive poet, produced directed by
The Kid slash Escobar; narration describes
The lives of lost tribes in the ghetto tryin to survive
The feature opens with this young black child, fingers scratched
Cigarette burns on the sofa, turnin the TV down
While Mary Jane Girls, 45's playin', soft in the background
Food from C-Town's, mornings was hash browns
Stepped over dopefiends, walkin out the door, all of us poor
I learned the difference 'tween the snitches
The real ones, and who's soft
And the murderous, hungriest crews
People jumping from roofs
Shotguns pumping, made it through my youth
Walking very thin lines, ages seven and nine
That's the age I was on my album cover, this is the rebirth
I know the streets thirst water like Moses
Walking through the hot desert searching to be free
This is my ending and my new beginning - nostalgia
Alpha and Omega places, it's like a glitch in "The Matrix"
I seen it all, did it all, most of y'all will pop for a minute
Spit a sentence then the game'll get rid of y'all
Y'all got there but y'all didn't get it all, I want my style back
Hate to cease y'all plan it's the rap repo man
To them double up hustlers, bidders, niggas who real
Professional stick-up kids dreamin' for mills
Let my words guide you, get inside you
From Crip to Pirus this is survival

[Outro]
Blood of a slave, heart of a King
Blood of a slave, heart of a King
Uhh, uhh, blood of a slave, heart of a King
Uhh, yeah
Huh, Braveheart, uhh..



[Hook]
I carry the cross
If Virgin Mary had an abortion
I'd still be carried in the chariot by stampedin' horses
Had to bring it back to New York
I'm happy that the streets is back in New York
For you rappers, I carry the cross

[Verse 1]
Y'all can keep y'all weak beats from your corny producers
There's a new king of the streets, you're gonna get used to
I was the old king of the streets, that y'all once hated
But now I reinvented myself, and y'all all waited
NAS, N.A.S. mean Niggas Against Society
Noisy I aim, not silently, noose all surroundin' me
I hang 'em, I string 'em up, ain't no thing, I just drop 'em
To which doctor you copped
And you locked and it ain't what it was
I changed it up from that pop shit, it's hard to see R&B
Rappers arguably, started fuckin' up the game horribly
'Cause I parted the sea, then these novices targetted me
Bitches infatuated say they love me lyin' to me
What I've discovered is my brother's tryin' to be
The next me, yeah I support him, but he's blinded I see
Jealousy, he love me to death and I'm buggin'
I love him for life, we both still mournin' on our mother's life
And I don't need much but a Dutch, a bitch to fuck
A six, a truck, some guns to bust
I wish it was that simple, the last emperor, hit yo' ass
With the Nasty Nas diary, get out my path

[Hook]
I carry the cross
If Virgin Mary had an abortion
I'd still be carried in the chariot by stampedin' horses
Had to bring it back to New York
I'm happy that the streets is back in New York
For you rappers, I carry the cross

[Verse 2]
I can't keep a bitch 'cause none of them come before little Des
I can't be too rich, too many hoes lined up for sex
I can't rest until my niggas in houses with pretty mazes
Water and flowers in 'em
While my niggas walk around in they trousers grinnin'
Gotta keep a lot of heat; .30 cals, 10 millimeters
.40 cals plus the Heckler to set y'all straight
You too light? I shoot your freckles out
You too dark? The infrared show you what the TEC about
Huh? I'm stressin' out, need more offices for bosses
Secretaries and meetings with big sharks who mad greedy
We can sell mo' boats on the coast
Give coats to the po', and give hope to the broke, then live low
But that ain't reality; I look happy, but under the sky
You see a nigga who know, out of three women two out of three
Will love you but lead you to they own hidden evil
Bitch! You the reason niggas be beefin', ho get on
'Posed to be Earth, ain't worth the pussy that you sit on
From here on it's a new day
Million dollars ain't what it was yesterday
Many problems, many niggas, most involved but they fake
Hope y'all relate

[Hook]
I carry the cross
If Virgin Mary had an abortion
I'd still be carried in the chariot by stampedin' horses
Had to bring it back to New York
I'm happy that the streets is back in New York
For you rappers, I carry the cross



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Verse 1]
I pull a string on the lamp and shit darkens
I'm living in an elegant Moroccan apartment
Proletarian chicks sparking
Convo weak and I don't really care for her jargon
Balcony is windy, looking at the stars and
Alky on the Henny, woozy in the head, wobbling
Gucci pillow on the bed, while she giving noggin
Listening and tripping off the Maxwell album
Thinking I should leave to a European island
Bristol and Spain, bring a book about Stalin
Dinner serenaded with a violin
But shorty not qualified to be took to that kind of outing
Gotta be a fly bitch to hang around that fly shit
Fine dining Olive Garden
Nah bitch, Nas is In the real deal
Food spots on the constant
Pick the right wine, a Chianti to wash it
Lifestyle encompasses top-notch watches
Rolexes, synonymous shit I'm copping
Ask her has she been around duffle bags
Full of that fuck you cash
Get off the jet with me in heels, I'll cup your ass
Looking in my eyes saying "Nas you're one lucky bastard"
Grip your clutch, you'll get finger fucked in the passenger
I hit the dutch, blow smoke out, music and laughter
See us in the coupe flying passed ya

[Verse 2]
Esco, dress code, it changes
Harrods in England
Back to the star spangled labels in my closet hanging
Counting wonder in the Tundra
Get humbled or disgruntled when I come through, confront ya
Let nothing slide, sly remarks, you must wanna die
But you frontin', why? When we all know you pumpkin pie
When we in the bus we fly better shit than Emirates
To Dubai, to the Chi, I'm a crucial conflict
Heaven sent, cause a storm, typhoon flood you out
You are what a thug about, I'm a fuckin juggernaut
Never sleep, never tire, keep a freak I tie up
Who don’t speak, she quiet
So I can think, conspire
On my feet’s a (?), and sometimes sneakers
Wear ties at the Setai Miami
Time-pieces are from Zurich
It’s like I’m allergic, to Nonoxynol 9
Give it to you raw so you can feel it



[Produced by Dr. Dre]

[Nas] Motherfucking Dre, whassup my nigga
[Dre] Sup Nas
[Nas] Chilling God
[Dre] Niggas is up in here hittin' some of this chronic nigga
[Nas] Yeah and this chocolate over here, they mixed this shit up
[Dre] Nigga hit some of this shit nigga
[Nas] Yeah, lemme get that. I'm tired of these niggas
Niggas stealin beats and niggas is stealin' your whole techniques and shit, niggas wanna take everything from a nigga man
[Dre] Yeah yeah yo Nas it's like this man
Niggas can't do it like I do it, d'yaknahmsayin'
Just like niggas can't do what you do
[Nas] Right, right
[Dre] You know, can't nobody fuck with this
You know all these niggas out here just
Talkin' this East coast West coast bullshit
Niggas need to kill that shit
And make some money, y'know
[Nas] Word
[Dre] Fuck it
[Nas] What is it, what is it God
[Dre] Let's get together, make some fuckin' music
[Nas] Right, that's what I'm sayin', that's what I'm sayin'
[Dre] and get paid, and just, let that be it
All these niggas talkin all this bullshit
Better sit back, and watch what happens

[Verse 1]
The Golden Child chop that ass up, you was holding out
Let the streets be the court and corners hold the trial
Fatal not fictitious
I rock the cable 86 shit
Foreign cars young with crazy bitches
Mad smoke makes me able to quote
Soliciting ill editions of that Murder I Wrote
A provocative plan can bring a knot to my hand
As the pyramids that stand on top of the sand
In the heat of the moment, like Farrakhan said we need atonement
Bulletproof glass, S-classes chrome kitted up
Calicones lit it up
I didn't get touched checking my nuts
I stood up and lit a Dutch
Clutching gats quick to bust
But knowing how these niggas tattle
I sneak move get the drop, one shot without the gun battle
So when you run the lead travel
I come through it's taboo
Ninety-six ways made to clap you

[Hook]
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is comin

[Verse 2]
In the black limo, Jack Daniels through the cracked window
I spot the fake, red dot his face like a Hindu
Snatched the symbol, tied his hands to make examples
Substantial amounts you owe to the firm
Crew, Firm affliation, paper chasing
Chips glossy, rich Pablo Escabano
Sophisticado, blazing hollows like Saddles
Rap apostle, nacho cheese, I'm Castro
Compared to these niggas who swear to be real
But impostors to Hoffa
Nas plague kills
Counting bills to send to all my jail niggas who fell
From New York to LA, QB to CPT for GP
A hundred G cars
Garcia Vegas cigars
Kani shit, mad jiggy
The clout, murder material serial scratched out
My name's passed out like it's something venereal
But back in stereo

[Hook]
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is comin

[Verse 3]
From childbirth to hearses, flow like the Nile cover surface
I bit the fruit from the Serpent
Apocalyptic, get bent stay splifted
Control the rap game you got it twisted
Dr. Dre way the Bridge say, shake dice and kiss it
Sip Crist' push the six with biscuit
Jeep full of chickens, pull up beside, have a listen y'all Nas y'all
Fly gangsta wavy hair teeth chipped in
My shit bump in the courtroom drunk, links truck
Rocky bracelet cognac kernel never chase it
Rap hero black DeNiro
Federal Bureau tapped my line and got zero
Rap pro diamond roll, hustling low
Pro-file white gold style, raking bloody dough by the pile
Shot down still alive he struggling for the phone
Fo-fo blow him, when homicide comes, these three words are sung

[Hook]
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is comin

[Outro: Dr. Dre]
Check this out, it's Nasty Nas, and Dr. Dre
East meets West
That's how we making it happen
That's how it goes down for the nine-six
Aiyyo Nas let's get this money
Let's get paid
Sit back and watch all these motherfucking clowns out here
Riffing and beefing about this bullshit
Yo while they doing all that
We just gon' kick back with these honeys
This Cristal and party to the year 2G

[Hook]
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nas is coming
Nasty Nas is coming
Nas is comin



[Produced by Trackmasters]

[Verse 1]
Yo, release what's in me
Besides the Henny, it's eyes that's seen plenty
Fiends get skinny as if Queens was a Craig Jenny
Instead of diet plans it's crack 200 grams
I pump a G-pack, peeping for where the D's at
It's slow, lookin' for Rambo, the cop who got grazed
Back in the days, chasin' niggas through my project maze
That cop he got a death wish
He run behind niggas until you breathless
Everyday he makin' ten arrests, shit!
My nigga check this, I know the bitch he rest with
I even blessed it, forty-dash-ten inspect it
(Already checked it Dunn, near his ankle you could see his gun)
Peep, he parked his Jeep in the back of the slum
To check Tanisha, fat ass real fly, with the blonde caesar
Vittadini summer gear, she push the two-seater
I heard she brag about the way he eat her
A Irish man short slim with a tan, they say he laced her cheeba
She due, be lookin' weaker, now her teeth are foul
Speakin' loud, peep her style, in and out of every reefer cloud
Fat ass dissolvin', like cotton candy in a mouth that's starvin'
Rock the same gear daily, like a soldier in my squadron
I heard she let Jake investigate from her window
Cause she's a nympho, suckin' dick and coughin' up info
So now it's set up, her and the beast to get wet up
I know he vest up, we blazin' from the neck up
(Yo let me knock first) Soon as he open let your Gi-Glock burst
They had the chains on, son hit the lock first
We busted in the cop jerked
Jungle popped one in his shirt
I grabbed the bitch by her tits, she tried to say she Earth
We saw the cameras, tape recorders, and the monitors
They eyein us
(Nas yo he survived one from the fo'-five)
Pull his shades down, they seen his last days now
There's no way now, we can be treated just like a slave now
Two in the dome, he's laid down
Ayo the bitch is saved now
She's living in a snitch grave now

[Hook]
Shootouts is similar to Wild West
Broad daylight, face to face without a vest
You know the episodes, thugs camouflage the spectacles
Please God just save the life that the Devil sold
See It Was Written but was never told
Peep the jewels black man, it's even better than gold
Niggas roll with iron, police roll in hot pursuit
Tryin' to stop the loot, fuck Jake, cock and shoot

[Verse 2]
Still on the streets with my peeps so deep
We threw a block party for my man goin' up creek
To do his two to four
Niggas show love, from all around the board
Peace Lord
Sony Handy-Cam on record
Pop a bottle, cause when you come home we still got it sewn
We can watch the tape play back and just zone
Film all the bitches, on the benches with ill extensions
We block the streets off, only crew cars can enter
Music was loud and it was crowded
Barbecued wings we fed the fiends (gamble in the back) Killa shouted
And Frank tried to stop the bank, lost about what a Roley cost
Guzzled his drink, and staggered off
He's a Big Will, used to slang krill, now he own The Hill
Couldn't take losin' his cash, and I could feel
Somethin' in the air yeah
Frank returned with Pierre
A gun slinger, who niggas hadn't seen in a year
I usually be holdin' - 'specially this type of weekend
And everyone except for me had started reachin'
They had gats in each others faces, with kids
And grandmothers around, Frank's only concern was his paper
My man Killa let off, half of them fake niggas jet off
Police blitz quick, waitin' for that to set off
Runnin' the static, it got me mad cause they a bunch of faggots
Startin' shit in my hood, I can't have it
Yo High, get the 40-Cali stainless, Jake is still out
Let's make it real and still make them niggas famous
Dip behind trees in fatigues and squeeze, dodge and weave
Hearin' Jake retaliatin', and Wiz was up the alley waitin'
We breeze, jump in the ride, heard Pierre died
Internal bleedin' inside, and ain't been back since ninety-five

[Hook]



[Refrain: Damian Marley]
Tribal war
We nah want no more a dat
Every man deserve to earn
And every child deserve to learn, now
Tribal war
A nuh dat we a defend
Every man deserve a turn
Like a flame deserve to burn
Tribal war
A nuh dat we a defend
Every man deserve a turn
And every child deserve to learn
Tribal war
A nuh dat we a defend
Every man deserve a turn
Like Babylon deserve to burn

[Verse 1: Nas]
Man what happened to us
Geographically they moved us
From Africa
We was once happiness-pursuers
Now we back stabbing, combative and abusive
The African and Arab go at it they most Muslim
Used to be moving in unison
Disputes would end
Bounty hunters and grape street get cool again
Sub-standard housing
Got the young running rampant
Wilding, for a Phantom
He can style in
Mask on his face
Grabbing his Ruger
Saying nobody move or I'll shoot you
Man you're expiring
Catch 25 and he does it like a man
He sides with black
White pride and mexican
Survive the best he can
Strap a shank to his thigh
Why do we all collide
Why do the young die
Extortion, murder and burglary
Tattoos his chest
Says his enemies don't deserve to breathe

[Refrain]

[Verse 2: K'Naan]
I drink poison
Then I vomit diamonds
I gave you Mandela, black Dalai Lamas
I gave you music
You enthused in my kindness
So how dare you reduce me to Donny Imus
Timeless in case we never been acquainted
Flyness who made it
It gets duplicated
Mindless violence
Well let me try to paint it
Here's the 5 steps
In hopes to explain it
ONE: It's me and my nation against the world
TWO: Then me and my clan against the nation
THREE: Then me and my fam' against the clan
FOUR: Then me and my brother we no hesitation, uh
Go against the fam' until they cave in
FIVE: Now who's left in this deadly equation?
That's right, it's me against my brother
Then we point a Kalashnikov
And kill one another

[Refrain]

[Verse 3: Damian Marley]
Man a war tribal over colors
Over money, over land, and over oil, and over god
And over idols, and even lovers
Over breakfast, over dinner, over suppers
Over jungle, over rema, over buckers
Over Brooklyn, over Queens, and over Rutgers
Over red, and over blue, and over chuckers
Over red and over blue and under covers
Tribal trouble
The drive-bys double
Cause the youth dem nah go war
And go fight with knuckle
The two sides scuffle
Vietnam nah go a war
With no more kung fu nun chuckle
Missile and shuttle
And the Queen of England and Uncle Sam
Dem a flex dem muscle
The tribal hustle
Blood diamond poodle
Survival struggle



[Produced by L.E.S.]

[45 seconds of talking/skit]

[Verse 1]
It was a murder
Jake just hit the corner people swarming
Three in the morning I jumped out my cab like "Fuck
Niggas is buck," mega bloodshed, the tape's red
I heard some bird whisper, "Yo he should have ducked"
I puffed the lila, just before I hit the scene for rilla, I'm all high
It's late I'm looking down at the fella
Shit's pushed in, ambulance placed him on some cushion
His mom's had a stare I wouldn't dare second look when I murk
It hurt, kind of took it as a brief reminder
That the street's designed to stop your life clock
The beast'll time ya, cell to cell, suspect ass nigga you fail
First time locked in Comstock, my mind blocks the frail
Bursting, blasting at your forty cal shell, split your dry cell
My niggas never snitch why tell
We roll with no regrets, destinies, fiftys and equities
Queens'll be the death of me

[Hook] x2
To the suspect witness: don't come outside
You might get your shit pushed back tonight
(Suspect witness don't come outside
You might get your shit pushed back tonight)

[Verse 2]
Dear God, I want the riches, money hungry bitches infested
Giving the jealous niggas sickness to witness
My crew dresses in vests, feel the essence
Try to test this scientist, able and reckless slaughter
Nautica Down, frames look petite
Ten millis, minks designed just for my physique
I keep a low pro as if I owe, bless the flow lovely
My pants hang while I'm dancing, sipping the bubbly
Hey, me no worry, hashish keep my eyes Chinese
Roll the two Phillies together, make blunts Siamese
I meant it, I represent it, descendant made of
Early natives that were captured and taught to think backwards
Trapped us in a cracker's psychiatric, it's massive
A Million Man March, alert the masses
Tan Clarks, Armani in small print upon my glasses
Don assassins, Armageddon
The wedding of a freak and a beast
Seven heads, got the righteous threatened
Life Was Written, the plot curves behind the settin'
Comprehend the grammar, Math we own
Are you the type of nigga to shoot a leg to get your name known?
I flip the brain tone
Niggas get hit and wrapped in plastic
The mic I strike in vain, givin' the pain of what a MAC is
What you with? Luchi or drama
No sleep means insomnia
No need to check the clock, the streets'll time ya

[Hook]
To the suspect witness: don't come outside
You might get your shit pushed back tonight
(Suspect witness don't come outside
You might get your shit pushed back tonight)

[Verse 3]
It justifies Nas Escobar's leavin' shit mesmerized
Mega live, like the third world
Decipher my deceiver make him a believer
Spitting gem stars, words in my mic type receiver
Bond is my life so I live by my word
Never fraudulent Queensbridge don't make no herbs
Spread my name to deacons, politicians while they speakin'
Rebel to America civilization
Caught you sleepin'

[Interlude]
Street educated, created
Fly gangsta, Firm style
AZ, what up, what up?
Jungle, Benny Blanco from the Bridge
Mega, big Hi, clap em down
L.E.S. on a murder quest



[Produced by L.E.S]

[Verse 1: Quan]
Can we please have a moment of silence
That's for my niggas doing years in confinement
And for my soldiers who passed over, no longer living
That couldn't run whenever the reaper came to get em
Can we please pour out some liquor
Symobolizing let's take in time to consider that
Though our thugs ain't here, the love is here
And we gon' rep til slugs kill us here
This for my dawgs stuck in the struggle trying to gain
Smoking trauma, sniffing Ra while selling cocaine
Trapped in the game, not knowing how to stop and get by
To live it alive, so instead they live it to die
Can we please have a moment of peace
For every G that fell for his flag in the streets
Blooding and thugging, folking and loking
Cryping and creeping, Latin and Kinging
Or just for poor righteous teaching

[Hook: Quan]
As day comes and night falls
For the rest of our life we'll miss y'all
And even though life must go on, we'll still mourn
While wishing y'all were home

[Verse 2: Nas]
Yeah and can we have another moment of silence
For brothers who died from Black-on-Black violence
From here to the Dark Continent where rebels sell diamonds
To clients allover the world, got little Black girls dying
And can we please pour some more liquors
For Will, Bokeem, Bar, Pappy my niggas
Here's another Warrior Song from Nasty and Quan
It's to him I pass the baton to carry this on
Street's Disciple, salute to those who's gone with bullets
And I promise through rhyming Quan gon' rep his life to the fullest
And can we please have a moment of truth
For soldiers and troops away with helmets and boots
And families back home who pray they make it home safe
Hoping that they don't get hit with a stray or missiles
This is just a moment to let you all know that we miss you
Mommy I'm still here, wishing I was there with you
Let's take em home

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Quan]
And can we please have a moment to mourn
For Pac, Biggie and Pun, cause through us they live on
Jam Master Jay, Freaky Tah and Aaliyah
Big L and Left Eye, when we die we hope to see ya
Can we please have a moment for children
Who got raped or murdered or trapped in the system
Who never knew their father, never learned to dream
But was guided by drug dealers, killers and crack fiends
For single mothers that's forced to play mom and dad
Busting her ass to give her kids shit she never had
For my niggas in the pen hoping rhymes'll get em signed
So when released, they can say bye to a life of crime
For every mother that held a son in the street bleeding
Crying a song of sorrow to dark and deep for speaking
Just a moment outside the day to day struggle
To let the ones we really care about know that we love em

[Hook]



[Intro]
Bis-Mi-Allah A-Rahman A-Rahim
(To the Gods.. to the Gods.. to the Earths)
Pass that shit homie

[Hook]
Now tell me what y'all smokin
What kinda heat y'all holdin
Well is your creep move potent?
I got a bunch of bullets in the bag of guns I pass 'em to my niggas c'mon
We bi-coastin', keepin our po-ckets bulgin'
We got the plan in motion
I got a bunch of bullets in the bag of guns I pass 'em to my niggas c'mon

[Verse 1]
Zoom, from outer space he comes
Blunt in his mouth with his hand on his gun
Bitches flappin' they gums, do he be clappin' and shootin' guys
Actor or a movie star, rapper revolutionized
What is his race, nation, or creed?
Is he Arabic, Black, Latin, Asian they read
Magazines say I walked on water, talked to the heavens
Spit at judges, stepped on peasants
But in reality, I just entered your galaxy
September '73, up in these wild streets
Fuckin' these wild freaks, a harem of hoes (God damn)
And my mystique got 'em tearin' my clothes

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
My nigga smoke with one lung
If he cough he might die, passin' me trees
The liquor bottle's almost empty
We about to collide, with the enemy
Only way you die if it's meant to be
You fuckin' with a general
No discussion is the principle we bust and it's the end of you
Now we knockin' on your mama door
Like we came to fix the sink; my kind of war
Death, angels coming for you
Spirit horse runnin' from your body like Young Guns 1 and 2
Paramedics fightin' for you, who's gon' win?
The hands of time, or the hands of medicine
Don't cry, witness your fate, this is your wake
Walk by your casket, spit in your face
Enter the fog dog, the light is your guide
And when you're gone all your niggas gon' light it with Nas

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Pardon but I gotta question of life now
Look at the nigga next to you right now
Is he real, fake or scared?
Do it like this niggas right hands in the air
Ball it to a fist and put it over your heart
Now let's say it all together let the ceremony start
"I shall - stay real stay true stay holdin figures
Never put a bitch over my niggas
I shall never, cooperate with the law
Never snake me I always hold you down in war
If they take one of mine, I take one of theirs
I never break the oath to the death I swear"
I swear that's how we pledge allegiance, to the alliance
Of underworlds killers and thugs, though the science
Of a nigga still yet to be found
So light up some green, and pass it around, pass it around

[Hook]

[Outro]
Wanna get high, come smoke with me
Smoke with me, light it up

[During outro]
Damn, nigga, take this weed, I'm bout to go over to my bitch house, get my fuck on, nigga! Y'all niggas stay up!

[During fade]
Come here, bitch, come smoke with a nigga...



[Produced by Havoc]

[Intro]
Q.B. since 1933
To nine-six
Check the shit

[Havoc]
Nine-six, Escobar 600

[Verse 1: Nas]
Check the shit
My mind's set, son got wet
I'm vexed really
They snatched off his Rolex, smacked his bitch silly
Why niggas acting illy word to Will he bout to feel it
I feel it, he shoulda been dealt with it
Them niggas sour they put to much flour in their coke
And got the nerve to wonder why they're broke
While we was gleaming, niggas was scheming
Seen the ill Bimmers beaming
Triple-beam and doubling cream, had em fiending
To get they fingers on the dosa
I called Sosa
"Sosa, these niggas hit the God bring the toaster
Meet me in the Bridge I'm bout to go loca"
Left my rat beggin me to stay and stroke her
He came through with two fly bitches, Venus and Vicious
With two macs inside the Volvo
What up God, I'm still sober
I need some Henn to bend me over
My nigga Hav gotta soldier
It's getting down, it's going down kid
I heard he might not live, I'm holding back tears
Told these broads to put it in gear
With two females that don't smile digging they style yo
Whattup son, these niggas done started something wild
You know the clique well, Rhamel with the gold in his grill
Tried to get a name holding the steel
I paid attention to the females
Maintained bitches when it get real
Sos' pulled me close and told me the deal
He said both hoes'll peel
Spray shots and reload and still handle the wheel
Point em out smoke a Phil' then chill
I layed back Escobar status, knowing The Firm got it cornered
We on it, shit we was born with

[Hook: Havoc] x2
Spark the lye, QBC yo it's do or die
In this, business of trifeness
I finesse this, Boyardee, we chef shit
Perfect shit, Albert Einstein minds connect wit
Dangerous sons, step back let the TEC lift
Lift you up, bless you with a shorty then we set you up

[Verse 2: Nas]
Hold it right there pull over
That nigga right there inside the Rover
I knew he'd be right here, I told you
Let's get him now, look at him smile, ice Bulova
Polo pullover, big links and rocking boulders
He's stunting, after he left my man like that
Without a fair chance to fight back, but I'll be right back
He never seen us
Sos' gave the mac to Venus
And Vicious, lookin delicious, handle yo' business
And step to him, shake your ass try to screw him
Do what ya gotta do to get to him
A tight Parasuco, with young faces
Can turn niggas Buttafuoco, of all ages
They was amused by the way they walked, way they talked
Only if they knew these girls'd spray New York If they had to
Heard him ask Venus, "Could I have you?"
He jumped out a Jeep, heard her tell him "Don't grab boo"
They started chatting, was only bout a minute, flat when
They jumped in the back of the Jeep laughing
We followed them pollying, he thought the hoes were Somalian
Probably when they hit the Holiday Inn
I grabbed the phone and called the Mobb and them
We layed low about a hour or so, these bitches movin' too slow
We both holding, what if them wild hoes started folding
Sosa, said say no more, we started rolling
Before we got in they must have shot him, security wildin'
There the girls go, hurry up we out
In the 940, me Sosa and two shorties
The punk niggas got murdered in the orgy

[Hook: Havoc]
Spark the lye, QBC yo it's do or die
In this, business of trifeness
I finesse this, Boyardee, we chef shit
Perfect shit, Albert Einstein minds connect wit
Dangerous sons, step back let the TEC lift
Lift you up, bless you with a shorty then we set you up

[Outro: Woman]
QBC, Queensbridge motherfucker
Roping niggas up
Cause our clique is thick
Another day another dollar
More money, more murder
Fuck this shit, Q.B. up in the house



[Hook]
No idea's original, there's nothing new under the sun
It's never what you do, but how it's done
What you base your happiness around? Material, women, and large paper
That means you inferior, not major

[Verse 1: Nas]
If niggas could look inside my mind, you'll find
Where bodies are buried, first look past the hotties who dimes
Go to the center, enter with caution, past the brain cell graveyard
Where weed's responsible for memory loss
Let's witness, the horrific, the stench'll make you nauseous
See what I seen every day I live with this torture
Lightin' spliffs up to stay high like 24 hours
Sleep with my heat, wash with my gun in the shower
My tongue is power, it thrills women, kills demons
Long as I'm still breathin' I'm still winnin', I'll teach 'em
The hood converted from trey bags to 20's a girl
Everybody had money, every summer was real ill
Four-finger rings, dope dealers, 'caine/Kane
"No Half Steppin'" with flat tops when Rakim reigned
Radios on card tables, Benetton, the Gods buildin'
Ask for today's mathematics, we Allah's children
And this was goin' on in every New York ghetto
Kids listened, Five Percenters said it's pork in Jell-o
We coincide, we in the same life, maybe a time difference
On a different coast, but we share the same sunlight
You're part of the world, might be like colors and gangs
While on my side, brothers'll murder for different things
But it all revolve around drugs, fame and shorties
Stuck for your bling, stripped for your chain, the same story
From, Czechoslovakia to Texas metropolis
Them treacherous rastas in the Mexican mafias
Be scrapping with tats on they back, violent wars
Nothing less than a lethal injection if ever caught
Courtrooms, eagles and flags, American style
While in our world, the ghetto stays incredibly foul
Watching for paint chips, don't want no lead in yo' child
But them gangstas put lead in yo' child, the bezzy be out
The chain be like a hundred K
Shining since Roxanne Shante' made "Runaway"; that's been a minute
Genesis is deep, my features are that of a God
It's not a facade it's a fact, these rappers wanna be Nas
My Exodus doesn't exist, I'll never leave the streets, it's all in my mind
Even with sleep I'm duckin nines in my dreams
Si-rens, wide awake, why'd I think it would change
Can't hide when you famous or even try to do the same things
Like, somebody's always watching
My life before I, walk out the door I size up every option
Eyes cut every direction, it's like God or guns
Which is better protection? Can't decide, that's a hard one
I mean they wanna see me in prison, the chains bamboozled
Headline reading "Rapper Slain From a Man Shootin'"

[Hook: repeat 2X]



[Intro: Nas & (AZ)]
(Peace king)
Peace king
(Listen, they wrote a book on your life)
Right
(You think anybody'll read it?)
No fuckin doubt!
(Let's make history homie)
Aight then
(You know we brought the hoes clothes and money rolls to the table)
No, fuckin, doubt
(It's time to manifest this)
Shit we the flyest nigga
(Bring it to a whole, y'know?)
Gangsta nigga

[Hook]
Niggas better watch ya back, it's so cold
Pinky rings shining, so act like y'don't know
Bitches in heat for niggas that got dough
We the flyest gangsters
What you don't got is my natural glow
Counting out stacks and macking out hoes
Pushing big dicks and packing our chrome
We the flyest gangsters

[Verse 1:AZ]
Follow; I'm like a Lamborghini green Diablo
Coupe VT, it's like DVD when I flow
Feel me, I'm loved like the great late Malik Sealy
The one the player haters hate dearly, but can't near me
Homicide can't scare me
I o-bide by the laws of these streets sincerely, a real nigga
The type that can build with ya
Verbalize bring life to a still picture, it's God-given
Been blessed with Allah's vision, strength and beauty
Truly my only duty is to dodge prison
Play with me, I'm modest 'til them strays hit me
Regardless the circumstances I'mma stay filthy
Dough forever, the live stay low forever
And fuck niggas, cause it's hard to keep them close together
One dependant, no wife, one co-defendant
No forms of weakness, I flow with vengeance

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
I do what I can do when I can do it
Feel how I feel when I feel what I'm feelin
Live how I live it's only cause I been through it
Learn to try it like to eat it and shit it's nuttin to it
Burn it light it weed it and off the liquor, while drivin outside
I'll never catch a vehicular homicide
My music is a description of my vibe of course
My life, my sites, my thoughts, what I like on my fork
Cause you are what you eat, you eat what you can
You pray to bless the food but first you wash your hands
To wash away them bad spirits, don't bring it in your home
Once you let them in they stayin, evil be gone, say it
I'm proud of Mase for giving himself to the Lord
Wonderin does Faith, think about Big anymore
Of course my nigga Horse got married, see shit is changin
We ain't these little niggas no more, running dangerous
I like to bone, I'm a peaceful brother
Eat up so much the girls call me seafood lover
Be having they legs shakin, stab 'em, break 'em
I'm Hercules Hercules when havin relations, the flyest

[Hook]

[Verse 3: {​​​Nas & (AZ)}​​​]
We put this on the, soul of our born (as we hold the Qu'ran)
Kamikaze style
(Older cats coaching us on)
Yo, it's kill or be killed
(Understand, real'll be real)
A forty-shot spectrum {​​make your whole embassy kneel}​​
(Identity sealed, protected by our) energy shield
(And fuck a drop, cause that's that shit that got Kennedy killed)
Close the book
(Was taught never expose a crook)
Between the knight and the bishop
(Wanna knock ya rook
I'm a rare breed never had a fair to lead)
I ain't light niggas recite, (too impaired to read)
{​​We both hard hit just like Camacho and Vargas, who's a target?}​​
Now watch how we close the market, motherfuckers

[Hook x2]



[Produced by Will.I.Am]

[Nas]
There comes a day in your life when you wanna kick back
Straw hat on the porch when you old perhaps
Wanna gather your thoughts, have a cold one
Brag, to your grandkids on how life is golden
So I'mma light a cigar in the corridor of the crib
Pictures on the wall of all the things that I did
All the money and fame, 8 by 10's
Of the whole Rat Pack inside of a big frame
Colliding with big names that could've made your career stop
All that, and your man is still here and I'm still hot
Wow, I need a moment y'all
See I almost felt a tear drop

[Chorus]
When was the last time you heard a real anthem
Nas, the millionaire, the mansion
When was the last time you heard your boy Nas rhyme
Never on schedule, but always on time

[Hook]
These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me
These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me

Ohh, I'm that history I'm that block
I'm that lifestyle I'm that spot
I'm that kid by the number spot
That's my past that made me hot
Here's my life long anthem
Can't forget about you
(Can't forget about, Can't forget about you)

[Nas]
Can't forget about the old school, Bam, Caz, Melle Mel, Flash
Rocksteady spinnin on they back
Can't forget when the first rap Grammy went to Jazzy, Fresh Prince
Fat Boys broke up, rap hasn't been the same since
So irregular, how it messed you up
When Mr. T became a wrestler
Can't forget about Jordan's retirement
The shot Robert Horry hit to win the game in the finals kid
Some things are forever, some things are not
It's the things we remember that gave the world shock
They stay in a place in your mind so snug
Like who the person was with whom you first made love

[Hook]
These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me

These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me

Ohh, I'm that history I'm that block
I'm that lifestyle I'm that spot
I'm that kid by the number spot
That's my past that made me hot
Here's my life long anthem
Can't forget about you
(Can't forget about, Can't forget about you)
Can't forget about you
(Can't forget about, Can't forget about you)

[Nas]
Unforgettable, unsubmittable, I go by N now
Just one syllable, it's the end cause the game's tired
It's the same vibe, Good Times had right after James died
That's why the gangsta rhymers ain't inspired
Heinous crimes help record sales more than creative lines
And I don't wanna keep bringing up the greater times
But I'm a dreamer nostalgic with the state of mind
The past the past enough of it, aight then
But nothing gives me chills like Douglas and Tyson
Or Mike when his talk was live
Or when he first did the moon walk on Motown 25

[Chorus]
When was the last time you heard a real anthem
Nas, the millionaire, the mansion
When was the last time you heard your boy Nas rhyme
Never on schedule, but always on time

[Hook]
These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me

These streets hold my deepest days
This hood taught me golden ways
Made me, truly this is what made me
Break me, not a thing's gonna break me

[Nat "King" Cole sample]
That's why, darling, it's incredible
That someone so unforgettable
Thinks that I am unforgettable too



[Hook]
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, still we choose to ignore
The obvious, man this history don't acknowledge us
We were scholars long before colleges
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, but still we choose to ignore
The obvious, we are the slave and the master
What you lookin for? You the question and the answer

[Verse 1]
We trust no black leaders, use the stove to heat us
Powdered eggs and government cheeses
The calendars with Martin, JFK and Jesus
Gotta be fresh to go to school with fly sneakers
Schools with outdated books, we are the forgotten
Summers, coolin off by the fire hydrant
Yeah I'm from the ghetto
Where old black women talk about their sugar level -
It's not unusual
To see photos of dead homie's funerals
Aluminum foil on TV antennas
Little TV sit on top the big TV, eating TV dinners
Girls dye their hair with Kool-Aid
They gave us lemons, we made lemonade
But this nigga's paid, ancestry of slaves
Descendant of kings, it's necessary I - bling
Put rims on everything, wear Timbs on every scene

[Hook]
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, still we choose to ignore
The obvious, man this history don't acknowledge us
We were scholars long before colleges
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, but still we choose to ignore
The obvious, we are the slave and the master
What you lookin for? You the question and the answer

[Verse 2]
Do I mean it like a slave master, nigga?
No I'm gangsta, gotta eat rappers
My abbreviation was young when I caught the cases
That should mean the court could see my changes
Take off the bracelets
Savage when broke, Smoke sour diesel, need no Bowflex
My chest still cut up like a bag of dope
Thought patterns consist of boss matters
Spit Moses' lost commandments like a gross sandwich out my mouth
Toast to government cameras peepin us, every week I must
Have my cars, homes and phones squeaked for bugs
But this is what I was dreamin of
Between cuttin hard coke with new razors slicin my fingers up
They used to string us up, we wanted everything
But the one bringin us cake be the snakes like the
Like the New Jack City wedding scene
No time for mistakes, tryin to get it like Medellin

[Hook]
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, still we choose to ignore
The obvious, man this history don't acknowledge us
We were scholars long before colleges
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, but still we choose to ignore
The obvious, we are the slave and the master
What you lookin for? You the question and the answer

[Verse 3]
People afraid of criticism
But I always put myself in a sacrificial position
They been know I ain't just rappin for fame
I got my old homie's half-sister's father askin' for chains
Yep, I give the cash up, this paper don't matter
They see me from skinny to fatter, when I rap about war
They got a tendency to scatter, they ain't my backup no more
So now my enemies are at my front door
Cause anytime we mention our condition, our history or existence
They callin it reverse racism
Still to this day the streets torn - my brother Jung'
I'll always have a seat for him - not behind me, beside me
You'll always know where to find me
They say the close ones will hurt you
So let's keep a small circle
On the road to riches and diamond rings
In the land of the blind, the man with one eye is the king

[Hook]
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, still we choose to ignore
The obvious, man this history don't acknowledge us
We were scholars long before colleges
They say we N-I double G-E-R, we are
Much more, but still we choose to ignore
The obvious, we are the slave and the master
What you lookin for? You the question and the answer



[JR GONG INTRO]
Now I and I say greetings in the name of The Mighty King
And I & I say played by the King love is all I bring
And I & I say Africa is I & I responsibility Dreadlocks
Yes, Huh!

[Hook 1 SAMPLE]
To the Promise Land
Going to The Promise Land
Yes the Promise Land O Gosh now
To the Promise Land
Ye

[VERSE 1 JR GONG]
Imagine Ghana like California with Sunset Boulevard
Johannesburg would be Miami
Somalia like New York
With the most pretty light
The nuffest pretty car
Ever New Year the African Times Square lock-off
Imagine Lagos like Las Vegas
The Ballers dem a Ball
Angola like Atlanta
A pure plane take off
Bush Gardens inna Mali
Chicago inna Chad
Magic Kingdom inna Egypt
Philadelphia like Sudan
The Congo like Colorado
Fort Knox inna Gabon
People living in Morocco like the state of Oregon
Algeria warmer than Arizona bring your sun lotion
Early morning class of Yoga on the beach in Senegal
Ethiopia the capitol of fi di Congression
A deh so I belong
A deh di The King come from
I can see us all in limos
Jaguars and B'mos

[Hook 2 SAMPLE]
Riding on the King's Highway
To the Promise Land
Going to the Promise Land
O Gosh
Ye the Promise Land
Yeaha the Promise Land
Ooo

[VERSE 2 NAS]
Promised Land I picture Porsches
Basquiat Portraits
Pinky Rings realistic princesses
Heiresses bunch a Kings and Queens
Plus I picture fortunes for kids out in Port-Au-Prince
Powerless they not allowed to fit
But not about to slip
Vision Promised Land with fashion like
Madison Ave Manhattan
Saks 5th Ave and
Rodeo
Relaxing popping labels
Promise Land no fables
This where the truth's told
Use them two holes
Above your nose
To see the proof yo!
Imagine a contraption that could take us back when
The world was run by black men
Back to the future
Anything can happen
If these are the last days
And 100-foot waves come crashing down
I get some hash and pounds
Pass around the bud then watch the flood
Can't stop apocalypse
My synopsis is catastrophic
If satellites is causing earthquakes
Will we survive it
Honestly man it's the sign of the times
And the times at hand

[Hook 3 SAMPLE]
There's alot of work to be done, O gosh
In the Promised Land
In the Promised Land
O Gosh
Take me to The Promise Land
Ye the Promise Land
O Gosh now
To the Promise Land
Hey

[VERSE 3 DENNIS BROWN]
There's plenty of land for you and I
Buy and Buy
Lost of food to share for everyone
No time for segregation

[Hook 4 SAMPLE]
In the Promised Land
Yes a to
The Promised Land
The Promised Land
Going to The Promise Land
Ooo
There's a lot of work to be done in the Promise Land



[Hook]
Picture us married, you and me; K-I-S-S-I-N-G
I remember the first time, girl, you and me; F-U-C-K-I-N-G
Girl picture us married, you and me; K-I-S-S-I-N-G
I remember the first time, girl, you and me; F-U-C-K-I-N-G

[Verse 1]
She was the modern Isis, honey thought she was priceless
Perfect definition what a wife is, I like this
Showed me how excitin life is
I used to hang around dudes that used ice picks
The sheistiest, put you on they heist list
How we met it must have been fate
First date, crushed grapes, we ate lobster and steak
She kept asking questions how the cash made how my rent's paid
How many guns I sprayed and huns I laid
She said she want to have a family raise kids someday
Like out in Beverly Hills she wanna live one day
I can get with that I drop you off home
I call you hit me back
I wanna dig that and did I? I did that
Put it way up where her ribs at, her future kids had
You held out for two weeks, longer than these hoodrats
You precious more precious than lost treasure
Matter of fact I'm kinda hopin we can stay together

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
I see you dressed up in white face covered in veil
Do I hear wedding bells? My dogs throwin rice
And it's the day that your father give you away
To a real man that gently put the ring on your hand
Do we vow to stay faithful? Do more than try to
Now, look me in my eyes and say I do
Driving off in the Rolls Royce just married on the plates
We can spend our honeymoon in the states
You can throw your friend the bouquet
Something in the back of my head say
For us two, maybe cuz I love you
Hug you squeeze you touch you tease you
As long as we together it's heaven for me to please you
Won't stop til I tell you me to, beautiful
Deeper and harder love layin new with you
Running my fingers through your hair it's like days can go by
While I'm wit you and I won't even care, word

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
She been with young dudes, old guys, Hindus, pa-pi's
Colombians who cut pies, but none of them can touch Nas
Thug ones to those soft as baby shit
She been with hoodlums and those who had crazy chips
Til one day she decided to flip
It was nuttin I can do about it, like she the boss and shit
Started talkin this divorcin shit
I gave her my half rib, half my crib, half my cake
Half my car, half my kids? Can't get that
Tried to swing on the God, had to dip that
Yo, push her on the bed, lift her leg, had to rip that
All she wanted was rough sex, with her slick ass
Had to sit back, smoke a blunt and just look
With a fine-ass body and a damn good cook
For some reason yo she had me stuck and I had her in my web too
You my queen God bless you

[Hook to fade]



Still somehow I believe, we always survive.. but why?

[Nas]
To my dogs.. wherever you are

[Verse 1]
Whattup Big? You know shit is rough after you slid
You in God's hands now, keep a place for me kid
Ain't nuttin changed -- still Party and Bullshit
We used to fuck R&B Bitches and see who rhyme sickest
For every hit you made, more rappers afraid to come out
Machine Gun Funk, from Queens I came through to smoke blunts
You came to my hood, we was broke
I wonder if we stayed that way, would there have been gunsmoke?
Still on the block around fiends numb from coke, I guess so
Cause now with paper, shit is still ghetto
But fuck it black, you livin your life, through your loved ones
Peace to your daughter and your newborn son
It used to be fun, makin records to see your response
But, now competition is none, now that you're gone
And these niggas is wrong -- using your name in vain
And they claim to be New York's king? It ain't about that
It's more serious, I plan to toast it up with you
Joke with you, happy we on top, the most official
Ain't too many real ones out there; I feel some
But doubt they're, capable, to take it where you took it to
I missed your wake not cause I'm fake
Cause I hate to see somebody so great in that way
I woulda stayed so long with so much to say
I had to put it in writin to keep me and Brooklyn from fightin
Tellin me to pay my respects and move to the side
But I probably wouldn't have got off my knees to let people by
You can't kill nothin that's Ready to Die
You was like God to us in the form of Allah

Still somehow I believe, we always survive.. but why?

[Hook]
Still, we, will survive
No matter what, my people just stay alive
Still, we, will survive
No matter what, my people just stay alive

Thug Life never die..

[Verse 2]
Dear 'Pac, every thug sheds a tear drop -- and use teeth
To bite off beer tops, and Pour Out a Lil' Liquor
You was more than just the wildest nigga
2Pacalypse, I understand your style nigga
It's goin on the third year, since you've been gone
On the East and West Coast the same shit is goin on
The industry be talkin, offendin me often
They don't believe you dead, wanna see you in your coffin
I can relate, shootouts and court dates
All Eyez on You, niggas in your face invadin your space
You asked if I could trade in your place, how would I hold up?
How long would I ride, before I fold up?
How did you know through your rhymes it was your time to go?
You predicted it in every line, all in your flow
There could Never Be Peace I have to quote
Can't believe I heard my name on "the realest shit you ever wrote"
We had words cause the best supposed to clash at the top
But kept it brotherly, when we seen each other and stopped
In NYC, at MTV, people watched
We was both deep, after you left, I got no sleep
Think about how us real niggas would be
If we united, a nation of thugs, who could fight it?
You was caught in a wild homicide, or were you crucified
Like the son of God, when Lucifer lied
And make the world think, young blacks should be extinct?
But Thug Life'll never die, we stay high and just link
Will there ever be another MC as nice?
Will you return to us like the resurrection of Christ?

Still somehow I believe, we always survive.. but why?

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I wonder what the Commodores went through on tour?
Did Smokey Robinson, have to shoot his way out a war?
What has Al Green seen, that made him religious?
Was it the drugs -- put an end to the music business?
If so, should I put out the indo right now and write down
A plan and pursue my dream turn my life around
Cause I'm bound for the movie screen, cuties that scream
I'll need a extra Uzi riding through my own hood in Queens
It be the ones you always knew, that want it on
Tellin everybody it was him, that you fronted on
Thought we walked a million miles it was just twenty
Not used to walkin in the path of legit money
I thought I made it but we only took baby steps
Up the success ladder, where they pay me checks
To my clicks when I got it I said "Baby bless"
That was the 80's, but now look at this crazy mess
We in the 90's, and finally it's lookin good
Hip-hop took it to billions, I knew we would
A lot of ups and downs in the game, could lose or gain
A couple pounds tryin to maintain -- one day you here
The next you not; when you around niggas, check 'em out
Some is bout it, most individuals plots
And run the spots, some choose to stay to theyselves
While others have no cares and stay in jail
More than fifty percent of us
Endin up with holes through the chest
Through the head, through the gut it shows
The future for us young shooters and old killers
Who become rich as dope dealers?
Nothing left for us but hoop dreams and hood tournaments
Thug coaches with subs sittin on the bench; either that or rap
We want the fast way outta this trap
Whether it be 9 to 5 or slangin crack
To my deceased Gods wishin' I could bring you back
But life is a dream and y'all taught me that

.. always survive.. but why?

[Outro]
Always survive, always
Still, we, will survive
No matter what, my people just stay alive
Still, we, will survive
No matter what, my people just stay alive
Still, we, will survive (no matter what)
Still, we, will survive (no matter what)
Still, we, will survive
No matter what, my niggas just stay alive



[Intro]
Yeah, yeah, yeah yeah, Nas, uh, yo, yo
Life, they wonder, can they take me under?
Nah, never that, nah, yo, yo

[Verse 1: Nas]
I come from the housin tenement buildings
Unlimited killings, menaces marked for death
Better known as the projects where junkies and rock heads dwell
Though I owe to it my success
With survival of the fittest, every day is a chal'
I would think I'm a part of U.S.A. and be proud
Confronted with racism, started to feel foreign
Like, the darker you are the realer your problems
I reached for the stars but I just kept slippin
On this life mission, never know what's next
Ancient kings from Egypt, up to Julius Caesar
Had a piece of the globe, every continent
Yo, there's Asia, Africa, Europe, France, Japan
Pakistan, America, Afghanstan
Yo, there's Protestants, Jews, Blacks, Arabics
Call a truce, world peace, stop actin like savages
No war, we should take time and think
The bombs and tanks makes mankind extinct
But since the beginning of time it's been men with arms fightin'
Lost lives in the Towers and Pentagon, why then
Must it go on? we must stop the killin'
Tell me why we die, we all God's children

[Hook - Nas and Amerie]
All this hate can't last forever (uh, c'mon)
It's time that we stand together (yeah, for the world)
Everybody wants to rule the world (what, what, what, what, what, c'mon)
World (peace), world (peace), world (peace), world

[Verse 2: Nas]
Yo, there's brothers on the block, posted up like they own it
That's they corner, from New York to California
Got blocks locked down
Like, "dog you safe whenever you with me, see this is my town"
So the youngsters, grows in ghettos, goes to prison
At an early age, already know it's against him
So in order for him to survive, one day he must open up his eyes
To the set backs and rise
Cause, everybody wants a shot, in this land of opportunity
Look at what this country's got
There shouldn't be nobody homeless
How can the president fix other problems when he ain't fixed home yet
The earth wasn't made for one man to rule alone
To all colors and creeds, to home it belongs
I want land, mansions, banks and gold
The diamonds in Africa, oil in my control
The world's natural resources, all its residuals
But then comes foes, I have to guard it with missiles
And I become the most wanted
But is it worth hearing a million people problems and followed by Secret Service?
I guess, attempts at my life with loaded barrels
So move over Colin Powell or just throw in the towel, yo

[Hook - Nas and Amerie]
All this hate can't last forever (uh, c'mon)
It's time that we stand together (yeah, for the world)
Everybody wants to rule the world (what, what, what, what, what, c'mon)
World (peace), world (peace), world (peace), world

[Verse 3: Nas]
Y'all know that's my style, to hit you at the right time
No other compares to what Nas write down
Tell you my dreams, show you my pain is yours
You could get what you love, be a chain in cause
You alive right now
There's so many that's dead or locked up inside the beast, I'm a hot light now
It's whatever man think of manifest to the real
The plan is to wake up cause time reveals
All this hate can't forever last
All my ghetto heroes in Heaven, it's like you right here and never passed
You just transcend, I know I'm gon' see you again
Hopin I reach the world leaders and win
Ain't nothin without struggle, listen up, it's critical
We used to fear arms, now the weapons are chemical
In Hip-Hop, the weapons are lyrical
To be the best you challenge the best, then the blessings are spiritual
Top of the world for the kid and unless
Poppin any rapper's head off his shoulders no contest
I know the Most High hear me, so fly you can't near me
You scared of a mirror, my theory is that - knowledge is power
To every projects and every street corner, we gotta get ours now

[Hook - Nas and Amerie]
All this hate can't last forever (uh, c'mon)
It's time that we stand together (yeah, for the world)
Everybody wants to rule the world (what, what, what, what, what, c'mon)
World (peace), world (peace), world (peace), world

[Outro: Skit]
Yo, niggas ain't forget shit, know what I'm sayin?
Niggas ain't forget nothin
Men, women and children killed by the police and shit
Niggas ain't gon' forget that, you know what I mean?
Yo, what this war just show me is like, whatever you want out of life
Whatever you feel is rightfully yours, go out and take it
Even if that means blood and death
You know, that's what I was raised up on, that's what this country's about
This is what my country is, and my country's a muthafucka



[Intro: Nas]
Yo, this remix goes out to everybody out there
That call theyself "keepin' it real"
From yours truly, Escobar and Big R
From New York to Chi-Town
Check it out now
Commissioner Steve Stoute
Trackmasters, QB, check it, yo

[Verse 1: Nas]
Low profile, rap style, slick as Nu Nile
Give the crew pounds every time we cover new ground
Still survivin' but there's a few down, back in the essence
I'm askin' questions on the phone with jail adolescents
Quiet confession, the system's applyin' the pressure
My mind is guessin', is livin' and dyin' a lesson?
But not to be obliged with the mirage of cars
Take me off track from what the Gods focus on hard
Laid up, smokin' cigars, motionin' maids
To bring me toast and eggs kosher
Ice chokers and wolves to smoke ya
My wisdom culture lives in ultra madness
Devoted Coach bag bitch
Broke, the average nigga's hopes to get mad rich
But what's the purpose?
Only the Gods can watch the Earth twist
I'm physically trapped down on the surface
With all the crack merchants, snakes and serpents
Foul jakes that search us
Clowns with four pounds, this ain't a circus

[Hook: R. Kelly]
Street dreamer (Oh mercy mercy me)
Ain't nothin' out there for ya
(There ain't nothin' out there for you)
Situations gettin' heavy
Heavy, heavy, tryin' to be a gangster

[Verse 2: Nas]
Black clouds over the hood, I'm on the corner with the thugs
Late night under the Moon as they assume I'm slangin' drugs
'Cause I'm hooded up, thought a G a night wasn't good enough
Pushed my luck, yo, they had a brother put in cuffs
Luckily, made it out of court comfortably
Judge said I need a job, ain't nothin' comin' free
Could've got a one to three
I try to school these shorties under me
But they can't see, from life to death
So now we back to where we never left
The ghetto – it's a damn shame, knowin' it's a man's game
Shorty thinks it's time to make your plans change
All that runnin' round tryin' to chase what's already here
Been there, it's goin' nowhere
Pops told me knuckle up, no fear
I wish some of these killings they could be prevented
Whatever happens, it was written, meaning God meant it
But during life, you put your heart in it
Even though it seems we bein' targeted
Let that brother R hit it

[Hook: R. Kelly]
Street dreamer (Oh mercy mercy me)
Ain't nothin' out there for ya
(There ain't nothin' out there for you)
Situations gettin' heavy
Heavy, heavy, tryin' to be a gangster

[Bridge: R. Kelly]
Dream on, dream on
Dream on, dream on
Dream on, dream on
Dream on, dream on
Street dreamer, yeah
Street dreamer, dream on
Dream on

[Verse 3: Nas]
Sort of wild; since a child, hope was all we had
Dreamt of plushed-out pads
Complainin', the mental strainin'
How many in my crew was into gainin'?
Subtract the weak links up out the chain and
Rise and start reignin'
Blasphemy usin' Nas' name in vain
Some claim supreme being yet they lied in his name
I tried to learn the game and only thing I found incredible
Everything I tried to learn, see, I already knew (That's right)
And it's embedded in my heart now
So I could sit back, count a stack, and play my part now
I saw my life flash in front of my eyes, he wore disguise
Put a gun to me, hungry, he went on to chastise
That's Nas, ain't it? Made it rich from entertainment
Fresh Wally's painted, as he told the kid he came with
My first thought was: "How the game flip?"
Yo, perhaps it was somebody I smacked drunk in a party on yac
Or was I marked for a contract for some foul act
I did a while back or even beyond that
He got me layin' face flat, sayin' my grace, Black
Woke up in a cold sweat, yo, I hate that
Nightmares feelin' real, word to Will
My A-Alike I lost in the battlefield
That's why I hit the mic with mad appeal
Grab your shield and meet your maker
The Queens niggas die for paper
Deed the things, the street dreams will take ya

[Hook 3X: R. Kelly]
Street dreamer (Oh mercy mercy me)
Ain't nothin' out there for ya
(There ain't nothin' out there for you)
Situations gettin' heavy
Heavy, heavy, tryin' to be a gangster



[African Choir Intro]

[Hook 1: Jr. Gong]
Lord!
This Spear, huh!
Shaka Zulu, Bobo Shanti, Nyabinghi
Man a Mau Mau Warrior
This spear, eh
Fear and desperation no depression can't tarry ya
Despair, hey
Ayatollah, Idi Amin, Mennelek
Man a Masai Warrior
This spear, eh
Fear and desperation no depression can't tarry ya
Despair
Like burning spear and such and such before me
Who all fought for the cause and
This Spear, eh
Enforcing all the laws

[Verse 1: Nas]
The Master and the Masses
One has power
The other one lacks it
Guns are power
Controlled by assets
Owned by financial forecasters
Who are the Masters?
They are the Gangsters
They are the bankers
The ones who tax us
The Masses
They are us
The sheep, the people
Divided in classes
I go off like a Shi'ite bomb
And All ya'll see I'm on my
War paint on my face, shit
My nine millimeter on my waist
I'm a problem
Shoot up your place shit
Let a few go
Then I get low
Blazing Haze again
The Masters, The Wall Street War Chiefs
The Elitists Groups
The Masses
They pray to Jesus
Saying he will see us through
The Masters are the aristocratic
The Masses
Ask if the Most High
Is On his way here
I'm trying to stay clear
My mind is my modern day Spear

[Hook 2: Jr. Gong]
Hey
I say...
This Spear, huh!
Shaka Zulu, Bobo Shanti, Man a Gideon
Man a Mau Mau Warrior
Despair, eh
Fear and desperation no depression can't tarry ya
This Spear, hey
Through the hands of time and cruel men
It has slew more than a billion
Despair, eh
It keep on suppressing the humble man's opinion

[Nas - Verse 2]
This lead it'll Swiss cheese
When the fist squeeze
Mislead
The media misleads
Scares you to the point
Where you miss sleep
With that said
This lead with this Ruger
And that shooter
Sub-machine gun
Ratta tat through you
Copper tops, hollow points
Will do ya something bad
Our future
Is Mislead
Three strikes
There's no school
When a teacher strikes
This economy
This monopoly
Get no job
Just own your property
Now it's back to
What comes natural
Must survive any how you have to
Despair, Desperation
But I have no fear
When I hold This Spear

[Intermission]

[Jr. Gong - Bridge]
Make some boy know me nah smile
Cause this spear nah beg friends
Man a run racket
Man a run scheme
Man a run race
Man a run down Benz
Can't trust a she nor he nor we nor I
In a contact lense
Man a run from police
And a run down wealth
And dollars and nah make sense

[Jr. Gong: Verse 3]
So
Rise up to my defense
Hollow pointed is my preference
Should have been deterred
Don't know what you heard
Get referred
By the wrong reference
When this spear start dispense
It a fly and a tear through fence
Dismember your members
And all of your limbs
Body bust in enough segments
Well
Man a run drugs
Man a run risk
Man all a run out a time and ends
Man a run up and down
And a run fi dem life
And a run down this month rent
Nutin' nah go a yard
And food the a road
Then man have to go touch pavement
Despair was a tool
That was used to enslave man
And make manservant
Escape from Despair and Desperation
Becomes more urgent
Mankind needs to cleanse and wash out dem soul
With spiritual detergent
A distant army
A distant relative
Controlling the circumference
And any man move with no permission
They're feeling the circumstance of

[Hook 3: Jr. Gong]
This Spear, hey
Shaka Zulu, Bobo Shanti, Man a, eh
Man a Mau Mau Warrior
Despair, eh!
Fear of your recession and depression can't tarry ya
This Spear, hey
Inner city youth dem rise it up disguised as AK-47
This Spear, eh!
And anytime them clap it up the whole city level
This Spear
Like Burning Spear
And such and such before I
Who all fought for the cause and
This Spear, eh!
They can't ignore me
No!

[Outro: Dennis Brown]
What do you think of Africa?
Africa, Africa
Ha ha ha, Africa
Just, just the mention of it
Just the mention of it, man
It's like you call me name, man
Well you know Africa is motherland
And Africa is were we rightfully belong
And that's were I want to be



[Intro]
The unauthorized copy
Dedication to my children, my child, Destiny Jones
To my niece and nephews, Suree, Malik, Jabari
The world is yours
Acknowledgements: first off I wanna thank God
And I wanna thank everybody for helping me out with this
Couldn't do it without you. Chapter 1

[Verse 1]
January 28, 1968
Born into this world, William Griffin The Great
Chapter 1, Wyandanch, Long Island
Scientific rhyming invented a new style when
He met with Eric Barrier from East Elmhurst
The melody they created was the first
Burst on the scene 1986, with clap to this
'87 dropped a classic disc
The facts is the tracklist was like full
The vocals, the beats, according to Marley Marl
Recorded in my hometown Queensbridge
That's why it's so relative
This biography was unauthorized
I spit it how it was given to author Nas
William changed his name at sixteen to Rakim Allah
Cause Clarence 13X had New York on lock
Gods on every block, jams in every park
I remember hearing Kurtis Blow saying
"It can't get better than this"
'Til Run DMC blew my brains to bits
From leather coats to shell toes to the Stan Smiths, to Dapper Dan kicks
First million-dollar deal ever in rap
18th Letter did that
From 4th & Broadway to Uni to MCA
We followed the leader to Harlem's Apollo Theatre
Supreme, Rap and the 50 that don't rap
Fort Greene, Queens, Long Island wolfpack
Paid In Full posse, hot they was on
And Ra had his firstborn
With the next line I'ma be easy
His wisdom's name is Fifi
EPMD put a record out, was dope
Tension spread, and I quote
"Smack me and I smack you back"
Sounded like the answer to the "I Ain't No Joke" track
For a second it ain't look good
Little tension buzzing from Wyandanch to Brentwood
Misunderstood, all forgot
At sixteen when I met Freddie Foxxx
Toting burners, the whole coast's most concern was
How has Rakim's flow made Christians convert with Islamic ways
Let The Rhythm Hit 'Em was the third LP
A sophisticated mean one
Before similar voices were King Sun
A few others, but sooner or later, the game was Ra's kingdom
At sixteen, son was watching him, mesmerized
Respect, not jocking him, was so amazing, besides
He came on the stage with lasers in his eyes
Walk with me now

[Outro]
Unauthorized Biography of Rakim
Epilogue: Mother was a jazz singer
Nephew to R & B legend Ruth Brown
Discography: Paid In Full, Follow The Leader, Let The Rhythm Hit 'Em, Don't Sweat The Technique
That's the end of the group, went on for solo
Dropped "The R", then The 18th Letter, then I think something, The Master
Was signed to Aftermath
Scheduled to release an album Oh My God with Dr. Dre
The album was dismantled because of creative differences
The end
To the new beginning, yeah
Next book, KRS-One. Peace



[Nas Intro]
Uh, it's real, it's real, it's real
Uh, uh, owe me back, uh shorty
Shorty, what up, huh?
Come on

1 - [Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe me something

[Nas]
Yeah, owe me back like you owe your tax
Owe me back like forty acres to Blacks
Pay me back when you shake it like that girl

2 - [Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe, owe, owe

[Nas]
Yeah owe me back like you owe your rent
Owe me back like its money I spent
Pay me back when you shake it again

The don, all the time, with all the shine
You small time, I ball with mine
Links, minks, Bentley, it's all with mine
My jams bump out to the borderline
UK hot with it, blew spots with it
Every continent love when I spit it
Corners to blocks, even the cops feel it
Brothas on lockdown on their cots feel it
It's real in the field the Last Mohican
Who survived in the streets and did something decent
Now I got plans to buy the whole hood
Legit now, I ain't gotta lie to no judge
I make hits now, money I flip now
Hood fella every honey wanna kiss now
I lit up my neck, pinkie, and wrist now
So girls everywhere, this is how we get down

Repeat 1

3 - [Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe, owe, owe

[Nas]
Yeah owe me back like you owe your rent
Owe me back like its money I lent
Pay me back when you shake it again

[Nas]
Play to win, girls in the club moving
I get 'em real hot, my songs seduce 'em
I flow, I'm so mysterious
Nas, and Nasty's the alias
Everything platinum I glow
Cadillac trucks pulling up to the do'
On top out the car, lounge at the bar
We spent a thou', we wild, look at how rowdy we are
Feel like a million dollars, feel me holler
To the max with the Benz and chrome wheeled Impalas
Thugs and renta's, to the playas and ballers
Sexy mamas, fly ladies lookin' proper
Look good enough to be taken shoppin'
Earrings, bracelets, now you rocking
Your body's so nice that I give you this option
Let you wear my big chain if we get it popping

Repeat 1
Repeat 2

[Ginuwine]
I put the shackles on your feet (You owe me)
I think you owe me some (You owe me)
The shackles on your feet (You owe Nas)
I think you owe me some (You owe Ginuwine)
(You owe Timbaland, you owe me)

[Nas]
Lock you down baby, you know what you owe me
Mack like Goldie, it's the same story
Let you hold something, you spending it right
Know where you gon' be by the end of the night
Make it bounce, shake it, move it around
Wiggle it a little bit, throw it to the south
Fantasizing me inside and you riding
Throw it like a stallion, you wearin' my medallion

[Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe me something
(You owe me something, oh yeah)
I said shorty, say what's your price
(You owe Nas)
Just to back it up
(You owe Ginuwine)
You can hold my ice
(You owe Timbaland)
Now let's say you owe
You owe us something, baby
Oh, oh, oh



[Hook 1 - Stephen Marley]
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change
The world
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the
World
Change the world

[VERSE 1 - Nas]
Yeah!
Got out the 600
Blunted
Chicks hunt him
Neighborhood know he comin'
Jakes hate him
Snakes could not violate him
Pimps memorize his lines-verbatim
He reps N.Y. yo
Gives C-notes to winos
Not church
It's how he tithe though
He walks the tenement
Sleeps at his super fly condo
My kinda nigga
My Icon, my Idol
No certificate
For this misfit who handle business
The odds stacked against him
He fights back mackin Benzes
Never puts cash or ass
Before friendship
He laughs last?
As some die young
He is still existing
Somehow he got around the pitfalls of the system
When he walks we watch
When he talks we listen
Leaders

[Hook 2 - Stephen Marley]
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world

[VERSE 2 - JR. GONG]
Who do I follow?
Who do I copy?
Look in to the mirror
And it's you I see look at me
Everything new
Like it fresh from the factory
Everything you do?
It impact me
Your lifestyle attract me
Parents try distract me
When I grow up
I want to be like you exactly
And as soon as I get over this acne
There's no way anybody coulda stop me
Me gravitate toward the aura
And all the mannerism
The sending out of orders
And man start moving busy
The locking of the corners?
The streets and all the buildings
Mi love you like a father
Mi ready and mi willing
Anything what you a talk
Is law in my dominion
And mi have similar thoughts
I share the same opinions
Mi have it say you smart
With mi best interest at heart
I'm following your path
Yow mine whe you a walk

[Hook 3 - Stephen Marley]
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world

[VERSE 3 - Nas]
They appeal to the conscious
The Paramount
The Caesar, the monsters
The grandiose, the martyrs
The hell on earth pompous
Ellsworth Bumpy Johnsons
The Harlemites the Garveyites
Black as the credit card we swipe
Poppin' Dom tonight
For all of mine
I can see myself back at the Autobahn
Malcolm on the podium
Shells drop to linoleum
Swipe those
Place 'em on display at the Smithsonian
Next to only gems
That were left behind
By holy men
Infectious
Charisma of those who gave us direction
The anti-sexists
Resistance against oppression
Progressive thinking
Ghetto speakers
Protestors against the colored
Only section to the Jena 6 and
The Frost Nixon
The contradiction
The cross the crucifixion
The loss we took for sinning
On Esau's back inscription
That it was written
That nothing is coincidence'n
They took our leaders and they lynched them

[Hook 4 - Stephen Marley]
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world
This one's for all the leaders
Leader
Lets all change the world
Change the world
Change the world, change the world
Change the world
Change the world, change the world
You change the world



Tracklist:
1. The Genesis
2. N.Y. State Of Mind
3. Life's A Bitch
4. The World Is Yours
5. Halftime
6. Memory Lane (Sittin' In Da Park)
7. One Love
8. One Time 4 Your Mind
9. Represent
10. It Ain't Hard To Tell

Album Cover:




Don't body ya self
Don't body ya self
Don't body ya self nigga

Yeah, yeah
Everybody get low niggas
Dedicated to the fuck Nas coalition
Touch my dough I'm lettin .40 cals blow nigga
Not cows with four legs
But cals with more lead
That add up more dead
It's on nigga
I'm a bury them
Niggas don't want beef they vegetarian
Scared of pussy you climbed out a caesarian
I push ya grown ass back in your mothers womb
You need nine more months
Your crews nine more punks
You rhyme on stuff and claim I ain't sign y'all up
If I sign y'all I'm on dust
Ya we from the same hood but nigga what?!
When y'all was tryin to rap y'all was makin me proud
Man now you fucked up, down on your luck, runnin your mouth man
Why don't be a real man, say you need a lil help
And I might help your ass off the shelf
But noooo, you're bein disrespectful
Thinkin son so cool that he won't check you
Stand down, the king is home
Queens is on, NASDAQ, Dow Jones

Don't body ya self
Crazy
Take it slow man
Slow down
Take it slow motherfucker
Don't body ya self
Let's listen
Let's just listen
Don't body ya self
Listen
Slow down though man
Slow down
Ya'll gotta take it slow

I am De Niro after Am.Ex. commercials and "The Fockers"
With Martin Scorsese after Gangs Of New York could rock this
Back together with the master plan
The rebirth of Langston Hughes, I'm that man
I'm in the streets like old graffiti
I'm hearin wankstas talkin greasy
Whether broke or rich my friend
Nasir bring that career to an end
And I'm bored with you MCs B
Ya'll beneath me
And my raps bring horror like a board of Ouiji
Of course I'm the king, get my shine on
And I blind y'all cause they call me "The Lord of the Rings"
Pinky heavy man, big stones in the weddin ban'
Smell of brimstone back from Hell again
Next verse gets worse from God's son to Devil's sin

Ya'll need to take it slow
Don't body ya self
Motherfucker act like ya know (05')
Motherfucker better take it slow
Don't body ya self

They say Jada defeated him
Joe too street for him
What's next? I guess it's for Nas to ether him
Ya'll awaiting an MC burial
This is ethereal, FM stereo to XM radio
What does it mean, ethereal? Hmm.. either heavenly or spiritual
Extreme, delicately light in a way that seems too perfect for this world
Man that is righteous, faithful and keeps law
Will surely live declares the sovereign Lord
And you are none of the above
So you a sucka for death if I'm a sucka for love
And ya wanna know why I don't got an answer niggas
Cause I truely understand these niggas
Scared of me so they talk about family members
Like I can't point out your grandma to niggas
Damn you was my man like crew, dog
Don't make me change your body frame to blue fog
The Q is the borough of true dons
Any disrespect nigga we choose arms
Will it be Gilmore or Crowes?

Nigga act like ya know
Yeah
Ya betta take it slow
Motherfucker act like ya know
Mess around and body ya self
Don't body ya self



[Produced by Dave Scratch]

[Verse 1]
It ain't hard to tell, I excel then prevail
The mic is contacted, I attract clientele
My mic check is life or death, breathing a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like the Shining, sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket lining
Hit the Earth like a comet – invasion!
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian, half-man, half-amazing
Cause in my physical, I can express through song
Delete stress like Motrin, then extend strong
I drink Moet with Medusa, give her shotguns in hell
From the spliff that I lift and inhale, it ain't hard to tell

[Verse 2]
The Buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop, place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jewel, inhale from the L
School a fool well, you feel it like Braille, it ain't hard to tell
I kick a skill like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills I'm Ill plus Matic
I freak beats, slam it like Iron Sheik
Jam like a Tec with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magnetize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave 'em froze like her-on in your nose
Nas'll rock well, it ain't hard to tell

[Verse 3]
This rhythmatic explosion, is what your frame of mind has chosen
I'll leave your brain stimulated, niggas is frozen
Speak with criminal slang, begin like a violin
End like Leviathan, it's deep, well let me try again
Wisdom be leaking out my grapefruit, troop
I dominate break loops, giving mics men-e-strual cycles
Street's disciple, I rock beats that's mega trifle
And groovy but smoother than moves by Villanova
You're still a soldier, I'm like Sly Stone in Cobra
Packing like a Rasta in the weed spot, vocals'll squeeze Glocks
MC's eavesdrop though they need not to sneak
My poetry's deep I never fail
Nas' raps should be locked in a cell, it ain't hard to tell

[Outro Scratches]
The type of lyrical terrorism I present



[Verse 1:]
Yo, you believe when they say we ain't shit, we can't grow?
All we are is dope dealers, and gangstas and hoes?
And you believe when they be telling you lie, all on the media?
They make the world look crazy to keep you inside?
Why you listen when the teachers at school
Know you a young single parent out struggling, they think you a fool
Give your kids bad grades and put 'em in dumber classes
Killing shorty future, I wonder how do we last it?
Underground in they casket, ancestors turning
I'm learning something every day, there is no Lazarus
Words like God is Greek or Latin
So if you study Egypt, you'll see the truth written by the masters
My niggas is chilling, getting high, relaxing
Envisioning, owning shit, yo it can happen
What do we own? Not enough land, not enough homes
Not enough banks, to give my brother a loan
What do we own? The skin on our backs, we run and we ask
For reparations, then they hit us with tax
And insurance if we live to be old, what about now?
So stop being controlled, we black zombies

[Hook:]
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)

[Verse 2:]
Ayo, we trapped in our own brain, fuck behind bars
We've already gone insane
We've already gave up, cut our own heads offs
Stab our own backs and dream too much
Without fulfilling reality; too greedy and
Can't have one or two chains, we need three of them
Can't have one or two guns without squeezing 'em
On our own people and, fuck black leaders
'Cause whites ain't got none leading them,the rhythm is cosmic
Nas is divinity, the deity's prophet
Let's all get down and get up
Victims walking 'round with Down's Syndrome, all stuck
Fainting, shouting, catching Holy Ghost in church
Scared to do it for ourselves 'less we see somebody doing it first
We begged, we prayed, petitioned and demonstrated
Just to make another generation - black zombies

[Hook:]
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)

[Verse 3:]
You scared to be yourself, 'cause you in a trance
Feel free, hear the music and dance
If you cared what they think, why wear what they wear, just for you
Dumb niggas with long beards like they Arabs or Jews
Or from Israel, Bismillah al rahman al rahim
Islam's a beautiful thing
And Christian and Rastafari, helps us to bring
Peace against the darkness, which is unGodly
So what's the black man's true religion, who should we follow?
Use your own intuition, you are tomorrow
That's the sound of the beast
I'm a Columbia record slave, so get paid
Control your own destiny, you are a genius
Don't let it happen to you like it did to me, I was a black zombie

[Hook:]
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)
Walking talking dead, though we think we're living (black zombies)
We just copy-cat, following the system (black zombies)

[Outro:]
Wake up! Black zombies in a spell for more than fo'-hundred years
Ghetto niggas won't have it no mo', can I get a witness?
Why listen to somebody else tell you how to do it
When you can do it yourself; it's all in you, do it, do it
Do it niggas..



[Audio sample]

[Nas]
It's sly Fox, cyclops
We locked in an idiot box
The video slots broadcasting Waco Davidian plots
They own YouTube, MySpace
When this ignorant shit going to stop?
They monopolizing news, your views
And the channel you choose
Propaganda, visual cancer
The eye in the sky, number 5 on the dial
Secret agenda, frequency antenna
Dr. Mindbender
Remote control so controlling your brain holder
Slave culture, game's over
What's a fox characteristic?
Slick shit, sensing misinformation
Pimp the station, over-stimulation
Reception, deception
Comcast digital Satan
The Fox has a bushy tale
And Bush tells lies and fox trots
So, I don't know what's real (what's real)

[Hook]
Watch what you're watching
Fox keeps feeding us toxins
Stop sleeping
Start thinking outside of the box
And unplug from the Matrix doctrine
But watch what you say, Big Brother is watching

Watch what you're watching
Fox keeps feeding us toxins
Stop sleeping
Start thinking outside of the box
And unplug from the Matrix doctrine
But watch what you say, Fox Five is watching

[Nas]
The Fear Factor got you all riled up
O'Reilly? Oh really? No rally needed, I'll tie you up
Network for child predators, setting them up
MySpace, pimps, hoes and sluts
Y'all exploit rap culture, then y'all flip on us
And you own the Post, and y'all shit on us
What is their net worth?
They're going to try to censor my next verse
Throw them off the roof neck first
While I'm clicking my cursor
Reading blogs about pressure they put on Universal
It gets worse
While I'm clicking my mouse
While they kick in my house
They figured us out
Why a nigga go south?
It's either he caught a body
Don't sleep, they're watching
I watch CBS, and I see BS
Trying to track us down with GPS
Make a nigga want to invest in PBS (see BS)

[Hook]

[Nas]
They say I'm all about murder murder and kill kill
But what about Grindhouse and Kill Bill?
What about Cheney and Halliburton?
The back door deals on oil fields?
How is Nas the most violent person?
Y'all don't know talent if it hit you
Bringing up my criminal possession charges with a pistol
I use Viacom as my firearm
Then let the living split you, who do you rely upon?
Then shoot shells at Leviath-o-n
I'm dealing with the higher form
Fuck if you care of how I write a poem
Only fox that I loved was the Red one
Only black man that Fox love is in jail or a dead one
Red rum, political bedlam
Don't let the hype into your eyes and ear drum
Murdoch owns Fox
Not A-Team with Baracus
And he hates Barack cause he march with the marches

[Deep voice outro]
I pledge allegiance to the fair and balanced truth
Not the biased truth
Not the liest truth
But the highest truth

I will not be deceived
Nor will I believe in the propaganda
I will not fall for the okie-doke
I am tuned in...

[Nas]
Watch what they watching
Watch what you're watching

Better watch because they're watching
Watch what you're watching

M-m-media, misleading you
Watch what you're watching



[Hook 1 - JR GONG]
And I've got studios to voice in
And I've got news for rejoicing
Now a new sun is rising
I count my blessings

That I'm safe when I'm resting
Furniture in my nesting
Not by force
I'm suggesting
You count your blessings

I've got love and assurance
I've got new heath insurance
I've got strength and endurance
So I count my blessings

And give thanks to the master
That through all the disaster
We're still here
Together after
Better count your blessings

[VERSE 1 - NAS]
Cause yo', this year, can't wait 'till he gets here
7/21/09 my first son will shine
And it's amazing, I'm about to be raising
Another made man, and like his dad they'll praise him
And some will hate him just cause we're building a nation
Like Bob did with Damian, the world will embrace him
Girls will chase him, foresee they will not break him
And when I'm not around you look for God and thank him

[Hook 2 - JR GONG]
And I've got somewhere to dress for
And I've got no need to stress for
And so I'll always put my best forth
And count my blessings

And there'll be no need for tissues
Cause there'll be no further issues
If you've got someone who miss you
Man count your blessings

And I've got love and assurance
And I've got new heath insurance
And I've got strength and endurance
So I count my blessings

And give thanks to the master
That through all the disaster
We're still here
Together after
Better count your blessings

[VERSE 2 - NAS]
You're wishing
You were sitting
In the top position
Picture perfect
Nothing less cause you deserve it
Without the Hermes
You never hurting
You knew that you was
Destined for greatness
For certain
But see the over zealous
They be thirsting
Caught up in emotion
You're keeping your composure
Like Gershwin
Songs by Earth, Wind
Keep you in a zone
Writing verses
So when your pocket's light
Know that you have a heavy purpose

[Hook 3 - JR GONG]
We've got pre-school and day care
We've got pension and well-fare
And though not all will play the game fair
Still I count my blessings

I've got joy in abundance
I've got life full of substance
I've got meetings and functions
So I count my blessings

I've got something to live for
I've got surplus to give more
And we're all welcome through his door
So I count my blessings

And give thanks to the master
That through all the disaster
We're still here
Together after
So I count your blessings

[VERSE 3 - NAS]
I think you're looking too hard for it
Want the double R
Under your garage door
Appreciate the things you work hard for
And count your blessing
Count your blessings
So don't be mad if you ain't fly y'all
You got the means
To reach the level I'm on
You should know that there's only one Nas
Y'all
But count your blessing
Count your blessing
Ra!

[Hook 4 - JR GONG]
And I've got studios to voice in
And I've got news for rejoicing
Now a new son is rising
I count my blessings

That I'm safe when I'm resting
Furniture in my nesting
Not by force
I'm suggesting
You count your blessings

I've got love and assurance
I've got new heath insurance
I've got strength and endurance
So I count my blessings

And give thanks to the master
That through all the disaster
We're still here
Together after
Better count your blessings



[Intro: Nas]
Dre, he a Compton-Compton OG
Nas, he a QB-QB true G
Do the history

[Verse 1: Nas]
Way before The Firm, like back in the day
Nas was the first New York nigga rappin' with Dre
So of course I got a track to bring it back to your face
The one kid that would've been Aftermath that got away
But we still get together, like, every several years
To sprinkle a little bit of Heaven for your ears
Relax, sippin' Cliquot in Rio, stupid fuckers
Low-key, no G's, but it's still Gucci luggage
I love Cape Cod, and watching fly bitches with gray eyes
Wrestle in a tub of KY to get my day by
I like to celebrate, why? ‘Cause I can vision
Collages and images of my lies with no regret to hate
So every breath I take is all about the rules
It's hard for you to breathe, like you at high altitude
So crack the Patron, it's on heathens
The God's back, hard body, Mr. Jones never leavin'

[Hook: Marsha]
Hustlers, dealers, drop-top riders
Make that cake, cop two five fivers
Pimps and players, platinum diamonds
East to West Coast, we riders

[Bridge: Nas + (Game)]
He a Compton-Compton OG
(Mix that with a QB-QB true G, what you got's)
A concoction of some different ghetto blocks
(West Coast kill the tracks, East Coast gunshots)

[Verse 2: Game]
1995, eleven years from today
I'm in the record shop with choices to make
Illmatic on the top shelf, The Chronic on the left, homie
Wanna cop both but only got a 20 on me
So fuck it, I stole both, spent the 20 on a dub sack
Ripped the package off Illmatic and bumped that
For my niggas it was too complex when Nas rhymed
I was the only Compton nigga with a "New York State of Mind"
Inside the dope house, bottlin' up sherm
Bangin' The Firm, Dre was king then so I waited my turn
Fast forward, now I'm making 'em burn
Ended my peers' careers
Hollered at Nas, a hard lesson was learned
So I reconciled my differences like he did with Jigga
I stopped beefin' with niggas, ‘cause I'm "Ether" to niggas
Comb the earth 'til there's no one left
If I ruled the world I summons all you weak rap niggas to death

[Bridge: Nas + (Game)]
He a Compton-Compton OG
(Mix that with a QB-QB true G, what you got's)
A concoction of some different ghetto blocks
(West Coast kill the tracks, East Coast gunshots)

[Hook: Marsha]
Hustlers, dealers, drop-top riders
Make that cake, cop two five fivers
Pimps and players, platinum diamonds
East to West Coast, we riders

[Verse 3: Nas]
Yo, the Jordans sportin', come off the dice game
With a fortune walkin', you a walking coffin'
The musket, I tucked it, you bluff it, I bust it
You're sideways talking, so I lay often
I wait patient, to duct tape hatin'
Fuck ass niggas, get bucked ass niggas
Pluck ashes of Cuban cigars, you foolin' with Nas
That's my name and I came with Rugers this time
And if I'm sane that Soul Plane movie's the bomb
Word to my mom's name tattooed to my arm
You can't revolve me, embalm me, calm me or harm me
Rob me or dodge these bullets I'm busting
See that's malarky you yappin'
I open up the tripod to put the gatling on, and I start clappin'
Nasty man, from bagging grams and runnin' from cops
To a mil on the hand, a mil on the watch, I'm fuckin' with Doc

[Hook: Marsha]
Hustlers, dealers, drop-top riders
Make that cake, cop two five fivers
Pimps and players, platinum diamonds
East to West Coast, we riders



[Produced by L.E.S]

[Nas]
Uh, 2000 G

[Verse: 1]
Yo, I need an encore y'all, you should welcome me back
You wanna ball till you fall, I can help you with that
You want beef? I could let a slug melt in your hat
Cuz I'm a wild barbarian, too hard, I'm scarin' 'em
Century 21 solar eclipse
While you listenin' to the words that I wrote on the disc
Thelonius, my description is do-rags, pants sag down to my feet
AK is my heat, everyday in the street till I lay six feet
QB, PJs, and we playin' for keeps
Jewelry, cars and Jeeps is my motto
Four-fives with the hollows, silencers on the nozzles
Pop bottles with those who left here
The best years, wearin a bulletproof vest years
The aim for the head and chest years
What's your name? Make your name known
For the next year's, better rep, yeah

[Hook x2]
Nasty, Nas the Esco to Escobar
Now he is Nastrodamus
Nasty, Nas the Esco to Escobar
Now he is Nastrodamus

[Verse: 2]
I let y'all niggas bang my shit before Saddam hits
Let Nastradamus tell us what time it is
I was the first one on that Don shit
First nigga to sing a hook on some TJ Swan shit
Black ski masks up in the projects, camoulflage, full clips
Run up in your crib, tie up your bitch
Weigh the bricks and we loco, so broke, brown coke won't sell
Spendin' your money on weed, smoke and hotels
Hood rats and bullet wound up females
Got babies by hustlers and niggas in jail
Slingin for chips and fiends with burnt finger tips
Base heads, killed cab drivers just for a hit
A week later, sportin' Gators, gettin' thrills
Our honies wearin' Gucci high heels
She come to scoop me, I chill
Leave the streets alone for a sec
Hit the sky bar on sunset, then the sex is so high-tech
Uh

[Hook]

[Verse: 3]
Now, lounge homeboy, you in the Godly zone
Rest in peace, Ill Will, now your name's in the throne
And we gon' rep it the best that we can
Physically, you was killed by the weapons of man
But where you at now, you lamp laid in Mac's now
Where Bravehearts put they rap down in honor of your name, you a legend
And they don't understand how you CEO from heaven
But that's another level, brethren
Two G's, we got the type fam with Mac 11's
We do squeeze, thought it's not right
But that's the zone that we left in
Bentleys, Porches, Piaget watches
Sick with the bread, Lamborghini trucks topless
Laptops with 100 gigabytes, ninja bikes
And we all roll dice, for each other's ice
And how does one guy multiply to more than five wise guys?
But only one man, only the mind's eye can understand that I'm...

[Hook]

[Outro]
Ill Will
Nastradamus
New LP for the 2G
Uh
Bravehearts
Nation
Big Things
Lucciano
Oh, the Lord again
M-O-B-B Deep
Zaire
Jungle
Wiz, horse
L-E-S, L-E-S



Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh-uh...

[Hook]
A Mastermind - Sees it coming before it comes
A Mastermind - Before he go to war he counts his ones
A Mastermind - Everything planned out perfect
In case y'all niggas got to get murdered
A Mastermind - Sleeps at night real easy
A Mastermind - Cause everything he does is by the book
A Mastermind - Never do a thing irrational
Lives forever, these tales are classical

[Verse 1]
Velvet bow ties, bulletproofs in the tux, when I roll by
In a car similar to Osama's, in my diamonds
And my principal is to study drama
Look what happened in Manhattan
A couple of years ago when guns started clappin'
Two of my dogs fell, two of my niggas ran
They was amateurs in beef with a grown man
It taught me the lessons of how the strong stand
And how the weak end up in a coffin
Play it cool, that's the old school rule, man
Keep your ears to the street, you'll never lose man
Make your enemies believe there's love there
Cause in war, belief is all fair
Rock them to sleep, shots in your jeep
And you ain't never know the plot was from me
It's from my Masterminds

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
It ain't a game it's the life
Think it's a game, you lame
And I'm nice on that black stone merlot
Toast to my hero Nat Turner
Weather below zero, gave the keys to Kelis
Whispered in her earlobe, "drive home"
Cause she the wife and they the freaks
The underneath my girl caliber
They smiled at her and said "Goodbye"
With niggas who thug or die, they wild as us
My bodyguards in my Denali truck
Knowing that I'm surrounded by OGs that I don't really get down with
They got a separate table for their freaks bought them drinks
So we could talk man-to-man so real niggas could link
I knew, they kill hoes too like Rae Carruth
They used to spray troops, now they managing groups
The main nigga Sonny had big money since '82
Had two of my dogs whacked, nothing I could do
That was back when I had no crew, I switched that
Now I'm strong with niggas who feel Sonny was wrong
My money's long, his money is weak, he's losing sleep
Trying to feel me out, to see what it's gonna be
But I'm a Mastermind

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I live a clean life, I don't even steal cable
I speak for myself, my niggas will slay you
Lucky us, this rap done worked out fine
Feds, check me out, it's no dirt y'all find
This King Of New York shit only last 15 minutes
Every nigga get burned, but it's what you did with it
Niggas who brilliant, came in and killed it
Made millions every three months, new jury
I'm low, smoking blueberry with a ho
That know a few scary individuals, eerie as she get into it
Squares, they into voodoo
She says a Hail Mary, then she said she knew who
Would come and try to kill you too

[Hook]



Ma, I'm sorry who the fuck I AM, I can't trust my fans
Out of luck, no constructive plans
My friends stay powdered up, I'm so drunk, can't stand
You said if I would sober up, I'd be a powerful man
Turned out the street life, you prayed I wouldn't
But every church in the world can't save our children
I stayed out late, you heard shots, thought it would be
Your oldest son on the ground dead, but fortunately
Them bullets had some other names on it, a brother was blind
I hit the L, then we yell out, "It wasn't my time!"
I loaded up shells, one by one, you smelled blunt from my room door
Little Nasir was at war
And little did I care what you saw
Crew deep with a few heat, now it's time we settle the score

But in the projects, I visit Muhammad, in linen garments
Preaching Man, Woman, and Child, the living Prophet
And I'm similar, Nasir Bin Olu Dara
Visqu Allah, fist full of dollars in the dice game God
The Ice King, God, the Black Christ, elegant stance
Clothes fit me like a crime boss, the medicine man
I see the world collapsing, young pregnancies
Young girls are unfastening they Sasoon jeans, no prophylactic
All this fashion and fly jewelry, now makes my eyes teary
N.Y. City, grab a hold and ride with me

Rip the Freeway, shoot through Memphis with money bags
Stop in Philly, order cheese steaks and eat Beans fast
And bring it back up top, remove the fake king of New York
You show off, I count off when you sample my voice
I rule you, before, you used to rap like the Fu-Schnickens
Nas designed your Blueprint, who you kidding?
Is he H to the izzo, M to the izzo?
For shizzle you phony, the rapper version of Sisqo
And that's for certain, you cloned me, your wack clothes line
I'd rather Sean John, bore me with your fake coke rhymes
And those times, they never took place, you liar
Un was your first court case, you had no priors
You master fabricated stories of streets and sound slick
Have you surrounded, you and them faggot you down with

While they riding NAS, trying to boost their careers
Corny as Cormega, all you Hip-Hop queers
Since Illmatic, It Was Written: I Am... Nastradamus
That's the answers to the puzzle I gave you, now here's a promise
My next few albums, instead of projects
They'll be a difficult test inside the cover for the mind's optics

Come in my hood, but bring the guns with you, it's dark
Headed through Brooklyn, Queens, Harlem, Staten, and Bronx
Headed through Compton, Oaktown, South Central, and Watts
New Orleans, Mississippi, Chi-town, every block
I'm trying to have my positive ways, I put my rhymes on page
Did crimes and headline on stage
I signed a contract, so here it is, you have it
Streets Disciple, I'm Stillmatic



[Hook: Joss Stone]
My generation will make a change
This generation will make a change
My generation will make a change
This generation will make a change

[Verse 1: Damian Marley]
Now me love fi see the schoolers them a graduate
A study hard, and save the party for the holidays
Diplomatic with them diploma, and them bound fi great
Because them nah pick up no 'matic, and a perpetrate
And then I love the energies, what them a generate
My Generation it so special, it will make a change
Because the elders sew the seed, and it a germinate
So anytime them see the progress them a celebrate
Because we rising up despite of the economy
And then a we a star the show, like the astronomy
And how we keep on breaking through, is an anomaly
Because we keep remaining true, without apology
The mission have fi carry through and finish properly
Say Gambia to Guadeloupe, Paris to Napoli
Say Zambia to Honolulu, back to Tripoli
And everybody want a future living happily

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
Can you blame my generation? subjected gentrification
Depicting their frustrations, over ill instrumentation
Because music is the way to convey to you what I’m facing
Placing my life in front of your eyes for your observation
Now if you can’t relate then maybe you are too complacent
Athletes today are scared to make Muhammad Ali statements
Whats up with tomorrow? Will you lead? Will you follow?
Improve your values, education is real power
I reach them like Bono, so get rid of your self sorrow
Add some bravado, get wealthy like Wells Fargo
It's truth, that I am you, and I am proof
Surviving through, we do what we gotta do
Yo, we could break the cycle, let nobody lie to you
Then maybe put our sons and our daughters in private school
Because there’s a mission we gotta finish before we leave
This generation is destined to do historic deeds

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Lil Wayne]
If you weather that storm, then that rain bring sun
Been a long time coming, I know change gone come
Man I got to keep it moving to the beat of my drum
Last night I set the future at the feet of my son
But they thinking that my generation got to die young
If we all come together then they can't divide one
Don’t worry 'bout it; just be about it
Got a message from God: Heaven too crowded
But I say: Hey young world, you never looked better
And I heard change started with man in the mirror
This generation, I’mma represent
A generation led by a black president
Now hows that for change? Who knew that can change?
I don’t even look at the flag the same, heck
So when you finish reading revelations
Thank God for my generation

[Hook]



[Produced by  Carlos "6 July" Broady & Nashiem Myrick]

[Intro]
See no evil.. fear no evil.. speak no evil.. hear no evil..
If you don't bring that shit around you
You ain't got nuttin to worry about (uh-huh)
Yeah (yeah, uh-huh)
Knah-sayin?

[Verse 1]
Yo, yo yo yo
Carolyn, from Maryland, she Lady Heroin
She elegant -- her apparel in the M-Class caravan
Ki's of dope
Lovin' cats to ski in her throat
She fuck killers in her condo, her Benz and her boat
Her iced throat, ass is curvy, 40 years old
She passin for 30, Gucci framed glasses from Purvy's
Madison Ave., shoppin when she not, coppin bricks of that shit
She hoppin on dicks, ridin Pony's who trick
At my man's wake, she said the eulogy
After that I usually, bumped into her shoppin for jewerly
Her bodyguard screwin me, I gave her my math
Ain't nothin new to me, blowin backs out, six-pack Stout's
Wide fat mouth, the evil look, with a bow-leg
Yo niggas said, "Shorty's a pro, she blow heads
She push the fo' red, she know Feds, Feds know her"
A code red, maybe she's out to slay me, this bitch is crazy
She blew the celly up, meet me at the telly to fuck
She knew about, cats from way back, we smoke the haystack
She never cough once, blunts was her hobby
She said I knew her man probably, no doubt, 9-6 he tried to rob me
I jetted though, sometimes you never know
He snorted all her work, now she need me, to do her dirty work

[Hook]
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Nigga you reap what you sew
What goes around, comes around
If you sleep you don't know
A very small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Where beef could never end
At the time you least expect it
I'mma see you again
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
You get away with it now
Soon enough it catches up to you
Someway, somehow
Yo it's a small world
Watch what you do.. ("It's a.. small world..")

[Verse 2]
Snook from Redhook was grimy, did five years, glad to be home
From Attica known, for keepin chrome calibers
Smooth like a Wallaby shoe,
He's out to get it, five years plannin to blow, soon as he hit the bri-dicks
Had a girl in Woodside Queens, thought he was low
Played the crib for a month, and deaded his P.O
Started robbin niggas til he caught a whole kilo
He had a bunch of starvin niggas he owe, he never paid though
Got large, sign on his door, "Don't knock hard"
Layin with his bitch, niggas is rich, is what he told her
Played the block, holdin' cracks inside the baby stroller
Here come his crazy soldier, six shots it's over
A year went past, Snook went flossin fast
His old man had crossed his ass, for the laws of this fast cash

[Hook]
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Nigga you reap what you sew
What goes around, comes around
If you sleep you don't know
A very small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Where beef could never end
At the time you least expect it
I'mma see you again
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
You get away with it now
Soon enough it catches up to you
Someway, somehow
Yo it's a small world
Watch what you do.. ("It's a.. small world..")

[Verse 3]
I seen death, seen thugs cry, it's bugged why
We let the slugs fly, enter your brain, through your skull
Another thug died, pitchin your soul, into that infinite
Black hole, where many souls go cause of a fo'-fo' blast
Snook was one of em, so many more
Even that Fendi whore, got niggas hit up yeah let that Henny pour
Carolyn, paid-up bitch, made bitch, stay rich
Heard her bodyguard took Snook to God
Carolyn when she needed him, he took the job
He was close to her, ever since she took him inside
When his moms died, dopefiend OD-ed, eighty-five
He went crazy, stuck up banks, to stay alive
He was live - do niggas even know the things that he tried
Robbed armored trucks - incidents where police died
He stayed in lower Eastside, peace God (peace God)
He starin at me hard
Two of his mans with him, I got to hit em
I'm reachin for my Roscoe
Cocked it back on, and get my blast on
At the gas station, bunch of Arabs racin' out the way
As my Taurus spray, jump in the whip, hit the highway
You know how I say, the game that I play
It's real tendencies, when you feel your enemies
But can't figure out whose who, keep it true
Shit is cool now -- put the tools down? Never
Cause everyday is on, livin this life, out for this cheddar

[Hook]
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Nigga you reap what you sew
What goes around, comes around
If you sleep you don't know
A very small world ("It's a.. small world..")
Where beef could never end
At the time you least expect it
I'mma see you again
It's a small world ("It's a.. small world..")
You get away with it now
Soon enough it catches up to you
Someway, somehow
Yo it's a small world
Watch what you do.. ("It's a.. small world..")

[Outro]
I'm going to see you again..
Uh-huh.. I'm going to see you again.. nigga..
Uh-huh.. going to see you again nigga.. yeah



1. The Genesis Conceived by Nas and Faith N

2. N.Y. State of Mind —C. Martin—N. Jones—
Produced By: DJ Premier for Works of Mart Productions
Recorded and Mixed at: D&D Recording, NYC.
Engineer: Eddie Sancho
Contains Sample From: "Mind Rain" as performed and written by J. Chambers
Published By: Gifted Pearl/Ill Will Music, Inc./Skematics Music (ASCAP)

3. Life's a Bitch —N. Jones—R. Wilson—O. Scott—A. Cruz—O. Dara—
Featured Vocals: A.Z
Trumpet: Olu Dara
Produced By: L.E.S., co-produced by Nas
Recorded and Mixed at: Unique Studios and Chung King Studios, NYC
Engineer: Jason Vogel
Contains Sample From: "Yearning for your Love" as performed by The Gap Band and written by R. Wilson and O. Scott
Used courtesy of Polygram Special Products, Inc
Published By: Ill Will Music, Inc./Skematics Music/Minder Music (USA) (ASCAP)/Taking Care of Business Music/Total Experience Music Publishing Co. (BMI)

4. The World is Yours —P. Phillips—N. Jones—
Produced By: Pete Rock for Mecca and the Soul Brother Productions, Inc
Recorded and Mixed at: Battery Studios, NYC
Engineer: Jamey Staub
Contains Sample From: "It's Yours" performed by T La Rock, courtesy of Warlock Records
Published By: Hit'N'Hold Music (ASCAP) Ill Will Music, Inc./Skematics Music/Pete Rock Publishing (ASCAP)

5. Halftime —W.P. Mitchell—N. Jones—G. Byrd—
Produced By: The Large Professor for Paul Sea Productions, Inc
Recorded and Mixed at: Chung King Studios, NYC
Engineer: Kevin Reynolds
Contains Samples From: "Dead End," "Soul Travelin'" and "School Boy Crush"
Published By: Large Professor Music Ltd./EMI April Music Inc./Ill Will Music Inc./Skematics Music/Minder Music (USA) (ASCAP)

6. Memory Lane (Sittin' In Da Park) —C. Martin—R. Wilson—N. Jones—P. Barsella—
Produced By: DJ Premier for Works of Mart Productions
Recorded and Mixed at: D&D Recording, NYC
Engineer: Eddie Sancho
Assistant Engineer: Luis Tineo
Contains Sample From: "We're in Love" as performed by Reuben Wilson and written by R. Wilson and P. Barsella EMI
Unart Catalog Inc./Ill Will Music Inc./Skemetics Inc./ Gifted Pearl (ASCAP)

7. One Love —J. Davis—N. Jones—J. Heath—
Produced By: Q-Tip for A Tribe Called Quest, Inc
Recorded and Mixed at: Battery Studios, NYC
Engineer: T. Lathem
Contains Sample From: "Smilin' Billy Suite Pt. II" as performed by The Heath Brothers and Written by J. Heath
Published By: Ill Will Music, Inc./Skematics Music (ASCAP)/MJQ Music, Inc. (BMI)

8. One Time 4 Your Mind —W.P. Mitchell—N. Jones—
Produced By: The Large Professor for Paul Sea Productions, Inc
Recorded and Mixed at: Chung King Studios, NYC
Engineer: Kevin Reynolds
Assistant Engineer: Jack Herscha
Contains Sample From: "Walter L" as written by G. Burton
Published By: Large Professor Music Ltd./EMI April Music Inc./Ill Will Music Inc./Skematics Music (ASCAP)

9. Represent —N. Jones—C. Martin—
Produced By: DJ Premier for Works of Mart Productions
Recorded and Mixed at: D&D Recording, NYC
Engineer: Eddie Sancho
Assistant Engineer: Luis Tineo
Ill Will Music Inc./Skemetics Inc./DJ Premier Publishing/Gifted Pearl (ASCAP)

10. It Ain't Hard to Tell —W.P. Mitchell—N. Jones—
Produced By: The Large Professor for Paul Sea Productions, Inc. Initial Tracking at PowerPlay Studios, Long Island City, NY
Tracking Engineer: Anton "Sample This" Pushansky
Recorded and Mixed at: Chung King Studios, NYC
Engineer: Stan Wallace
Mix Engineer: Diego Garrido
Contains Samples From: "Human Nature" as performed by Michael Jackson and written by J. Bettis and J. Pocaro; and "N.T." as performed by Kool & The Gang and written by G. Redd, JR., R. Handy, C, Horne, R. Bell, R. Bell, R. Mickens, D. Thomas, G. Brown and C. Smith
Published By: Large Professor Music Ltd./EMI April Music Inc./Ill Will Music Inc./Skematics Music (ASCAP)

Executive Producers: Faith N. and M.C. Serch
Art Production: Jo DiDonato
Design: Aimée Macauly
Photography: Danny Clinch

Big Shout Out To: My Moms, my brother Jungle, my pops Olu Dara, Kiane, Big Bo, The Grand Wizard 'Mike', the Minister family, Starlyn, Anthony, Rachel, Pauline, Shamina, Tineeka, Tequila, Tina Wina, my cousins Dee and Gee', Pumpkin, Helen, Uncle Tee, Grand Ma Ella, Nan, Nap and Nub, bob, Illwill, Betty, Masey, Junior, Angie, Takia, Dasia, my wisdom Carmen, all my peoples in Baltimore, N.C., Miss. Tex, Every Body, Queensbridge Houses, Astoria Houses, 40 P.J.S., Baisley, Far Rockaway, Corona, Ravenswood, the whole Queens Gettin' Crazy Cash Crew, "Niggas don't even understand it," "A.Z., life's a bitch, so fuck it!", Turkey, E-Flan, Devine, Gee, Hayes, Fat Slate, Sissy, Mrs. Versie, Nee-Nee, Draws, all my people's on the Island, up North "hold your heads and keep rockin'," Trinidad, Uzi, Goon, Doug, good lookin' out Faith Newman, Nisha, Ashley Fox, Serch, Angela Thomas, Don lenner, David Kahne, Ty Ty Harris, Webb, Bernard, AK, Large "Extra P", Van, Sharon and family, Q Tip, ATCQ, Pete Rock, CL, my mothafuckin' man Premier, Smooth, Guru, Dirty Rotten, G Rap, Lil G, Polo, the entire Hip Hop world, Neek the Exotic, Cormega, 40 Side, Vernon, Spud the B, Ball Lord, Columbia, Sony and the whole shit, L.E.S. Hots, Poet, Havoc, Pop, Uptown, Monster......Lord, Black Jay, Rapper Ron, Nut, Draws, BJ, Black, Ice, Mayo and the family, Spunk and the whole crew
One Love Blackpeople...............

In Memory Of: Illwill, Snoot, Poppa Charlie, Tyhae, Rich Kid, Tyrone, Dot, Bing, Louie, Loyd, Sarge, AG, Wee Woe, I'mma C Y'All....
One



[Intro]
Yeah it's like wakin' up from a bad dream
(America)
Just to figure out you wasn't dreamin' in the first place

[Verse 1]
If all I saw was gangsters comin up as a youngster
Pussy and money the only language I clung ta
Claim ta I mold myself up to become one
Ain't ya happy I chose rap I'm a monster
Streets deceiving they can't believe my achievements
Cultural strata persona's that of a non-needer
Because I don't need nada except for prada beaver
For cold winters tattoos got my summer's sleeveless
To my g's on the flee from the coppers
Stiff bodies on freeze in funeral parlors
From the slums I come up a phoenix caked up
Tryna take what I'm eatin came up a dismissive kid
You lucky if you allowed to witness this savvy mouth
Wild hardly a man's man who woulda knew
The beach houses and wild parties
Jezebel's and stella mccartney's
For years all that how could I not be dead?
This old german said I was a thug with a notty head
Looked at my benz and called that a nazi sled
With a face like he wonder where I got my bread
Probably all these stones he see
From my shows overseas
From crime to rhyme my stories is
I'm from the home of the thieves

America pay attention
(america)
Wake up this is not what you think it is
(america)
America pay attention
(america)
This is not what you think it is

[Verse 2]
Blessed the lord is a g he gotta be
Who's the god of suckers and snitches the economy
Lipstick from Marilyn Monroe blew a death kiss to Fidel Castro
He'd want me to spit this
Only the strong survive Nas bear witness
The hypocrisy is all I can see
White cop acquitted for murder black cop cop a plea
That type of shit make me stop and think
We in chronic need of a second look of the law books
And the whole race dichotomy
Too many rappers athletes and actors
But not enough niggas in NASA
Who give you the latest dances trends and fashion?
But when it comes to residuals they look past us
Woven into the fabric they can't stand us
Even in white tee's blue jeans and red bandannas

America pay attention
(america)
Wake up this is not what you think it is
(america)
America pay attention
(america)
This is not what you think it is
America
(america this is not what you think it is)

[Verse 3]
Assassinations diplomatic relations
Killed indigenous people built a new nation
Involuntary labor took a knife split a woman naval
Took her premature baby let her man see you rape her
If I could travel to the 1700's
I'd push a wheelbarrow full of dynamite through your covenant
Love to sit in on the senate and tell the whole government
Y'all don't treat women fair she read about herself in the bible
Believing she the reason sin is here
You played her with an apron like bring me my dinner dear
She's the 'nigga' here ain't we in the free world?
Death penalty in Texas kill young boys and girls
Barbarity I'm in the double-R casually
Bugging how I made it out the hood dazzle me
How far we really from third world savagery
When the empire fall imagine how crazy that'll be

America
(america america)
America
(america this is not what you think it is)
America
(america this is not what you think it is)
America



[Produced Eric B]

[Intro]
Ayo Nasty Nas, what up?
~Ain't nothing, a lot of cowards fronting
I hear what you're saying, but yo, this is all love for me, you know?
~No doubt, smoke them cowards, you stillmatic

[Verse]
Ma, I'm sorry who the fuck I am, I can't trust my fans
Out of luck, no constructive plans
My friends stay powdered up, I'm so drunk, can't stand
You said if I would sober up, I'd be a powerful man
Turned out the street life, you prayed I wouldn't
But every church in the world can't save our children
I stayed out late, you heard shots, thought it would be
Your oldest son on the ground dead, but fortunately
Them bullets had some other names on it, the brother was blind
I hit the L, than we yell out, "It wasn't my time!"
I loaded up shells, one by one, you smelled blunts from my room door
Little Nasir was at war
And little did I care what you saw
Crew deep with a few heat, now it's time we settle the score
But in the projects, I vision Muhammad, in linen garments
Preaching Man, Woman, and Child, the living Prophet
And I'm similar, Nasir Bin Olu Dara Visqu Allah
Fist full of dollars in the dice game, God
The Ice King, God, the Black Christ, elegant stance
Clothes fit me like a crime boss, the medicine man
I see the world collapsing, young pregnancies
Young girls are unfastening their Sasoon jeans, no prophylactic
All this fast shit and fly jewelry, now makes my eyes teary
N.Y. City, grab a hold and ride with me
Rip the Freeway, shoot through Memphis with money bags
Stop in Philly, order cheese steaks and eat Beans fast
And bring it back up top, remove the fake king of New York
You show off, I count dough off when you sample my voice
I rule you, before, you used to rap like the Fu-Schnickens
Nas designed your Blueprint, who you kidding?
Is he H to the izz-O, M to the izz-O?
For shizzle you phony, the rapping version of Sisqo
And that's for certain, you clone me, your wack clothes line
I'd rather Sean John, you bore me with your fake coke rhymes
And those times, they never took place, you liar
Un was your first court case, you had no priors
You master fabricated stories of streets and sound slick
Have you surrounded, you and the faggots you down with
While they riding Nas, trying to boost their careers
Corny as Cormega, all you Hip-Hop queers
Since Illmatic it was written, I am Nastradamus
That's the answers to the puzzle I gave you, now here's a promise
My next few albums, instead of projects
They'll be a difficult test inside the cover for the mind's optics
Come in my hood, but bring the guns with you, it's dark
Headed through Brooklyn, Queens, Harlem, Staten, and Bronx
Headed through Compton, Oaktown, South Central, and Watts
New Orleans, Mississippi, Chi-town, every block
I'm trying to have my positive ways, I put my rhymes on page
Did crimes and headline on stage
I signed a contract, so here it is, you have it
Streets disciple, I'm stillmatic

[Female voice sample]
You make me feel so good



[Intro - Barack Obama - taken from victory speech in Iowa]
They said this day would never come
They said our sights were set too high
This country is too divided, too disillusioned
To ever come together around a common purpose. They said

[Hook]
"Although it seems heaven-sent
We ain't ready, to have a black president"
Yes we can change the world, the world, the world

[Verse 1 - Nas]
They forgot us on the block, got us in the box
Solitary confinement: how violent are these cops?
They need a early retirement
How many rallies will I watch? I ain't got it in me to march
I got a Semi to spark, the game's in a drought
Public housing, projects, cooking up in the Pyrex
My set, my clique, either getting money
Or running from homicide trail, that's if they ain't died yet
Trying to be rich, still I'm pledging allegiance
A predicate felon, a ghetto leader
Lending my poetical genius, to whoever may need it
I bleed this from Queensbridge, now living with my feet up
Never defeated, so a president's needed
You know these colored folks and Negros hate to see
One of their own succeeding
America: surprise us and let a black man guide us

[Hook]

[Verse 2 - Nas]
What's the black pres' thinking on election night?
Is it: "How can I protect my life? Protect my wife? Protect my rights?"
Every other president was nothing less than white
Except Thomas Jefferson had mixed Indian blood.. and Calvin Coolidge
KKK is like: "What the fuck?!", loading their guns up
Loading up mine too, ready to ride
Cause I'm riding with my crew - he dies, we die too
Yeah, but on the positive side
I think Obama provides hope and challenges minds
Of all races and colors to erase the hate
And try to love one another. So many political snakes
We in need of a break, I'm thinking I can trust this brotha
...but will he keep it way real?
Every innocent nigga in jail gets out on appeal
When he wins, will he really care still?
I feel

[Hook]

[Verse 3 - Nas]
Say a prayer for "Do we have to?"
You ain't right, Jeremiah Wrong pastor
In love with a slave master
Sincerely yours, USA's most brave rapper
Jesse carjacker, Uncle Tom kidnapper
Ask around: Bentley coupe off the Richter
Bitch called "Life": I pimped her, what
Politics, politricks, Klan-shooter
Deacon for defense, progress-producer
Nothing on the stove, a survival-booster
Gotta do what we gotta do
We ain't got no governors coming through to help
Anything we need done, gotta do for self
New, improved JFK on the way
It ain't the 60s again, niggas ain't hippies again
We ain't falling for the same traps
Standing on the balconies where they shot the King at
McCain got apologies; ain't nobody hearing that
People need honesty

[Hook]

[Outro - Governor Bill Richardson]
It is my distinct honor, and privilege to introduce
The next President of the United States - Barack Obama



[Verse 1]
Blaze a 50, sit back in the drop top Azure Bentley
Of course with me, this chick who'd make Bobby divorce Whitney
Brazilian candy, from Miami
Masseuse, wedding ring on, loving Celine Dion
Hate rap, told me where she get cake at
She's a part-time dancer, part time romancer
Tries to be a mother when she gets a chance to
Left her husband alone to raise they son, he's in pampers
Modeled for a year, got her bachelors degree
33, recovering from plastic surgery
Went from 34B to 36 double D
Met her in San Diego at tha Super Bowl party
Had the Henny, sipped it up with Terrell Davis
MVP, we flicked it up from Sports Illustrated
I was silked out, flossing with Stoute, he had the gators
When she walked in, she lit up the room like Las Vegas
Terrell said her man's a fullback for the Raiders
A drunk who'd fuck cheerleaders and wind up in the papers
It's easy to get the pussy, just don't fall in love
Next thing you know I'm hugged up with this bitch in the tub
Palm Springs, Al Capone's Suite washing her feet
Is this love? Somebody's wife fucking a thug
Hitting it raw, tasting it, wilding out of my character
Taping it, Tyra Banks face with Faiths lips
Giving head like she knew me for years
Pillow talk, she let out tears, told me bout her husbands affairs
Millions she would get if his neck got slit
She rolled the equality, then passed the la to me
Told me 'bout her man's life insurance policy
He stays on the golf course, wears Le Coq Sport
Evenings he drinks his wines on his private resort
You can take him there, here go the keys, you can slip in the rear
Chop a nigga up, yo, meet me somewhere
So we can make more money, then you could ever see rapping
Split the cash and move to Venezuela, adapting
P-11's, ACP shells for blasting
Caught him with his spanish maid
He had a lighter with a can of spray, burning her legs
She tied to the bed, sex S&M, sadomasochistic
Sadistic, yoked her from behind, blew him out exsistance
His maid cried "No", lucky she was blindfold
Naked with mad burn marks all on her thighs, yo
Twelve point five million, he kept his funds
In the Lloyd's of London, goes to his wife and his children
Yo, I thought "What if shorty gets scared, electric chair's all I envision
All she'll probably get is psychiatric supervision"
I switched the plan, the maid flied to Switzerland
Fake ID, forged his wife name, catch the next flight
The same night, headed to Spain, nice game
Now we're back to where we meet again

[Verse 2]
Blaze a 50, sit back in a drop-top Azure Bentley
Of course with me, this chick who'd make Bobby divorce Whitney
Top down, night air blow her hair
Sky black, stars glow, the face on the moon stare
Fastlane on the nine-five, honey laughs about the cash
Took a blast out of her coke bag
Snorted it, started screaming "Yo, we almost crashed!"
Earlier I took the coke out, replaced it with crushed up glass
Her head nodded down to her chest, slowly she fell asleep
Overwhelmed by greed, put to death



(Who's world is this?) 2x

[Verse 1: Nas]
I sip the Dom P, watching Gandhi 'til I'm charged
Writing in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin
To hold the mic I'm throbbing, mechanical movement
Understandable smooth shit that murderers move with
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
A fiend of hip-hop, it's got me stuck like a crack pipe
The mind activation, react like I'm facin' time like
'Pappy' Mason with pens I'm embracin'
Wipe the sweat off my dome, spit the phlegm on the streets
And the Nikes on my feet keep my cipher complete
Whether cruising in a Sikh's cab, or Montero Jeep
I can't call it, beats make me falling asleep
I keep falling, but never falling six feet deep
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Get money)
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Take money)
I'm out for dead fucking presidents to represent me

[Hook]
(Whose world is this?)
The world is yours
Disciple of the projects slash verbal murderer
(Whose world is this?)
Yeah, the world is yours
To the philly bluntheads, crack-pumping drug murderers
(Whose world is this?)
The world is yours
To my niggas coming home from lockdown with new plans
(Whose world is this?)
Fuck it, the world is mine
Holding a stolen cop's Glock with G-notes in my hand
(Whose world is this?)

[Verse 2: Nas]
To my man Ill Will, God bless your life
To my peoples throughout Queens, God bless your life
My insight enlights vision
Words of wisdom, niggas pay me intuition to listen
To murder paragraphs of mysticism
Man plant seeds that brings forth multiple breeds
So many cultures on one planet but one culture's free
Son, I need weed to proceed
Change the flow speed and I'm getting vex Giuliani you 6-6-6
There's no days for broke days selling smoke pays
I toke the chocolate potent philles never roach-sprayed
Shit is a hassle, the bridge is like a haunted castle
The mic's my religion, the system is the Devil's lasso
And yo, the trife life is the most influential
Though colors on men's skins and pens is coincidental
How you living, large or broker?
You're wasting time extorting papers from smokers
Catching court papers getting broker

[Hook]
The world is mine
Persona of late Tony Montana yet gettin' mine
(Whose world is this?)
The whole world is mine
Who want it, I never front it, I'm forever blunted, gettin' lye
(Whose world is this?)

Henny up with the lye (La la la)
Never stop, we don't stop (La la la)
The hennylo, puffin' lye y'all (La la la)
Don't stop the hennylo (La la la)
Who puff the lye? (La la la)
Everyday, puff the lye plus the hennylo (La la la)

[Verse 3: Nas]
I'm the young city bandit, hold myself down single-handed
For murder raps, I kick my thoughts alone, get remanded
Born alone, die alone, no crew to keep my crown or throne
I'm deep by sound alone, caved inside a thousand miles from home
I need a new nigga, for this black cloud to follow
'Cause while it's over me it's too dark to see tomorrow
Trying to maintain, flip, fill the clip to the tip
Picturing my peeps not even could make my heartbeat skip
And I'm amped up, they locked the champ up, even my brain's in handcuffs
Headed for Indiana stabbin' bitches like the Phantom
The crew is lampin' Ill Will style
Check the gold-toothed smile, plus I profile wild
Stash through the fly clothes, burnin' dollars to light my stove
Walk the blocks wit a bop
Checking dames plus the games people play
I check the games plus the games people play
Bust the problems of the world today

(Who's world is this?) 5x
(La la la, la la la, la la la la la) (Repeated until end)

[Outro]
Yeah yeah, yeah Wizard, keep that lye in the air
Yo, I wanna give a shout out to the whole fuckin' Queens
My man Tipster on the boards, keepin' it real Lord
The Queensbridge nation, get it on
Fakin' no fuckin' jacks, fuck around and get your wig pushed back
And big shoutout to my man Killa, Ron Du, it's on you
L.E.S. on another murder quest
'94, we out
Keep the lye in the air, Hennessy everywhere
Keep the la la goin'...



[Produced by Jae Supreme]

[Intro: Nas & Jae Supreme]
Yo, Nas whattup?
Whattup kid?
What going on Ill
I'm just tryna tell these brothers where I'm coming from
You know what I'm saying
Alright, kick it

[Verse 1]
I'm the nigga walking with his finger on the trigger
Make enough figures until my pockets get bigger
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testing
Gimme a Smith-N-Wesson I'll have niggas undressing
I'm rolling with a mob and running from the cops
Drive stolen cars and shoot many Glocks
A marijuana addict, if niggas want static
They had it, 'cause I flip just like an acrobatic
I'm always on the corners rolling up Sess
When I dress it's never nothing less than Guess
So I walk with a bop and my hat turned back
Love committing sins and my friends sell crack
I got it going on, my knuckle game is strong
Sip Dom Pérignon and then carry on
Army certifieds, keep a Rent-A-Ride
Stripping mad hoes and kick em to the side
See I'm the type of brother who keeps a four-pounder
Start a lot of shit and shoot at out-of-towners
At every block party, I try to catch a body
All for props, tell your pops call the cops
See now I'm on the run, but still having fun
Living by the MAC, my gear is all black
I keep killing because I'm ready and I'm willing and I'm a villain

[Hook]
What?
What?
Wha-a-a-t?

[Verse 2]
I got beef with the President and still loving it
Trying to make plans to overthrow the government
It won't work cause niggas don't believe enough
They'd rather stand on the corners and receive a cuff
Around they wrist, you don't like the sound of this
Rebel, but my country doesn't want me
They'd rather hunt me but you'll never catch us all
While you fucking with the dealers we'll be sticking up the malls
Full of anger, all about danger
Pulling out my banger, stabbing up a stranger
I hear Walkie Talkies in my sleep
And use a whole lot of slang when I speak
Walking with a vest, the projects is where I rest
And the streets keep me stressed
Staring at your face, wait for you to make a sound
That's when I take you down, shoot you up and suit you up
All in black and put you in a box
A hard rock with a .25 in my socks
Aiming at your temple so take the diamonds off your hands
I'm buckwild like Billy Bear and Ganz
Prince of pistoleers, words are crystal clear
And this you should fear
The maniac keeps killing, I'm known as a outlaw 'cause I'm a villain

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I keep bullets racing out the barrels of a Magnum
Put 'em to sleep and leave the doctors to tag them
An outlaw, although I never wear a holster
In every town you see my face is on a poster
Hear so many gunshots my eardrums should pop
Eyesight should stop from seeing mad niggas drop
To the concrete, I got police putting chalk on the street
And this is done once a week
I'm out to kill like Navy Seals
I'm crazy ill and what I can't do my .380 will
I never play with a AK
Because I'm fine with a .9 and if caught I'll do lesser time
Sometimes you gotta plan shit and understand it
See I'm a bandit whose hand'll itch
Without a gun in it, Nas is running it
I stay blunted, I'm the project's most wanted
My voice is like magic
My cassette is the clip and your radio's the Automatic
So when I'm in your town, "duck down"
Or take fire, whatever you desire
But I'm on point you might miss
Never fight this, you'll be sightless when I strike this
So roll the dice, I'm stopping the bank
It's ill how I got the pen dropping the ink
No one can stop this apocalypse
On your record player a method layer so run and tell your Mayor
Nas the parlayer, you better say your prayer
I'm the New York City slayer
I play high post and then lay low
Parlé slow and wear horns, not a halo
And keep killing 'cause I'm a villain



[Intro]
A lot of times it seems like, you ain't gon' make it where you wanna be in life
But, yo if you got a plan, believe me you gon' get there
You gon' get everything you ever wanted baby
That's my word

[Verse 1]
Trust, my niggas come home from long bids
They check for me before they see their own kids
I open up accounts for 'em, we bounce tourin'
Major cities, arenas, headline with big time singers
Cop Ferraris with navigational screens
Guide us through your hood and any locality, head back to Queens
Piped out seats, Oakwood mb cord speakers
Bumpin' out old shit
That made me think of Old Easters '86 in a le tigre short sleeves
Lees, flip the cuffs up, gettin' fucked up
From Old E, Fresh Fest, niggas got hurt
100 niggas rush the door with Queensbridge tournament shirts
Back then, nobody wore a vest
Pull out razors, you had to put your hand skills to the test
Get your Pumas took, come home barefoot willin'
Look at the chain I snatched with a medallion worth a thousand
Cops rushed the garden made it home smilin'
Half of the crew probably on the island
Project call play puff ball the hoop was made out of a hanger
Playin' corners stick the elevator never thought
Project life was promised nothin' but to die trife
For steppin' on the next man's nikes my motto look for tomorrow
Today is yesterday look at the hood now, I'm mad that it turned out that way
Gats spray these shorties is killers
The older G's taught us well, what's wild now is that they're smaller
And they look at me like I'm on the outside lookin' in
Like 'who's you' when I cruise through
I call shorty took him in watch your friends, get ends
Be clever, realize that today's the first day that begins forever

[Hook]
Everything will eventually come to an end
So try to savor the moment, cause time flies, don't it?
The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better
Cuz nothin' lasts forever
Everything will eventually come to an end
So try to savor the moment, cause time flies, don't it?
The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better
Cuz nothin' lasts forever

[Verse 2]
Nice cars, livin' like a star club hoppin'
Poppin' bottles at the bar love shoppin'
Gucci iceberg, coppin' two, three nice furs
One for your wife, one for your freak silver spurs
Rolls Royce too good to be true, houses worth 2.2
Pool parties beautiful view
You made it in life, Forbes Magazine style baggy jeans style
Pass the green while hoes wit' meanwhile
Asses, pretty mommies illest bodies pass glasses
Louis Roderra with Peach Schnapps you just relaxin'
Thinkin', "Damn, wish my niggas could afford this"
On the sand at your Malibu house holdin' a cordless
Talkin' to lawyers accountants investments
Money doubles, triples protected hard work you manifested
Worries of failure, when you buried with your familia
Keep your name prosperin' to the maximum
You should live, there's only one life that's the physical
Rich or poor in jail why the fuck should you be miserable
Things happen for reasons, the clock keeps tickin'
Love could have your heart beat skippin', thugs turn to religion
The bitch you love could start to hate you
The shit you use to do escape you
Things that make you laugh represent the past
Reminisce the block gamble gees on the floor
Niggas use to be the man, you don't see 'em no more
Your favorite restaurants and favorite stores, they tore 'em down
Turned 'em into shopping malls the hood is like a ghost town
Haunted by souls who thought that time stood still
Just live your life to the fullest, never look back, it's real

Everything must eventually come to an end
So try to savor your moments, cuz time flies don't it
The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better
Cuz nothin' lasts forever, ya know

[Hook]
Everything will eventually come to an end
So try to savor the moment, cause time flies, don't it?
The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better
Cuz nothin' lasts forever
Everything will eventually come to an end
So try to savor the moment, cause time flies, don't it?
The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better
Cuz nothin' lasts forever

Ya now, nothin' lasts forever ya know
Let it go, let it go



[Verse 1]
Uh, if I can teach somethin' so be it
And hope somebody learn somethin' from it
And give it back

They can't break me or shake me
They too fake to come kill me
Think they faith is with Satan
They mistake me I'm filthy
Rich off the ghetto medleys, so now they wanna dare me
It's gonna be a murder confront me, the burners are empty
Middle Passage I made it
I'm from the land of David
The Nazarene of Bethlehem they had me wrapped in blankets
Ya bunch of backward gangsters
Y'all signin affidavits
Snitches with smiling faces, got you blowin trial, I hate this
Hopin' my child can see through this tryna be a good daddy
I was there when she was born and she'll be there when I'm buried
Kind of weird and it's scary
All my years have prepared me
What I fear is my temper, I see clear to the center
Right through a man's soul
Straight through his eyes, straight to his heart
I'm still alive how did I make it this far
Cause I been high I been low, searchin' for a way to go
Every single night I pray
And Lord I'm on this battleground, lost just waitin' to be found
I guess it's just a warrior's way

[Hook: Alicia Keys]
This is a song, for my warriors (A warrior song)
Bravehearted and strong, definition of a warrior (Definition of a warrior)
Gonna keep marchin on, to the sound of my own beatin drum

[Verse 2]
Like King Nasir fightin' the British regime
I can't cope my existence is hope for younger teens who lost and they broke
Earlier this year I buried my queen in a gold casket
Your mother's the closest thing to God that you ever have kid
I'm askin, what would you do at your own mom's funeral
Wanna pick her up out of it, this can't be real
Tellin' my daughter grandma's gone, but I can't keep still
I can't go on, responsible for so many
Her last days at the hospital
Visits from family I'm tryin' not to bust shots at niggas
Wishin' death on other nigga's mothers ain't right but why mommy
She raised me in the projects alone
Her untimely exit from her, heavenly body
Got me ready to body somethin' quickly
Can't be happy, fuck a party she can't party with me
So your apologies are burnin' ya own souls
To the kids with no parents at home, grab a hold

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Fight 'til the fight is over, for my peoples I die see
When you thought they were soldiers they turned out to be nobodies
I think they out to get me, helpless was livin' sinful
If you was me all this pain I'm feelin would bend and killed you (I'm a warrior)
It only made me stronger
But in my head it gets darker who wishin' evil on ya
Sometimes I wish I was dead
But I took heed to the cause (I'm a Warrior, yeah)
Cause I been high I been low, searchin' for a way to go
Every single night I pray
And Lord I'm on this battleground, lost just waitin' to be found
I guess it's just a warrior's way

[Hook]

[Outro]
To my warriors
To all these, baby
KrucialKeys! Braveheart y'all
This to all my warriors, who breathe with the heart of a lion
To everybody that lost their mother, their father
Rest in peace moms!
My mother's last words: Never give up
A true warrior, who raised me in the hood, in a war
Love ya girl, y'kno keep marchin'
Yea yea yea, you never give up
To all my warriors, haha
Braveheart, Braveheart
Definition of a warrior



Uhh, uhh, where am I going
Where am I?
Yo, it's ill

[Verse 1]
Yo, my wife's tired of fucking me
Life tries ducking me
Luckily I find 'em just at the right time
Mac in my right arm
Tequila bottle in my left arm like Cristian
Watching my life go
Can´t do myself in
Wolves in the night yo, hells men
Two revolvers I can let twelve spin
Hop in my Benz, push it to the limit
Buck-sixty who wit' me?
My Crys', two L's, twisted blunts and inner conscience
Telling me that I ain't shit
No matter how much cash I sit with
Still gotta ask the Lord for forgiveness
My precious baby girl came like forty nights of rain
To replenish my adolescent brain
Blessed be her name, before her birth I was insane
So I drive to cool the pressure down, delay the pain
I ate from these poisonous, fucked up streets
Tasted larceny, it was sweet, I starved for more to eat
Though I took, that was to live, hope God will forgive
As odd as it is, the more I gain the harder it is
To maintain, bitches playin' games
Niggas snitchin'
I ain't saying names
But y'all niggas better watch how y'all slang
Lost so many close niggas
Drunk, almost crashed
I'm going too fast
Highway patrol will just flash
Lights in my rearview
If they stop me I hope they lock me
Instead they speed ahead
Yo nigga watch me

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'm a ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand
Trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself alone in the zone
Drunk by myself

[Verse 2]
Heard niggas hate me, but I hated too once
Been in the shoes of a Wolf in the night when he hunts
For every shell niggas bust, we bust at ourselves
Can't tell them niggas nothing though
Bullets wak'em up well
Take them to hell
Stick up niggas once ran up on me
My decadent lifestyle attracted sharks on me
I ain't your mark homey
It's hard to look straight
My foot on the brake
Spilling my bottle not even shook of the Jakes
Could hardly look both ways
Put out the haze blurry vision
Think about the time in my life before I was in television
Hella women
Jealous niggas up in my vision
Since we all hood niggas expect kilos
For what they not seeing is police expect Rico
Only if I could take care of everybody, intoxicated
Windows up blastin A.C. going wherever instinct takes me
I hate it when I'm like this
The bottle's my accomplice

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'm a ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand
Trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself alone in the zone
Drunk by myself

[Verse 3]
The reason that I want to be alone
Tired of all the things that went wrong
That would have went right if I would have did it on my own
Take another swig
The more I drink, the more I think bad thoughts
Fake friends who hung around who wanna bring you down
Not knowing who to trust, rumors about niggas coming through
Supposedly to shoot at us, not knowing what was true
Or what to believe, that's why I'm on the low lately
Choosing a Henny bottle over a friend, driving again
To keep my mind off that weak shit
There's love through it all
Things to live for
I swerve, almost crash into a wall
Think about the good
Find myself laughing
Turn the cell off
No way to be reached
Know I'm near my crib
Tryna see my way through the streets
Reminded of the positive, I take my drunk ass home
Start feeling out of it, can't wait to get out of this whip
Bring my ass to the crib
I'm tired...

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'm a ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand
Trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself alone in the zone
Drunk by myself



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Nas talking]
The light is there

[Intro: Olu Dara singing]
See I come from Mississippi
I was young and runnin' wild
Ended up in New York City, where I had my first child
I named the boy Nasir, all the boys call him Nas
I told him as a youngster, he'll be the greatest man alive

[Verse 1: Nas]
Let's go!...
Hey-Hey-Hey-Hey --
Chuck Berry of these rap skits, styles I mastered
Many brothers snatched it up and tried to match it
But I'm still number one, everyday real
Speak what I want, I don't care what y'all feel
Cause I'm my own master, my Pop told me be your own boss
Keep integrity at every cost, and his home was Natchez Mississippi
Did it like Miles and Dizzy, now we gettin' busy
Bridging The Gap from the blues, to jazz, to rap
The history of music on this track
Born in the game, discovered my father's music
Like Prince searchin' through boxes of Purple Rain
But my Minneapolis was The Bridge, home of the Superkids
Some are well-known, some doin' bids
I mighta ended up on the wrong side of the tracks
If Pops wouldn't've pulled me back an said yo

[Olu Dara singing]
See I come from Mississippi
I was young and runnin' wild
Ended up in New York City, where I had my first child
I named the boy Nasir, all the boys call him Nas
I told him as a youngster, he'll be the greatest man alive
Greatest man alive (Yeah, turn it up!)
Gre-Gre-Gre-Gre-Greatest man alive!

[Verse 2: Nas]
The blues came from gospel, gospel from blues
Slaves are harmonizin' them ah's and ooh's
Old school, new school, know school rules
All these years I been voicin' my blues
I'm a artist from the start, Hip-Hop guided my heart
Graffiti on the wall, coulda ended in Spoffard, juvenile delinquent
But Pops gave me the right type'a tools to think with
Books to read, like X and stuff
Cause the schools said the kids had dyslexia
In art class I was a compulsive sketcher of
Teachers in my homeroom, I drew pix to mess them up
Cause none'a them would like my style
Read more books than the curriculum profile
Said, "Mr. Jones please come get your child
Cause he's writin' mad poems and his verses are wild"

[Olu Dara singing]
I was born in Mississippi
I was young and runnin' wild
Moved to New York City, where I had my first child
I named the boy Nasir, all the boys call him Nas
I told him as a youngster, he'll be the greatest man alive
Greatest man - The great-greatest man alive

[Verse 3: Nas]
Hey-Hey-Hey -- My Poppa was not a Rollin' Stone
He been around the world blowin' his horn, still he came home
Then he got grown, changed his name to Olu
Come on, tell 'em 'bout the places you gone to

[Olu Dara singing]
I been to Saudi Arabia, Mozambique
Madagascar, Paris, Greece
The Middle Africa is where we lived
Better known as Queenbridge
[Nas]
Nas, Nas you don't stop
Olu Dara in the house, you don't stop
Muddy Waters' Howling Wolf you don't stop
From the Blues to Street Hop you don't stop
Tell 'em Pop

[Outro: Olu Dara singing / Nas adlibbing]
See I come from Mississippi (Let 'em know)
I was young and runnin' wild (Runnin' wild)
Ended up in New York City (Yeah!)
Where I had my first child (That's me)
I named the boy Nasir (Yeah, Daddy!)
All the boys call him Nas (Luh ya, boy)
I told him as a youngster
He'll be the greatest man alive (You the greatest, Pop)
Greatest man alive (You the greatest, Pop)
Gre-Gre-Gre-Gre-Greatest man alive!
Rest In Peace Ray Charles



[Nas]
Look here see
Pretty Mike shanked Two-Face Al over some gal
Found the body dead in the isles
Death by strangulation
Microphone cord, a dirty broad
Guess they'll never play it again Sam
Damn that was my jam
Now she's on the lam
She made it out with 200 grand
What a scam
While these two compete on who's the star of the show
Golden legs there makes off with the dough
I read the paper there with Joe the Butcher
"He said one glance is all it took ya
She's a real looker
They say her old mans a bootlegger
Transporting in any weather
And at this rate we'll never get her."
Fellas, think it's time to call it a night
All this talk of this mystery dame's gettin' me tight
Thought I saw her in my eyesight, right
Hate to spoil the party
"What are you guys havin', the same?
Waiter another round for the gang."
It's strange how I always felt outta place
Joe The Butcher's my ace, but in comes Freckle Face
So I said "See you later."
'Fore I hurt him and his two ugly thumb breakers
He met them in Louisiana wrestling gators
An idiot can tell they're involved with the caper
So I pulled the revolver on my waist up
Between the patrol car and the gray truck
Behind the street lamp was a silouhette
White gloves and a real long cigarette
What do you know all this time she's got me in her scope
She spoke, says, "The devil got you guys by the throat
Your conspiracy theories won't work without evidence
That's the reason why Eric B. is not president."

Well what do ya say

Ya see?
Ya see?
Ya see?

Look here see
I know you got soul you're trying to hide it
How did you kill a man out in Cypress
One Eyed Charlie
He only hangs with the criminal minded
Says you guys did it doggy style is he lyin'
She says, "Walk this way, I'll tell you a children's story."
We hit the bodega got her a few 40's
We jumped in my ride we drove and she cried
Twisted off the cap there and opened her mouth wide
Swallowed it, whole bottle's half empty
Drinks like a fish now she's past tipsy
The truth came out as we got to her suave house
Chopped and screwed her mouth and sat me on the couch
I said, "It's gettin late, come on, give it to me straight
Who's ya sponsor lady?" She says, "Bill Gates."
What are ya born 77 or 78?
She says, "Nah it goes way to an earlier date
Slave times," claims the slaves said rhymes
But she fell in love with some fella named Clive
Who? "Clive Campbell from Sedgwick Ave, the Bronx."
Now she shows me the cash
I said who's Clive, don't play with me skirt
She said Clive Campbell
He's Kool Herc

Ah-ha!
Ah-ha!

Listen up sweetheart
Now we gettin somewhere
As she's talking, she starts vanishing in thin air
But before she dropped the money bag on the floor and died
She said if you really love me I'll come back alive



[Intro]
Uh
Crazy (crazy) Ah (ah)
Yo pussy kill me...
Huh (huh).. yeah (yeah) yeah..
Huh, huh, huh ,huh..

[Verse 1]
Pussy killed me when I was born (What?)
Pardon me, I'll rephrase it: departed mommy's womb decaying
I look at the bright side
The fact that I got a life side
Born '73 - September right Nas? (True)
Virgo child, the first thing I learn is money makes the world go round
On this small planet, it's ten women to one man; I wonder how we manage
To say vows and walk a straight line in marriage
Niggas is some nasty creatures (Word)
Bitches even nastier, they throw at your boy and it's hard for me to pass it up
Freaky hoes lick a nigga's ass and nuts
Stupid bitch braggin 'til her baby dad went nuts (Stupid bitch)
Now he looking for me, two cars deep
Rolling up on nigga's, barrel out the window, asking, "You NaS peeps?"
I can't have that, two four five, nigga grab that
Pass it to me, sucker-for-love niggas I blast at
I swear my dick is gonna get me in trouble
I pissin bubbles
I thought I felt a sharp pain, better stick to rubbers
When laying hooker after hooker, day out and day in
Watch out for diseases, the doctors can't name 'em
Just a thought: we all fuck the same chicks
Some play like they innocent, fucking entertainers
And basketball players, the bitch is a ho
But still some of y'all a save her, put your dick in her throat
You just the nigga that done wifed her (huh?)
She drove you crazy, now your monkey ass wanna shoot the pimp that pipes her
She had your baby, (Damn) now you a life-er
And suicide notes you write her
Pussy kills

[Hook: repeat 2X]
Oh what a thrill
Inside a bitch feel
Gotta be strong to handle it, it's real
Pussy kills
Backs shots keep a nigga open
Bitch a have niggas gun smoking
Pussy kills

[Verse 2]
My nigga James got married, same girl he went to school with
Nice girl, nerd with glasses, he was too stuck
Studied for her Masters, part time nurse
I'll tell you how superb the ass is, but who's looking
I mean that's my man, maybe I just took a peek
Maybe I wondered what it would be like, sike
Cause James and me like I was with AZ like
Luke and Han Solo fucking with niggas' girls' forbidden, that's a no-no
It's death and we real niggas, civilized gods
And their ain't too many niggas like NaS, I'm trust worthy
Plus I know a dude that caught his wife cheating
Killed his baby, killed his wife, and took his own life, even
Happy for James cause real bitches hard to come by
This nigga found one, I told him he's lucky, we clown some
Rolling up dutchies while watching Roy Jones in round one, he froze
Put his face to the tv, 'bout an inch close
Move out the way nigga, fuck's the matter with you, you blind?
He pointed to the front row, thought he was loosing his mind
She 'posed to be with her sick mother, left for the weekend
Was stressed when she was leaving
Now she's next to some nigga, cheesing
He's having trouble breathing (Gasping for air, coughing)
He pictured 'em making noises, grinding him and kissing him
Yelling, "Ain't no telling where her lips have been!"
Left her foul messages, she came home no lesser than
Ten minutes later, then they start wrestling and screaming
She said she missed her flight that evening
She never left, she wasn't at that fight, you speeding
That's Vegas, this is New York, you bugging
I held up my hand for a dap but he wouldn't touch it
I'm like, "When you started acting like that? This is dumbness."
Gave me a crazy look and started swinging punches
I ducked, couldn't believe it, the nigga so whipped
He got his gat and started squeezing, hit two policemen
Neighbors dialed 911, they heard the thumping
Wounded cops kicked in the door and started dumping
Me and his wife dip to the floor she smiled strange
My comrade was breathing no more, they killed James

[Hook]



Uhh... yeah... uhh...

[Verse 1: Nas]
Blessings of life to the children, they say life is like five days
Words of a old man with silver hair, in his wheelchair
His eyes were bloody while describin what lies before me
Said evil bitches and jealous men would try to destroy me
It occurred to me, this old nigga's words couldn't be realer
I'm on top now, slightest drama, I'll have ta kill ya
Cause animals sense weakness, sharks smell blood in water
Ishmael, Moses and Job knew the divine order
Shit is plastic material, havin' no life
I crash whips and leave it no matter the price
As long as I survive, cop a new five
Circle the block where the beef's at
And park in front of my enemy's eyes
They see that it's war we life stealers, hollow-tip lead busters
There's no heaven or hell - dead is dead fuckers
And your soul is with God, your mind keeps lurkin the earth
Watchin your own murder reoccur

[Hook: repeat 2X]
For ever struggle, every strip, and every ghetto
For every nigga totin inner pain and heavy metal
For every child that's born, and every nigga gone
And for every breath I breathe and live to see another mornin

[Verse 2: Blitz]
It's Blitz nigga the streets glory many die for me
Got knocked, refused 3 to 9's, went to trial for me
Basically I'm just reality, loaded with foul stories of lust
Greed and contempt, no street is exempt
Extended clip shots, hoods barricaded for 6 blocks
I sip shots, watchin em hustlers pitch rocks
Oil paintin pictures of my pain, illustrate the city in vain
Fallin deep into the pits of the game
This is for the sickest state of mind, in these fatal times
Vest crimes, nickel-plated nines and niggas for the dime
Hear the sounds of them babies cry, still I'm sayin why do we reside
In the ghetto with a million ways to die
Stayin high to relieve the pain, breathin in the game
Exhalin guilt sin and shame, misery and strain
What the fuck will tomorrow bring; luck or anthrax
I stand back, hopin I'll make it through tomorrow

[Verse 3: Nas]
My skin is a art gallery, right - with paintings of crucifixes
Hopin' to save me from all the dangers in the music business
Was once a young gangsta hangin' with youth offenders
But since I tasted paper it started losin the friendships
Watchin' kids freeze in winters, they still poor
How could I tease them with Benz's and feel no remorse
Drivin' past them in the lively fashion, diamond colors clashin'
Red stones, blue stones, red bones and black ones
Fuck did I expect with bucket seats in a Lex
And spendin' time in Chuckie Cheese with Little Des
Got guns when I'm with my daughter
Hate to bring a violent aura in her presence
She knows what daddy taught her, it's lessons
Black princess it's a ugly world
I put my life up for yours, see I love that girl
Could you believe even my shadow's jealous
My skin is mad at my flesh, my flesh hates my own bones
My brain hates my heart, my heart makes the songs
Though my songs come from the Father
I'm lonely...
Hold me, it's gettin' darker

[Hook] - repeat 2X



[Verse 1]
Word to Will, buried in his Fila suit and heavy chain
I wanna be iced-up, nigga, bury me the same
I live for street glory and I die for ghetto fame
Respect all, fear none, my pride is everythang
Initials in swimming pools floors, women lose drawers
A true boss, never lose wars, got cheddar to floss
Guns under my bed, mask and a flashlight
Livin' my life like everyday's my last night
Alcoholic on toilets, I shit blood
Foreign cars, models and stars, life of a rich thug
Mommy told me from weed I would switch drugs
To cocaine and hit clubs and deep-dish dubs
How would she know unless she hit the clubs, got her mack-on?
Back in the 60's with an afro and her platforms
Boppin' to the Supremes, smokin' joints
That's cool, but I'ma live how I want

[Hook 1]
{Repeated in the background: "I did it my way"}
From crumbs and roaches and rats
Converted in from hustlin' to raps
From break dancin', back spins on the cardboard
To bullet-proof Bentley's, gats in the car door
Never gave a fuck what nobody said
They hoped that I failed and wished I was dead
If I fuck up, it falls on me
I lucked up and struck rich, now we all can eat

[Verse 2]
Gateways, marble floors, chandeliers
Jacuzzi's, Gucci soap, throwin' cash in the air
Though I still feel broke with millions in the bank
And deals on the table, I focus to stay afloat
And just to think some would die to get what I got
They think it's a lot; in the blink of an eye, you could get shot
Niggas is wolves, comin' if you ruthless or not
But I be on point, put you in places where bodies rot
Never knew murder 'til I seen my man get popped
No blood soakin', layin' there, eyes still open
I got a little closer, put my hand in his palm
He was lookin' right through me, yo, starin' beyond
I wonder what he saw: the limos, movies and tours?
Did he die in vain or represent for the cause?
Now I put his name on everything I'm involved
And that's the game; y'all can't relate, fuck y'all (Ill Will)

[Hook 2]
{Repeated in the background: "I did it my way"}
Converted in from hustlin' to raps
I call it how I see it, niggas
If you don’t like it – so be it, niggas
I make my own rules, I do my own plans
Gangstas do what they want, suckas do what they can't
Takin' sacrifices, kid
You only gettin' one life to live

[Verse 3]
Hoes in my focus slow me
Roll with the brokest homies
Cold and we hopeless lonelies
Scoldin' my foes who phony
From blocks where coke could feed you
And cops is over-evil
They know some people
Who tell on felons who sold some diesil
Heroin and blow, it ruins minds
Knew a crew one time
'89, they took work to Caroline and blew big-time
In just two years, their crew disappear
Snitches and bitches smeared the paint on their pictures
Years back, I reminisce and remember
Sittin' on wood benches gave me splinters
Just a baby nigga thankful
When them killas came through, guns out, movin'
I thank the ones who said
"Shorty, go home!", we about to be shootin'

[Hook 1]
{Repeated in the background: "I did it my way"}
From crumbs and roaches and rats
Converted in from hustlin' to raps
From break dancin', back spins on the cardboard
To bullet-proof Bentley's, gats in the car door
Never gave a fuck what nobody said
They hoped that I failed and wished I was dead
If I fuck up, it falls on me
I lucked up and struck rich, now we all can eat



[Intro]
Yeah, niggas want to talk about this rap shit
Niggas want to talk about this money
About these cars, these homes, these labels
Clothes, sneakers, big money shit
Now everybody trying to get rich
Now get rich niggas, fuck it

[Verse 1]
Some rap pioneers be them crackheads
When they speak, you see missin' teeth
Silver chain with a silver piece
Niggas your grandfather's age, they pants still hangin' down they legs, talkin' about they ain't paid
And they hate you, ‘cause they say you ain't pay dues
And Slyvia Robinson was stealin' and robbin' them
I feel it's a problem we gotta resolve
Hip-Hop been dead, we the reason it died
Wasn't Sylvia's fault or because MC's skills are lost
It's because we can't see ourselves as the boss
Deep-rooted through slavery, self-hatred
The Jewish stick together, friends in high places
We on some low level shit, we don't want niggas to ever win
See, everybody got a label
Everybody's a rapper, but few flow fatal
It's fucked up, it all started from two turntables

[Hook]
When they crown you and you rise up to your position
Carry on tradition
When they knight you, then you go to fight
Go to war, don't petition, carry on tradition
Carry on tradition, carry on, ca-carry on, carry on tradition
Carry On Tradition
When you rep what we rep, then carry on tradition

[Verse 2]
Some of these new rappers got their caps flipped backwards
With their fingers intertwined in some gang-sign madness
I got an exam, let's see if y'all pass it
Let's see who can quote a Daddy Kane line the fastest
Some of you new rappers, I don't understand your code
You have your man shoot you, like in that Sopranos episode
Do anythin' to get in the game, mixtapes
You spit hate against bosses; hungry fucks are moraless
You should be tossed in a pit full of unfortunate vocalists
Niggas, I could've wrote your shit
I had off-time, was bored with this
I could've made my double-LP
Just by samplin' different parts of Nautilus
Still came five on the charts with zero audience
The lane was open and y'all was droppin' that garbage shit
Y'all got awards for your bricks – it got good to ya
You started tellin' them bigger dogs to call it quits?! WHAT?

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Now niggas got the studio poppin', it's mad clearer
Engineers got his earplugs and still hear us
The live-in-the-park sound versus the studio state of art sound. We on the charts now
From British Walkers and Argyles
Look at us rap stars now, with our black cars now
Fortune 500 listed, brunches, sip Cipriani's
Sippin', blunted, with rich white guys around me
Thick white girls around me, Chinese lined up
Because I'm what? Every dime lust
We used to be a ghetto secret; can't make my mind up
If I want that or the whole world to peep it
Now carry on tradition
Fuck a bum wack rapper makin' his career out of dissin'
Peace to the strugglin' artists and dead one's gone, we miss 'em. I promise I carry on tradition

[Hook]



[Produced by Nas & Trackmasters]

[Various Speakers & Nas]
"Hey Nas, hey hey boy, you see what they done did to Jimmy and Lee?"
"Mmmhmm. Damn, man"
"I can't take it man"
"Sho' can't"
"You think this is gonna eva' change?"
"Man, damn this place, man! Damn these chains! These damn chitlins every damn night"
"This cotton"
"Shit!"
"I can't take it man"
"Harriett done left the night befo'. It's time we go
Ain't no place for black folk here. Man, promise land callin' me man"
"It's callin' me too"
"It's time we go"
"Yeah, I'm wichou!"
"Hey man, hey damn these chains, man. Damn you master, you ain't my master, man!
"You ain't nothin', you ain't nothin'"
"Hey Bandit, Bandit, get the dogs! Get the hounds, we gonna
Have ourselves a hangin' tonight!"

1996!
Back up in this nigga
The right way, though, you know?
Double-tre son, you know ain't nothin'
Coincedental or accidental, son
No doubt!
You know how it's goin' down, man
It was all written
No question, I'm sayin' man, I mean, how we playin' man
You know what I'm sayin', they dealt us in, son
They playin' with a 54 deck, you see with the jokers in and everything, you know what I'm saying?
Son, I'm playin' with the 52
You wanna stress on how I used to play, that's how I play
But, yo, they takin' us into this next millenium, right now
I'm sayin' law, you know what I'm sayin' we gotta lay the law
Cause without law ain't no order, you know what I'm sayin'
That's why these cats are slippin' through, you know what I'm sayin? They got the rules missin' though
True
Yo, word up, though, you know what I mean?
Son, these niggas look faker than the new hundred dollars, son
Yeah, you see that they look Monopoly money, right?
Word, with the big ass face on it
Yo, what I'm sayin', we see through all that, though
You know what I'm sayin?
No question
All eyes seein', son, you know we real
Yo, no doubt. In the Qu'ran it says Nas, the men
Nesa's the woman, you know? It was written



[Verse 1]
One 44, two 45's
Three loaded clips, four niggas roll, one nigga drives
500 Benz, six reasons why this kid should die
We shooting every mothafucka outside
Pulled on his block, jumped out the car
Guns in our hand, at the same time everybody ran
There that nigga go, hiding in the crowd
Let the trigger blow, seven shots now he lying on the ground
Blood on the floor then we shot some more
Niggas he was with two niggas hit, one nigga fell
One tried to run, go get him son
Make sure he's done 'fore we bail, I ain't tryna go to jail
Must handle beef, code of the street, load up the heat
If these nigga think they could fuck around
Real niggas do real things by all means
Niggas knowing how we get down, it goes

[Hook]
Shoot 'em up, just shoot 'em up, what?
(Kill-kill-kill, murder-murder-murder)

[Verse 2]
Driving through roads, Suburban Chevrolet
Six tinted windows, and I'm on my way
To get up with my hoes, I pull up to they house
Not a freak to be heard, nobody came out
Ringing the bell, where in the hell, could they be at?
I'm about to leave stepping slow, where my truck was at
Who the fuck is that? Could it be a jack?
Now pull my strap, it's my man and we have the same plan
There them bitches go, Civic '94
Looking funny though, open up the car door, funny smile
Fuck two already, third ass was heavy
"Nas this is Sherry, Sherry this is Nas and his man, ready?"
Walked in the house, snatched off they clothes
Ran through them hoes, plenty ice, that they all seemed to like
Can't find my man, heard a blam-blam
Now I'm wondering, "In this scam, do I even stand a chance?"
He killed the hoes, took all they dough
Fire in his eyes, higher than the sky coming down the stairs
Now he wanting mine, reaching for my nine
Aiming with our guns at each others face, at the same time
My nine on his lips, his fifth on my chin, I start whispering
"Put your gun down, we can skip town"
Rocked him to sleep, pushed back his meat
Lift off his chain, took his shit, emptied out close range

[Hook]



[Intro]
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
Check, one, two

[Verse 1]
Yo, I'm hot like 95 Fahrenheit
On a summer night, tight spot where bodies rot
Rats drink from water drops, in the streets, niggas
Little kids scared cops, with red dots
Philosophical gangsta, with violent priors
Going back like black and white TVs with pliers
Leaning on broke down cars with flat tires
Flash iron on anybody trying on the blocks I'm supplying on
Madicon, my peeps, tie ballons up
And swallow 'em, and the P now got goons, lots of 'em
Cops see them and run, don't want no drama
Certain parts of the streets, the beast don't want a part of
Martyr, hood haunted like the Dakota
Where John Lennon was shot up, but he sang for peace
He begged for freedom, hanged with wild Jamicians
From Kingston, who drink Irish Moss
Listening to Peter Winston, Machintosh
Lightning hits the top of the church steeple
When I'm writing, semi-automatic, no hyphen
It's frightening

[Hook x4]
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move with

[Verse 2]
I take summers off, cause I love winter beef
Started '87, with the shotty in the sheep
Three-quarter length, beige, dressed to kill
Bust a shell at the ground, pellets hit the crowd
Nobody like a snitch, everybody shut they mouth
Woolrich, Carhart, gun powder stains
Smelling like trees, sensimille on the brain
Scheming on your girls, bamboos on your chain
Got ill up on the train
Twisting off a cap of a English in my vein
Might've pushed you on the tracks
Deaf crack fiends who can't speak, scream noises
Cause she bought a jum of soap from one of my boys
It's just another day in the hood
And I'm with some wild brothers, up to no good
We saw the movies, like Tony Montana, and 'em
But our style was let them pile, then we robbin 'em
Money dudes, make 'em come up out they shoes
Run they jewels, word is bond, where my man Nino going
And I had to make a song, speaking on my old life
For the thieves who come out at night

[Hook x4]

[Outro]
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do



[Intro: Mykel]
Where there's life there is water
We depend on Mama Nature
There's a message for tomorrow
Everything connects to you
Some say soon it will be over
You can see it in the weather
Out of tune with Mama Nature
What you do comes back to you

[Hook: Mykel]
We're not alone (4x)

[Nas]
Confucius, Confucius, Sigmund Freud
And Farad Muhammad, is it evolution or God?
Searching for the truth is a threat
Seems the closer we get to the truth State Troopers or Feds
Come out to silence you, my house in Malibu probably tapped
Cause living next door to Demi Moore, plus I'm black
Plus I want vengeance for the poor who's attacked daily
Patriot Act never scared me
Jake in the Taurus, sticky in the jar-as
Niggas I'm with got warrants
America's browning, 20 years from now every town'll be brown and Latin
An African looking Manhattan
I'mma tell you what I seen with my three eyes
Word to me, not a hoax back in '99
A spacecraft in the skyline
In L.A. in daytime, ask Horse if I'm lying

[Bridge 1: Mykel]
Every mother every father
Raise your sons and your daughters
With respect and with honor
From the seed comes a fruit
It's an unbroken circle
All of life is universal
And we're all in the struggle
If I know one thing is true

[Hook]

[Nas]
Evidence remains in debate
Documents of our own Air Force base
Additional terrestrial information
Other planets with life population, my observation
Scientists study pictures of a flying disk
Right on earth anthropologists are finding shit
Visitors probably live with us, they can mimic us
It's sort of what we're seeing in the cinemas

[Bridge 2: Mykel]
Take a look in the mirror
And see the bigger picture
It's good to be alive
(It's good to be alive)
Nobody is an island
We are part of an environment
Only way we're gon' survive
Is if we harmonize

[Hook]

[Nas]
Reginald Lewis, the black billionaire
Before Oprah, Bob Johnson, how'd he disappear?
Conspiracy theories, UFOs in the air
I've seen it with my own two eyes, and I swear
Like Warren Buffet, real money I'm just trying to touch it
The diamond encrusted shit, live illustrious
Cause we was deprived of it, suffered
Now we pop to prove anything's possible
My pimp strut was invented when they whipped us
Now we diddy bop just to show you that our strength's up
Just when niggas 'bout to see they cut
Global warming about to burn us up
Niggas never really seen paper in this world
American Black's the teenager of this world
Give us 20 more years to grow up, already geniuses
What I mean is this
I used to worship a certain Queens police murderer
'Til I read the words of Ivan Van Sertima
He inserted something in me that made me feel worthier
Now I spit revolution, I'm his hood interpreter

[Bridge 2]

[Hook]

[Nas]
Ayo I'm American born, love america, love my people, love all mankind, all nationalities you know. I think it's just recently where everybody just started to feel like there was an elite group that runs everything, and everybody else was sheep, ignorant, making all ethnicities, colors and creeds, niggers, blind to what really is going on. So i say take off the wool from your
Eyes. Out with the Old America in with the New. End all racism, all injustice, all oppression to poor people, any
People anywhere in this planet. Let's come together: a new day is rising



[Produced by L.E.S]

[Intro]
To my niggas.. huh..
We all we got..
Let's hold it down though, y'know?
However it's gon' go down
This what we gotta deal with, y'know?
Yo..

[Chorus]
It's the life we chose, where friends become foes
And the dough'll get you killed quicker than you know
This is the life we chose, bring fake snakes and hoes
And the only way out, is death or goin broke
This the life we chose, ain't too many happy endings
That's why there ain't too many happy niggas in it
And I'll admit it, this life is fucked up but yo..
(but yo..) this life is the only life I know {*echoes}

[Verse 1]
Uhh, uhh, uhh
Gold bathtubs, makin love to my Queen
Get my back rubbed, Chardonnay, rollin up green
Statues, marble floors, rare paintings on my wall
My lifestyle's like the Forbes Magazine
Closets, full of rockets and submachines
Take this nigga out the projects, and his thug team
Yo we cruise past street lights, ill rides
Mr. Chow both coasts with the most loud toast
Calicos roast y'all folks, keep y'all dyin
Cause it's hard to fuck around when we dealin with science
My enemies got money, so y'all should watch how I play it
They never know we enemies until they hear me say it
Til they kid's on the phone sayin, "Please daddy pay it"
Til they brain's on the floor, mixed on the pavement
High-class elegance, you respect or you hiss
You go against you'd rather piss on an electrical fence
It's strategic, how these niggas want you to think
You'd be surprised, who'd be the one to put you to sleep
Why you stink? Yo these streets don't allow you to blink
You get showered by lead, comin out with your mink
Bow ties and tuxedos, bust Eagles
Dump drugs and acid, then they rush with the Rico
It's hard fuckin with niggas you hope you can trust
You a fool if your main bitch is easy to fuck
And you've got money - is these hoes greedy or what?
Shit is devious, ex-friends wantin you stuck

[Chorus]
It's the life we chose, where friends become foes
And the dough'll get you killed quicker than you know
This is the life we chose, bring fake snakes and hoes
And the only way out, is death or goin broke
This the life we chose, ain't too many happy endings
That's why there ain't too many happy niggas in it
And I'll admit it, this life is fucked up but yo..
(but yo..) this life is the only life I know {*echoes}

[Verse 2]
Uhh, what's love when you don't give your man enough dough?
He wanna stick you
What's love, you got beef?
Nobody rollin wit you
What's love, you locked up, and your family don't care
Is love a four-letter word, that deceives the ear?
What's real, when you know your man's girl is a ho
And you don't even let him know, cause you fucked her befo'
What's real, when you talk behind a man's back
Then you see him and give him dap, now explain that?
What's trust, when they seperate your case
When you at your court date, your co-de', can't look in your face
What's trust, when you keep your wife away from your man?
And he never crossed you, but you claimin he's fam'?
What's trust, when you get bust, your niggas don't retaliate?
They blaze purple haze with em the next day?
God forbid one of my niggas get hit, I'mma go haywire
Won't hesitate, I'mma spray fire
But everybody's different, you won't know how you react
Til you in that position, and that's an actual fact
The hearts of men change as time goes on, who's wrong?
You was hungry when you stuck Duke, he came back to buck you
Who's wrong? Foul all your life, now you 90
On your deathbed you regret bein grimy
What's lust, a bust nut? What's a thug?
A ghetto child raised around drugs, til he's old enough to bust slugs?
Then what's jail, to rehabilitate, or to make a nigga worse
When he come home to catch another case?
Life's about decisions, you choose it, you gotta live it
You did it, heaven or hell or prison
Who knows when your clock'll stop tickin, get your weight up
Save up before it's over neighbor, I told ya
You gettin older player, look at those who gave up

[Chorus]
It's the life we chose, where friends become foes
And the dough'll get you killed quicker than you know
This is the life we chose, bring fake snakes and hoes
And the only way out, is death or goin broke
This the life we chose, ain't too many happy endings
That's why there ain't too many happy niggas in it
And I'll admit it, this life is fucked up but yo..
(but yo..) this life is the only life I know {*echoes}



[Produced by Live Squad, Lo Ground & Top General Sounds]

[Hook]
*whisper*
Silent, silent
Murder

[Verse 1]
It's sort of like the conclusion to Color Purple
Niggas is losing, confusion, with one time on pursuit moves in
Grabbing niggas up in this movement to rule shit
Cop versus the block, shorties is schooled quick
Lesson number one. If you're arrested and hung
Where niggas is from gotta keep a lid on your tongue
It's like silent murder, I hit blunts hard like Ray Mercer
The violent words of a prince in a palace of Persia
The cognac plurger plus the trees
But who's the foul one to make his nose take a freeze?
And got enough gall to rock ice in all hype
Used to be a general but just lost his stripe
Pipe dreams and white fiends and all-nighters
Collect calls from lifers, Astoria wars with Cypress
Since I got a problem with the law-writers
I kick some more items just to explore horizons
The palm lady dreamt of this day so I'mma play
The crib close smokin' with the big toast and lay

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
They say the arms of Nicky Barnes would be enough to blast
A lot of rich niggas fell and started pumping gas
Was it the mind of CIA that bumped off Malik Shabazz
Fuck what they teach in class I'mma reach the mass
Strap up, no back up, it's jungle tactics
Livin' practice, out of line niggas get smacked backwards
So wear it if the cap fits
Folded up money and mad clips
A stack right under my mattress
To smoke a nigga like a Hughes Brother motion picture
Niggas gettin' open crews, roping older niggas
April fools they laugh the jokes on the benches
Cease outside my nigga spoke on his sentence

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
My right-handers never play too close to cameras
It's night time, scandalous, circle the loud gamblers
Peace making niggas pep talk
The Beast making niggas walk off the hot avenues with they brew
Time to get this loot countless, 'cause son it ain't no youth fountains
Niggas take cash and shoot, bounce and Pakistanians are took hostage
Locked up inside a linen closet known for spending pies up
What's the flavor when your neighbors do jake favors?
Lock the real niggas down and lettin' fake players
Roam around the projects, it's lyrical logic
I dilute, the weak can inject the right composite
When plotting on murderous schemes
It seems I'm ghostly called by the essence of Queens
The palm lady dreamt of this day, so I'mma play
The crib close smokin' with the big toast and lay

[Hook]

[Outro]
And Cain killed his brother Abel
When God accepted Abel's offering and not his
Abel's offering showed that Cain was not giving his best to God
And Cain's jealous anger drove him to murder -
Drove him to murder



[Verse 1: Nas]
From Willie Lynch to Willie Hutch, right on, we +Superfly+
Made Gucci the shit - Louie too, suits and ties
Player trophies, pray to Goldie
Picture wax museums full of Black Panth's and triple OGs'
Aunt Jemina hoes, historic horse shit
Girls from long time ago, stagecoach with the horse, kid
Witchdoctors, good ol' pickpockets
Sip Moonshine, so-called coons, shines, and darkies
I love y'all; pyramids to cotton fields
To Wrigley Fields, forgotten men who DID get killed
Crispus Attucks, the first blasted
Peace to the rich lady, purse snatcher shot in the back
I know your hunger kid, I know they hung your dad
Burnt ya mama crib, I know that hurt you bad
Minstrel shows; from gold to shackles and back to gold
We act like we home, matter of fact - we are home
Bad attitudes, octoroon skin tones
Slave food turned to soul food, collards to neck bones
Betsy Ross sewed the first American flag
Bet she had a nigga with her to help her old ass!

[Eban Thomas]
As James Baldwin says,"You can only be destroyed
By believing that you really are
What the white world considers - a nigga" {*echoes*}

[Hook: sung w/ ad-libs]
No matter how, hard you try, you can't stop, us nooooow...
No matter how, hard you try, you can't stop, us nooooow...

[Verse 2: Nas]
Can't be stopped
Yo, on Dateline, the other night they showed hate crimes
Gave a blood time cause he fought with his canine
Bestiality, humane society
Go to China, see how they dine, see what they eat
Better yet ask PETA, whoever; which animal makes suede?
If not for suede, would you have survived the Dark Ages?
Cannibal ways of the ancient Caucasians
Stare you like you're steak tartar, pinot noir
David Star on the chain of Sammy Davis
He helped pave the way for Southern Crankers and them Harlem Shakers
Now we gettin' our papers, they try to censor the words
And stop our money comin', but you can't escape us - haters

[Hook]



[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, laced and Macy's, don't have it, a hatred addict
I need faces mad with frowns when I'm around, or I'm wastin' fabric
I don't feel greater 'til my plush pieces cause you to suck your teeth
So mean-muggin' on my clean-thuggin' mean nothin'
Women dream I'm your husband
I'm Alex Pushkin, the black poetry-writin' Russian, ice disgustin'
I started bling, how could you question my direction
Or my Tom Ford collection? Gangstas two-steppin'
You hate me, should thank me, but lately
I burned so much trees, I keep environmentalists angry
I'm a rare dude, I'm a wonder, your best success is my worst blunder
Y'all livin' trendy on pennies, I cop plenty Fendi
Vivienne Westwood, I'm good
Get the whole Trump Tower top floor for the hood
Dre & Cool, we ridin' heavy, NY to Miami cause

[Chorus: Chris Brown & Nas]
We make the world go round
Now let's toast to the hustlers
We make the world go round
Tell the hustlers, toast to the gangstas
We make the world go round
Tell the gangstas to toast to the ballers
We make the world go round
And tell the ballers pour a glass for all us
We make the world go round

[Verse 2: The Game & Chris Brown]
I see the haters on the floor jockin' my swag
I'm poppin' Ralph Lauren tags and pourin' champagne inside a polo glass
Model bitches rollin' grass, Escobar unfoldin' cash
Toastin' with my entourage, went from robbin' armored cars
To all my stars, red carpet to the L'Ermitage
We throwin' red dice at the Mirage
I pull that red Lamborghini on twenties out my garage
Set up shop in South Beach like Khaled and Terror Squad
(We The Best!) Big pimpin', top down chrome spinnin'
"Top Gun", Tom Cruise tucked inside my Gucci linen
No, just Romo
You tryna shine, I put the nine on your jersey for promo
Jessica Simpson, that's so-so
Nick want his (baby back), but that's Loso
Tell Hawaii 5-0 to catch me at the Pro Bowl
On the field, diamonds chokin' the jockey on my Polo
CB, let 'em know though

[Chorus: Chris Brown & Nas]
We make the world go round
Now let's toast to the hustlers
We make the world go round
Tell the hustlers, toast to the gangstas
We make the world go round
Tell the gangstas to toast to the ballers
We make the world go round
And tell the ballers pour a glass for all us
We make the world go round

[Bridge: Chris Brown]
We make the world go round
From my town to your town
We on top, no stopping us now
We got Patron, the ballers two stepping
Ladies on the floor and all 'em two stepping
From L.A. to Harlem, two steppin'
So iced out, it's easy to point them haters out

[Verse 3: Nas]
We start with Bellini's and end with Patron shots
H. Lorenzo belt buckle from Chrome Heart
Alife tag popper, it'd be sad not to walk out the store with bags
Worth a hundred cash shoppin'
Violence only when have to, have to to swell you up
Prefer peach Schnaps, Perrier-Jouet, a vanilla dutch
Mets cap, that's Queens, I'm a vet, bet that
300 carats the average up on the neck, black
Paid the cost, be the boss, Black Caesar floss
Weekends at the Venetian, pull up in that black Porsche
Top down, new fashion
Seein' me is like seein' through the lens of Helmut Newton's camera light, flashin'
And I'm laughin', my plaques' from album sales
Y'all is ringtone platinum, but ninety-nine cents adds up
I don't hate 'em, I congratulate 'em
The new young Prince with young Mike Jackson on the same track, what

[Chorus: Chris Brown & Nas]
Now let's toast to the hustlers
We make the world go round
Tell the hustlers, toast to the gangstas
We make the world go round
Tell the gangstas to toast to the ballers
We make the world go round
And tell the ballers pour a glass for all us
We make the world go round



Uhh, oooooh baby, baby
Keep it thug, and keep yo' heat, na nah nah nah nah

[Verse 1]
Now slowly, thinking of all the things that oppose me
I think of kings who died and rappers out to dethrone me
For they crown they head is cut off, bodies is laid
Dead in the street, it's so fucking pitiful
First they love you, could be the bitch that even live with you (ho)
Mad at your riches, now she switched, turned miserable
Cause she wanna dress like Bonnie, Robin and Crystal do
But Crystal's single, Bonnie's broke and her niggas too (ha)
I can do bad by myself; went from rags to wealth
From Jags to Bentleys to, plenty ass bitches
Can't keep they hands to theyself no more
I'm like, Hugh Hefner, you lesser, you just a

[Hook]
Wanna be me, you can't you faggot, you bitch
You coward, you clown, you just wanna be down
So you - wanna be me, you bitch, you phony
You clone me, you wanna be me son, I'm the one and only
But you - wanna be me, you suckers, you weak
You flunkies, you fake, you couldn't come close on my worst day
But you - wanna be me, I burn you and learn you a lesson
Concerning this mic profession, turn your direction

[Verse 2]
You can't be me, not in your wildest fantasy
It's childish; should I have to resort to violence?
Pay me a half a million, I'll consult your album
And show you how to stay off my dick
That's the thing I hate the most, can't even call you a man
When you gotta call out my name to get you some fans
No talent, you need direction; you a pussy with a yeast infection
You unlucky, I'm your fucking C-section
Plus I'm the last real nigga alive
Toast glass, Ill Will, the label get high
Realize, how many classics I gave you
Perhaps if you think back you'll realize that I made you

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
You can't be me, I'm trying to walk a straight line
Why they trying to take mine? I'm past 8 Miles of every state line
Eating, alligators and, hummingbird hearts
At the Player's Ball, Brioni suits, y'all birds watch
As real millionaire, shit'll take place
Evil as Hitler's hate-race people
This is God son, and I've come from the God under pure peace
To represent the streets, you'll see that my plan
Is not to destroy your man
But to bring more to mankind and teach
Every MC reach for your pens and papers
Lesson one be creative; what you made of junior?
Cause soon you'll be a grown man with the mic in your hand
And understand, to battle Nas not in your plan
I'm the last real nigga alive, understand that
And you my offspring, the boss sting
A bulletproof Porsche things, hard for you to understand that
Nas the king, where my bricks, where my band at?
Play me a gangster's theme, while you entertain me
If I ain't crying laughing, to the lions, throw your ass in
What the fuck was you niggas thinking?
Guns'll clutch if I get a inkling that you coming for the kingpin
But I laugh at you cowards, ha ha ha
Take me out, try try try, but you

[Hook]

You can't be me



[Produced by Large Professor]

[Intro]
Yeah, yeah, yo, yeah, yeah

[Verse 1]
For niggas up in they mom's crib listenin
To this unadulterated Nas shit wishin it was them
Instead of, me on this track on this beach with palm trees
Drinks with umbrellas straws telling it raw
Jungle of concrete killers and snakes I was amongst that
Bundles of crack through this funnel that's black
I want you to vision through my telescope see the hell I wrote
It's Reynolds when I Wrap it like a envelope package
And they was into dope back then
Numbers, pimpin and robbin, well they still robbin and pimpin
But it's small change compare to hip hoppin
And did I mention millions because of lip poppin
Trips expensive gift shoppin whip drivin
Benzes, Jeeps, see, them and they bitch got one
It's shockin you thinkin naw it's just rhymin
But all this time it's like organized crimin
For instance, there was a time when there was a line
Between streets and business, but now peep how it's mixed in
The beef is now sickenin, everybody got paper
Words of power, because of it the cops hate ya
The government watchin all of those who thuggin it
They wanna lock us up cause they kids are lovin it
Not knowin that most rappers are straight ass
The shots ring out, whenever we clash it's Star Wars

[Hook]
We call it Star Wars
What happens when the shots ring out, Star Wars
We call it Star Wars

[Verse 2]
Caviar never, I rather the Cajun blacken
Catfish no snails simple nigga to please
Met a bad bitch dimples in her cheeks
She remembers Busy Bee battles when it was peace
Caught myself driftin in thought, cause now it's different I thought
Niggas was raised off the shit I record
Like I was brought up off that Planet Rock
Kurtis Blow, James Todd Smith, Shan and Scott LaRock in the jams
Why would they fuck with a don, Jehovah witness
Him and his co-defendants, I eat 'em like Lucky Charms
With two percent low fat milk, five percent pro black built
It's nothin mother had a motherfucker
I don't think about it niggas talkin there's a lot of gossip
That I'm a prophet or I can't go back to my projects
Can I? Does a plant grow from a pot yes
Do trees grow from a forest MC's y'all are clitoris
Y'all niggas roll with any click that's winnin any crew
Doin whatever's trendy, even they leave me too
Ain't enough room in this town
What is beef between ghetto word spitters with crowns, Star Wars

[Hook]
Cause this is Star Wars, shots ring out everywhere, Star Wars
Cause this is Star Wars, shots ring out

[Verse 3]
This ain't, no Oscars or MTV or Joan Rivers fashion police
Not what you read in tabloid seats
These are MC's that live by the code, it's hard for me to spit it
Because the game was supposed to be sold, we live it
Came from the streets we the voice of the youth
America's nightmare was given a mic booth
Nike boots, leathers and jean, jewelry, cribs and cars
Rappers not dependin on your nine to five jobs
Entertainment, this is our world this is our language
Different regions speakin east and west gang shit
You got your positive shit like, Common Sense
But even he had drama with the Don Mega Cube
Acknowledge the words get twisted at times it's rules
What you think is different from the block whenever we feud
Fuck your pictures and your plaques your tours and autographs
Don't trust bitches and niggas who tell you your all of that
Cause, they'll be in your enemies face, sayin it's safe
To run in your release party sprayin the place
Or catch you when you least on point, putting your keys in the door
Behind you with your seeds in KB Toys store
Maybe the words get disrespectful now your niggas check you
You 'gon let that nigga play you, you know we 'gon rep you
Next mornin every news channel and front page
Headlines another rapper was slayed, this is Star Wars



(Sample)
"They did not have the power to stop Louis Farrakhan
They were trying to touch on and thieve envy within the leadership
But as a general and a man that rose through the ranks through discipline
His presence inspired those men with the discipline he imposed on his own life
Louis Farrakhan"

[Nas]
No revolutionary gets old or so I'm told
You're left full of bullet holes when you tell the people go free
Oh, it's a matter of days before they try to take me
I heard gun shots rang; his bullet's got my name
I ain't see 'em take aim, I dreamt this day came
Cause I stood in the face of damnation
Satan spat at 'em, flat out disgraced 'em
He want my blood, why me?
Why not the fake who deserve death, man?
Fuck it, I'll take one
Cause stop me but can't stop a whole nation of millions who feel you deceived them
They believe in reparation makes it even
So I'm deadly now because of one reason, they listening
In Budapest, Japan, China, and Switzerland
We getting it in son
Another bullet pass by, missed me
Wondering who plotting to get me?
Alphabet boys still plotting against me
To hush me and stuff me in the pockets of history
You won't remember why they came to clip me
When time go by you'll soon forget me
They say he was the king of bling, jewels, and Bentley's
Then they use one of my lines just to prove I'm guilty
Don't let' em kill me...

(Sample)
"They did not have the power to stop Louis Farrakhan."
"They did not have the power to stop Louis Farrakhan."
"They did not have the power to stop Louis Farrakhan."
"They did not have the power to stop Louis Farrakhan."

[Nas]
Some revolutionaries do live long
Am I one of them? Guess we'll know in due time
Everybody has rights, can I use mine?
Can I rock shine? Can I have a girl that's too fine?
Got a swell life, tell me will I lose mine?
Every time I turn around somebody new dying
Let's start living, À la carte, Escargot, Escobar
Invest my millions
Mansion for the wife, the rest for the children
Knowing that they coming anytime
But untill then, i'm at large till they shoot me
Million dollar stones in my camouflaged Gucci
Giving you this crack like Pookie
To question the system, be the resistance
No matter what color you are everybody niggers
Or you can stand by or watch or you can march on with us

(Chorus) Nas 2x
Some revolutionaries get old although I'm told
You'll get a left full of bullet holes when you tell the people go free
Oh, it's a matter of days before they try to take me



[Produced by Timbaland]

[Intro: Nas + (Timbaland)]
(What?) Ever been in love? (C'mon)
Yeah.. are you ready? (uhh) For somethin real?
(Say what?) Cause it can't be fake
This ain't no game (C'mon)
You gotta be wit me, for real (uh-huh)
Cause it's real out here (uh-huh)
So make up your mind, cause I ain't got no time
Y'know? (C'mon)

[Verse 1]
I'm the most wanted baby father, save the drama
We toast when I wine and dine ya -- all you need is me
I won't stress you but bless you
Mentally and sexual, we both intellectual
Can't forget how I met you;
You thought I was a boxer Prince Naseem
But I'm the mobster -- Nas from Queens
And when I gotcha - you ridin with me
You keep askin, "When do you have time for me?"
I'm never free always on the move, business oriented
Lifestyle expensive, attract women
You wanna search my pockets, and act all wild
Say I hurt your heart - ask how could I smile?
Wanna call back all my numbers - star 6-9 me
Check my car for rubbers, but quit tryin
Before you find what you lookin for and get to cryin
You always sayin what you gon' do if you catch me lyin

[Hook: Aaliyah + (Nas)]
You won't see me tonight
You won't see me tomorrow
I'll be gone by daylight (doubt that)
And you'll be so full of sorrow (yeah right)
You'll go tell all your friends (that's right)
How you called and I follow (they know it)
But you won't see me tonight (you don't believe that)
No you won't see me tomorrow

[Verse 2]
Caramel kisses of Jezebel's sister
I feel no guilt when I twist ya
Turn the other cheek when I see the next freak witcha
You got your name on his lease, copy his keys
That's your lil' spot where you rest your wig piece
Go 'head and live baby, I know you his lady
You page me, when you got the day free
But I be out with my peeps in them system jeeps
You wanna lay up in the sheets of presidential suites
Like I'll massage you while you massage me, mami
But can you hang with a young man who's doin his thang?
Speak up, I wanna know if you can keep up
Timberland boots for girls, with the tree stump
Baggy sweatsuits, mystery what's underneath them
They for my eyes only, you call me when you lonely
But I like to make the baddest girls wait, I got G baby

[Interlude: Nas and Aaliyah]
['Yah] Call you on a Monday
(Nas) I'll call you back baby
['Yah] Call you on a Tuesday
(Nas) My cell is off baby
['Yah] Call you on a Wednesday
(Nas) I'm out of town baby
['Yah] You won't be back til Thursday
(Nas) I'll page you back baby
['Yah] Call you on a Monday
(Nas) I'll call you back baby
['Yah] Call you on a Tuesday
(Nas) I'm out of town baby
['Yah] Call you on a Wednesday
(Nas) My cell is off baby
['Yah] You won't be back til Thursday
(Nas) I'll call you back baby

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Thinking of me, you getting the chills
Like a rush through your body when you think how it feels
Give me a call and my voice give you butterflies in your tummy
Tell your friends you in love with Nas, not his money
And I'll prove I'm a man of my word - handed you furs
Iceberg, everything on this planet Earth a woman desires
You make a good wife to most men
I know I got you open
But -- you just my close friend
Get it baby

[Hook]

[Bridge: Nas + (Aaliyah)]
The God, the God, the God, Nasir (you won't see me tonight)
The Queen, The Queen, The Queen, Aaliyah (you won't see me tomorrow)
Nah nah (I'll be gone by daylight)
(And you'll be so full of sorrow)
Uhh uhh (you'll go tell all your friends)
Tell your friends (how you called and I followed)
How you followed me (but you won't see me tonight)
Not tonight baby (no, you won't see me tomorrow)
C'mon, c'mon c'mon
Tomorrow, what
Daylight, ghost

[Outro: Timbaland + (Aaliyah)]
Say what, say what
Yo (You won't see me tonight)
You won't see Timbaland tonight baby
Ohhh, or Nas Esco', check it
Let it ride
Let it ride



[Produced by DJ Premier]

And as a special treat this evening
I have asked America's foremost young poet
To read his latest poem for us

{*scratching by DJ Premier: "ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"Everybody watch him"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"We-we-we came a long way"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"Everybody watch him"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"*

[Verse 1:]
Yo..
Yo.. yo..
Power and crime, the thugs slingin powder and dimes
Twenties of D, is yo' niggas wilder than mine?
My niggas bust nines, puff lye and stick up cowards
For they shine, you resist, then you push up flowers
I'm like Luca Brasi, Vito's best hit-man
That's "Godfather" shit, back seat, next lit plans
Revolvers spit, I'm too tough to bargain with
And you don't want the God to pull up the cars that's sick
Arms and wrists is lit up, Queensbridge Kings
Plaques, awards, applause when I do my thing
Streets is black as midnight, the concrete gray
With stains of blood and germ and piss all day
Come on the ave, get sized up, plus appraised
Duck and pray that my guns dont' bust your way
Niggas with names, livin off reputation
Sometimes gotta remind you ain't nothing changing

{*scratching by DJ Premier: "ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"Everybody watch him"}

[Hook x2]
If you ill come get me, cause I ain't running
If your gun's off the hook then we'll both be gunning
Come get me if you real, cause I ain't scared
It's all fair in love and war and I'm well prepared
If you ill come get me, cause I ain't running
If your gun's off the hook then we'll both be gunning
Come get me if you real, cause I ain't scared
It's all fair in love we can take it there


[Verse: 2]
You don't like me clown? Now you wanna take me down?
If I bring my face around, you gon' do what? You butt
Your crew knew I blew up, I been shinin - baseball diamonds
Dick rings for your chicklings
Niggas know what my nine pearl handle's about
Fuck you say girlie mouth? Get it krunk like the Dirty South
And I know you see me flossed out, multi-milli-i
Hear your bitch talk about me, you give her the cold eye?
Girls dig you, imagine what she feel for me?
You make hot songs, but she know you steal from me
Who ill as me? I wild on haters in album three
Next level - I take y'all niggas to 3-D
Can't find a nigga shook from Queens
I'll be with the most grimy killers
(what nigga) and they all look clean
Who put bombs underneath cars, if you want beef then start
Your next stop is to the graveyard

[Hook]

[Verse: 3]
You too feminine to kill again, jail got you soft
You talk but you scared to go back up North
Keep your face twisted, but you don't really want nothing
Talk a bunch of shit motherfucker and stop fronting
You don't wanna flip again, and sell drugs again
Be on the run again, catch you at the Comfort Inn
Shoot up your door, bust in on you and your whore
Put y'all in bags, clean the blood off of the floor
So play tough, I want y'all to get out of line
I got nines, every color shape and design
I sent killers every race to put one in your spine
Two in your ear, get your crew, who do I fear?
Nobody never get involved and none of em dyin
I think like you do, roll with about two irons
Catch me flying, high in the aircraft wining
- and dining, the rich ass, then we laugh at your bitch-ass
When they gauze up your stab wounds
While I'm gettin head, in a Lear jet, bathroom
With all my goons, all my ice, and suitcases
Full of paper, not money it's bank statements
The Illmatic that explains how we rock
Yachts and co-ops, we buy the hood and sell you a block

[Hook]

{*scratching by DJ Premier: "ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"Everybody watch him"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"We-we-we came a long way"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"
"Everybody watch him"
"ladies and gentlemen.."
"Na-Na-Na-Nastradamus"*}

{*scratching by DJ Premier: "ladies and gentlemen.."}
{*scratching by DJ Premier: "ladies and gentlemen.."}

{"Hydro Drops" weed skit follows}



[Intro: Scarface]
Yo Nas
I don't think they wanna fuck with this
Gangsta shit
Fo' sho'
Danger
Danger
Check it out

[Verse 1: Scarface]
It's on, and once again I bring niggas the rough
Fuckin with us, that get you motherfuckers touched
Hit in the darkest alleys, where the Super Sports rally
Beatin up the block, leavin these motherfuckers shot
They ain't ready for the Nakamici
I flip this shit like I'm Comaneci
Now dey a motherfuckin see me
They try to breeze me, but I got niggas in New York
Comin kama-kize, sparkin this shit that keep me off the heezee
Game over, he with my man came over
To scoop me, blowin dukey, in the black Range Rover
Nasir, tell these motherfuckers what we came for
Tell these niggas why we here

[Verse 2: Nas]
Nuttin but the New York to Texas connection
Nuttin but some real shit, what y'all expected
Spaz out, some times dreamin, think I'm awoke
Harsh realities of life, hit me after I smoke
Money satisfy half of my mood, then there's a part of me
That's distant, quiet, the most dangerous side of me
I'm twisted like, Dr. Death, Kevorkian
Flip shit, white gun handle, made of porcelain
My, Houston niggas, come through for niggas
Scarface get a call and we shootin niggas
Favor, for a favor, that's how we do business
Tryin to make future figures, we two of the illest, what?

[Hook: Nas]
You wet who I want wetted, I'll wet who you want wetted
Any nigga can get it (a favor for a favor)
I'll wet who you want wetted, you wet who I want wetted
Any nigga can get it

[Verse 3: Scarface]
You say you got a problem? Then tell a nigga where he at
So I can study his motions and peel his motherfuckin cap
Where his brother go to school at? Find out some more information
Bout that bitch and hit a nigga right back
Cause when it come down to the come down;
I'mma pull the motherfuckin plug on him
Walk up to his face and then gone
Set a example, send these hoes a little message:
They need to be more careful who they mess with, don't even stress it
Leaded, I pull these capers all the time
With the ugliest AK, I blow his motherfuckin mind
Him and whoever standin by, I'll tell these niggas, "Let's go"
And then we fin' to ride, and he fin' to die
He fin' to die, throwin up his own blood
With a slug in his motherfuckin mug
I do this outta love, cause your money ain't no good here
Just consider that as favor, until I need a favor

[Hook]

[Verse 4: Nas]
A killer code, secret untold, how we bury beef with a rose
To his wake we send a wreath that explodes
Beneath us sleep with the Reaper, they sleep eyes closed
That's how real Brad Jordan keep it, to him I owe
Five fo-fo's ready, five masks, five machetes
Attack em like Freddie, then we toastin over spaghetti
I share withcha drama, you share with mine
That's how we killin two birds at the same time
Send my enemy's ear, I'll send your enemy's finger
With a pinkie ring, that's just a present my nigga
Either way the heat is grave, fuck with 'Face we bring war
Either, you feel these bullets or the Texas chainsaw
Not for popularity reasons, but for the love of the art
And you my heart, I leave casualties bleedin
Cause we keep it death for a death, life for a life
Murder for a murder, and I got you it's vice versa

[Hook]

[Outro]
A favor for a favor
A favor for a favor
A favor for a favor



[Verse 1]
My niggas got scarred grills, skully hats and gats be fully's
Brrrat, cars peel, the East Coast cartel
Rats get their tails snapped and trapped
The snitches in the streets and the snitches who rap
Pure euphoria, a dose of death to all of ya
Coroner choruses sung from The Bridge to Astoria
Dreams of fallin' in the elevator, passin' floors
Suddenly stop, the doors open up to a brick wall
I can smell the haters, wishful thinkers, bad luck prayers
Picture your tarot cards and bodyguards getting sprayed up
Sabotagin' my makeup, my watches get laced up
Even if they indicted Jacob
Forensics, paramedics, carry cowards off
Defibrillators shock to your chest, try to cough
They die and hit Hell from an iron
I'm fly in YsL, I'm paid from this shit
Got bitches high as hell, and they fucking like AIDS don't exist
They get sent to your hotel, a maid and shit
Put a barrel in a capo mouth, 'til his scalp come out
You a kid, you don't live what you rap about
King poetic, too many haters to count
Too much paper to count, QB, bitch!

[Hook]
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
(My own strength nigga, that's what I'm scared of, ha-ha)
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength

[Verse 2]
Got seven candles lit, black wallpaper, black carpet
Thinking about which nigga to target
You kill a nigga today, he lives forever
So I plotted out smarter, there'll be no martyrs
Black TEC on the table, Mag .44
Black negligee on my bitch, she's at the door
Black fish eggs, nigga, that's the caviar
You niggas fish-made, y'all niggas is fifth grade
Niggas, it's fifty ways to disect the General
If I give ya the top five, you will not survive
Rule 1: cocksucker, keep my name from your tongue
Rule 2: thought you knew don't fuck with God's Son
Rule 3: see, matter fact, I just wait
If y'all reach top five, then I'ma eat y'all alive
Each one of you guys that claim Hip-Hop is still alive
Like y'all ain't in agreement with Nas
That shit is dead motherfucker, it's dead, bitch…

[Hook]
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
(My own strength nigga, that's what I'm scared of, ha-ha)
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength

[Verse 3]
From crack pushers to Lac' pushers and ambushers
And morticians to fortresses, case-dismisses
Laced in riches, cake ridiculous
From nickel and dimin' to trickin' them diamonds
Vegas, places in Switzerland
From non-blastin' to auto, I don't have to blast mine
They blast mine, black 9, you flatline, my cash climb
Buy rare art, antique pieces, Mona Lisa's, own no leases
Five-star restaurant eaters; don't forget who your peeps is
'Sposed to dine with you, sip that good wine with you
Only if they grind with you or slang for ya
Seen niggas live, laugh, party and die in that very same corner
Pretty girls glance at us, status unconceivable
Private planes landed out in Teterboro, weed I twirl
Once even gave me a phobia, that I be in a spot trapped like Madame Zenobia's with this kid eyein' my Rolly, y'all

[Hook]
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
(My own strength nigga, that's what I'm scared of, ha-ha)
Join me in war, many will live, many will mourn
Money Over Bullshit, pistols over brawn
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength
Afraid not of none of you cowards but of my own strength

[Outro]
There it is, QB, bitch! Yeah…
QB, bitch! Yeah, yeah… QB, bitch!



American born, American raised, American made

[Hook 2X]
My country shitted on me (My country)
She wants to get rid of me (Naw, never)
Cause the things I seen (We know too much)
Cause the things I seen (We seen too much)

[Verse 1] (Nas)
Aiyyo, it's packed on this Rikers bus
The tightest cuffs is holdin' me shackled
The life of a thug caught in the devil's lasso
On the streets I was invincible
Cowards would duck at a glimpse if they knew
What my pistol would do, a fuckin' killa
Mother's a dopefiend embarrassin' me
All in front of my friends
In the street smile with no teeth
I never knew daddy, heard he had a 72 caddy
Died in a robbery, can't remember him, was probably 3
Why didn't my folks just die in this society
Why wasn't I a child of a doctor, who left stocks for me
Two little brothers, two sisters, them shorties gots to eat
Mother's a junkie, she twisted, so all they got is me
I'm the provider, with goals to do much better than my father
Whether through drugs sold, or holdin' revolvers
Blurry visions of dad holdin' me high
It comes to me slowly, the words he would cry

Repeat Chorus

[Verse 2] (Millenium Thug)
It is I that step up
Me that don't give a fuck, you that foe, then it's all over soldier
Hummers and Range's through the desert
Fuck a 20-inch, long as we got gas and we got water
Troopers lookin' for manslaughter
I gotta get back, for what they owe
Shoot'em in the back for the get back
Lead through shit bag, hold tie gag
Forget the life had, now we all rebels
Everything burnt down includin' the ghetto
We can see 4 miles the land its major rubble
And debris from the earth as we knew crumble
Yo you could see the sea
And the stars look closer to me
I'm a mad man, this is a real life movie Mad Max
S-K's, AK's max, ABR's spittin' and it ain't a rap
My mommy dearest pray for me hopin' I come back
But yo

Repeat Chorus

[Verse 3] (Nas + Millenium Thug)
Yo, I'm sittin' behind these prison walls
I got this pen and pad wishin' on a visit, God
Brothers is here for homicide and yo, it's some for rape
Some brothers innocent, I pray that I could just escape
How is the war
And yo I'm wishin' I was in your shoes
Holdin' machine guns
Clean fun, shootin' dudes with fatigues on
Anywhere is better than this
It's America's plan every color of man inherits the shit
Yo I'm startin to think it's all a scheme, nobody cares
I know the warden is readin' the scribe
[MT] But yo I swear, it's a billion dollar business
Courts, lawyers and jails
We all slaves in the system, I'm bout to rebel

[Verse 4] (Millenium Thug)
There's not a bitch in sight
Or block bench, or black gate
Or gray fence, look who fucked it all up, Mr. President
I remember yesterday we was on the block gettin' bent
Now it's state of the art
I just saw the first dude I met here, his head came apart
What a bloody mess, a slug fest
I just buried 8 of mine, at night I hear grown men cryin'
You know I'm spittin' mine
I ain't goin' out here, we gotta win
Everytime I hear the wind I think a slug went in
I'm checkin' my chest, holdin' my head
Catchin' my breath, watchin' my back
Smokin' this grass, beatin' my dick, thinkin' of ass
I don't know what they broadcast, the newsflash is fake
Everyday I'm feelin' like you, I wanna escape
And if y'all niggas feelin' like me, y'all niggas just say

Repeat Chorus

[Nas]
This goes out to Che Guevara;
A Revolutionary destroyed by his country
Just trying to fight for what's real
This goes out to my nigga Malcolm El-Hajj Malik Shabazz
Just trying to fight for what's real
This goes out to Martin, all about peace and destroyed by his own country
This goes out to everybody in the whole world
Just trying to fight for what's real
To Patrice Lumumba;
Just trying to fight for what's real and destroyed by his own people
This goes out to my hood niggas
Coming up everyday just trying to survive the only way we know how
But see we know too much now, and we seen too much now
So ain't nothing gon' to stop us now
To my country, to my country, my country, my country...



[Produced by The Alchemist]

[Intro: Nas & (Lake)]
(Uh uh huh, lets go, yeah!)
Uh, ghetto children singing (Singing)
See they eager to learn (Uh hum)
How to become the next world leaders, Bravehearts

[Hook: Nas]
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here

[Verse 1: Nas]
Book one, strategy, tactics, techniques
Look dumb, but massively notice the weakness
In all them, gotta shoot only if necessary
Homey vest is very real if enemies carrying heavy steal
Beware the thugs who ain't scared of blood or jail time
When Aryan nations ain't having integration
We so blind, the beauty of life, was when my mom said nigga you could be Christ
I wasn't old enough to hold my dick and pee right
"Jesus", what is he like?
I picture him standing with diamonds on him
Little different from the way my mommy saw him
Practice your aiming, physical training in difficult terrain and
Test your endurance, try to keep your stamina banging
Splitting dutches up, strap up
The armies is school teaching smart ways to kill
I'm thinking Ghandi was a fool, but chronic's a fool
Got me thinking out loud, fuck it
Sleep on my drunkenness I'll blow your brains out

[Hook: Nas]
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here

[Verse 2: Lake]
My revolution is as real as Bobby Seale's
I build with dudes and cribs worth a quarter mill in dix hills
For fishscale, to cop guns, the time come
I'll mask up and get my comrade off the bus
Fuck the beef I'll snatch your seed from chuckie cheese
And feed him to the rats in the back of the P's
Black fatigues and ? on the sofa
50 inch flat screen Louie Vitton holsters
My motions don't appeal to repel at divisions
I did it strong for 7 long years in prison, fuck the system
I'm like a modern day Hitler, black gorilla, crip and blood in one nigga
Only killers know my face
I beat a case for shooting at the police
Nigga, the name Lake, though simultaneously the street revolution
21 gun salute the new Huey Newton

[Hook: Nas]
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here
Revolutionary warfare is all fair, love and war
For the cause, I gotta take you off here

[Verse 3: Nas & Lake]
Teach y'all women how to hold the family down in case something happens to his fathers
Protect the children, grab revolvers
The women plays important part of our life force
So what we fight for, my heart goes to you beautiful wife in war
Uh, And listen more talk less
Watch all and trust none, demand your respect
And be ready to die for what you believe in
And ride all the time not just when convenient
Justice and freedom, wisdom and understanding
We the lost children of Israel in this western world region
You ain't a man you a coward if you can't support the girl you put a seed in
Strong rule the weak, but the wise rule the strong
It's more to a war than just getting it on
Conceal your form, cover your tracks
Stay prepared I don't care if no one's spared

[Hook] (x2)



[Verse 1]
Amazing man, got a letter from an Asian fan
He asked, "was I black, was I gon' play Japan soon?"
Wrote back, "Yes" danced in the shower, got dressed
Old school, powdered my neck
I give, but I'm selfish
Tattoo of my chick lips on my pelvis
Well it's the pubic part, excuse me y'all
I think that I became musical
Way before rap I did wanna be the tap dance kid
On Broadway, 42nd Street, legendary
Three-card Molly, Nasir drives a Harley now
FYI, for your info
Insects splattered on the bike window
Tatted innuendo
Just last night, don't know where it came from
Guess it's from a past life
Am I charismatic enough?
Does my charm reach people that could make a change?
If I shoot with straight aim at the positive target
And swooed him to make a deposit into my account
Would that be progress?
I doubt

[Hook]
Something is fishy, something is bothering me
I just can't figure it out
Something right under my tongue, I can't speak it
Can't spell it, yo it's bugging me out
Somebody doin' something wrong to somebody I know
Somehow it's related to me and now I'm frustrated
Cause now I'm focusing too hard
On something that's just too plain to see

[Verse 2]
Savoir faire yeah radiate, conscience clear
About to have a monstrous year
Live in the spot, yeah, err night, deep ladies
Get ya harder than termite teeth
C'est la vie, I'm engaged
But the crew came to play, they fly free, check me
And they wrist is froze, like toes on a body in the morgue
That was put there by the squad
Look here, I'm the god on the mic on the track
Like Arthur Ashe with a tennis rack, tell the DJ to spin it back
Yeah, somethin' like that
Uh, it go
Savoir-faire yeah, radiate, conscience clear
About to have a monstrous year
Live in the spot, yeah, err night, deep ladies
Get ya harder than termite teeth
C'est la vie, I'm engaged
But the crew came to play, they fly free, check me
And they wrist is froze, like toes on a body in the morgue
That was put there by the squad
Look here, I'm the god on the mic on the track
Like Arthur Ash with a tennis rack, tell the, nah
Everything I be in
Creme de la creme from the linen to the gold front rim
Cold stuntin'
Take a look around, what you found?
Like Master Ace, tell me the world's a bastard place
High school students will slash your face
And these white nigga hoods, I'm talkin'
Computer rage is real
Get excited when I'm walkin'
Cause I'm used to dark shades and a limousine tint
Business managers scare me half to death
When they tell me every month what is ? being spent

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I don't like when my girl try to pull a MC Lyte
Jumped out the whip, through the train
Leave me like D Nice
They say we used to resemble each other
Both last name Jones so we must be brothers
My yearly salary suffers
Cause I hate work, no play make Jack lame
And I rock parts on my head that are hotter than yours
Hot rosado lines, designs your barber can't draw
Posters of Nas on the barbershop doors
Entourage, security galore
When was the last time you rode by yourself, superstar?
Got so much love I shot Cupid in the heart
I'm awakened by my own screams
Lucifer masturbated in my dreams
It means somebody is gonna get fucked in the worst way
And none of y'all hoes touchin' my wordplay
Janitors and men with eighty mil both feel the same grief
The men at work, blue collars of the old men
Shinin' shoes, shoe polish go through the same dramas
They wish for a better tomorrow
I thought only five percenters are conspiracy theorists
Thinkin' what the new world order thing is
But everybody does
The fear of the planet is contaminatin everybody's blood
Triliteral, Democratic parties
Anglo-American military alliance
Study at Oxford, scholars, they watchin'
NASDAQ, Dow Jones, got the world stocks in a shamble
Procter and Gamble
Toxins demand you understand who plans to jam you
Some random thoughts by the candlelight in Paris
As I struggle to be savvy

[Hook]



[Nas Talking - Intro]
Here we are
Here we are
Yeah
This one right here is for the people

[Hook] (Sample -MAMADOU & MARIAM, "SABALI")
Sabali, Sabali, Sabali, yonkontê
Sabali, Sabali, Sabali, kiye
Ni kêra môgô
Sabali, Sabali, Sabali, yonkontê
Sabali, Sabali, Sabali, kagni
Ni kêra môgô

[Nas Talking]
Ay yo D. Lets go all the way on this one

[Damian Marley - Verse 1]
Some of the smartest dummies
Can't read the language of Egyptian Mummies
An' a fly go a Moon
And can't find food for the starving tummies
Pay no mind to the Youths
Cause it's not like the future depends on it
But save the Animals in the Zoo
Cause the Chimpanzee dem a make big money
This is how the media pillages
On the TV the picture is
Savages in villages
And the scientist still can't explain the pyramids (huh)
Evangelists making a living on the videos of ribs of the little kids
Stereotyping the image of the images
And this is what the image is...
You buy a khaki pants
And all of a sudden you say a Indiana Jones
An' a thief out gold and thief out the scrolls and even the buried bones
Some of the worst paparazzis I've ever seen and I ever known
Put the worst on display so the world can see
And that's all they will ever show
So the ones in the West
Will never move east
And feel like they could be at home
Dem get tricked by the beast
But a where dem ago flee when the monster is fully-grown?
Solomonic linage whe dem still can't defeat and them coulda never clone
My spiritual DNA that print in my sould and I will forever OWN (Lord)

[Hook]
[Nas talking]
Yeah, Sabali. Thats patience. That's what the old folks told me…
Discovering the World before this World. A World buried in time
Uncover with rhymes. It gets no realer

[Damian Marley: Verse 2]
(Huh) Are we born not knowing, are we born knowing all?
Are we growing wiser, are we just growing tall?
Can you read thoughts? Can you read palms?
Can you predict the future? Can you see storms... coming?
The Earth was flat if you went too far you would fall off
Now the Earth is round if the shape change again everybody woulda start laugh
The average man can't prove of most of the things that he chooses to speak of
And still won't research and find out the root of the truth that you seek of
Scholars teach in Universities and claim that they're smart and cunning
Tell them find a cure when we sneeze and that's when their nose start running
And the rich get stitched up, when we get cut
Man a heal dem broken bones in the bush with the wed mud
Can you read Signs? Can you read Stars?
Can you make peace? Can you fight war?
Can you milk cows, even though you drive cars? (Huh)
Can you survive, AGAINST ALL ODDS...Now?

[Hook]

[Nas]
It's crazy when you feed people the truth you don't know how they're gonna react. You're scared of wrong doers, people that just ignorant, You're scared of the truth, be patient for now

[Nas: Verse 3]

Who wrote the Bible? Who wrote the Quran?
And was it a lightning storm
That gave birth to the earth
And then dinosaurs were born?
Who made up words? Who made up Numbers?
And what kind of spell is mankind under?
Everything on the planet we preserve and can it
Microwave it and try it
No matter what we'll survive it
What's Hue? What's Man? What's Human?
Anything along the land we consumin'
Eatin', deletin'... ruin
Trying to get paper
Gotta have land, gotta have acres
So I can sit back like Jack Nicholson
Watch niggaz play the game like the Lakers
In a world full of fifty-two fakers
Gypsies, seances, mystical prayers...
You superstitious? Throw salt over your shoulders
Make a wish for the day 'Cuz
Like somebody got a doll of me
Stickin' needles in my arteries
But I can't feel it
Sometimes it's like "pardon me, but I got a real big spirit"
I'm fearless... I'm fearless
Don't you try and grab hold of my soul
It's like a military soldier since seven years old
I held real dead bodies in my arms
Felt their body turn cold (Oh)
Why we born in the first place...
If this is how we gotta go?
Damn

This goes to all the wisdom and knowledge seekers of the World. Sabali, Patience, yeah



[Produced by Kanye West & Mad Rapper]

[Intro]
To My nigga
Who brought me in this world
Ha, that's right nigga

[Verse 1]
My old dad important to the family structure
A provider A God
My moms a queen, that universal team civalized us
My pops maybe was late but always came home
My moms would put us to bed and she would wait on
Soon as he walk in the door she barking
I turned down the Johnny Carson
Jumped out the bed
We grabbed both his legs
Me and my brother
Not knowing the pain he gave my mother
Night after night, fighting yelling at each other
My papa played the street all day
Mama was either home, at work, while we played inside the hall way
She sacrifices all she got to feed us
When she was alone she cried by the phone peeping out the window heated
But still I didn't see it
Mama hid it from us
We was kids younger
Till we got bigger, on to
Bigger things that we knew what the time was
That daddy was leaving his crib and mom's love

[Hook] (x2)
Papa was player, player wasn't papa
Papa loved the ladies
Never got enough of
Pretty brown round
Running round town (Shhhhh)
Don't tell your mother what's going down

[Verse 2]
So many kids I knew, never knew who Pap was
That's why I show my pop love
He was still around when I popped up
He could have left
My moms pregnant shook to death but stayed
Watch me crawl till I took my first step, to the first grade
To my first fist fight
Right behind me he would stand
No matter how big or tall he made me fight you like a man
Throw dirt in your eye, swing my right scoop your ass and slam
He watched me so I wouldn't get jumped by shorty's fam
Roaches and weed all over my crib, him and mom's relaxing
Next thing you know he packing, so then I asked him
What's this white shit on that plate and your facing?
Papa why you butt ass from the waist
And who's this lady I'm facing
Dark skin you're not my mommy
He grabbed me up to run some smooth words by me
Promise things that he would buy me
If I kept my mouth closed and don't tell mommy
He said one day I'll understand little me
What's in you is inside me

[Hook] (x2)
Papa was player, player wasn't papa
Papa loved the ladies
Never got enough of
Pretty brown round
Running round town (Shhhhh)
Don't tell your mother what's going down

[Verse 3]
Pop's told me hold my own
Pop's told me value home
Could I help it papa was a rolling stone
Who loved the pretty brown round
Out of town bound
Trumpet in his jazz band, he touring
At home I play his latest recordings
And it's strange now how, I do my thing now
I'm in the game now
Inherited his brainpower
To pull strings and gain power
From weed habits are same now
No white lines to trumpets to tight rhymes
And beats that be pumping
Before he left he taught me something
A child's young years the most important time to be there
That's why he stayed 'til we grew up, respect is still here
I'm older now see what having a father's about
One day they can be in your life, next day they be out
It's not because of you, you know the deal
Him and your moms feel
If they stay together then someone will get killed
I love you still, always will
Cause that's my nigga
Although you felt you was wrong
I still feel you kid
Life goes on



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Intro: Jadakiss]
I need it from the top, ah!
This is history baby
Commissioner Steve Stoute, Lenny - ha!
God's Son, whattup?
D-Block, whattup?
Bravehearts, whattup?

[Verse 1: Jadakiss]
Yo ain't nothing but trouble God
When I kick in the door with D-Block, Bravehearts and the Double R
Don't make me let the machine off
This is methadone music that you can lean off
"Made You Look," the remix with me up on it
I copped your shit, now I break weed up on it
And everything is real I see
Like my niggas that been home but they only got a jail ID
I helped the game, it ain't help me
I'm top five dead or alive and that's just off one LP
And, I still buzz, they feel cuz
Cause they know the flow's Ill just like Will was
I'm just tryin to make sure that my sons wealthy
Out of shape but I make sure that my guns healthy
I'm a ape, you can't stand 'Kiss
Comin through the hood in a Aston Vanquish the color of dandruff
They said we jumped him, I just let the gun snuff him
Copped P then turboed soon as they uncuff him
This goes out to all of your mans
Why put you in the verse when I can put in a coroner van
D-Block

[Hook - Nas]
They shooting! Ah, made you look
You a slave to a page in my rhyme book
Gettin big money, playboy your time's up
Where them gangsters? Where them dimes at?

[Verse 2: Ludacris]
I'm from the school of hard knocks, sneak peeks and low blows
Where X's mark spots and kitchens mark O's
Where love is gon' getcha and hate is gon' snitch ya
And fingers squeeze triggers like boa constrictors
It's the, Mr. Luda, Jada and Nas
And our bullets give you a deep tissue massage
So hear a song and dance while I make these ends
You never stood half a chance like Siamese Twins
Ah, they shooting, look in the barrel
Then he made the front page of the Miami Herald
Or Chi. Tribune, nozzles with silent doom
We in that A-Town Journal as violent goons
You should print my information, quote my rhyme
And keep me in between these New York and L.A. Times
I was the victim of society, it's 'Cris the menace
With mo' shit out on the streets than evicted tenants

[Verse 3: Nas]
Yo, I grasp the ratchet, the blinker, the biscuit, the burner
The heat, the toaster, the twister you meetin your owner
The banger, the hammer, the flamers I aim at the cannons
And can ya, manhandlin ya, you'll be famous I'll cancel you
And cut, that's the end of your movie
Pretendin you actin like you and your mens'll come shoot me
My tennis shoes Gucci, old school pea soup green
Jean Lee suit on, Veuve Clicquot champagne
Friday the 13th my CD drop, I rhyme to more Base than EZ Rock
I'm Jason, call up P.D. watch
Them Bravehearts, Jungle and Wiz and Nashawn
Ill Will rasta Lake, never revealin his face on
TV or pictures or even them niggas
Sorry that I made you wait long, glad them fakes gone

We shooting! Squeezing them triggers with Luda beside me
Me and 'Kiss get Luniz of weed, set to Styles P
Tell him hold his head, God's Son got him we made y'all look
From San Quentin to Rikers Island to



[Hook 1 STEPHEN MARLEY]
JAH TOLD YOU
IN HIS OWN WORDS
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
TO GUIDE YOU
THROUGH THIS COLD WORLD
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
JAH TOLD YOU
IN HIS OWN WORDS
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
TO GUIDE YOU
THROUGH THIS COLD WORLD
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"

[VERSE 1 NAS]
Two steps away from death
A vest and a holster
I detest detectives arresting us over
Weapons possession
They was checking the Rover
Inspecting the Tattoos
On my neck and my shoulder
How many times I'm one of six
Coffin holders
Or I'm
Sitting with goons in the visiting rooms
Flip it I could have been you
Behind state walls biddin'
These are the things that a G pray for
Acquit us
A little stash in the safe or
Little Shorty to wait for him
Or a Shorty to take the weight for him
What really did I escape from?
Thought I saw Gods face
On the design in my vintage Claiborne
Swear I see Him every day ya'll
In a bus or the train or
The billboards out there that hang tall
I still give thanks for Him
Have faith for Him
No matter what His name's called
Seen!

[Hook 2 STEPHEN MARLEY]
JAH TOLD YOU
IN HIS OWN WORDS
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
TO GUIDE YOU
THROUGH THIS COLD WORLD
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"

[VERSE 2 JR. GONG]
Can you think of a color that you never seen?
Can you reminisce on places you never been?
Well is many are called
But them never deemed
Worthy for the cause
Cause them never clean
Help who help themselves
Jah nuh raffle dream
That's why me chummy with Jah Jah
Like a Cherubim
Keep we strong through the winter
Like an Evergreen
And all of us are more connected
Than it ever seemed
All things are related
And creation is a package
Generate together
And we increase the wattage
A how them a go manage?
Tell Babylon them can't do Rasta damage
Nor stop we through the passage
Jah did make a promise
God is always honest
Always keeps his word
Yow nuh care what the plan is
Don't be astonished
Stumbling blocks vanish
One day the meek gonna live inna di palace, Woah!

[Hook x2 STEPHEN MARLEY]
JAH TOLD YOU
IN HIS OWN WORDS
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
TO GUIDE YOU
THROUGH THIS COLD WORLD
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"

[VERSE 3 NAS]
Some ask me if I feel
That Zion is surreal
And in my songs
Do I plan to expose and reveal
Word to the curb
That's under these chrome wheels
My homies is the only ones I'm taking care of
But severe reality starts to become more clear
And these know-it-all rappers
Have become more weird
As if they were superior
And fans are inferior
How I balance between the streets and the theories of
Collegiate literature
I hold mirrors up
Give combinations of pain, joy, fear and love
Through my perspective
I can see Jah reflection
In the highest definition
Getting high with my bredrin
Then I ask him why is Africans dying from circumcision
They lack proper surgeons and suffer malnutrition
Underestimate the wealth of their own wisdom
Its like its been exchanged for this penicillin
Seen

[Hook 4 x2 STEPHEN MARLEY]
JAH TOLD YOU
IN HIS OWN WORDS
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"
TO GUIDE YOU
THROUGH THIS COLD WORLD
"AND I'LL SEE YOU THROUGH"



[Verse 1: Nas]
I walk the blocks like whatever god, my message to y'all feds
Who desperate to arrest us young, benevolent hardheads
Abercrombie & Fitch rockin', wrist glistenin' marksman
Hitchcock of Hip-Hop since Big Pop departed
The project logic is still salute the dead, Glocks spit
Pour some juice out for those in Manchester, Beaumount
Otisville, Lewisberg, Fort Dix, Fort Worth, Oakdale
Every fed jail where all my dawgs lurk
War hurts much to gain 'til the day we all say
May your pain be champagne then we all blaze away
At our enemies, may they die easily
Long as they perish forever's what freedom means to me
Blowin' greenery, growing eager to see evil things
Thrown away, zonin' grey, GT, Diesel jeans
Airs and Chucks, solitaires, stones with the rarest cuts
On some Pretty Tone shit, haircut looks airbrushed
And they're aware of us though
And we don't give a flyin' 747 fuck though
Stayin' on my hus-tle
*beat change*

[Verse 2: Nas]
A message to those who trapped us up, from federal guys who backed them up
We never will die, we black and tough, lead in your eye, we strapped to bust
Half of us been locked up inside the beast, look at the time we see
Brooklyn to Compton streets, Queens, even the Congo needs dreams
Our bullets and triggers our enemies pullin' on innocent women and children
It wasn't no ghetto killers who mixed up the coke and put guns in our buildings
But I'm not gon' cry, and I'm not gon' just stand and watch you die
I'mma pass you a .9, I'mma grab your hand -- come on let's ride
A message to those who killed the king, who murdered the Christ
The same regime, what God has built you never can break
What God has loved you never can hate, man makes rules and laws
You just a ruthless dog, your kennel is waiting
You devils will run back into the caves you came from
Whenever that day comes, forty-acres, plantations, see every race won
Sincerely yours, Street's Disciple, revelations



[Intro]
Yeah, check check, testing
It's clear out there, yeah
It's like I'm hang glidin' over the hood, ha
Never worry (ohhh, no, no, no)

[Verse 1]
Check, let there be light
No gang bangin' in New York tonight
Just murals of Biggie Smalls, bigger than life
Turn up the kid mic ‘cause ya'll ain't listenin' right
What's all this talk that Nas got bought?
I'd rather outline my body in white chalk
Ain't nobody been where I been, they at a stand still
This is all overseen by my man Will

[Hook: Tre Williams]
As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I know that I ain't got much time left
And they don't really wanna see the good in me
Ain't satisfied until they see the fool in me
And I know my business, so my sins great
And I thank the hood for all the love they gave
And I forgive 'em all, they did they best to hate
Oh, let there be light!

[Verse 2]
This ain't to glorify, just painting a street picture
There's no guidance or Bibles, just blunts and swishers
Gillettes cut 'caine in kitchen
Now every rapper wanna claim he hang with Kenneth "Supreme" McGriff, and
It's like the same difference except when niggas get arraigned
They don't want the same sentence, niggas get to snitchin
If I could reverse demises and turn falls to rises
And bring back the niggas who was livest
Old hustlers, reminiscing on better days
They home, doing nothing, might as well be in a cage
Hating on young brothers, one foot in the grave
They used to love us
Till we found our own way through the maze
New York, set trippin' and flaggin'
Got the West Coast laughin'
Now Esco's askin', "What happened?"
My homegirl from upper Manhattan; she remembers the quarters that's Latin, a lot of rat-a-tat-tattin'

[Hook: Tre Williams]
As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I know that I ain't got much time left
And they don't really wanna see the good in me
Ain't satisfied until they see the fool in me
And I know my business, so my sins great
And I thank the hood for all the love they gave
And I forgive 'em all, they did they best to hate
Oh, let there be light!

[Verse 3]
The son of the audio cassette era, TEC wearer
Bullets and baguettes, Benz Bose Speaker Terror
Deman I get mine till I'm dead, so I can drive somethin' red
Like that horse standing on it's hind legs
Since Arnold and Willis in they bunk beds
I wanted bread like Wonder
Not Ned the Wino like the parents of Lionel
Nas is the Ghetto American Idol
No matter what you do you're never getting my title
I can't sound smart, ‘cause y'all will run away
They say I ain't hungry no more and I don't talk about yay
Like there's no other way for a ex-hustler
Cake getter, the ex-wig splitter to touch you, I beg to differ
When you're four years into the game
We can have a conversation
Eight years in the game, I invite you on vacation
Ten years in the game, after I've enjoyed my fame
Only then I let you pick my brain, niggas

[Bridge: Nas + (Tre Williams)]
[And I] Right about now [And I] (They don't really know)
[And I] (They don't really see)
I don't even deal with all that garbage
(No, no, no) We getting real right, you know?
[And I] (Though I walk through the valley)
That is Tre Williams, ladies and gentlemen
[And I] (They should fear no) [And I] (no, no-oh)
Focus on good things, man, good times, heh-heh, alright

[Hook: Tre Williams]
As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I know that I ain't got much time left
And they don't really wanna see the good in me
Ain't satisfied until they see the fool in me
And I know my business, so my sins great
And I thank the hood for all the love they gave
And I forgive 'em all, they did they best to hate
Oh, let there be light!
As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I know that I ain't got much time left
And they don't really wanna see the good in me
Ain't satisfied until they see the fool in me
And I know my business, so my sins great
And I thank the hood for all the love they gave
And I forgive 'em all, they did they best to hate
Oh, let there be light!

Oh let it be, let it be, yeah
Let it be, let it be



[Produced by L.E.S]

[Hook - Nas + Nashawn]
These are last words of a hanging slave
How could I forget this
I rob you put you on my hit list
Under my nails are dirty look at the grime
My burnt lips from the roach clips
How can I shine
Being broke and bag a dope bitch
Powerful mind we brave men
I blow smoke and I'mma keep sayin

[Verse 1:Nashawn]
I wanna be more than that bullet that go through ya zone
Wanna be the lead that tear through ya skin and crack bones
Wanna be the heat you feel makin ya moan
Wanna be the hospital bed that you lay on
Wanna be the god you feel when you pray-on
It's Nashawn the type that get the hyper calm
I'm gonna kill something
Rap cats be real frontin
Fuck shootin legs
Cock back put his brains on the pave
Nigga how bout that
Close range with the gauge get payed
First rapper to shoot off stage
Turn the front page the next day my life is like a book
A twenty four hour song without no hook
Millennium Thug computer chips up in my slug
Turn corners when you turn corners, know who to plug
Thugs around me outside its grimmy outside
Better slide before you get bodied outside

(Chorus)

[Verse 2: Nas]
I'ma prison cell six by nine
Livin hell stone wall metal bars for the gods in jail
My nickname the can, the slammer, the big house
I'm the place many fear cause there's no way out
I take the sun away put misery instead
When you wit me most folks consider you dead
I saw too many inmates fallin apart
Call for the guards to let them out at night when it's dark
Convicts think they alone but if they listen close
They can hear me groan touch the wall feel my pulse
All the pictures you put up is stuck to my skin
I hear ya prayers (even when ya whisperin)
I make it hotter in the summer colder in the winter
If the court parole ya then another con enters
No remorse for your tears I seen em too often
When you cry I make you feel alive inside a coffin
Watch you when you eat play with you mind when you sleep
Make you dream that you free then make you wake up to me
Face to face with a cage no matter your age
I can shatter you turn you into a savage in rage
Change ya life that's if you get a chance to get out
Cause only you and I know what sufferings about
Yo it's stunning when bed sheets become your woman
And I'm the one that gotcha weapons when the beef is coming
Maybe one day I'll open up my arms to release you
You'll always be my property nigga stay legal

(Chorus)



Nas: "This ain't for everybody. Y'all know who y'all are
Yeah you, y'all know who y'all are. These are our
Heroes."

[Hook: Nas]
Let's hear it, one for the coons on UPN 9 and WB
Who 'Yes Massa' on TV, what ever happened to Wheezy? The Red Fox's?
Never got Emmy's but were real to me
Let's hear it, two for the spooks who do cartwheels
Cause they said they played they parts well
Now they claim caviar, hate that oxtail
Lambda Sigma Phi badge on lapel
Whitey always tell him, "Ooh, he speak so well"
Are you the one we look to, the decent Negro?
The acceptable Negro -- hell nah
But they say, "These are our heroes"

[Verse 1: Nas]
Uh, Massa used to breed us to be bigger to go play
Athletes of today in the NBA, make me proud
But there's somethin' they don't say
Keep gettin' accused for abusin' White pussay
From OJ to Kobe, uh let's call him Tobe
First he played his life cool just like Michael
Now he rock ice too just like I do
Yo, you can't do better than that?
The hotel clerk who adjusts the bathroom mat?
Now you lose sponsorships that you thought had your back
Yeah, you beat the rap jiggaboo, fake nigga you
You turn around then you shit on Shaq
Who woulda knew, Mr. Goodie-Two-Shoes
He love a little butt crack, got enough cash
Little kids with they bus pass who look up to you
To do something for the youth, stupid spoof
But you let them use you as an example
They would rep, but our heroes got they hands full

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
You Homey The Clown, bowtie, apple pie, Bo Jangles
But we love Bo Jangles, we know what he came through
But what's your excuse, duke? You talk Black
But your album sound like you give your nuts for a plaque
You don't ride for the facts like um, say Scarface
You don't know what you feel, y'all too safe
Election done came and went, y'all worked so hard for it
Huh, and in the end we all got dicked
These are our heroes, thanks a lot public school systems still rot
Still harassed by cops, snitches on blocks
Sellin they peoples out - some real folks with clout
Tavis Smiley , Michael Eric Dyson
Stokely Carmichael, let's try to be like them
Nicky Giovanni poetical black female
Jim Brown to the people who sing well from
Fela to Miriam Makeba
The mirror says you are the next American leader
So don't be, acceptin new 'We are the World' records
These pickaninnies get with anything to sell records
Cause it's trendy to be the conscious MC
But next year, who knows what we'll see?
Ha-Ha, these are our heroes

[Hook]

Nas: "Yeah, I wanna give a special shoutout to the -- y'know
The crew doin' they thing out there reppin' us hard
Big up to Tiger Woods . Yeah, ya don't stop. Big up
To Cuba Gooding Jr . Y'know, yeah, y'know. Tay Diggs
What up my nigga. Yeah, ha-ha. And you don't quit
And ya don't quit, and ya don't stop and ya don't quit."

Male Heckler: "Yeah-Yeah, what you doin' for the hood though
Homie? What you doin' for the hood, man? Look at
All that paper. Drivin' around like a playboy in
My hood. What type of shit is that?"

*overlapping dialogue*

Nas: "I'm outta here. Please, excuse me, 'xcuse me -- please
Let me get to my limousine, I'm outta here. I know, I
Got a plane to catch. And I love you back. Ha-Ha
Yeah yeah -- And I'm outta here. A-ha-ha -- PEACE."

Thug Heckler: "Come on nigga, give back to the hood. Cocky
Motherfucker!"



[Verse 1]
The phone rings
Another peaceful moment is lost
Latifah's chest jingle in "Set It Off"
I press pause in the bed as a king
I let it ring 4 or 5 times
Answer while I'm puffin' my green
It's Tamika sayin', "Hi Nas"
I caught a flashback of her askin' me was I asthmatic 'fore I tapped that
She offered me dinner under the moon
I said, "Sorry. I made plans at Ray's Boom-Boom Room"
Nine push-ups... Strength's gone at the tenth one so why hook up
The pimp's gone off the Patron Tequila
Put on my Lee's and the original Fila's
Sedated from L's, 380 cocked, naked ladies laid up in tails
Like Whodini I chose, gazelles don't lean on my nose
Drivin' by the clubs gleamin' and go
Heads turn it's a freak show
I need them to know... When will they learn
Nas need a queen not a ho to...
Point out my enemies, a girl who's into me
But not a hype chick- someone with proper energy
Someone who's into me but won't fuck with my enemies
And you can sing along 'cuz I'm feelin' ya energy

[Hook: Claudette Ortiz]
Hey Nas... How ya doin'?
Take my name... And my number
Meanwhile... We'll be groovin'
But let's take... it... slow

[Verse 2]
One for the honeys who roll blunts up but don't smoke
Two for the few who see potential in you when you broke
Three for the G they got, they game is hot I give it to you
Double life wife- play with the man that's livin' with you
Here's the issue... A woman gotta be stunnin'
Get to a man's heart through his stomach
You gotta be skilled in the culinary arts
Know a brother stay mad hungry when he spark
Hit the museum, maybe Central Park, you mentally smart
Picture we in Tiffany, you becomin' my counterpart
If I want Chinese then you buy me a wok
If you want barbeque I call Professor and Ak
'Cuz u... point out my enemies, someone who's into me
But not a hyper chick- someone with the proper energy
A girl that's into me who won't fuck all my enemies
And you could be the one 'cuz I'm lovin' ya energy

[Hook: Kelis]
Hey Nas... How ya doin'?
Take my name... And my number
Meanwhile... We'll be groovin'
But let's take... it... slow

[Verse 3]
Slow is the way
Holdin' hands, tongue and hickeys
Hope and I pray where I run at you run away with me
That's if my gun get busy we gotta get outta there
Hear sirens jump in the stick drop a Sedan and hide for years
Like no one else in the world did this except for us two
You gotta trust me, I gotta trust you
If coppers bust me it's me you rescue, this to the death boo
You rep me respectfully that's how I rep for you
Retired from pimpin', perspire is drenchin'
As we... suck and fuck each other's minds out commission
Time's out forbidden
Until we pass out, that's when we stop
We give it all we got, give it all we got- we hot
Give it all we got, give it all we got- we rock
Give it all we got, give it all we got
You 'bout the baddest thing
Since Michael had Billy Jean
And Prince gave you diamond's and pearls
But to be my queen you must...
Point out my enemies, a girl who's into me
But not a hype chick- someone with proper energy
Someone who's into me who won't fuck all my enemies
And you can be the one 'cuz I'm feelin' ya energy

[Hook: Claudette & Kelis]
Hey Nas... How ya doin'?
Take my name... And my number
Meanwhile... We'll be groovin'
But let's take... it... slow

(Claudette) (2x)
I can be... What you said
That you need... I can be...All that
I can be... I can have your back... baby



[Nas]
Yo ill will, ruff ryders
What what, sraight like that

[Verse 1]
You a killer or a hustler, dealer or customer
Gangsta or buster, youngster or old nigga
A weed head, a coke sniffer
You rich or a broke nigga
Know you all relate to this shit that I wrote niggas
Lots of my mans trapped up in a max
Penitentiary, sending me letters I answer back
That eventually, we all be bentley'ed out
Throwing campaigns, fuck it I'm running for White House
My niggas control Senate, pipe seats jeeps tinted
Mad Lewinsky chicks, some kinky shit
Did dirt now I knew it would come back one day
So I'm on point, scrap, prepare for gunplay
Stared at one face, thought it was beef he looked familiar
Ready to blast, nigga gave me daps said I feel ya
Can't believe how my life changed
From the hood, the first time in my life I can say I did the right thing

[Hook x4]
Life is what you make it nigga, I'mma make it
No matter what it takes my nigga, we gonna take it(uh)

[Verse 2: DMX]
Uh, uh, uh, uh, uh
Everyday shit, around the way shit got me stressed (what)
So I keep on the vest in case a nigga wanna test (uh)
I got no time for games cause I'm all grown up
You wanna joke nigga? laugh when you get blown up (come on)
See how funny it is when your kids ain't got no father
Cause you played it sweet now you floating in the harbor (for real)
Shit is hectic so respect it for your health (what)
Didn't think it was right, you should've checked it yourself (come on)
Life is too short to get caught up in some dumb shit
Wake up one day, 40 years old on some bumb shit
Time flew by, you was too fly to see the light
Everyday it's getting darker then comes the night
Now what? (what) realize that you ain't got shit (uh)
Not long ago you was the man on some hot shit
So just peep the flow yo, cause you already in this
Make sure your shit is right kid and handle your business (uh huh)

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
Make history before you go
Fuck the misery, you livin' po' we gettin doe
Except the dollars other reasons why I'm living yo (why?)
Time is valuable
Low and behold the young, black, and powerful
Got to eat yo, everyday my daughter feet grow
You wack and cheap with the doe, my heat could blow
Payin' doctors when I'm born, a preacher if I'm buried
That's why cash is needed for my kids to inherit
Gotta pay just for living, tax life is a b'ness (business)
If you catch a bad deal, watch your life diminish
Deals made by God and the Devil, and we in it
Pawns in the game, can't complain or say shit
Just strap up and hold on, hope for the best
Prepare for the worst, no fears no nothing on earth
No tears if I'm dumped in a hearse, I won't be the first
Nor the last nigga, let's get this cash nigga

[Hook]



[Intro]
Uhh.. regulate nigga
Bravehearts nigga
Live for this
Some of y'all don't live at all
Get yours nigga
Get yours baby
Uhh, yo.. yo..

[Verse 1]
As the night close down on the Earth like gray dark rings
Light of cities in the nights, destination for Kings
With big dreams, like Castro, overthrew Bautista
From Cuba, and pointed nukes toward the U.S
About to shoot us for revolution; that's how you gotta move
A lot of rules, some locked in solitude
Curse the day of they birth confused, who's to be praised?
The mighty dollar -- or almighty Allah
I'm like the farmer, plantin' words, people are seeds
My truth is the soil; help you grow like trees
May the children come in all colors, change like leaves
But hold before you, one of those, prophetic MC's
With blunted flows, seven hundred souls in me
Each channelin', from past to present times, heaven shines
Light on those, innocent to how the world grows
Some men become murderers, and some girls become hoes
And you accounted for, everything that you heard
Do not speak to fools; they scorn the wisdom of your words
My heart is wise, bloodshot eyes, the saga never dies
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners..

[Verse 2]
Yo we gotta be God's children, habitats in tall buildings
Rats crawl in filthy hallways, incinerators
Sinners who faithless, still there's hope, pray it's answered
Dreams turned real - what's a wicked nation?
One with blind men - not takin charge of the situation
Empty arguments and real conversations needed
The world'll need it, to hear it
Evil tries to weaken my spirit - it's chronic herb
This hurt come from the honest word
I now try hardest to serve my maker, what I learned
Find it's way on the paper, so I could dictate it
Articulate it, luckily - I was put on one of the ships that made it
Through strong currents and winds that left the others stranded
To sink in the Atlantic
Satan jigs the planet, not to get too religious, but
Who decides when and if your life is finished?
If Christ is in this, for the sake of your name, oh Lord
May we break away from the chains abroad

[Hook]
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners.. get up, wake up, rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners rise rise rise
Ghetto prisoners..

[Verse 3]
You wanna buy time? I'm the seller of minutes
I give you every second low-priced, if I so lies; the truth is
Time waits for none of you, in fact
He can't wait for the date to snatch the ground right from under you
Small visions of better life if cheddar was right
Lurk in the mind, of young ones ahead of they time
Trapped in the slums, beggin for nuttin but takin
Headed for nuttin but the state pen, where they cousins be waitin
Judges is not relatin to pleas, guns bustin where the kids play
Richochet off lamp poles and leave damp holes
In bystanders, get cancelled, D.O.A
Around the way where we from
Hope the future reduce the rate of those buried young
Life is every man's kingdom, a dyin man's past
And a newborn's, first time to be here at last
And shouldn't have to grow up fast, and suffer our pain
Hustlin harder than the generations here before he came
Goin through the same bullshit as our fathers
Readin history, but who's the authors?
For some the game is easy, for most of us the game is much harder
But never lose faith; through the years just get smarter
Ghetto prisoners.. ghetto prisoners..

[Hook]



[Intro: Erykah Badu]
This bitter land
Watered with my soul
The fruit it bears
Leaves me so cold
This bitter land
Does nothing for love
This bitter land
Brings pain from above, oh-oh

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, running on the concrete across the train tracks
The devil is behind me
In the ghetto where's you'll find me, it's where I stays at
Cop shot us up, he get a medal then retire
But it never will define me
Write a letter to the president, whoever in control of the society
Tell 'em stop riding me, stop driving us into a suicidal ideology
Tryna feed my seeds
Getting high on weed, study my degrees
Stay fly, getting paper
With some dead white people faces in the circle of spaces around the green
I'ma lean, taking Percs It’s a bitter Earth
Is a nigga cursed? Am I blessed? See what I mean
It's a test, life is a test
Life is like a hood, hard
Trying not to fall between the cracks
In the cracks it's so dark, and the dark
Seems more appealing than the light in the land
Where you gotta fight
Catch a body in the night, we need a plan
To survive, to survive the land
Survive the storm, when it comes through
Either you're busy living or busy dying, look what it's come to
Look what it's come to, so what you're gonna do?

[Verse 2: Erykah Badu]
This bitter land is far too real
This bitter land, it does not heal
Cause in the land skies are grey
But we fight the storms that come our way
A boy who strives to be a man
Must push to lead with all he can
Oh, this bitter land
Oh, bitter land
Oh, oh, oh, oooh
This bitter land can't stop my fight
This bitter land

[Outro: Nas (Erykah Badu)]
Look what it's come to
So what you gonna do?
What you gonna do?
(My land)



[Hook]
(You're a big girl now)
Fully grown with your hormones now
Got your own home and you alone
Wanna bone, wanna moan, get your back blown out
(No more daddy's little girl)
You a big girl now, in a world, where these niggas are foul
You could be aborting the next Michael Jordan
Your man don't wanna be around
(You're a big girl now)
She's sexy, she got it, she ride it
Every nigga wanna be inside it
(No more daddy's little girl)
I need her, I'll eat her
Do anything to please her
My ghetto queen of Sheba

[Verse 1]
I'm the type that'll get you by the fireplace
Get you hype when I lick it, put it by your face
Sipping red wine, is it bedtime
You can kick it with your nigga while we listen to Faith
I'm feeling richer today,I can hit it then stay
Lingerie make me take it to the kitchen and play
We got champagne, whipped cream, I'mma grab a bucket of ice
Bubble bath running, and the candlelight feeling so right
It's your night, no stress, no fight
Mad at your ex, cause his dough tight
Never go right when you're with him
Try your best to forget him
Cause it's easy to please me
CD skip when your head board hit the wall
Call for the lord
Right when you cum, I'm biting your tongue
Make your legs cramp up, you can't stand up
You can hit a blunt if you want
I'mma pull my pants up
We can discuss a weekend of lust on top of the trust
Tell me what's the reason for us
To love or to fuck
I'm the thug that you want
If it's gangster we can't front
If you want me I can stay around
If you need me, I'm here for you
How that sound?
Now it's up to you
Depending on how you wanna get down
Cause you're a big girl now

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
Got your name and your number in my cell phone
Hear your voice and I wonder where you are, if you all alone
If you in a good mood, if you not
Or you thinking bout you was at my spot
What we did when we got hot
Is you dreaming you had me?
Is you creaming your panties?
Like a king, fed me grapes, and you fanned me
On the couch, to the floor, to the bed, to the sink
And we ate each other like candy
Under the covers, two intimate lovers
You fuck a nigga like you mad at me
Throw the ass to me
You should be glad to be
In the presence of a real thug as bad as me
While I'm in the streets with my murdering squad
You talking to your friends that I'm hurting it hard
How I'm making my rod, how I make you say "Oh God"
Every ho that you know wanna know Nas
Gotta dodge all the blowjobs, getting hard
Cause you know how these girls are
Wearing tight shit, no panties, no bra
Running up to my car with menage a trois suggestions
Starting to get an erection
Guessing, only if you knew how your crew stressing
Complexion chocolatey, fondle me, thinking it's time to leave
I need time to breathe
Wanna follow me, Ironically
You pop up, throwing bottles at my Tahoe
Like it's my fault
But you don't wanna talk
Don't wanna hear nothing, all of a sudden
You and the shorty start scuffing
Now shorty dumping you out
Can't let her get the best of you
So I rescue you
Only thing left to do was to grab her
So you can jab her, get a cheap shot
You don't wanna feel chumped
Now here the cops come
So we gotta run to the ride
Then we drive off through the traffic
Don't panic, but you know how we gotta manage
Looking at your face
And the damage in your facial
Every angle can't let it faze you
No reason to be insecure or immature
Baby girl see the world is yours

[Hook fade out]



[Intro Sample]
We use the word everyday
Now we don't know the capacity of this word
Are we headed for conflict or not? (Yes sir)
Because we did not break down the capacity
Of the same what (The same word)
Brothers and sisters, this is why we hung up the consciousness
We've been taught wrong

[Verse 1]
Find a room to lock yourself in and close the door
It's some heavy concepts that we gotta explore
We gotta strip the word down rugged and raw
The rhetoric of Martin King just ain't around no more
Du Bois ain't here, James Baldwin neither, they all were leaders
But they ain't help me get this Porsche two seater
A lawyer left the hood, he never looked back
To be a Forture 500 CEO it took rap
So what if my pants sag with my hat turned back?
The same swag got our merchandise flying off the rack
Marketing companies is hiring blacks
Fresh hip-hop lingo for your campaign ads
Controversy surrounds who could say it and when
Some niggas are full time, some playing pretend
So fuck that, no apologies on the issue
If it offends you it's meant to, it's that simple

[Hook]
Tryin' to erase me from y'all memory
Too late, I'm engraved in history (I'm here my niggas!)
Speak my name and breathe life in me
Make sure y'all never forget me (Cause y'all give me life!)
Cause y'all use my name so reckless
Whether to be accepted or disrespected (And I love it!)
And I love it, especially when y'all do it in public
And I'm the subject
Cause y'all my niggas

[Verse 2]
Yo, I was thinkin' a little bit
What would it take to authenticate my nigganess?
Ball ridiculous? 26 inches when I call up the dealership?
Aww that's some nigga shit
We only out for our own benefit?
We havin' too many kids? We Claudines? Welfare recipients?
The infamous free clinics is the sickest shit
Make me think what the hell they clean they syringes with
Everybody bleeding, the cops are the demons
Courtrooms full of goons, jail buses leanin'
Handcuffs squeezed too tight on youth life
If you fight they just give in, people used to do sit ins
They got Nigeria and Niger, two different countries
Somehow Niger turned to nigga, and shit got ugly
The problem is we started thinking like the colonists
'Til Noble Drew Ali started droppin' that consciousness

(Chorus)

[Verse 3]
My father was not a banker, neither was my neighbor
When it came to gettin' paper who the hell was gonna train us?
Oppresion couldn't escape us through the ages
We changed the basis of derogatory phrases
And I say it's quite amazing
The use of ghetto terms developed our own language
No matter where it came from
It's celebrated, now people are mad if they ain't one

[Outro Sample]
Every word we use, it has a capacity
And if you don't understand the words you're using
And understand the capacity of it
You are using words that is creating a destiny for you
That you don't even know, or even conscious of

(Chorus)

(Chorus without Ad-libs)



[Intro: Chrisette Michele]
Hip Hop
It will never die
Hip Hop
It will never, never die

[Verse 1: Nas]
Ghetto nigga strutting, with nothing but dreams in Queens broke
Mac-10s, you can smell the PCP smoke
Melle Mel told it real, in the music he wrote
Those were the days I remember, we used to be close
Then I was nine, coldest winter I remember
Was slipping in December, two feet of snow
Yeah, that's the East Coast, that black ice
Symbolize the rap life, it was slick and smooth
I understood I had to come from the hood
Doing the Pee Wee Herman, the Smurf
Before them phones chirped
The block's drugs flowing, didn't have your own work
You had to have somebody else's, a small chrome on your pelvis
Starter jacket, Blue Georgetown or Green Celtic
Your girl's too expensive, she want shellfish
Red Lobster was popping, standing on that line forever
I wish someone would step on my Bally leathers
Now it's whatever
Hip Hop's forever

Kept my radio on 98 or BLS
Had a pre-pubescent lyric gift, but niggas never hear me spit
My little brother tried to warn them, I was a tornado coming
He knew from the inside like the eye of a storm, and told my pops about it
He gave us tickets to that Wild Style flick
Double Trouble retarded, we was the proudest
I never had a summer job
Sweeping leaves, socks to my knees
Home-made shorts, cut off Lee's
I ain't work a day in my life
Wiping away eraser off the paper, man
I'm just trying to say it right
Big radio, tape's slowing down
Lower the lights go, battery dead
I got to freeze them 'till they're ice cold
In the freezer later, I'm staring at the speaker
Sunk in them 808s deeper, cleaning my sneakers
With the bristles of a toothbrush, soap and water
I let the shoestrings soak in water

[Outro: Nas (Chrisette Michele)]
(Live Hip Hop, Live) Ain't got nothing to do with Old School
(Live Hip Hop, Live) New School, Dirty South
(Give Hip Hop, Give) West Coast, East Coast, this about us
(Give Hip Hop, Give) This our thing, you know what I'm saying
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay) This came from the gut, from the blood
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay) From the soul, right here, man
(I Pray Hip Hop, Pray) This is our thing, man
(I Pray Hip Hop, Stays) You know? so I say what I say

(Live Hip Hop, Live) And I say what I say, and I mean it
(Live Hip Hop, Live) Y'all take it how you want to take it
(Give Hip Hop, Give) Because if you asking: "Why is Hip Hop dead?"
(Give Hip Hop, Give) It's a pretty good chance, you the reason it died, man
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay) It's a pretty good, chance your lame ass, corny ass
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay) Is the reason it died, man
(I Pray Hip Hop, Pray) You don't give a fuck about it, you don't know nothing about it
(I Pray Hip Hop, Stays) You want this paper, be a hustler

(Live Hip Hop, Live) You a hustler, you ain't a rapper, get your paper man
(Live Hip Hop, Live) You know what I'm saying, but this rap shit is real
(Give Hip Hop, Give) Bitch, this shit is real: bitch
(Give Hip Hop, Give) *laughs*
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay)
(Live)
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay)
(Live)
(I Pray Hip Hop, Pray)
(Give)
(I Pray Hip Hop, Stays)

(Live Hip Hop, Live)
(Stay)
(Live Hip Hop, Live)
(Give Hip Hop, Give)
(Give Hip Hop, Give)
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay)
(Stay Hip Hop, Stay)
(I Pray Hip Hop, Pray)
(I Pray Hip Hop, Stays)



[Havoc]
Dunn you fam to me, and only family
That can get that close to me, keep it type strong
Blowing green that's keeping us going
Island hoppin getting right on them 747 Boeings
Dunn you fam to me, and only family
That can get that close to me, keep it type strong
Blowing green that's keeping us going
Unconditional love showing
40th side, 41st side ride

[Verse 1: Prodigy]
Me and my Dunns come from the slums
You can't take the slums out my Dunns
And that's how it is, that's how we live
Sometimes I find myself wearing the same shit for days
Not caring, bout what they gon' think or say
I got that, I don't give a fuck in me, it's stuck in me
That's how I 'vantage over y'all niggas, y'all too pretty
We too gritty, like Sanford and Son
Too grimy like Pigpen with jewels on
See we the top rap niggas, the Q-Dogs
You got a lot of nerve, putting out them songs
Knowing that my niggas come strong, so let's get it on
We just getting warm, operation Quiet Storm
Silent wars or we silence the fours
Hav, P, and Nas, got it in the smash, fo'sho
Now it's movies and soundtracks
This is where your career stop at

[Verse 2: Nas]
Ayo I drink to that
I'm like a dictionary, y'all rappers exam me
You violate, they read your obituary in front your family
You should idolize Nas in the flesh
Don't wait til I'm dead, to say I was the best, no doubt
We shot hoops with coat hangers, got loot with dope slangers
Sold soap to strangers, joked with danger
Rob prostitutes, dodge cops in hot pursuit
Bought weight from rastas, travel hot routes
O.T. commute back and forth
Tell shorty get that package off
Fuck being trapped up North, being told where to eat and shit
Caught a case then I beat the shit
D's on the block flash badges, nylon jackets
Big White boys with guns yelling, freeze Black kids
Got my niggas in the pen, eating octopus
Wishing they was on the blocks with us
To watch me and P do it, put the heat to it
Put it out, first day, the whole street knew it
Bitches, hold they pussies and bop to the music
And think deep to it, now who the truest

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Prodigy]
Dirty fingernails, reaching in my pocket pulling knots out
I daydream of better days, in different ways
Out this lifestyle we live, iced-out with the big fifth
That's why the burnt leather lean to the left
Even though we gained cash on fish
I'm trapped on reason being we ain't all rich
And I'mma be that same nigga for the door
And I'mma still walk the same path, we soon clash
We get stacks, you do the math
We pound niggas out, walk away and laugh
Fresh from out the lab, P and Nastradamus, kid
Rap niggas shit they drawers

[Verse 4: Nas]
Yo they probably did
I aircondition y'all niggas, my prediction is you rewind this
Your highness, Q-Boro's finest
Click your Timbs three times, the wizard is Nas
Grant you a wish, you get rich while listening hard
To my thugs in the prison yard, bench-pressing 200 pounds and up
Feeling like you down on your luck
Raise up, I feel your pain, hit the law library
Appeal the game, all eyes on me
Restrained from, being looked at, it's uncivilized
We epitomize thug song, y'all niggas get mad
Jealous rappers is puss, ain't got no style
No heart and no look, shook
Get stole on, my niggas move right in the moonlight
Y'all niggas get done, I pee on them son, they a small issue
We too official, blue steel pistols
Teflon vests, it's no contest we hit you

[Hook]

[Outro]
Yo, yo, yo, yo
Forty decide, Forty-First side right
Yeah youknahmsayin
Not for nothing baby
Knahmsayin wanna give a shout out to my peoples
YouknowhatImean, Yambo, Ill Will
Killa Black, my brother
It's never gonna be another, word up
Yeah, you know how we do things

[Skit]
The future is nothing but a series of probability made up of decisions that we make right now but these decisions leads to certain events into the future and every human being has a capability to determine their own future some are just more into it than others



Real conversation for that ass

(It's what they want) Huh
(It's what they want) What you say? (It's what they want)
Can't hear you, man, speak the fuck up
(It's what they want) Word (It's what they want)

[Verse 1]
Nastradamus, skama lit, know when I rep
Flow when I'm set, I got the chips to make a lotus my whip
Gold on my neck was once a code of respect
For high rollers and vets
Now it's loads of baguettes
Prefer a Mac-10 over a Tec
No matter sober or wet, I smack soldier cadets
Trees that might eject my hype back
Famous phrase "Nigga, light that"
Hoes you fuck ask you: 'Where your ice at, dunn?'
It's all about Playboys when we was young
Could only get tongue, then finally we can cum
Busting in hoes, guzzling 4's
Crack blitz, '86, you turn hustling pro
From bottles, to seven in your hand
To fake Pepsi's, to get to the crack, unscrew the can
Gleam blunted, seeing 100's, stacks of boy with a lean on it
We got it if the fiends want it
The whole block singing the same theme "Don it"
Fuck it, too many crabs in the bucket
If it's ice work, I'm gonna truck it
You gotta love it, you gotta love it

[Hook]
(It's what they want) fuck it
(It's what they want) you gotta love it
(It's what they want) fuck it
(It's what they want) you gotta love it
(It's what they want) fuck it
(It's what they want) you gotta love it
(It's what they want) (it's what they want) (it's what they want)

[Verse 2]
Some girls get too emotional, fanatic extremist
Compulsive, with malice incentives, the foulest of bitches
Hunger my riches, her childish wishes
Be suspicious of those sleeping with fishes, them hoes
Conspicuous and it shows, tricking this dough
Kicking this flow, slip and you fold
So when your click roll, I let my clips go
Niggas on opposite poles
I got that confident soul, for those locked in a hole
Inhumane, living hostile opposed
To living on the street, proper from my top to my toes
Aeropostale my clothes, Vernon niggas in suburbans with liquor
Preposterous foes, finicky foul niggas
See niggas and blacks, there goes a loud difference
Coke sniffing, tapping 13 year old chickens
You can't be a kingpin when you snitching
Regardless, we still make you a target
We shoot you in jail, chrome objects
Hit you in your own projects, it's street-onomics
This rhyme is edited, credited through ebonics
Miserable cats, hunger paining
Get off your ass, stop complaining
My crew be in Montego Bay Macarena-ing
While you home, waiting your arraignment
This thug life you claimed it, I make millions from entertainment
Now back in the hood, certain cats, they wanna kill me
They ice grill me, but on the low, niggas feel me
You gotta love it, you gotta love it

[Hook]
(It's what they want) fuck it
(It's what they want) you gotta love it
(It's what they want) fuck it
(It's what they want) you gotta love it
(It's what they want) (it's what they want) (it's what they want)



[Intro - Kissing]
I love you so much, don't ever leave me, I won't let you leave

[Verse 1]
The ho turned me out, green eyes, had a crush on her
Since 5 years old, met her, fell in love wit her
I saved that ho cause she bring more hoes
She major yo, the way she left them other dudes cold
Heart-broken she walked right out of mad nigga's life
So when I bagged her up right, I had to make her my wife
And I ain't gonna lose her like those other lames did
I keep a stash safe kid, when I proposed it made her face big
She keep me jigg, glorifying medallions
Got me in clothes made by Italians, feed me lobster and scallions
Watching her pile on my bed, her body feel stacked
She been around for years, know the hustlers, pimps, and macks
Bankers and diplomats
She the scratch on my back
Her c.r.e.a.m. I lust, now I got her I dont know how to act
When she not around, Im heated, bout' to lay somethin' flat
Know how to treat it, never take for granted, she got me trapped

[Hook]
My money, money, money, my bitch is my money
Ohhh money you my honey
Money is my bitch
Ohhh money, money, money, love her cause she keep a nigga rich
Ohhh money you my honey, but I think she got me pussy whipped
My money, money, money, my bitch is my money
Ohhh money you my honey
Money is my bitch
Ohhh money, money, money
Yeah yeah that bitch treat me like a trick
Ohhh money you my honey, she says without her I can't be rich

[Verse 2]
All the fun we have together, I keep you in my pocket
It's so much of you I share you, and speak to you in private
You got me karats on my wrist
I'm a savage for your kiss
Embarrassed when I'm not with you, I'm off guard
Niggas always expect to see us two together, stable
The best couple they seen since Trump and Marla Maple
Don't need no pre-nup
Cause when we hump we do it up, make sure we both will bust a dollar sign nut
Before I got to know, my life I say was mediocre
Break of day, slingin' all night long, fiendin' to stroke ya
Seeing niggas wit' you I wasn't happy
Wanted to stick them up to get you, heard you calling for daddy
And gladly I take you as my lawfully wedded wife
Never divorce me, I promise to treat you right
Keep you satisfied, never lie help you grow
My legal tender, lovely federal reserve note

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I won't sell my soul to you
What do I owe to you
My cars, my house, my flow to you
Screw you
Before you
Real niggas said I was cool, now I got you
The envy me cause I'm wit you
You floss too much
Turn niggas out, one touch
For you, my guns bust
You always said in GOD we trust
It's hard enough to keep counting on you
You cheat wit' government thugs, got the IRS pounding on you
I think I liked you better when you were illegal
But you had to get professional
Musical
Now when we fuck we use prophylactic, hard plastic
Stick you in ATM's, limited cash quick
Said you'd give me luxury, when I asked it
Fucking me, I gave you back shots in ya assets
Promised happiness, but really did nothing for me
I guess bitches like you just grow on trees



{*Doug E. Fresh beat-boxes*}

[Nas] Yeah.. what.. you!
[DEF] UH-HUH! C'MON!
[Nas] Yeah.. yeah, what?
[DEF] Nasty Nas, Virgo
[Nas] Uh-huh
[DEF] L-L-Ludacris, Virgo
[Nas] Uh uh uh
[DEF] Doug Fresh
[DEF] As we go, somethin like this
[Nas] Nasir..

[Nas]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo
Hey girl, just come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo
We sippin' on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though
I drop you off at Willoughby and Myrtle
Smash with the Virgo, ain't got to take your shirt off
You seen me convince your homegirl though

Plus she says her life is too hard
She says that she wanna come and build with the God
Promise me that she gon' play her part
Cause what I spit gets straight to her heart
And, she's damn fine, feet Hammertime, damn if I mind
Long as the butt bubblin' back in your waistline
I don't waste time, I gotta get-get on it
Just you and me, two glasses, silver Patronin'
In the club scene where I met Ms. Green Eyes
She walked by askin' me, "Are you Nas?"
Why? "If you was I'd be totally twi"
What's that? "Totally with it, T-W-I"
Haha, well, here I am, yep, I'm the man
Bartender, put a Cosmo in that girl hand
So, here we standin' before I begin
Homegirl made a knot out of the cherry stem
Tongue skills, yeah I like that, now we on the right track
Straight to my Phantom, call Africa Black {*brrrring*}
Ever since then she been yappin' a track
Told her friends, now they hollerin' behind her back
Sing!

[Ludacris]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo
Hey girl, just come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo
We sippin' on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though
I drop you off at Peachtree and Myrtle
Smash with the Virgo, ain't got to take your shirt off
You seen me convince your homegirl though

Now I was, so fresh and so fly in diamonds
When I stepped up in the club even my eyes was shinin'
A little cute thing said, "What's yo' name?"
I put my necklace in her face and told her read the chain
Ooh ooh so stuck up, told me shut the fuck up
BLAOW! Ludacris in the ha-oooh-ouse
The needle hit the record, they was playin' this song
All the ladies hit the floor and it was uh-uh-on
Live forever like 'Fame,' let the Leroys dance
While I'm laid back, chillin' in my b-boy stance
Could be a little pop lockin' if your girl's top droppin'
But watch for cockblockin' on my coochie stock options
But later for the ASSDAQ, throw 'em on the fast track
Make 'em swip-swap, Nasty N-A-S pass that
Honey in the black cause I'm feelin' her curves
He looked down at what I had and said, 'W-w-word'
Why only serve one when we can serve up two
Then at the bachelor pad, doin' what the Virgos do
And these women so shy but get loud undercover
So we could have sex but I can't be your loverrrrrr
{*DEF breakdown*: buck! buck! buck! buck! buck! buck!)
Ah, ah-ha-ha, ah-ha-ha, ah-ha ah ah-ah SING!

[Doug E. Fresh]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo (c'mon)
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo (c'mon)
We sippin on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though (that's right)
I drop you off at Two-Fifth and Lex-o
Smash with the Virgo, you ain't got take your shirt off
Seen you convince your homegirl though

They got my voice for the record and my voice for the beat
Virgo crew, baby run the streets
So let's go (let's go)
Let's go (for the beat)
Let's go (virgo crew)
It's the Virgo
Let's go (Nasty Nas)
Let's go (Ludacris)
And if you don't know, now you know (Doug Fresh)
{*DEF finishes beat-boxing*}



[Produced by Marley Marl]

[Sample]
On the real, all you crab niggas know the deal

[Intro]
Yeah, finally up in this nigga
Let's pay homage to Illmatic
Let's put the crown where it's at 10 years
Never been done this real by nobody

[Verse 1]
To my seed, may I lead you into no greed or evil
In the categories of stories I breed my sequel
You know the money, blues, blunts, broken 22's
Monkey see, monkey do, shorty sipping sunny dew
Now it's V.S.O.P. in a Phantom, mad smoky
Murder trees, cruising gat in the stash so it won't poke me
Up in the Trump Plaza, Suite 3010
Don't make no noise cause we dirty, tell 'em hoes hurry in
We got the room lit up with perfume and mad boom
And there's video taping blooming asses on the zooming lens
Rollin on you nondescript niggas, you're marked for death
Like Colombians with bad coke that gyp niggas
Tilt the dutch, twisted up the uwee if you're skilled enough
In Will we trust, salute the dead the nine mili busts

[Interlude]
That verse is ten years old, nine and half years old
Street's Disciple, the rebirth comin at you this year baby, it's on baby

[Verse 2]
To the hood, may this be the day that we pop them bottles
This is mandatory, what if there's not tomorrow?
You know the murder rate, jealousy, you heard 'em say
He say, she say, I'm 'bout cheddar, he don't deserve to make
Sipping clear liquor with niggas, that talk sideways
Listening close, to every word in case they violate
Up in the projects Apartment 5D
Spark a lea' it's 'bout the reed, counting everything the block see
We 'bout to need to take the corners from them cowards
Get it on so y'all can move more coke powder, by the hour
Hold in case we gotta rip niggas, loaded
Teflon coated projectiles'll flip niggas
From ninth grade to lightweight to grams to my mans with guns in hand
Police vans, they missed the summers again

[Verse 3]
Yeah, power to the people, death to the phonies
This beast to the mic one two check, y'all fed-e-rallies on me
And they look like you approachin me like how you, homie?
The F.B.I. see only one problem, they try to slump me
After the young black male cause he makes a lot of money
So hustlers make crack sales cause they deprived and hungry
My country hates that I could run free state to state with hunnies
While making cake with real golded plate rims on Humvees
The bush stroker, the kush smoker, nigga
Just when you thought it was over look over your shoulders
I'm 30 now, baby sip drinks and sip 'em slow
Motto no stress, smoking less than I did befo'
You see the kid was broke 'til I spitted vivid expressions
Of hard living ghetto children, of a lesser God
Religion was fast women, expensive cars
Y'all witnessin over 10 years, the best of Nas



[Verse 1]
It ain't hard to tell, I excel and prevail
The mic comes in contact with the third rail
My raps react, they attack the whack just like a maniac
With this, see I'm a brainiac
I'll call you tattoo, you never come off
I flip the script with a sawed-off, boss
A modern Shakespeare—reincarnated
Brains are elevated, I'm bein' R rated
This style is terror, drastic
Meltin' the plastic, and I eat mics just like acid
Burn your pen and pads, mics you'll need not
Cause I be packin' like a Rasta in a weed spot
Hittin' your heart with a hollow-tip verbally illin'
Minds manipulated, my raps are nickel-plated
I execute raps like I'm swingin' an axe around
This is a mic shut down
Notify the President—that I'm bombin' your residence
And I'm leavin' no evidence
Voice box yells, lyrics will excel
Rappers gettin' smoked, you can smell the hot shells
Your style is fake, snake, well dramatized
You might as well be a singer but ain't harmin' Nas
Here's the break, I can translate lyrics so well
I excel, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook]
It ain't hard to tell

[Verse 2]
I got a case of vocal fever, I'm here to make you a believer
Nas wrecks the tweeters and receivers
Lyrics will explode, my brain overloads
Gimme a Grammy, competition is dead just like Sammy
I leave minds magnetized like slaves
Your style is old fashion like waves
Holdin' a pistol at a pastor, pullin the trigger faster
Tell 'em I was sent by his Master
But that topic's too deep for your ear
Here's the science you can comprehend clear
Advanced intellectual, a time bomb speeder
I'll know your whole card just like a palm reader
Non-stop, I'm bustin' heads like the FEDS baby pops
This is not the Kindergarten Cop
Put on your blindfold, I'mma release and stand tall
I detonate bombs at the Policeman's Ball
This is art from the heart, I leave 'em marked for death
In each breath, in this game, I'm the ref
Already I'm ill but I can only get better
With lyrics as pretty as a nickel-plated Beretta
I master dialects, of uncommon languages
A black man caught by the Klan couldn't hang with this
These are proverbs, copy cat attackers
I'm wanted dead 'cause I'mma genocide to rappers
Battlin' Nas is dead when my brain reacts
You might as well have fell asleep on a train track
This ain't the same track that you're used to
This is rhythmatic, automatic, try it, you oughta have it
Slaughter your tape recorder; givin' thanks to my supporters
And keep flowin' like water
No matter the obstacle, Nasty Nas will prevail
Ayo, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook]
It ain't hard to tell

[Verse 3]
Check it
I catch wreck with my intellect, suckers are incorrect
I'm gonna win 'cause you slept
On Nas, word is bond, I leave the microphone torn
False rappers, you need to write your own song
Metaphors are murder, man, hittin' like Roberto Duran
Hold the mic in my hand, my life span
Imitators will sweat me like gym class
Your raps are fat shit, then I'll be Slim Fast
New rap recruits I salute then delete 'em
Verbally eat 'em, because my ears don't need 'em
Nas is a terrorist, analyst
Swingin' my fists like a nigga breakin', possessed by Satan
You couldn't compete with a beat that was fast or slow
Brothers is gettin shipped out like I was Castro
I can eat your flavor but I'm not a candy lover
I use a Lethal Weapon, just like Danny Glover
Execute monologues, sabotage entourage
Mutilate mics like a maniac at large
I talk with slang, and use my brain
Generate pain, penetrate your vein
Move like a maniac, Nas is nice, son
Talk to your conscience and hit like Tyson
No competition, 'cause I cause wonders
Nas will battle rappers by the football numbers
A motor mouth killer, rhyme writin' thriller
Hold a Mac-11, and attack a reverend
Don't sleep 'cause you might not wake
I speak deep, dialects I translate
Me and friends commit sins on the regular
Murder my competitors, and et cetera
Nas is a gypsy Egyptian
Flippin' the script and microphone manufacturers are victims
My voice makes your ear drums swell
It ain't hard to tell



[Hook]
I wanna talk to the mayor, to the governor, to the motherfuckin' president
I wanna talk to the FBI, and the CIA, and the motherfuckin' congressman
I wanna talk to the mayor, to the governor, to the motherfuckin' president
I wanna talk to the FBI, and the CIA, and the motherfuckin' congressman
Can I talk to ya?

[Verse 1: Nas]
Step up to the White House let me in
Whats my reason for being I'm ya next of kin
And we built this motherfucker
You wanna kill me because my hunger?
Mr. America young black niggas want ya
I wanna talk to the man, understand?
Understand this motherfuckin G-pack in my hand
Look what happened to San Fran
Young girl hit by policeman
Twelve shots up in her dome, damn
Niggas thought we slept but the architect sent
The Pentagon's from Egypt, government secret
The 99 to 2-G computer shutdown, what now
Extension on Earth, human cutdown
Niggas play with PlayStations, they build a spacestations
On Mars plottin civilizations
Dissin us discriminatin different races
Tax payers pay for more jail for Black Latin faces

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
I'm just a black man why y'all made it so hard damn
Niggas gotta go create his own job
Mr. Mayor imagine if this was your backyard
Mr. Governor imagine if it was your kids that starved
Imagine your kids gotta sling crack to survive
Swing a mack to be live cart ack to get high
It's the ghetto life yea I celebrate it I live it
And all I got is what you left me with I'mma get it
And y'all combinin' all the countries we goin' do the same
Combine all the cliques to make one gang
It ain't a black and white thing
It's to make the change, citizens of a higher plane

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
What y'all waitin for the world to blow up
Before you hear this rewind this 4 minutes before we timeless
Let y'all niggas bang my shit before Saddam hits
Let Nastradamus tell us what time it is
They try to buy us with doe
Fake black leaders of puppets always talking bout the city budget
The news got it all confused lyin to the public
They eyes watchin stay wise move above it
Water floods predicted, hurricanes, twisters
Its all signs of the Armageddon, three sixes
People reverse the system, politics verse religion
Holy war, muslim verse christians
Niggas in high places, they don't got the balls for this
People in power sit back and watch them slaughter us
Mr. President I assume it was negligence
The streets upside down, I'm here to represent this

[Hook]

[Outro]
Can I talk to you Mr. President
Niggas tryin to get with the computers
We ain't John Henry
Banging down fuckin'..? fighting against the machines
We want to be Part of the establishment nigga
That's what we are steppin up for
Ain't no cartoon out here
This shit is real

Total Package in this nigga
LES in this nigga
Ill Will nigga
Mr. President wanna keep us from establishment
Niggas are american baby
American Made



[Hook]
Live now niggas, there's no promise of a second time around, put it down
We'll just live now, there's no reason why you shouldn't, everything is up to you
All you gotta do is just, live now, we spending
Not under the ground yet, we enjoying every second yo
Live now, don't forget to bro, yeah
Cause I promise you you'll regret it bro

[Nas]
Picture my last days will be so grim
My daughter at my bedside, respirator in me
Eyes dilated, looking skinny, trying to smile, trying to say something
Whole room will quiet down just to hear my last words
Tears fall down my facial, why fear anything, it's now too late to
I'm dreaming of a time I was silked out at the peak of my career
But I always choked out, leaving mad money on the table at crazy amounts
I would hit the scene for a second and bounce
Admit I did live a little bit, sweet pickle dick
Freaks licked on it, lips I dripped on it
Sex, I shot pearl necklaces on necks and tits
Traveled half the world, wish I traveled the rest of it
From QB to Mecca kid, so if you knew me
You'd be proud to say I left you with enough memories to resurrect me with
So live now nigga

[Hook]

[Scarlett]
It's been a long time since you came through to see ya sis
You know I love you, I've been a fan since Genesis
God, I respect you cause you never tied to smash
Since we met a while back, and your style was mack
Now I see that you a man after all you been through
A stand-up dude, held me down after Sekou
Need more brothers like you in the hood, would have wifed you if I could
But the white cells in my blood were no good
Said I had it ten years, but I was just a carrier
I thought, "Me a victim?", could never be my character
It's ill Se' passed the way he did, didn't know how to tell him
Just happy it didn't get in our kid
But all the things I did was the flyest, experiences were priceless
Remember days of diamond cuts
Nugget rings, clubs in Queens, Jetta cars
Used to love them things, Barbados, Belize
I stayed over seas, shopping sprees, credit cards
Pockets of Gs, left the hood, phattest cribs
To platinum from silver, came back, bitches calling me the black Liz Taylor
Imagine that, Rob me? My nigga would kill ya, they knew the rules
All the planes I flew, niggas I ran through
Lot of unprotected sex, don't know where it came from
Grimy niggas, rich niggas, damn it ain't a game son
From the Cayman Islands to the Virgin Islands
Gucci suitcases (coughs), a chic did it, eff the screw faces
Critics and fans, they need to get a life
You doin' the right thing, settle down, get a wife now
I grew with you so you know you make me proud
And most of all you gotta live now

[Hook: Scarlett]
Live now nigga ain't no promise of a second time around, put it down, would you
We'll just live now, there's no reason why you shouldn't, everything is up to you
All you gotta do is just, live now, keep spending
Not under the ground yet, keep enjoying every minute yo
Gotta live it up to the limit yo
Cause I promise you you'll regret it bro

[Scarlett]
Son, come close, lemme talk to you
I got music, put it out to the world, let 'em hear it
Look out for little me, one



[Refrain]

[Verse 1:Nas]
Peace to the Five Percenters, online engine inventors
Shout to them niggas
Family men, bringing home dinners
Watch out for desperate lonely women, hurt your happy home
Miserable and alone
Kissable, nice to bone
She not the type deserving of a throne
Her beauty is her curse
She fuck for shoes and a purse
Make me a movie first
Can watch you on my phone
I shop in Barcelona
I spend some nights in Rome
Feel like a Knight from England
That's what I named my son, Knight
He was born to be one
That's how my game was won
White 740 Beamer
Licked by an angel's tongue
I'm living dangerous son
She got a man, a famous one
Honey be pocket watching, she got a lot of options
Hard to make up her mind deciding which baller to rock with
Hot to death, slim pickings but I'm not impressed
She got the hottest sex
So I guess I'mma just stay

[Refrain]

[Verse 2:Nas]
Even though I don't like you
Next Friday night can't wait to fight you
Locked up I would knife you
Don't fuck with you
Last month I even bucked at you, you got locked
I felt bad, wait do I got love for you
I might kill you but do I got love for you
I want you dead under six feet of soil
At the same time
Want you here to witness me while you in misery
We hate each other but it's love
What a thug mystery
Years ago they ate the hearts of a slain enemy
We enemies but your hatred could never enter me
Some seek fame cause they need validation
Some say hating is confused admiration
Spotlight on me
I still look twenty
Still get money, lady killer
Pushing a Bentley
Maybe niggas could see too much of they failures through a nigga who realer
I don't like you near bruh, but I need you to stay


[Verse 1: J. Cole]
You can drop a “Wet Floor” sign down for the tears
God and my court date, the two things I fear
Man, they tryna give a nigga years
I’m tryna figure if I should even appear
Or should I escape town? Catch a Greyhound
Change my name, right – catch a plane flight
Out the country, let them ma’fuckas hunt me
Come and catch me if you want me
Know they’ll lock me if I stay
But where I’mma run to?
I got a good girl, we got a son too
And all we went through, we ain’t see eye-to-eye
But what you told me way back, you was a ride-or-die
So if they give me one, or if they give me two
Or if a nigga gotta sit down and do a few
Before I go, baby, I gotta know, what would you do?
Would you find someone new or would you stay?
Like the hoes when they lay with me?
Puppy eyes when I go, sayin’ “stay with me”
Aw, girl, you bad as hell and yet I’d love to
But see I got a girl I’m really makin’ love to
Therefore I’m feelin’ a lot more guilty when I rub you
That’s why I skip all of that kissin’ when I fuck you
Flush the condom down the toilet then I skate
I had you, but you can’t have me, I never stay

[Hook]
Stay

[Verse 2: J. Cole]
Ha! Life in a hometown, ‘fore I could take a step
I’m gettin’ grown now
And startin’ to notice that I see the same hoes around
Guess they had to go ‘round, my raps is profound
I got the flows, but yet a nigga ain’t got no sound
Copped a beat machine, I’m cookin’ up my own now
Got my mind on the city where it goes down
See, if I’mma get to where I’m goin’ then I can’t stay
Although I love it here
I’ll be damned if I sit around another year
Dreamin’ dreams, hopin’ somehow that they just appear
The hardest part of leavin’ is to know my mother here
Oh, but I’m comin’ back – oh boy, believe that
Let’s show the little niggas, boy, you can achieve that
Got the city on my shoulders, piggy back
Hello, my name is Cole and I’m here to stay



Hell yeah
Check it check it check, check check
Yo, when it come to sex advice, I'm the one to call
If you a virgin with blue balls or you tear down walls
Not Dr. Ruth, call me Dr. Knockboot
Pimped out hats, rock fashionable suits
A class for the youth, Sex Ed for your head
The do's and don'ts, that should happen in the bed
First, DON'T: run up in her raw cause you get burned
For sure, fuckin with the typical whore, because
DO: rock a Rough Ryder, whenever you inside her
Your local bodega is your supplier
And DON'T: take the pussy, if she fightin
Cause you saw what happened to 2Pac and Mike Tyson
'Specially if you large, some hoes is trife
Get you on a rape charge, have you servin your life
Yo, DO: get a yes confirmation before penetration
You wind up in a police station
DON'T: get with no young bitch and hit it
She PG-13, you rated R, she not permitted
DO: check for ID, whenever chillin V.I.P
With fly shorty P.Y.T
Yo, DON'T: lie about the cars you got
Or who you hang with, frontin when you borrowed your watch
Yo, DO: play your game right, if the G's tight
Then you can fuck shorty the same night
Yo, DON'T: trick when you don't have to
You think you ballin? You turn your back they laffin at you
You don't gotta keep repeatin you a thug, she heard you
In fact, she attracted to your man that herbed you
DO: spend a lil' dough, only if you know
The bitch gross a lil' somethin too bro
DON'T: eat the pussy the first night
Maker her bless you, we call that shit gesundheit
DO: set the mood right, Bailey's with ice
A cup of Thug Passion'll make everything right
Yo, DON'T: pop shit like you Daddy Longdick
When you come fast like Fed-Ex and bust too quick
DO: hit positions she will find interest in
DON'T: hit the pussy if that shit's blisterin
Hope you're listenin, turn up your transisterin
Hot 97, KISS-FM
Or B-L-S, with your hand up her dress
Chillin with your girl while you thinkin bout ya ex
Not too easy not too complex
I break it down, how to adress, the opposite sex
Problems or questions, I can answer them best
Signin off Dr. Knockboot at your request, peace

Rest havens
Fuck y'all bitches
Y'all niggas get y'all shit tight
Dr. Knockboot gotta come take y'all bitches from ya!
AIGHT?! We out!



[Intro: Future]
Dress it up and make it real for me
Whatever that fucking means

[Hook: Future]
Dirty soda in a styrofoam
Spend a day to get my mind blown
Dress it up and go to Nassau
200 miles on the dash
And gotta roll a pound up and gas it
Switching lanes in a Grand Rapide
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
Til these niggas start acting
Shoot a nigga like a film in a movie
Nigga, gone let 'em have it
Ballin' like the March Madness
All these cops shooting niggas, tragic
I'm the one that's living lavish
Like I'm playing for the Mavericks
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch, the molly made me fuck her even though she average

[Verse: Nas]
Reflect with radiance
Rising consciousness of my people in the stadiums
Or I can get ignorant like that nigga Maury Povich portray us as
I'm hip hop baby dad
And all of y'all my litter, my little kids
And my label's Mass Appeal
A blunt, a pill and some liquor
I get to my hitters, they spray your ass
Get money fast, R.I.P. the check, smell my kilo breath
I spit and I freeze you to death
Cuban tobacco mouth, trap nigga cologne
Been had the OG respect
Pick the city, I knock four of ya' baddest
16 chillin' with Supreme Magnetic
Fort Greene nigga with a little Queens bastard
Now I'm in a Ghost or a Benz or an Aston, icon status
And we still strapped case you niggas want static
Still ballin', still mackin'
Niggas ain't a 100, he 60/40
We 50/50, that's automatic
My niggas got open cases
But niggas got watches and bracelets
And cee-lo, I never throw aces
Don't give a fuck about racists
Pray that my niggas come out of the FEDs
Shout to my niggas who dead
We got the stripes
All I got is my real niggas for life
Nas pour henny, Future pour dirty sprite

[Hook: Future]
Dirty soda in a styrofoam
Spend a day to get my mind blown
Dress it up and go to Nassau
200 miles on the dash
And gotta roll a pound up and gas it
Switching lanes in a Grand Rapide
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
Til these niggas start acting
Shoot a nigga like a film in a movie
Nigga, gone let 'em have it
Ballin' like the March Madness
All these cops shooting niggas, tragic
I'm the one that's living lavish
Like I'm playing for the Mavericks
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch, the molly made me fuck her even though she average



[Produced by Scott Storch]

[Intro]
Uh, light somethin', stop frontin'

[Verse 1: Nas]
How much money's enough? Think maybe like a trillion figures
Pray my daughter don't wild like the Hilton sisters
That'd kill me yo, filthy rich
My daughter pass it onto the next generation
Throwing carnations at my tombstone
In my new home, meet Mom's in my Yves Saint Laurent suit on
Then we do a dance
Like my man Luther jam, but my verse came first
I stole change out her purse, now I wanna dig her up
Outta the earth, too morbid, lean forward
Toward a new paragraph, Blue carrots, D-class
Strictly that kush in the weed bags
Tryna' figure out what Barry Gordie had put in production
Studio's smokey now, hard like Davin Ruffin
Hit a spliff through a seance, and uh, play on, playa

[Hook: Snoop Dogg]
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Gotta' get your papes on, play on, playa
Before it's all gone, sip Don, tip waiters
Do y'all thing, ménage, swing, baby
Spend dubs on your bruhs, gotta live crazy
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Get your papes on, play on, playa
Get your papes on, play on, playa

[Verse 2: Nas]
Ruby red grapefruit juice with Grey Goose
Rubies in the Jesus piece, pimped out like Snoopy
But a East Coast thing, my girl's stocking
Tied up in a knot top of my bean head
Billion dollar dream head, went from triple beams to digitals
Servin' fiends to minimal, sixty G's
No criminal, no mo', just mo' dough
Mimosas pouring, Oprah's earrings
On fingers while your girl performs cunnilingus
‘Cause this big money aroma lingers
Barber cleans his blade, then they give me a fade
Hot towel on the face, hot models who vomit
After they eat so they can stay lightweight
Swallowin' my protein like an Ovaltine shake
Come through like Mo Green from Godfather, so clean
Where I step I 'Clorox it', keep twenty G's
On both sides of the thighs, that's four pockets
Eighty thou to browse for the nicest price
But we ain't into buyin' conflict ice
That's the shit they stole from the Congo, and other black soil
True mack fo' you, nappy hair just spinning
Honey gave me a massage with a happy ending
Finest females, I just came on and sprayed her
Got to get your papes on, play on, playa

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Snoop]
It's kinda hard for a playa like you
But let me show you how a nigga like me get revenue
What you never do is punk out, what you better do
Never let the game get ahead of you, get a better view
Better yet, a better crew, praise God, I'm a marry you
Get ya holy, carry you, bury you, slowly
Roll me another blunt, stuff it
Lick it, puff it, tuck it, fuck it
That man, that game, that thing it busts
In D-O-Double-G we trust
Yup, yup, young loc with the two steps
He creepin' with two TEC's, they sleepin' with two chicks
Right before we blast, all you heard was two clicks (Bloaw!)
End of existence, for instance
Rewind, replay it, re-chop it, remix it, re-twist it
Goddamn, D-O-Double-G, cuz, we missed it
Travel slow, I'm an Indian, but not a Navajo
I smoke the big leaf, end all the big beefs
My hair in two braids, I'm the big chief
La-da-da, be-da-ba-da…
Yeah, break that down, how fresh you are?
The king from Queens, Mr. Escobar
Connect with the best from the West, yes-yes, you are
Oh my God, it's Snoop Dogg and Nas; playa, play on



[Intro]
Yeah
I want all my niggas to come journey with me
My name is Nas, and the year is 1973
Beginning of me, therefore I could see
Through my belly button window who I am...

[Verse 1]
I existed in a womb, just like an abyss
Came from behind the sun, my hands balled in a fist
Punching on my moms stomach, kicking on her cervix
Twitching cause I'm nervous
Though my intended purpose
Was to be born to reign, not in scorn or vain
But to take on a name, my pops chose for me
Bloodstream full of indo
Developing eyes nine months process
Infant size, a Prophet in his early stages
Mother in her early thirties, was married to pops
Wishing what she carried would drop
I'm not worthy to come from a woman so pure
Ann-Jones, flesh of her flesh, blood of her blood
Her blood and bones, hearing prayers
She asking for my good health
That I'd become a man and learn to make a way for myself
Nervous she was and her paranoia got in my blood
Mixed with mariujana from my daddies geenes
'Lotta screams I'm hearin', it's crazy
Both parents is scrappin', I'm not even a baby
A miscarriage could happen

[Hook 4X: Nas]
I shot my way out my mom dukes

[Verse 2]
They must wanna keep me, cause 4 months past and I'm still alive
Guess I got what you call an Ill Will to survive
When I look hard the lights is killing my eyes
I know when moms is laying down cause I get bored and start to get live
Move side to side hear loud music and vibe
All black babies are born with rhythm thats no lie
Solar energize, mineralize food through my mothers tube
I'm covered in this thick layer of goo
Month two was the least most comfortable
My umbilical cord choking me
But month 3 was closer, see
Thats when pops took moms to see the doc at the clinic
But I was saved cause he changed his mind in the last minute
Watching 'em yell, heard my moms voice well
Feared fist fights, so terrified when we fell
While they broke up furniture and smashed plates on the wall
I wondered if I am born will I be safe at all
This place they call the world though my view was so large
Couldn't wait to get up, grow up and take charge
Month 5, Month 6 went by, hoping I'm born in July
But the Lord already figured out a date and time
Septemeber 14th, 73
Get ready world, doctors in the front waiting for me
Arms open cause they know when I drop, alot of shit's gonna stop
See how the goverment will start re-training cops
Month 9, I'm a week over due, the labor induced
Pops told my moms to push and take deep breaths too
Said stay calm, holding her arm, I'm trying to hold on
Surgical gloves touching my scalp, my head pops out
Everything blurry, my first breath screams out
Tears pouring down my pops face he's so proud
Wanted to hold me, but I was so bloody
They washed me off and he said "At least that nigga ain't ugly!"
Placed me in his arms snuggly, laid me on my mother
Finally, I got to see who held me in her body
She loved me,and I plan to over throw the devil
Y'all bout to see this world in trouble
Motherfuckers...

{*Baby screams*}



[Produced by Chucky Thompson]

[Intro: Nas + crowd]
"Picture us married, you and me," what?
"K-I-S-S-I-N-G"
"I remember the first time, girl you and me . . ."

[Verse 1: Nas]
This ain't no sucka-for-love shit
This ain't no Huxtable-kisses-and-hug shit
First night we fuck, shit, and don't call the next day
This a thug's wedding day, in love
Will we make it? Let us pray
In the limo my niggas, my father, my brothers
Everybody in tuxes gettin' blunted
Hard bottles, mob costumes this ain't no act though
Factual, the pimp shall scoop no more
Yes I'm absolutely sure
I know that she love me, I know that she faithful
We spoke on a prenumptial agreement
Cuz Will and Jada ain't need it
Spoke on eloping, but then I deaded the thought
Cuz she deserves cinderella's ball and the whole shit
But know this
You fuckin' wit' a slit your throat quick
Vehicular explosion, cigar smokin', dark minded, chart climbin
Well spokin say farewell to broke men or rich ones
Throw them phone numbers away cuz this is it hun
Headed to the chapel, my niggas laughin, and its baffling
Cuz just a year ago, it's weird though, I knew I'd get married
To who I knew not
Thought of snatchin Halle up from the dredlock
Pumpin Sade, my head nod
Finally I met the perfect bitch, pardon my French
Rephrase that, someone who make my heart stop
Couldn't wait to blaze that
Tired of hoppin' from honey to honey, HIV spreadin'
Everybody bump the same bunnies
The game, will put niggas in they grave
Right before they part ways, with the street
I want a son to greet, every mornin'
Daughters and more sons tickle my feet
Wife smilin, tellin me it's time to eat
I'm getting married

[Hook: Nas] (3X)
Say hello to the man, goodbye to the gigalo
It was difficult for me to find the chick I want

[Verse 2: Nas]
It was my dream for my queen to put the ring on and ride
Even Martin Luther King had a fling on the side
That's what the negative one's say
Knew my wedding would be one day, but quickly its this day
I know the hoes gonna miss me
Lookin' at ol' photos, sayin' damn he used to twist me
Start chokin' up since I woke up
Bachelor party was crazy, tryin' hard just to sober up
Father saw me in a daze, nudged me wit' his left arm
Told me how him and moms went to city hall, dressed norm
Said she would love me in my Ozwald Boateng
Customized in London by guys who suitup kings
Girl, you get the rings young, you behave
Maxwell he gon' sing, invited Lauryn Hill and the gang
Baltimore, North Cacky, Mississippi
Family packed in, My nigga L is crazy tipsy
Spilled Pepsi on the cuflings, ginger ale got it out
Walked in the church, chest all big to thug it out
My girl walked in, glistenin', different stones
'Bout to go from my fiance' to Mrs. Jones
That's a union that nobody could touch
I gotta be cool, wit ur crazy aunts and uncles
Cuz I love you much, cuz you put up wit' my shit
Court cases, baby mamas
I make a honest woman outta you yet
Everybody starin' at you, I'm at the alter standin
Heart poundin out my chest like a canon
I'm happy, One of my groomsmen, under the music, says don't do it
But they just jokes, some crew shit, they playin', I'm gleeful
I'm stayin I'm sayin vowels all true
Will you take music as your wedded wife? I DO
Sike, this ain't about music, y'all know who I'm talkin to
I'm getting married

[Hook]

I'm getting married



*Man laughing*

[Verse 1: Nas]
I had bad chicks that blow cum bubbles like bubblegum
Plus they ass lick, summer house be sippin' rum
Layin' lazy in the recliner, couple days
In my ashtray, smoke signals from the haze
I stick my finger through it, the ring of smoke broke
That symbolize weak guys, pop the strong link off
The infrastructure caves in, amazin'
I ain't have to read The Art of War to slay men
Serve niggas, bird niggas speakin' reckless
When their momma love the kid's records I made
You gutless, you don't know struggle
Throw a couple shells at you, hell grabs you
Nail stabs a hand of the Nasirine
I carried the cross to help you afford that plasma screen
Gave you chumps a path to walk, hold my hand
I'mma guide you like the OG, but don't talk, don't get it confused
Cause none of y'all can fit in my shoes
Y'all made of chemicals, artificial actions
God'll forgive you bastards
Only if you repent to the Nazareth Savage

[Verse 2: Nas]
I squeeze nipples like pimples to get the puss, get it?
Form a crew, swallow forty cal. bullets after dinner's finished
Wash it down with a shot of tequila, pocket full of scrilla
Can't come close to, Francis Coppola, Samson -- no Delilah
You're pint-sized, I'm Mike's eyes with the gladiator tattoos on it
You scared to look too long at, sit on a don's lap
Tell you a story shorty, spicy like Lawry's
Chickenheads and orgies, criminals that draw heat in their late forties
Drug habits, love grabbin' kids up like yours
Sendin' you a picture of them in their drawers with black eyes
Savage guys, you hire Magnum PI's to bag up my guys
Said you was a thug with a good disguise, try to protect your cabbage
You're runnin' from the Nazareth Savage

[Verse 3: Nas]
Son's back with flows, they say mine is very scary
Smell fear like a canine that finds buried babies
And all of y'all wear that same aroma
How to blow on your eighth LP, I'll show ya
You're wack nigga, face it
In the history of the game, you have no placement
Liquor and weed just massacred their mind, or thee celebrity
Or they couldn't change with time, so now they run they mouth
But when the sun go south, them guns come out
My cavalry woulda been through ten in your skin
Casualty you don't wanna be, don't want it with me
Straight savage



[Verse 1]
Black hoods, cops 'n projects
Sewers flooded with foul blockage
The gutter's wild and every child watches
Chains in top locks get ripped off hinges
Doors kicked off, drunks stag off smirnoff, wipe your beard off
Crippled dope fiends in wheelchairs stare
Vision blurry, cus buried deep in they mind are hidden stories
Bet he's a mirror image of that 70's era
He's finished for the rest of his life, 'til he fades out
The liquor store workers miss him but then it plays out
So many ways out the hood but no signs say out
Mental slavehouse where gats go off, I show off
Niggas up north, prison-ology talk, till they time cut off
You should chill if you short, prepare deep thought
To hit the street again, get it on, get this paper and breathe again
Plan to leave somethin' behind
So your name'll live on, no matter what the game lives on

[Hook]
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, I feel uninspired
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, it makes me feel, so tired

[Verse 2]
Yo, if this piano's the cake then my words are the candles
Light it up, make a wish, and them angels will grant you
Impatient once tried, but in those angels and bamboo
They lit it up, *puff* *puff*, hit it up, *puff*
Now they dismantled, think the whole world is crazy, got a 9
Watch where you walk, 2 dollar fine, sign of the times here in New York
Hire Satan, United Nations quietly taken, toll on your soul
Take it or leave it, just my evaluation
Stack loot and guns, teach the girls karate, school your sons not to hate
But to stay awake, cus the scars a razor make is nothin' in comparison
To the gas left on this whole mass, if we don't get it controlled fast
Might as well be, laughin' with Malcolm X's assassin as we die slow
Perishin', brain dead from a Ericsson
Words are the medicine, two teaspoons for goons
A cup of it for those thuggin' it, y'all sing the tune

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Another day, another dollar, my mother will holla
She said "go and see the world for myself, and my brother should follow
Pops was smooth, from his top to his shoes
Sang the blues, guitar strings he played smokin' his Kool
Duke Ellington hat, picture this yo, seventies cat
He wrote his music in the back of the crib, I did my homework
At night the windows were speakers, pumpin' life out
A fight, people screamin' cus somebody pulled a knife out
So I look at this room, I'm hooked to this tune
Every night the same melody, hell sounded so heavenly
But jail was ahead of me, speeding like amphetamine
Reading's what I should've done, cus my imagination would run
I was impatient to get out and become part of the noise out there
I used to stare, five stories down, basketball courts, shot up playgrounds
And I witnessed the murders and police shake-downs
Yo, the hustlas and hoes, drugs and fo-fos
This was the life of every kid, lookin' out project windows

[Outro]
Oh, outta my window
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, it makes me feel, so tired
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, I feel uninspired
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, it makes me feel, so tired
Lookin' out of my project window
Oh, I feel uninspired
Starin out of, of my window
Oh I, feel so tired
Oh yeah, outta my window
Oh, lookin' out, lookin' out
Lookin' out my window, oh yeah
Makes me, feel so tired
Outta my window, out my project window
Lord I feel, uninspired



[Nas]
I think I can remember some...

[Verse 1]
Brenda the back-bender used to have me in the twister
Grabbed her up and left her at the Buena Vista
Chelsea used to tell me choke her while I stroke her
Stuck a Heineken bottle up in the ass, a real joker
Used to run my bubble bath, tons of laughs, sexy chick
Nasty though, she used to try to eat my excrement
Used to play Atari 1200, baby-sitter made me kiss her
Put hickeys on her stomach
Toya was a tomboy 'til we played catch a screw
Had her out past her curfew, Sheila had this perfume
That drove a nigga wild, was a child then, Gertrude
Used to put my face in her crotch
Spun my tongue around in a circle while she watched
Eiserea knew I was a player, brought Fatima, loud screamer
While I blew clouds of reefer, they sucked juice out my uretha
While Marvin Gaye pumped from the speaker

[Hook]
Remember the times I hung with the dimes
Remember the times I fucked a few
Remember the times I hung with the dimes
And all the wild things I used to do
Remember the times I hung with the dimes
Remember the times I fucked a few
Remembering the times it was on my mind
But none of them could touch you

[Verse 2]
Was only scared of them STDs, syphilis, VD and herpes
Daffy Duck-lookin' bitch burnt me, correction
Urinary tract infection, what I got for no protection
Was a horny dog, mornings waking up with a log
Dick stuck to my draws, wet dreams in the mind
Of a one-of-a-kind sex fiend, Justine was luscious wanna cuff us when fucked us
Me and her best friend, this thick Texan named Tamika, English teacher
Wedding ring on finger, bent her big ass over the fold-out sofa
The weather was cold and Loretta would throw on nothing but a thong
Under the coat and
Put a show on just to show me she loved me
She would undress and wait in zero below weather
In slippers and a sun dress for me to arrive
Kept a freak in the ride with her head in my lap, the steering wheel's high

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Thank God I got bank god, so fuck pimpin'
Fuck broke condoms, pills and penicillin
Abortion clinics, I was one of the best who did it
Lesbian shit, wheelchair girls and midgets
Twin sisters, cousins, mothers and daughters, some wasn't no quarters
Long chin, some with funny odors
Long blond weaves, overweight, cottage cheese
Some I paid college fees, then they strip tease
And it's sad I don't remember great times that made me drool
And the sex gave me flashbacks when I was like eww
Mature with it now dog, here's the side of Nas
Principles are lined up, things prioritized
Se mamma I left that alone, faded memories, the reason that I'm grown
It'd be senseless for us to lie about our old experiences, no longer
Are we tempted

[Hook]



[Intro]
Uh, it's a new world, it's a new world
It's a new world, it's a new world
Uh, it's a new world, it's a new world

[Verse 1:]
Yo, celebrate the new life
New ways to make money
New ways to break dummies
Forge they name and take money
Computers ain't that smart
Whatever man built could be taken apart
Anything new can get old
Like dudes started rockin' platinum, some stopped wearin gold
Solar-energized rides, no steering wheel, tell it how to drive
No propellers in the sky
Airplanes like many rockets
Waitin lists for the rich to get tickets to visit Mars
While the poor people starve, computers takin over they jobs
A man's forced to live off land
Now it's back to the caveman era
When we made fire, by two sticks rubbin together
The truth is, many are too scared of new data
America Online, cut off, see you later

[Hook] 2x
Yo, welcome to the new world, new beginnin
A new way to play, a new way a livin
Cash is the past, a new way a spendin
New life for man, children, and women

[Verse 2:]
Yo, the new Mike Tyson's Roy Jones
Bill Clinton's the new JFK, without the hole in his dome
The new Don Trump is Bill Gates
Not because his occupation, it's cause we respect his cake
And cake mean his stock, net gross
Young kids step it up, go for the most
New cameras in police cars takin pictures
New hustlas gettin new street figures
And US embassies overseas
Almost every foreign country's under seige
Covertly startin wars, CIA, NAVY Seals
Commit larcenies that be worth over mil's
Oil in the earth spills
Girls blow they body up, birth control pills
African's pick diamonds out a dark caves
Then we wear it on our necks just so we can light up the stage

[Hook]

[Verse 3:]
Say goodbye to the brainwashed
Say goodbye to the young kids who not smart
Say goodbye to the toasters and Pop-Tarts
Yo, it's real
Swallow a little pill, there's a four-course meal
Say hello to the one world
Say hello to the sky, somethin's out there watchin you and I
More enticin than Star Trek, StarTec phones
Your genes and DNA is used to make clones
You got CD-Rom, everythang operates by computers
Then what happens when circuit breaks?
Y2K's the big scare
Scientists say we ain't prepared
What I feel is contrare
Alexander Graham Bell made telephones, yes
But now we request for your e-mail address
I might be old fashioned, stuck in my ways
But nothin make me more happier than seein today

[Hook]



Braveheart for life

(*sample - repeated 8x* Z-z-z-zone Out)

Salaam Remi! Yea, What, Yea
I want y'all to blast on these niggas, man

[Verse 1: Jungle]
Tuck in your chain put your watch in your pocket
Here come the Braveheart straight out the projects
We live the life where the blood spills
Same thing that get you cash nigga, get you killed
Warnin', Jungle always keep a gun on him
Pull out, {*shooting sound*}, forehead yawning
Sloppy, droppin' you birds
Close range so my bullets don't swerve, curve
No bullshit, back in ya head, find me
Call Earl, death is the ways of the world
Y'all made criminals tryin' to wild out there sold crack
Bust guns at Bow Wow's age
Fightin' in jail, lookin' for heaven, livin' in hell
Fuckin 'em hoes, boilin' coke since I was 12
Way too foul walk around all the time
With a gray Mack 10 and a pocket full o' dimes

[Verse 2: Wiz]
Braveheart to the graveyard, let's go niggas
Scared straight, but FUCK them hoes
Keep it, dead serious
Believe it don't believe us, until you see me creepin'
Now you sleep with them fishes
G-W-I-Z, so delicious
To all them ghetto and sober bitches in 'burban districts
I'm movin on passin' chumps, and very thoroughly promoted by God's Son
And this is the military turn it up
My oozie weighs a ton. a ton, your son less thump nah
Heat talk feet walk you run uh
Rat ta-tat, Hear them shots come
Drop son, pull out
You better send 'em back son, or feel that casket
The peeps be like one (one)
I'm movin on passin' chumps, and very thoroughly promoted by God's Son

[Verse 3: Nas]
G-O-D S-O-N I S-O-O-T-H-E a female's estrogen
With my testosterone, male hormone
Enough for a giant's body, science S-C-I-E-N-C-E
Don't tempt me, EMS against you, me I'm just, invincible
Like Mike Jack said, for me and Al Sharpton won't be Broke in Harlem
That's that, who made this style, solo or X
Are you TFO's doctor or Mobb Deep
Whoever, I freaked it yes, so meet ya death
I never wear Esco, I got a New Line comin' like cinemas
Remember the, original, y'all still tryina show niggas ya rich
Town house niggas
I'm six cribs deep, six bank accounts in six countries
Na I'm lyin', who gives a fuck that's so tired
While pictures of Bravehearts just livin' it up
A million of us, each nigga inchin' ta bust
You got a house in Virginia
The only way you sicker than us
Gettin' bagged with .22's now you's a ridiculous fuck
No need for the gun play, it's ok, cause you dyin' anyway

[Verse 4: Jungle]
Yo, this is for them high school drop outs
Niggas who copped out
If you prefer shots over knockouts
Sniffin' coke, smokin' weed
Sellin' crack, sellin' smack
You thuggin' it, you ain't turn it back
Braveheart's gettin' money ruthless 'till the world end
Gettin' high with my enemy's girlfriend
I used to have a bike on a bench
Now I got the jeep on this trip
Coke in the pot, heat on my head

[Verse 5: Wiz]
Nigga dont stop blazin' cuz ya target's movin'
Shoot 'till the gun's empty stupid, Queens
Niggas so ruthless, really excuses is
Useless to these swift executioners
And thats Queensbridge nigga, all day
Pump packs o' crack, smoke purple haze
Runnin from D's quickly knockout rookies
G Wiz you know what I'm all about
To all my real niggas

(*sample - repeated until end* Z-z-z-zone Out)



[Hook]
I'm pregnant, don't know who the dad is
I'm happy, but this shit's the saddest
I'm maintaining, still keeping my status
Fuck what you haters say, my ass is still the fattest
Roll with the baddest, my girls in Gucci glasses
How could you pass this? Your loss
But I ain't tripping - I'm still the boss
I won't be another black girl lost
Lost, lost, lost, lost, Lost, lost
I won’t be another black girl lost

[Verse 1]
Brown and beautiful, black and stunning, light and delicious
Chocolate colored strawberry kisses and cherry lipstick
Very mystic, bald stitches her wig
Kinky curly and dread, goddess gon' grant my wishes
Tantalizing touches, succulent skin, we should wed
Start off broke then stay together 'til we make it big
My queen is english, Sojourner Truth, I could learn from you
Never Ike Turner you, but look what you turn and do like
Get out of order, you're not a supporter of my dream
Rich girl fantasy schemes, a good man she needs
But she young and she speeding, honey now, what's the reason?
You just met this nigga, think you owe him a fucking threesome
So you lustin' to have a baby by a Denver Nugget
You don't love him, you want security, baby, your bugging
Financial liberty you're after, it's how you live
But the blood test shows it's not even his kid

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
Chanel bags, everything
She shopping every time she gets a wedding ring
This her 3rd marriage, 4 carats
Brand new Jag, deserves to have it
Temptation, she can't let go her dirty habits
Mid 30's, spendin' dough at Magic
She's dancin', romancin', she's up at Manson
She fucks all my mans, and they pop the magnums
So now what you gonna do, the morning-after pill is way overdue
'Posed to get married, now you embarassed
Who does this kid belong to?
Promiscuous, cuz' she got touched by step-dad, sex at
Such a young age, if you was a virgin, I'd get mad
Sick society, blaming yourself so wrong
I highly respect you, bet that, strong, intelligent
This song ain't to poke fun of you, to get laughs
I just love you, really love you
Here for you, wanna trust you
Wanna cuff you, be my lady
But first, I gotta see the baby

[Hook]

[Outro]
Ladies, I believe in you
We gotta stop this craziness out here, though
We gotta get right
Because when we both get right, we both take flight
Us real men need you, for real



Intro
[Nas] *talking
I want to dedicate this song right here
To Jonathan Jackson and George Jackson
Peace to those brothers

I want to shout out my man Sherm the Worm
Eighty years
Come home nigga
Come home, niggers

Ugh

[Verse 1]
I just burnt my American flag
And sent three cracker Nazis to hell and I'm sad
Ugh, I'm loading tefs in my mag
To send these redneck bigots some death in a bag
Choke him out with his confederate flag
I know these devils are mad
Little rap fans who live way out in safe suburbia
Would you stand with me, a United States murdurer?

Chorus:
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
Huh? Would you Testify?
You buy my songs
You buy my songs
But will you ride with me?
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
You understand my struggle
That's what you claim right?
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
Then get your aim right
And get your game tight

[Verse 2]
Don't buy my songs, y'all don't roll with it
Coming to concerts singing ho and shit
Fuck y'all lil' lil' ho bitches
I don't need y'all, I'll go gold with it
I heard y'all was downloading it (heh)
Like I'm y'all man who be exposing shit (heh)
Like uhh, William Cooper
Who told you the Pale Horse is the future

Chorus:
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
Would you testify on some realness like that?
I think you scared (heh)
I don't think you prepared
Yeah
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
You know what I'm asking you?
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
Do you know what I'm asking you? (*laughs)
Wow...
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
Wow...
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)
*sings (Testifyyyyy for me)



[Verse 1: Nas]

What up?
Escobar season begins
Repent your sins
Nine-Six
Trackmasters
Check it

Spark the lye with the eight-forty I fly
Pretty thug show no love its like when doves cry
Maybe I'm just too demanding, parked the Land
Mark Buchanan, fuck a job I'mma die scramblin
Digger gold, dig a bigger hole in ya soul
Que Pasa, Pablo's throne cabron
At the airport the Mobb picked me up in a truck
Jewelry chunky like fuck never scared to get stuck
So whats the deal Papi?
Heard the feds could of knocked me
Had the cuban posse all up in my room and lobby
Negotiating, my name holds weight, we motivatin'
Hustling, as if God was dancing with Satan
The Firm waitin', to get ajourned cause we facing
Double life, thuggin for life, you taste it
The white numbin ya toungue
I bought it from Dominicans
A suitcase of benjamins swung tight in his fingers
Had the Firm gun slingers, hit the lights, grab the white
Murder everything in site, and jet in the Bimmers
Now im home with the phone screaner
Resting the stones in a jewelry cleaner
Checkin my mail reading my supoena
To the witness standing, I got remanded
Livin on the 4th building and can't stand it
Gotta fight my case from the inside
Niggas telling, I felt it coming when my pockets started swelling
But thats the game for ya
Hid a stash to ya lawyers
Supreme court, Queens New York will bore ya'
Suited up, booted up, with the jail cut
Million dollar bail what?
Z put up the house and I was out
Word the Fuck Up
Time to get the shit on son
Tryna trap a nigga
Incarcerate me yo'
Check it tho, yo, yo

Im gonna make it if I try, cross my heart hope to die
(cross my heart hope to die)
Im gonna make it if I try, cross my heart hope to die

Praise the Lord, ive been scarred with hot water
Days are shorter, next court dates around the corner
Money ain't the same, shit is outta order
Since the days of Rich Porter
Something gotta give, I ain't trying to bid
Now I run up in cribs, body shit, but no women no kids
In the Bridge where the murderers live
I used to make a quarter million monthly
I was ill until they sunk me
Killed the snitch with the pump 3 shots
Bought a passport off a junkie
The Firm helped me flee out the country
Word and I'm out, Pakastinian land
Chilling with my man Jungle
The commissioner Stout
Killa B, what it is nigga firm biz



[Intro: Michael Kiwaunuka]
Do I want to rule the world?
Or will it conquer me?
Do I (?)
Or will it turn to me?
Do I lose my mind?
Cause it's been wandering
Will they ever let me out?
I've been wondering

[Bridge: Nas]
I came from the city, yeah
I came from the city, yeah
I came from the city, yeah

[Verse: Nas]
I came from the city, yeah
Got my name from the city, where?
The most dangerous city, let's take a trip back
Back in the time
1977, it was maximum crime
The president neglected us, him and 6 masterminds
Six powerful men put New York through some drastic times
The rich and selfish ones feed off the welfare ones
And which borough suffered the worst? Hmm where I'm from
The Bronx
We had to rumble with rivals on the rubble
While buildings around us would crumble
I dream right but it seem like nothing find me be trouble
I see the light, it's right there at the end of the tunnel
Had to find my rope to pull me up
Cause I needed some kind of hope to fill me up
Till I met one guy, took 'em under the wing
I coulda died if this man ain't intervene
He was an orphan, my savior
Free spirited, no man braver
He was honored and gifted, his name was Shaolin Fantastic
The lady killin' romantic, can't forget the day we met
And this story be canceled but yo my life began last year
Sophomore High School, that summer I saw her, said to myself
She'll be my wife soon

[Outro: Michael Kiwanuka]
Take me out of my self (?)
Help me lose control
Show me love, show me happiness
I can't do this on my own
Take me out of my self (?)
Help me lose control
Show me love, show me happiness
I can't do this on my own



[Intro: Nas and Kelis]
What nigga! What bitch-ass niggas! What!
Babe, babe, start the car!
(Nasir, come on, let's go!
Get in the car now, let's go! Throw it out, let's go!
Aight, aight, aight, yeah
But I got 'em. But I got 'em, though
(This is crazy, why didn't you just throw it out of the car?
This is so stupid, what are you doing?
Why are we even out here?
Why are we out here? What's going on?
This is retarded, yo, we gotta…
This is crazy. Never again
You'd throw everything away, for what?

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, my man Kool G Rap told me, "Son, do not look back"
Chill up in the mansion with a fat glutious max, relax
When people act schoolin' with facts, tell 'em
At this point in my life I'm all about chillin'
Ridin' around in something sick and the dress flies
And twist, homie's hermano just died, I gotta let it ride
That's what I got the public thinkin', my nigga
Just ‘cause I ain't in the hood don't mean shit, my nigga
I know who died before the body dropped
I know the guns that were used
How much money the shooter got
‘Cause on the private yacht I'm still within earshot of it all
The top ten list of the most grimiest guys of all time
Is all we talk when we talk in New York, y'all
Who to call and who to stay away from
Whose mother's address to have just to play it safe, son
Women they lust up so quick to give 'em up
What cars and what trucks they drive in
What towns they spend the most time in when they grindin'
I found out most of them are cowards
They hidin' behind reputations that's sour; I'm not going back

[Hook: Kelis and Nas]
The streets keep tryin' to say
Come back around this way
I've already gone that way
I won't go back today
I'm not going back!
X2

[Verse 2: Nas]
First thing that happen when you make a little paper
You think the Marriot is livin' in a skyscraper
Till you come across some ever more flyer paper
Realize that five-star tellies are even greater
Terry-cloth robes, elegance, movie shit
Heated-up marble floors with jacuzzis in it
First-class flights, diamonds in your crucifixes
All those things, you still ain't really doing shit, kid
‘Cause in reality, I'll earn my salary
The way I flaunted it then would now embarrass me
It kinda make me wanna hate bling
It's a race thing how they sell blacks to bootleg shit
In fact, real millionaires spend 60 mil on paintings
Whores charge niggas with raping
‘Cause we come out doors of Maybach cars
Watch us make bets on race tracks, smokin' cigars
So they counter the laws to take what's ours
'Bout 500K on a lawyer to beat the charge
So you can't stop us from making a billion dollars
Instead of going back, I'm buying the projects
But I'm not going back
The hood's in me forever y'all, but I'm not going back

[Hook]

[Outro: Nas]
And of course y'all know what I'm not going back to
Those no friends of mine… (And I'm not going back to)
Ten carat gold, it shine… (And I'm never going back to)
Sony, if they don't have dough to sign…
(Not going back to)
Y'all know that I'm not going back to
Those liars who would… (Not going back to)
Not help you if they could… (Not going back to)
Coke on the stove in the hood…
Y'all should know that I'm not going back
The hood's in me forever y'all, but I'm not going back

[Hook]



[Keon Bryce]
There's a war in the streets tonight
And nobody's really feeling alright
I got a blunt for my chronic, a juice for my tonic
I know now that I'm feeling right if it goes down
Cause my third eye sees the lowdown
And I know it's not my time to go now
Cause God's got my back in this showdown
So I know we'll be alright

[Nas]
Yeah, Brooks Brothers overcoat, know the ropes, smooth is holding those
Briefcase, silk ties, slick as them older folks
Silver fo'-fo', got no
My chauffer driver just left some of my colleagues smoking that Cali
Caught a glimpse of myself in the Barney's shop window
Kinda' see my father's features creeping in a little
Got an office on Broadway, business in Jamaica
Tell my daughter try the hardest so the best schools'll take her
And I'm late to a date with my wife, I realize
I stopped to shop, had to get her some type surprise
And I'm walking through it, chaos is all around me
But God got me, no fear, through the fire pride stop

[Keon Bryce]
There's a war in the streets tonight
And all this drama's got me feeling uptight
I don't know what I'll do if I don't see my boo
Cause she's standing on the corner of Linden Boulevard
Holding our baby in her baby in her arms
So hold on, your daddy's in sight

[Nas]
Yeah, Nine-four, Destiny opens her eyes
For the first time, praise God, baby mom's crying
Planned to be a strong black family
But we both were too young, too strung, too much flashing
Newcomer called Verbal Assassin running with
Nothing but the worst type, worst fight
When we brought my baby home the first night
Cursed like sailors, burst out the crib raging
In my new car bought from entertainment
Champaign and gaining clout fast, whiplash
Did this bitch just pass in the club pugged up, stupid ass
Grabbed her by the pony tail, "never disrespect me"
I'm a street vet, regret the sex, but not Desi
Moved back to your grandma, I'm single, the land's mine
She keeps the Benz, I'm all in the streets again
Squeezing the pen, released again, chart toppers
Hard-bottoms blessed the feet, now less baby mom's problems
New woman, she's great, this a different world
Checking out my wife's chemistry with my little girl
It's so amazing playing, life is so crazy
I've grown up the thankful for lessons God gave me

[Keon Bryce]
There's a war in the streets tonight
And nobody's really feeling alright
I got a blunt for my chronic, a juice for my tonic
I know now that I'm feeling right if it goes down
Cause my third eye sees the lowdown
And I know it's not my time to go now
Cause God's got my back in this showdown
So I know we'll be alright



[Intro]
Yo, yeah
It's that Queens shit, the real shit
Illmatic
It's the N-A-S, yes
Yo

[Chorus]
I wake up every morning
Thinking what we gonna do today (what we gonna do today)
There's got to be a better way (got to be a better way)
To maintain is the price of fame, life is like a dice game
Maintain is the price of fame, life is like a dice game

[Verse]
1, 2... I never knock a brother, I'm anti-jail for real
Smooth criminal skill, locked in a human flesh shield
Watching niggas get rich beside me
Pushing a 5 B-Y me up in the passenger seat
But I see me as Hallie Selassie in my kingdom
Sipping Asti Spumante, dripped in, reality kicks in
I need the papes to start clicking
Got a connect out in Richmond, ain't nigga in the fam will pitch in
It's on, word is bond, that's my name, big Nas, all wise to civilize
From the Northern Hemisphere of the earth
Peace to my seed and thanks for her birth
Destiny, that's her name
It's going on, you know my name
Big Nas in the house, y'all, on the freestyle tip
When I finish this shit, it's sure to be a hit
Peace, peace



[Hook]
In America you'll never be free
Middle fingers up, fuck the police
Damn, can't a nigga just breathe?

Braveheart, still QB's Finest
Grinding, enough diamonds to change the climate
Not only do you see a nigga shining, you can see a nigga breathe

Jewels enchanted like they was new from Atlantis
Cruise with the hammer, jealous heart, they can't stand him
Haters are scandalous, damn, can't a nigga just breathe?

To all my niggas getting money in the streets
Middle fingers up, fuck the police
Light up my trees, and I just breathe

[Verse 1]
I twist 'em, baby mama beef victim
Chronic leaf hittin', all kinds of heat with him, wisdom
From pot to piss in to high position
Intense hustle, it's pain like a pinched muscle
'Til it rains and my Timbs stain my socks
'Til I dodge enough shots, and the presiding judge slams a mallet
And says life I'mma guap, then I cop
Then I yacht, Then I dock
Island hopping away from nightmare holders
Or cowboy slingers who shoot up any club
That see they names ring loud on some FBI poster
Must be on Ex or he coked up, suggesting I post a
Bail, I'm like yes, cause we soldiers
We just getting older, in time, we still in our prime
I can't afford a new arrest on my folder
Nigga breathe

(Chorus)

[Verse 2]
I'm fresh out of city housing, and have too many options
Pennies on a pension or penitentiary bounded
Plenty henny in me, envy was simply they trend, see
My enemy was every hater that was bigger than me
The high life, the fly life
Pierre Hardy, imitation of Christ
Ice-wear gaudy, since '94 flossy
The Lex was an excellent choice, now fast forward me
The pestilence of the ghetto informed me
As a shorty, to push nothin' less than a 740
With fresh linens, sip Pellegrinos with Airs on
They sick, mixing they water with airborne

[Outro]
Oh, they so sick!
Look how I got 'em going crazy, look at that!
You gotta let it out, stress...ain't good man
You gotta breathe

Breathe...
America, we gotta be free

Breathe... (x4)



[Verse 1: Nas]
Cup'a Hen', cup'a Goose, cup'a Cris'
White chain, colored watch on a wrist
Switch lanes in monster whips, ambience
Specially dressed, guess who? -- Nas, it's obvious
Step to bars, we just order dark liquors
Clear liquors, y'all niggas are s-e-x
Yes we get respected, eclectic messages
Left our brains, straight into a female's estrogen
She feels electric, her breasts she's touchin' them
Wet 'tween the legs from this thug seduction
N-a-s, bend they ass, over-spank it
Whisperin' she loves intelligent gangstas
Call fatties 'bubbles', call head 'skull'
Before I get either I need some Red Bull
She'll scream as I pushed in her freezing cold pool
When she piss she gon' bleed in the whole stool
That's how much I wanna bang and touch her pretty thing
Won't pluck no chicken wing, don't fuck with just anything
Gotta come up, run up and get touched up
Suicide, that's if you confront us

[Hook]
Don't talk, just hold your breath (breath)
Been here a while, only one nigga left (left)
And all'a y'all know my style (style)
I spend dough but I still let it pile (pile)
Mama shake ya thing
Coochie get wet while the bass beat bang (bang)
You put it on and on and on and on
Everybody talkin' 'bout the new Nas song

[Verse 2: Nas]
Uh, from a boy to a king
Love to rock diamonds and fancy rings
I'm a thoroughbred, real heavy mayn
I'm fuckin' something tonight that's on everything
Fellas who beat bodies with me
Kidnappers and stick-up kids, they all poli' with me
Pop bottles with me, button-up shirts and throwbacks
Old cats only roll when I'm in the city
And the dance floor it's disgustin'
Move your waistline to the basic percussion
I'm that, cool laid-back don who won't say nuttin'
And laugh when a nigga start frontin'

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
Rock Tims, rock Chucks, rock Bapes
Her light eyes, pretty lips, fly face
First you said you would spread for me in an instant
See me with the next chick, now you act different
Power of the stick shift, now I embarrass her
Play your position, you way outta character
Do the knowledge, graduated hood college with honors
Pay homage to Nas, Dickies and Converse
On the eyes shades in the nighttime regardless
The army's so thick you can't harm us

[Hook]



[Nas]
Nasir bin Olu Dara Visqu Allah
Fist full of dollars in a dice game god
D & D glass cloth Kangols guided by angel with white wings
Nas the Viking fresh from my ankles thankful
Gangster see gangster do I'm Langston Hughes predecessor
Gun on my dresser slang I use upset college professor
More knowledge than Webster dictionary obituary column plus sign 'em
The first fake rapper murdered for rhyming
The jig is up gut 'em like fish swiss cheese 'em up
My wrist is freezing up sick of these ducks on my hiatus
Poking out their chest like they tall as sky scrapers
But they small as a shanty in a African village
Soft as cotton candy we assassins and killers
Let shottie off in club floors pellets spraying your familia
You screaming like you love war

[Hook: repeat 2X]
Everybody's crazy
Somebody's gonna get shot get rob get done get stomp get drop
Ladies love thugs and my thug love hip hop
Thugs love ladies and ladies they love hip hop

[Nas]
Peace fuck you with a fist in your ass
You pussy with yeast, you shook of the streets, you a Sisqó fag
You know blood baths I makes 'em fake thugs I hate 'em
8 slug I'm bustin' no discussion or waiting
Cause now Instead of coke rhymes it's laying
No analog it's digital criminals turned rapper times is changing
Niggas get flashier houses more plusher
Bitches giving ass up at ages more younger
Hands on the clock keep turning, hands on a Glock they keep squeezing
Bullets stop in your sternum they stop you from breathing
I'm light year far your mouth get all white
When I'm near you I frighten your heart
I want you to watch me notice stare look closely
Feel I'm who you posed to be real I know it hurts you
Soldiers approach you, you want to squash it, you older than most dudes
Although Nas did you and your whole crew, but

[Hook]

[Nas]
I know where niggas sleep; it's too many schemes too many plots
War plus money man I got too many spots
Hungry niggas get tutored to thinking new shit to come up
Killers fuck with killers you sleeping you getting stuck up
Not me your not ready I'm low but I be watching
We all connected so your man know my man
Your man knows my fam' they was cool when they was locked up
Beat cases and now niggas back on the block what
Bothers is taking secret routes when they drive
Tinted windows ears to the street stay on their job
Peep niggas that got prices on their head so high
Their own my will take the contract surprise
So we play a mental game intimidation
Got pussy niggas get pressed up on and paying
I wish these niggas would step up wait for the day an
Since I'm famous they thinking assault rifles won't be spraying
Who ever thinking coming to my vault for the safe
I got some niggas with acid get it thrown in your face
Play dirty catch your moms in J-30
Whatever whodie we all crazy we all 7:30 now

[Hook]



[Nas]
[Verse 1]
Yeah, yeah, yeah
You was born in the eighties, pops drove a Mercedes
Did a bid, coming home to some grown ass kid
Crack baby turn to young thug, description might fit you
Look around it might hit you
No joke, I wanna pistol fight with you
Shit comes around faster than you think
Blood and white chalk makes pink, so what's that make you?
Become a creature of habitat, the average cat
Won't see where it's at, or where it's going
The hood waits for no one
I've been through it from Ewings to Buicks, to body viewings
Car chases to court cases, to fly vacations
From wanting it all, to being the object of your admiration
Imagination is what they lack
It stops niggas from getting stacks
Feeling trapped on the block with loose cracks
Wisdom is vital for the survival of the street's disciple

[Hook]
"From the day you were born" (Olu Daru sample)
"Starring out, a young disciple" (Nas Sample)
"You had that gleam in your eye" (Olu Daru sample)
Disciple of the projects!
"From the day you were born" (Olu Daru sample)
"Street's Disciple" (Nas Sample)
"Disciple of the projects" (Olu Daru sample)

[Nas]
Moonstruck stuck, slow as molasses in my actions
That's compliments of a fast spliff in the night life
In my flight jacket, adrenaline heightened, mimickin Tyson
After watchin him cut up Razor Ruddock
In the gutter, which was once ghetto prophecy is now ghetto scripture
Lookin back at it, blowjobs from pretty crack addicts
Older Gods wantin no static, told some lil' niggas they can have it
Coke baggin and toe-taggin
They took Will, let me describe him, a live one
I think that he was the true +God's Son+ - not Jesus, but fearless
His ear was up on them sounds too, he'd hear somethin
Not to his likin, and say 'Son they bitin you"
He never got to see my debut, wild-mannered
But wild with them hammers, niggas frontin couldn't stand it
Took him off the planet, left us in 9-2
With the philosophy of what arms do, a true street's disciple

[Hook]

[Nas]
Plug the mics up, I'm ready to rock, knocking
Reminiscing of measuring pots of Pyrex, cook in the kitchen
Captain Hook to these infants
It's like my folks is still on the benches
Surrounded by villains and henchmen, was a killer convention
1991, son, gold fronts on the facial, gun buck by the naval
Disciple could blaze you, we laced it with embalming fluid
Rhyming to music all this time
Fighting 'bout how Kane and Rakim would do it
Seemed impossible to us that we could ever leave
From the block, where the world was forever freezing
Hell if I ever let them shovel me, son, in this cell again
Fuck these devil policemen, plush leathers, I need them
Risking my freedom, burners in bubble coats
Fuck a sermon from the neighborhood pope
He's sexing ho's, old fart, he's busting ones when he stroke
Multi-colored Pelle Pelle's, young stretch mark bellies
Babies born in a cycle, future disciples

[Hook]



[Nas]
Uhh..
Uh.. speak without thinkin..
Speak without speakin.. huh..
Feel without reachin, uhh
That's what it's about
It's about that, inner, inner love, yaknawmean?

Chorus: Nas
God love us hood niggas (I know)
Cause next to Jesus on the cross was the crook niggas (I know)
And the killers, God love us good niggas (I know)
Cause on the streets is the hood niggas, uhh
And I know he feel us, uhh
God love us hood niggas (I know)
Cause he be wit us in the prisons
And he takes time to listen, uhh
God love us hood niggas (I know)
Cause next to Jesus on the cross was the crook niggas, uhh
But he forgive us

[Nas]
He who has ears, let him hear
And he who has sight, let him see
He who has life, let him be
See everything goes through change
Those who know don't talk
And those who talk don't know a thing
Men are born soft and turn tough
Dead lay a stiffened heart, I've been kissed by God
I've been hurt, I've been marked for death, almost ripped apart
By the beast but he missed his mark
Alone in the dark my thoughts had sparked up
When I saw my body on the floor, from above I watch it all
Yo it came to me, the pain in me
Many slain empty skulls where a brain should be
It strangely seemed, like it was a dream
But the si-rens had never woke me
Only reason I'm here now is cause God chose me
And to me, I'm only just a crook nigga
But God love us hood niggas

Chorus

[Nas]
Day by day by day I sit back and pray
My thugs get packed away, in a maxi-cage
They pass away, they went off the casket way
My gats will spray, but that won't bring em back today
So long my crimies now gone for eternity
The team we got left on the set, now turn to me
Can't speak, tears in my eyes, revenge in my mind
I ride past the church where they got his body and find
They takin him to the hearse to put his body in dirt
That's it, pay my respects, wipe my tears with my shirt
Now it's time to do work, out of love and retribution
As loyalty, he would die for me, no excuses
Loadin clips up, countin bullets carefully
For self, though it feels like, he was there for me
Saw the enemy, I ate him, saw Jakes behind me
They ain't knock me, it's obvious that God's watchin me
Chorus

[Nas]
Jealousy in the hood, felonies in the hood
Thugs wit guns become celebrities in the hood
Yo it's beef in the hood, smoke trees in the hood
Little girls have seeds by O.G.'s in the hood
It's food in the hood, it's drugs in the hood
You can choose if you would, coke to sniff
Dope to ooze in your blood, parolees
Ex-cons live in the hood, it's jobs in the hood
You can starve in the hood
Your best friends'll fuck your baby moms in the hood
But it's good in the hood
I was raised in the hood
Was taught how to walk and duck strays in the hood
I stays in the hood, got my ways from the hood
Learned to play ball go to the NBA, in the hood
There's AIDS (uh) in the hood (WHAT?)
Our lives are the worst, on top of that, we broke
That's the main reason why God, love us the most

Chorus 2X



[John Lennon]
Imagine there's no heaven
It's easy if you try
No hell below us
Above us, only sky
Imagine all the people
Living for today

[Rap Verse 1: Nas]
Imagine we could all get along
Won't be long
Til that day comes
Mothers, stop cookin', take off your aprons
Father, stop lookin' at every sports station
Take a second
And think of every poor nation
Making weapons
They can't afford a plate, no proper healthcare
Over here in Section 8, a lot on welfare
Yo, the wealthy laugh, the market crash, economy's bad
How did we change it, newsflash about a power that's dangerous
How do we escape these brainless acts of terror
I'd tell you now, if Jesus ever comes, it'll not be better
Put our hearts in the right place
Humans of all colors
We stand up as one race, I promise you, one day
Imagine that

[John Lennon]
Imagine there's no countries
It isn't hard to do
Nothing to kill or die for
And no religion, too
Imagine all the people
Living life in peace

[Hook: John Legend]
You may say I'm a dreamer
But I'm not the only one
I hope someday you'll join us
And the world will be as one

[Rap Verse 2: Pitbull]
America, the
Land of the free
America, the
Land of opportunity
America
What's the point of having a Statue Of Liberty
If you turnin' refugees, back at sea
Music was made to move them
Even the devil he dances
I got a lot of questions
And I'm searching for answers
We taught to believe in religion, but religion's
The reason the Twin Towers are missin'
Listen
That was the past, but maybe now, you realize
The man above us the only thing
That keeps us alive
We breathe the same air
We bleed the same blood
Imagine our people treated equal, imagine one love (One love)

[John Lennon]
Imagine no possessions
I wonder if you can
No need for greed or hunger
A brotherhood of man
Imagine all the people
Sharing all the world

[Repeat Hook]



[Hook]
War is necessary, war brings pain
But war is necessary, war brings peace
‘Cause war is necessary, get your warriors up
‘Cause my niggas are war ready
War brings hate (Esco,  let's go let's go let's go!)
War is necessary, war brings pain (Esco, let's go!)
Get your warriors up
‘Cause my niggas are war ready
My niggas war ready

[Verse 1]
Staring at the face of my watch, its like a crystal ball
With the ability to make the issue stall
I told my man duck, ‘cause I know where the missile fall
‘Cause the ice is a fortune teller for the rich or small
Went to my man's crib who dead and saw his picture fall
I picked it up, his voice whispered, "Nigga, ball!"
So I smoke the finest, (85 for the ocean liners?)
I do it for the have-not's, I'm at spot
That resembles screen savers on your lap tops
And niggas can't believe it like seeing that nigga Zab drop
I be in Cameroon, bandanas on silk Dior
Sip cream liqueur, green and blue FILA velour's suits
Boss smooth, the only thing I endorse duke
Stash houses, gamble, I don't sweat a lawsuit
All true in living God, we was here first
Parisian linen garb and cashmere shirts

[Repeat Hook]

[Verse 2]
Whose crew was realist? Shot up the movie theaters?
Times Square '88, whose crew was in it?
(Photographed was?) sittin' on wood wicker chairs
40oz in the lap, givin' off wicked stares
Punch out kings, bustin' pistols in the air
Hangin' out a Cutlass Supreme window like "Bitch, come here"
Girls cussing back at us with the fattest asses
Like, "Who you calling bitch?! Little black bastards!"
We had to wave the flag, here come they baby dad
Drug dealers in the crazy Jag looking crazy mad
They all thought they was sparkle, fucking killer men
But we was all Black seeds as Fred Williamson
It was so simple, now I'm reflecting in this gold Enzo
Face it, my favorite trinket was that Teddy Riley guy bracelet
So now it's fly shit I'm draped in, customized shit I'm makin'

[Repeat Hook]



[Intro: Nas]
QB, the whole NYC
We gon' bounce to this
All my niggas (yeah, yeah)
All the ladies

[Hook: Nas]
Sometimes I wonder
Will a nigga go under because of his hunger?
This game is risky
If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?
Dead partners too soon
All these niggas flippin' on me ‘cause I won't give no loot to 'em
Sometimes I wonder, sometimes I...

[Verse 1: Nas]
Top of the world is what I'm aimin' at
These niggas is flamin' gats at my circle
I catch you, my first reaction's to hurt you; I'll hit your bird, too
Two in your scalp, then you out, your thug crew is out
Blood oozin' out, some servin' caine
Knowin' nothin' about this murder game
It's easily told but hard to hear
When niggas finally find out it's real
That's when they heart pumps fear
The real remain, the weak will disappear
My words are 20/20, my vocals are crystal clear
911 style sits on your mind like chrome
Let's say your brain's a V12, put it in drive, let it roam
What color? Might as well make it the same as your dome
You need your thoughts together means destination is unknown
As we travel on this road, an infinite path
I get into this math, drop and get intense for the cash
Will I be subject to kill? Live my life by the gat?
Just when I think I made it out, the street is calling me back

[Hook: Nas]
Sometimes I wonder
Will a nigga go under because of his hunger?
This game is risky
If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?
Dead partners too soon
All these niggas flippin' on me ‘cause I won't give no loot to 'em
Sometimes I wonder, sometimes I...

[Verse 2: Nature]
I know a lot of fiends by their first name, livin' in Queens
A lot of cats gettin' stuck for they chains
Holdin' dirty guns, the young old dirty ones
Runnin' wild, nigga, I raise hell above ground
Live in sin, holdin' rocks, Benjamin Grimm
Figure once I got knocked, it would end—never that
They try to tell me I don't love my own
The thugs know, they ride my zone, like The Cyclone
Trademark for Coney Isle, yeah, they know me now
I'm givin' niggas fake hugs, phony smiles
Stack profits, you know how niggas on the block get
Try to give you dap just to stare at your pockets
Crews advance, nothin' new, just the rules of the land
You couldn't tell if they wolves or lamb (Ha, word)
You could fight like a few, there's a few that ran
Or you could feed them and lose your hand
What you wanna do?

[Hook: Nas]
Sometimes I wonder
Will a nigga go under because of his hunger?
This game is risky
If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?
Dead partners too soon
All these niggas flippin' on me ‘cause I won't give no loot to 'em
Sometimes I wonder, sometimes I...

[Verse 3: Nas]
Blessings be to the ones who left us
To transcend into spiritual essence, in Allah's arms you restin'
To Him we pray for my peeps
Louie Lloyd Floyd, Twin and Taiyeh, Mr. Sonny back in the day
"Get that money, yam," he used to say
Not only nice with hands but street smarts, he was twice a man
I try to understand life's deep plot, I think of Weewop
Shikeisha, they both was mad nice on the rock
They woulda went pro, but only God, he only knows why not
Like my nigga Bing, let your sneakers be not clean
You come around, he start snappin' on you, makin' a scene
Kept the lye, cool nigga, warm heart, and stayed fly
You still alive, I see you in your sister's face
Are you nearby or lookin' on, just from a distant place?
My thoroughbreds, Black Ed, quiet but real
Expect to see your black Jeep come fly over the hill
In the spirit of Richie Lou, tribute
Remind the world of the crime that NY pigs do, we miss you
Never forget you, Harry and Sonia
Rest in peace to Marty, a 41st side of Vernon soldier
T.J. Black, better known as Killer
I can't replace you, but in me
Havoc will always have a brother, my nigga
My man Will, until we meet again
You hold it up there, I'll hold it down here
I hope y'all hear my prayers clear

[Hook: Nas]
Sometimes I wonder
Will a nigga go under because of his hunger?
This game is risky
If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?
Dead partners too soon
All these niggas flippin' on me ‘cause I won't give no loot to 'em
Sometimes I wonder, sometimes I...

[Outro: Nas]
Rest in peace to my grandfathers, Papa Charlie...
(Will a nigga go under because of his hunger?)
Rest in peace to my man's Horse pops, nam'sayin'? One love
(If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?)
Can't forget Nana, my man L.E.S. grandmom, nam'sayin'?
(All these niggas flippin' on me ‘cause I won't give no loot to 'em)
They still wit' us, though; I wonder where they at?
(Sometimes I...) How near, how far?
Sometimes I wonder (What?)
Will a nigga go under because of his hunger? (Can't go under)
This game is risky
If a nigga slipped six feet, will these niggas really miss me?



[Intro: AZ]
Yea, yea, check it out
I see today's mathematics as being understanding, you know?
Understanding is having the ability to see things clearly
For what they are not what they present theyself to be
It completes the cipher, you know what I'm saying?
It's also symbolic to the black child which is the best part
Ayo, son, represent

[Verse 1: Nas]
Now I'm the average nigga in the street life God
I try to beat trife odds, ride my elite through the night fog and park
It's Buddha to be sparked, it's consistent
The beast smells the el because it travels long distance
Cruising in his Chrysler, pursuing niggas in my cipher
Start wildin' like insane asylum on Rikers Island
Verbal assassin, I murder freestylin'
One two for the gun crew, three drinking Cristal n
I play the side cause the words of man kill
Proverbs, buck out my grill, real as Ill Will, keep still
Nobody move nobody die, why must I be high?
Busting in trife bitches, touchin' mic switches
It's like a hot spoon of heroin, a Don like Perignon
Females love the guns I be wearing
Plant my seeds to live infinite, indeed in my sentences
I flow demandin', that's understandin'

[Verse 2: Nas]
850 Tempo but rugged like a Pinto
Chop shop hip-hop, burn the block intro
High priests release voodoo, déjà vu and this taboo
Illmatic shit and what have you
Chef cocaine cook, no brain got the proper diction
My competition bleeds words and weed blurs my vision
I'm freezing in time, stop the rhyme
I'm sober in stolen Range Rover much crime
I, stick up America, Nas in your area
Disrupt the sound barrier, clowns get pounds of terror
A full whip for more clips then Clint has in his era
Dirty Harry, cold black the uncanny, of Kojak
A Beretta sticking up trucks carrying amaretto
Clever to entice 'em, herbs I'm micin' while I'm pricin'
Niggas like they're slaves, best behave I'm the nice one
Nas, broken down for Nasir, please protect your
Pop Dukes, resurrection international hoes, I'm sexin'
Or you'll be fucking one section, question?
Does a lonely mic give me an erection?, yes, son
On a float like the Jetsons futuristic rappin' mysitic
Bust it, try and diss while my finger is on the iron biscuit
I rhyme terrific sparklin' like the diamond district
It's understanding



Distant Relatives Album Art:
Track List:

1. As We Enter
2. Tribes at War (ft. K'naan)
3. Strong Will Continue
4. Leaders (ft. Stephen Marley)
5. Friends
6. Count Your Blessings
7. Dispear
8. Land of Promise (ft. Dennis Brown)
9. In His Own Words (ft. Stephen Marley)
10. Nah Mean
11. Patience
12. My Generation (ft. Joss Stone & Lil Wayne)
13. Africa Must Wake Up (ft. K'naan)
14. Ancient People (ft. Junior Reid)



[Hook]
I know you think you got it together player, but fuck the bird you with
And listen close to the makings of a perfect bitch
Listen close to the makings of a perfect bitch
There's always one thing wrong and you wish that you could switch
Or fix, while you shapin' every curve and hips, you heard of this?
The makings of a perfect bitch

[Nas]
A ghoul at night, I role like Jack the Ripper trying to choose my wife
I need a ass of a stripper, fat lipper
Mad niggas in this one predicament
You try to choose a loyal one and stick with it
My stupid dick again searching for something to jump and then start humpin'
Convincing me that the history of a woman is about leaving a nigga with nothing
So my experiences taught me how to come up with a plan to make a right one for the man
A toy for the boy, the one that righteously will understand
And since I can't find her I guess I gotta make her
I creep in the night like a kinky undertaker
I think I'm on a caper to abduct a nerd from the Ivy League
Next stop at the strip club snatch a bad one and flee
What's next, I'm stakin' out a five star restaurant to kidnap the chef
Say goodbye to the stress

[Hook]

[Nas]
I stitch 'em together then I kiss 'em forever
These surgical gloves are made of love, couldn't be better
Four cycles of blood, child birth first
Men-e-stral cycle, last men-e-stral cycle then death
That's four, so I guess rebirth is the fifth
Put 'em together, that's a genius, a slut and a chef
Holdin' the scalpel while cutting the flesh
Heavy bleeding, so I need suction, it's such a mess
If she survives she'll be sucking me next
Dark nipples on her D-cup breasts so I could titty fuck while she do
My taxes for the IRS
So I could just relax, shit, by now I'm blessed
I'm her daddy, I'm her messiah, I'm god
Cause I injected obedience and loyalty in her heart
Know you mad cause you with a bitch that nag you to death
I smack mine on the ass and she breathe her first breath

[Hook]

[Nas]
Gimme Sade's mystique, she gotta know her way in the streets
Like Billie Holiday in Harlem
Body from Ki Toy Johnson and Kenya Moore and Apple Bottoms
Maya Angelou's brain and some groove from Terry McMillan
Them Angelina Jolie lips, Angela Davis, Sista Souljah's wit
Helping me load clips
Some words form a pimp was, "Nas, it just don't exist"
But homes is twisted, a home ain't a home without without the misses
All the girls that I named are queens, no disrespect
But I need me someone to disappear, reappear like I dream of Jeannie
Whenever I want, I think I met her, it's on, forever I'll flaunt

[Hook]



[Intro] (Nas)
Yeah... ay yo Jungle... ay yo Wiz...
Come on man... Let's do this
It's a Braveheart party y'all
C'mon

[Hook] (Mary)
Throw your hands up cuz we wanna dance
Don't be afraid just take a chance
Cuz this beat will rock your body
Get up on the floor and party
Now y'all tell me what y'all wanna do
Thinkin' while I have a drink or two
Throw your hands up everybody
Get up on the floor and party

[Verse 1] (Nas)
I move at night, respect my gangsta
Ready for whatever you bring, the mood is right
The club is righteous, tight with family
Squeezin on big old bubbles with no panties
Ladies who's sexually free
And once in a while live on the wild side, kinky & nasty
Middle fingers up and say "Fuck the world"
Throw your hands up, they can't fuck with you girl
And my fellas, two time felons, two nine tote and lethal
Quick to leave you wide open, if you gettin' tore down
Blowin' a blunt cloud, and the DJ's makin' you feel thugged out
Put yo hands up

Repeat Chorus

[Verse 2] (Jungle)
I pull in a V12 drop all red
Look at ma with that cat paw tat on'er leg
Come here girl can I kiss you, let me lick you
Show you what your body made for, you're official
You could be my baby mama lookin like that
What you drink, champagne or Cognac
What you like dancin diamonds, Dolce Gabbana
Fendi, Louis Vuitton, Gucci and Prada
A nigga like Jungle to always come thru
Shine in yo hood whenever the fuck you want to
Cause I'mma B.R.A.V., E.H.E.A.R.T. from QB
Put'em up...

Repeat Chorus

Party all night (Party all night)
Let's drink, no fights (Let's drink, no fights)
Party all night (Whachu wan' do?)
Let's drink, no fights (Drink up...c'mon, yeah, yeah...)

[Verse 3] (Wiz)
I'm blaze, haze for days
Blackout thinkin' of ways to get paid
Mac out corner I got it's all laid
Shorty, with a nice round ass in my face
Now do she want me to touch her?
Or do she want me to see?
Fuck is she comin wit me
A true BHG Wiz, not complex
Chin checks if it get hectic
Nigga Braveheart respected
Get bent at the bar, talk shit, walk it
And if I can't talk it, the false big cop a case
I'm here to blaze, roll up a dutch and take it to the face
Throw yo hands up

Repeat Chorus 2X



[Hook: Mark B. Mayfield]
I gotta hold down the block when the block is hot
I gotta use my imagination to change the situation
I gotta hold down the block when the block is hot
I gotta use my imagination to change the situation

[Verse 1: Nas]
Yeah, feds feast on street dons, look at their teeth showin'
Salivating at the mouth, South to East Orange
Keep pourin' that liquor, but nigga don't sleep on it
You'll be giving up your Jesus piece to your peeps to pawn it
For legal fees in the penal dorm
Screaming on the horn with 'bout 30 years on your conscience
I'm watchin' brothers disappear, it's appallin'
Some dudes had just only a year of ballin'
Counter-intelligence found a strange evidence
Still we behind the wheel with heat on us
Hangin' with predicates
Position we placed in caves in, so they got us caged in
Waves spinnin' like Mike Bivens from New Edition agin'
I got families I'm feeding, ‘cause my mans is bleeding
Every five seconds look in all directions
I come through prepared, I give 'em a call
"I'm close, bring them guns downstairs"

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
Uh, uh, it's beef week, Monday, murder
Two niggas dead, Tuesday
Wednesday and Thursday is hearse-day
Friday, somebody-gotta-die day
Saturday, put the gat away
Chillin' with your chick and a bag of haze
Wonderin' how it's all gon' end
And what type of way, ‘cause Sunday back to gunplay
Most shit start over nothin'
And get finished quick ‘cause the art of repercussion
Yeah, I seen it, a G going out indecent
Taking a plea agreement, thinking he secret
Escape the crime scene, now you live straight like 9:15
Then one-time intervene
My man ain't like me sayin' I don't care if I die
But the SIG Sauer on me now I'm scared to die
You thinking the one I send to clap you be a shorty
But he old school, holdin' a .38, he in his 40s

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
Anytime brothers can't get jobs, then they rob
A man rather die than live on his knees and starve
Cops steady askin' your man what happened
First he tell, then he stop, like he not really rattin'
Guess he not really in that casket from a sawed-off
Listen, peep game from the brain of an all-star
The rain hurt niggas' bones who been shot
Metal pins in their leg, they walk with a limp-hop
The streets lie, so you better be cautious
Your man'll fry you plus everybody talkin'
A vet, a General, don't step where I walked in
Make your own path, be a legend in your skin
Make your own cash, don't stress what I'm flossin'
Don't expect more when you put in less work than all them
Queensbridge projects has taught him
And that's for life, you heard me right, I got the block

[Outro: Mark B. Mayfield]
When the block is hot
I gotta use my imagination to change the situation
I gotta hold down the block when the block is hot
I gotta use my imagination to change the situation
I gotta hold down the block when the block is hot
I gotta use my imagination to change the situation



[Verse 1: Nas]
Uh, I knew a few pharmacists, fuck frozen
They kept pneumonias on their arms and wrists
The main dude, Sekou, face look hard as shit
Remember like yesterday, they were the kings of ecstacy
Kept sellin' it, he blends in everywhere, has a mixed heritage
Bitches let him hit on the reg', waterbed seats in his car
All red Ferrari, Florida where we met at a redlight
Homeboy bumpin' my old shit
They wildin' with some freaks from the islands
Piled in behind him, limosine, Benz
He shouted, "Nas, roll with us"
I'm bored so I followed him
Nikki Beach, here's where the scene begins
He put me on to Dawn, nice ass with a set of mean twins
Had a pocket full of cash, Sekou wasn't lettin' me spend
I was there for the weekend, packed and prepared for anything
Then he brings me to his castle in Coconut Grove
War stories about dudes both of us know
Never heard drunken words spoken so slow
A year go by, the nigga was fly
Prada shoes, a lotta jewelry, stayed high
Got a call, he's in N.Y
Needs a couple of G's 'til tomorrow, I dips by
For a season where he's at
Greets me with a smile, told him "Here keep that"
Next week got a call from his wife
Said somebody done took son life
*beat changes*
She said

[Nas as Scarlett - repeat 2X]
"Who gon' hold me down now? Hold me down now
Tell me that huh -- who gon' hold me down now?
Who gon' hold me down now? Who gon' hold me down?
Tell me that huh -- who gon' hold me down now"

[Nas as Scarlett]
Forget about them other dudes, they talkin' to me rude
Cause I always knew the truth, they hated Sekou
H2 full of holes, the drove him off the road
Left him there on Biscayne, clothes stained with his brain
My soul shattered, my man's toe's tagged up
Arrangement's a closed casket
See now a ho has to, maintain with his fake gang
Sheddin' fake tears, I won't have it
Look, this kid's Jamaican -- half Hatian, half Asian
Brag about how the streets needed a changin'
Son, you the only one a bitch could call
You remind me of my dude, help me get them all

Nas: "Di-sci-ple" *scratched by DJ 3X*
Scarlett: "You remind me of my dude, help me get them all"
Nas: "Di-sci-ple" *scratched by DJ 3X*
Scarlett: "You remind me of my dude, help me get them all"



[Verse 1]
Get yours nigga
Cuz I'mma get mine
In due time
Everybody gotta shine
Get yours, I spray nines
I say this one time
The last time, I swear to y'all
I'm from where
The dope fiends is at
And killas crawl
And snitches call police
All these niggas and street
Corners everybody's like
Smokin' marijuana and
Snuffin' niggas in faces & startin' drama and
Shootin' niggas in cold blood, just kill 'em, so what
With the fo' pound go nuts
Betta slow up
Before you get your ass blown up
Nigga never gonna grow up
Drinkin' the Henney
But he know he gonna throw up
Tryin' to make crack sales
What it look like? The future for a black male
Don't want to make my momma cry
On a front page for a homicide
Fly whips, all I wanted to drive
Where chicks get blunted & ride
Do 105 in the fast lane
And a fast pace chasin' the papas
Spendin' chips on big chains
And the dimes that give brains
That was a 80's and 90's thing
Now I'm into big things

[Hook]
I ain't fuck with you
Now I'm into big things
Gotta get my life together man
Cuz now I'm into big things
Nah, I ain't gonna rhyme wit you
Cuz now I'm into big things
You know I can't do that shit no more
Now I'm into big things

Nah, I can't fuck with you
I'm into big things
Nah, I ain't gonna stand on the corner
I'm into big things
Now the talk is small talk
I'm into big things
I'm into big things
The big things
The big things

[Verse 2]
When I started this
All I wanted was cars and cribs
Like other rap artists but
Do I know where I'm goin' to?
Can I forget when I came from?
I be showin' you
Another style I'mma flow for you
Can I make somethin' wild
I can throw for you, flow for you
Make it bi-coastal
Take it to heights
That some of y'all can't come close to?
Some of y'all
Want to talk like hoes
Worse than bitches
And when y'all niggas see me blow
Bet it hurt like stitches
No competition
I stop and twist 'em
Hit 'em like a mafia proposition
I'm glad y'all stopped and listen
Thinkin' back to when I had not pot to piss in
Look up at a nigga now
Rocks are glistenin'
Can't stop my mission
Make anotha LP drop
I'm hittin'
With the new shit exclusive
No time to get caught up in a crime
I ain't have shit to do with
Used to chase the hoes
Now I chase the dough
Is y'all bitches gonna help me get paper?
No!

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
I go past y'all
Y'all got the glass jaw
And when I hit it, admit it
Y'all on ya ass y'all
We on the same team
You don't wanna pass the ball
Chuck and gunnin' for dough
You want to score
But you really don't know how to to ball
I put you on
It was me that introduced you to wealth
Crossin' me
Is like shootin' yourself
Wanna blow so fast now do it yourself
You ain't shit now
You was so ill, why you never came out
Where ya clique now
Where you sit now
In the back seat
Mad cuz I flip styles
And I pack heat
Make you run laps
Like a pro athlete
An' I done that
From my experiences
I appear relentless
Take more time
Just to hear my sentence
I'mma tell you what's real
An' what could stop you from makin' a mil
You could prevent this
When niggas don't see eye to eye to you
Lie to you
Wanna get high wit you
Want to eat food off of your labor
And take food off your table
Cuz they don't see your vision
Don't understand your mission
Is to make history
While you here
How long you plan on livin'
Not for forever
At least to 140
Pray for me
I'm tryin' to eat
Like the niggas who bought
Motown off Berry Gordy
Good God

[Outro]
Nigga I'm tired of games
I'm into big things
Gotta get my life together man
Cuz now I'm into big things
Now the talk is small talk
Cuz now I'm into big things
I'm into big things
The big things
The big things

Man we already did that
Now I'm into big things
No time to get sidetracked
Now I'm into big things
Get money now besides that
Some more big things
I'm into big things
The big things
The big things



To my niggas
To my niggas
What! What!

[Nas sings]
Looking back in time, when I had on my shine
I saw you standing there
I never tried to diss you, you didn't need your pistol
Why did you have to take it there
But then again, it was just my imagination
When my crew told me it was you that was player hating
Then we had to have that terrible confrontation
There's nothing I can do to help this situation...

Chorus: repeats 2x
[Nas sings]
Stay scheming (ya niggas kill me)
Niggas wanna get at me

Its been awhile since the last time we hung out
Full of weed, drinking henny until we all passed out
Stretch bently, Queens clique, pushing mean whips
And ho I'm with, glad who see she with
Shorty with the don
Me and horse switch cars
Jazz ruff for the six, this is it par
Thug nigga never thought I get this far
Who is that icing me from over there in the fog?
You got the mack god, you got the gat par
Dam, why they gotta do it to the black god
Everytime we chilling niggas want to act hard
My nigga Jungle known to slap a nigga back-ward
So we chill pay no mind, think about about shit
I'm for the love of it
Stubborn niggas always plotting on the brother tip
Can't even chill cause niggas just

[Nas sings]
Stay scheming
Niggas wanna get at me
Stay scheming
Niggas wanna kidnap me

But they never do it motherfuckers...



[Intro: Nas]
I want y'all to see this like film
C-Sick on production, Nas on the vocal.. let's go

[Verse 1: Nas]
Lots of fog at night, red brake lights
The freeway beside a restaurant
Cold egg whites sat on my plate like
3 AM, this is a spot frequented by some made men
I'm high on hemp
A fly old pimp just walked in, his suit was shark skin
He woke me up from some of the thoughts I'm lost in
What fame does to niggas, change love to bitterness
Friends to fiends for the audience screams, ridiculous
Jumped up, paid my tab, got in my Benz and went
To my old housing tenement, visit my old friends
Some show love and some are envious
Some got the heart of gold, some venomous
At times I wanna go back to being penniless
Ignorance is bliss, I love being innocent
Ugh, but life's got me on the fence again
And all is real so all's worth mentioning

[Hook: Ultra Naté (sampled)]
If I could press pause, or fast forward past the hardness
Visions written bring words to life like I'm smitten with
Memories real, still ill, now I appear crisp like film

[Verse 2: Nas]
Ice on gold from mossbergs to golf clubs
Ninth hole, the white rose, the life I chose
Bandanna over the eye, Dior sandals
Car doors rise with no touch of the handles
Capiche? Caprese salad’s on beaches and islands
Far from police sirens at least for a weekend
Then it's back to the streets creepin
I'd like to make a free toast of champagne on behalf of this nigga speaking
Add a splash to the Seagrams
Roll the hash for my world renowned goons this evening
As I circle the table like Babe Ruth
Louisville Slugger in my grip for a fake dude
Bat to the brain with brute force
Splatter my cream velour suit
They hit me with lawsuit
I slip in your whore coupe
Your bitch hate you, word to Jesus
Bet you never knew she toot yay and play with a gay crew
OGs hate to make way for the new
Young niggas want Polo ain't fucking with J Crew
It's safe to say I was once young and innocent
But look what I know now, is all worth mentioning

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
I speak to the street life
The executive chief types
The felons, young mothers with kids they trying to feed right
The botega wearers modern day Che Guevaras
Cuz I barely survived crazy eras
Honest, always make good on my promise
I don't talk it I do it you can hold me to it
I was born to this life I didn't invent it
But I'd be wrong not to take a few meal tickets
You and I are real different, we don't share the same beliefs
Fight in the ring or buy ringside seats
Either you like beef, or you like to spectate
Give me gloves, and I'mma do it how the refs say
We touch em and we come out tussling
The ghetto is my garden of eden
So I keep bobbing and weaving
It's intense so I'm hardly breathing
KO, and the winner is Nas, that's how the scene ends

[Hook]



[Intro: Busta Rhymes]
Ay fellas
I-I think you might wanna s-s-s-sneak your ratchet in here for this one
Ay ladies
Put the petroleum jelly on your face
Ayo Nas, we got a big bet in the streets that you knock their ass out in the first 30 seconds of the first round
Get them!

[Verse One: Nas]
Sitting up drunk, shuffling thoughts
Got paper but I'm lost
Losing focus, what a nigga still hustling for?
My seed is straight, the family's settled
Idle time get the man in trouble
When wifey tourin', my life get borin'
Start to remember all types of torment
The devil's callin', but I don't answer
Mom passed from cancer, leaving behind
Two granddaughters, two grandsons, two nines
Next to me in the Phantom, who lying?
Big screen documentaries of Idi Amin
Dada, trying to stay away from creeps
With their bullshit, trying to put me back in the streets
War stories, funerals
Where Feds be laying, from a dreadful slaying
Body viewings, at the wake
Nigga sit stiff in his Ferrari, no casket
With his eyelids still open, it's kinda spooky
Iceman watch on, the suit Gucci
I'm above the standard
But dudes is more zealous than Branford
Thinking you're too rich, they want to gun ya
Kidnap ya, cause of they hunger, but you fucking with hunters
Camouflaged in black hoods that dump clips
Cause real niggas die over dumb shit
Camouflaged in black hoods that dump clips
Cause real niggas die over dumb shit

[Hook (x2): Busta Rhymes]
Fight, fists, dance, sucker
Suicide, bounce, brother
Ice, whips, cash, nigga
Watch your, big, ass, momma

[Verse Two: Nas]
To your, power structure, Nas is dangerous
Y'all the antithesis, the opposite
Twitching shit, all up in your body language
Mean mugging your bitch, because she leans over
To look closer, told you: "Y'all sloppy gangsters", saying:
"Nas is this, and Nas is that"
Your eyes go front, your eyes go back
Surprised I'm at the same place y'all be at
It's obvious you don't know how I react
Like, I don't know where the party's at
You're foaming at the mouth, losing breath
Like a cardiac arrest, but I ain't impressed
Because the fact is, y'all don't really want it
Two to the head, four to the stomach
Call more security because, I come off
Anywhere you at, you scary cats
If you dare squeeze back, guns shall rain
A thousand times harder, than when I first came
Y'all not relentless, y'all dumb
And y'all just forgot about the consequences
Not a jail sentence, but see
The nigga you feed'll kick it to dude, that kick it to me
We posess, the recipes for death, because jealousy destroys
Feed the dog first, watch out for Salmonella poisoning
I know a kid who'll throw shit in your food
And say: "That's the way you kill a man
Avoid the shooting", hey {*echo* x4}

[Hook (x2): Busta Rhymes]
Fight, fists, dance, sucker
Suicide, bounce, brother
Ice, whips, cash, nigga
Watch your, big, ass, momma

[Outro: Quan, (Busta Rhymes)]
You smile, in my face
Secretly I know, you want my place
You waiting on me to choke, don't want a nigga to breathe
Want to come cut my throat, you want to get rid of me
But before I let it happen, them guns going to start clapping
And y'all going to rest in peace, because death is the recipe
Before I let it happen them guns going to start clappin
And y'all going to rest in peace, because death is the recipe

(Suicide, bounce, brother) (x4)



[Intro: Raye]
Oh yeah-yeah
Oh-na-na-na, uhm

[Raye]
Concrete bricks, bullet proof vests
I'm proud of these walls that I built to defend
And protect this bold heart
This bold heart
But the way you marched into my home
Not few, big army
With the weapon on your arm
Yes, you struck straight with your cold heart
Your cold heart

[Verse 1: Nas]
I'm like Nat, I'm like Nat
I'm a man of God but where is Christ at?
And even though my name is Nas I am like Nat
Is this me declaring war? White flags
I now know why I was even born
To strike back
A full moon up in the sky, that's a sign that
It's time to get my liberation, the perfect configuration
It's the birth of a nation, midwife black
Mother father, caucasian
My blood Indian, native
So now I'm contemplating being like Nat
'Bout to show you what I'm made of
I'm what racists are afraid of
No mule and the 40 acres
And despite that
Watch out for the traitors
When they say make America great again, do they mean make us all slaves again?
Don't be sidetracked

[Hook: Raye]
Is this you declaring war?
No, we will never wave the white flag, the white flag
So you think I'm gonna run now?
No, the time has come to fight back, to fight back
This is me declaring war
This is me declaring war, war
This is me declaring war, war

[Verse 2: Nas]
Don't want to be a victim no more
Depicted as a criminal, especially when you're poor
Why doesn't the government order capital punishment
To officers
Who racial profile and put slugs in us
Makes me think they want us extinct
On the brink of insanity
We screaming for justice, they sending tanks, the man in me
Demand we protect the family, anarchy
Ku-Klux-Klan and him demanding he damage me
So my fantasy is every single one of us
Come against the evil divide of people, it's common sense
The fury, I hope the whole world hear me
No justice, so I became a revolutionary
No matter if you're red, white, black
If you want freedom then we're all like Nat

[Hook: Raye]
Is this you declaring war?
No, we will never wave the white flag, the white flag
So you think I'm gonna run now?
No, the time has come to fight back, to fight back
This is me declaring war
This is me declaring war, war
This is me declaring war, war

[Outro]
Dear America, it's time for a better America
There's a little Nat Turner in every one of us
No matter if you're red, white, black
If you want freedom then we're all like Nat
War, war (war), war, war
Declare war
It's time
Let the spirit of Nat Turner live forever



[Intro]
Nas "Two-thousand-four, yeah. L, whattup?"
L.E.S. "Prophesy!"
Nas "Yeah."
L.E.S. "Prophesy baby!"

[Hook: Nas & L.E.S.]
Disciple, Disciple (What?!) Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (Let's go!)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Word to mama, any lineup of rhymers
Could bring any drama, anytime, the city's mine
Nas Is Like, Love Undying, Money's My Bitch
In Thugz Mansion, thugs dancin' around the fly shit
Pharaoh garment's Prada, Egyptian camelback-riders
Pyramid architects, Perignon bottles, money, jewelry want me then come
Get me, hit me but don't miss me, you history
Lead flowin' around like a Frisbee, Italian dons from Sicily kiss me
This ain't 50, this ain't Jigga, this ain't Diddy, this ain't Pretty
Pain, power, pussy and pistols, lyrically no one, hold none near me, hear me
Kids cheer me like The Count of Monte-Cristo
Steady poundin' soundin' like G without the lisp though
My big bro told me plain and simple, "Nas do not look back"
Watch where you took rap, no bookbags and trucker hats
Just army jacks and diamonds that's flashin'
What the fuck is that, freestyle

[Hook: Nas & L.E.S.]
Disciple, Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (Esco!)

[Verse 2: Nas]
Like Paul, Michael and Matthew, Peter, James and Andrew
Phillip, Simon and Judas -- I'm disciple of music
Street beats is the main thing minus the traitor
And I'm not a dictator, I'm the righteous invitin' you haters
Inside the life of the greatest, it'll take you through something real
Get a smack in your face, cause I hurt up, trauma-tize, llama
Bust shells, destroy yet try'ta prevent violence
If I present iron somebody dyin', don't even worry 'bout it
Then dress warm for the cemetery climate
When I speak I need cemetery silence, terror
See me, gold Hummers, Lamborghinis, man who stole the summer
Hand straight gleamin', if I don't know you toe-tag you
Drag you through the cement, fo-fo maggie
Body parts in my man's Maserati car, then party hard in Madagascar
While rigor mortis'll grab ya, him retarded, I'm pass that
Gloves on, where the mask at? Too many love songs
All the thugs gone, what happened? Where's the passion?
Rappers battlin' non-rappers, carryin' on backwards
Laughin' sayin' Nas thinks he's Farrakhan preachin' blackness
Hell yeah, awareness is my alias
Word to the 'Braveheart' written on my bare chest
The realest, HERE IT IS!

[Hook: Nas & L.E.S.]
Disciple, Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (STREET'S!)
Disciple (Street's!)
Disciple (Street's!)
Disciple (Esco!)



*Sample* Nas: "Political"

Newscaster: "Recently there has been an emergence of socially
Conscious and political rappers. It seems to be
A new trend in the Hip-Hop world."

*DJ scratches sample* Nas: "Nas is a rebel to America" 3X*

[Vers 1: Nas]
Yeah, check it, uh
Spot build-rocker, lil' papa killed Hoffa
Beard lil' longer, feel strong and I'll stop ya
Drill sergeant, still thorough, wheelbarrows of distilled vodka
Get me real bonkers like Will Ferrell on cat tranquilizer
Rap guys get bank and think they messiahs, but they liars
Vote fo who now? You're red, white and blue?
I'm American too, but I ain't with the president's crew
What you peddlin' and who you peddlin' to?
You ain't got the ghetto with you
Try'na lead my sheep to the slaughterhouse
Talkin 'bout +Rap the Vote+, you ain't thought about
The black vote mean nathan, who you gonna elect
Satan or Satan? In the hood nothin is changin, uh
We ain't got no choices who to choose
Ten-years ago they were tryin to stop our voices
And end Hip-Hop, they some hypocrites
Condoleeza Rice - I don't really get this chick
Tell her if she ever really cared about poor schools
About poor children, then she gotta prove that she
Ain't just another coon Uncle Tom fool
Like these MC's, gotta give 'em the rules
Lie to the youth, Uncle Tom you confused
Might as well give the Hip-Hop community a noose
Need a truce with the gangs and some food for the hungry
On Kerry nuts, he look at you like a monkey
You MC's on that old slavery path
The Bushs'll look at yo' ass and laugh
See, it's all about community, let's help ourselves
Cops brutalize us get dealt with with shells
It's our turn, it's 'bout time we win
Need somebody from the hood as my councilman, uh

[Hook: Kelis]
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit

[Verse 2: Nas]
Up in the steam room chillin', exfoliating the skin
Israeli men conversatin' on ends, probably businessmen
I sense good taste, and they watch us, the spots an expensive place
Manhattan New York, I'm try'na keep steamin'
It's good for the lungs, had plans for the evening
This man leans in, his boys laughing
Now I'm the spokesperson for Black men, this always happens
Says, "Since all Black women care about is who got dough
And all we do is call them either bitch or a Black ho"
I say first brotha you ain't gotta be that cold
Since you ignorant, I'mma show you how the facts go
The biggest example in scandal of history
Were Monica Lewinksy or Donald Trump's pimping spree
Most women who love Givenchy or Gucci
Are pretentious, non-Black groupies or floozies
But who are we to blame, not the dames
It's a man-made game, in essence our woman the same
Beautiful creatures, Black girls birthed the earth
So they deserve the Hermes purse
Matter fact, I'm about to go shopping with my dime
Catch you cowards the next time, the next rhyme, uh

[Hook: Kelis]
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit
Yeah I think about this every day, that's the American Way, shit

[Verse 3: Nas]
I don't care about the runaways
I don't care about who's gay
I don't care about dying of AIDS
But I care if I got paid
Who even cares about the president?
I think they're making a mistake
I don't care about the hurricane
As long as my family's safe
I don't care about the candidates
They burnt this country to bits
Yeah I think about this everyday, that's the American Way (Nas: Uh)

Can we make a change
You know it's not overnight
Let's start the fight (Nas: And ya don't stop, uh)
Can we make a change
You know it's not overnight
Let's start the fight (Nas: Yeah)
Yeah I think about this everyday, that's the American Way

*Sample* Nas: Nas is a rebel to America!



[Intro]
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah y'all... New York City...
Tryna to see where I'ma go tonight...
The most famous town in the whole fuckin' world...
The other night, nigga was at Lotus...
I hit P and them
I was Dom P'ed up in there, you know...
But I found this new spot we went to the other night, yo
Check it out, check it out how it went

[Verse 1]
It was just cool like, smooth night with my jewels bright
Goons left, goons right, coupe with blue lights
Bad girls in black pearls, gave us cat calls
Took 'em back to the crib to break they ass off
In the loft, mixing hash and dro
Honey spreaded that asshole like a wide mouth bass
Sippin' wine out the glass, Teddy Pendergrass blast
When the phone ring, the house lights flash
Turned down the sound, let's get down to business
Shit about to go down with some foul niggas
What the voice said, "What up, pop? Who want it?"
I put the guap up, get the boy popped
He say "Son, stop, it's dudes you feedin'
Who feedin' other dudes, but they really not eatin'"
Dog, why you callin' me? This our food
You handle the mouths that it trickles down to
Niggas want beef, I want some of that cow too
But I'm in my princely robe, simply rich
Don't bother me with silly shit, call Rico
He said "It IS Rico, of all people
Gave his moms furs, called up the mayor
To get his crime pardoned, his son's godfather"
Said the nigga shot up my cars
Last night he laid for me to come out my doors?

[Hook]
Niggas always on that bullshit
To make a nigga wanna open up a full clip
Niggas always on that bullshit
Now your funeral, the preacher's at the pulpit
Niggas always on that bullshit
To make a nigga wanna open up a full clip
Niggas always on that bullshit
Now your funeral, the preacher's at the pulpit
You can't kill me

[Verse 2]
High, fly, send a fella loaf or glass
Fold up cash, you ain't heard the soldier's half
You speakin' hogwash, silly shit, Balderdash
I got the live sparked, Phillies lit, smoker's jacket on
The son of a Cap-ricorn, my dad's a don
What you think that he spawned? A slacker? Nah
Packed the 9's, yo this nigga's asinine
Smack your mom, relaxed and calm, then mack your mom
In a casket, you'll get your fashion on
You'll be in a suit and tie, you'll die
You'll make maggots turn to flies, fuckin' with Nas
Remember anyone can get it at anytime
Lames'll swear by your name, when they lie
Get hit with the lone star, ripped where your bones are
So tell me how yo' ass gon' run, from a C-Z-P-O-1?
In the midst of real steel movers, you a loser
Merk you wit your own shooters
All you want is a name, pissed and insane
My security system, my playspot a fireplace, listen
Then it goin' off, start spittin'
Niggas try to bring it where I live in
Trustin' you, knew where all of the cribs at
So we waited with the Sigs, blat, blat, blat!

[Hook]
Niggas always on that bullshit
To make a nigga wanna open up a full clip
Niggas always on that bullshit
Now your funeral, the preacher's at the pulpit
Niggas always on that bullshit
To make a nigga wanna open up a full clip
Niggas always on that bullshit
Now your funeral, the preacher's at the pulpit
You can't kill me

{*"You can't kill me" to fade*}



[Hook] (x4)
Where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?
Where where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?

[Verse 1: Nas]
I slow dance with the Devil
Snow setting in the bezzle
Mo' sipping, phantom bumping Aaron Neville
Polo black scented, eyes squinted
Air Force One's, with my own pattern in it
Fresher than a star, glowing up in the galaxy
Pagan holidays, are way far from my reality
Fart through Evisu jeans, lethal green
Oliver peoples shades when I creep through Queens
With no AKs, I'm the ambassador
Robin Hood in the Aston Mart
Lotta blood gonna splash in war
Task force homicide, federalies gonna harass
But y'all ain't never seen nothing
Not a word not a hint, on the kid from the Project Bench
That went Sony-BMG, to that new conglomerate
Island Def Jam, guess how many dollars was spent
To get the best man, yall niggas ain't silencing shit
Ya bitch been wanna polish the dick
The big Benz, I'mma model ya chick
Was that posing, cash froze her
Cats stroke her, once I smash it's over
Cold like ice, more chains than slaves
Dangerous ways, Poltergeist change the channel
Roll the dice, I bring change when I gamble
I could sell sand to a Arab, hiding my gun handle

[Hook] (x4)
Where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?
Where where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?

[Verse 2: Nas]
The ill whip pusher, my spit wet ya
If you stand close to the woofer
Betcha get sprayed by my lecture
Any club with ladies or dimes, I'm a regular
Give it up smooth, I ain't beggin ya
Intelligent brainiac, brains maniac
Back of the Maybach, taste that, don't waste that
Eat with my elbows top of the table
Street etiquette with speech impediments
And still see presidents, no matter who paid
Cause you ain't take the last dollar made
Long as they keep printing it, there's chances of getting it
Money's my bitch, and we stay intimate
Ask about Nashwan, could ask about Jung
Ask about Bravehearts, and ask where I'm from
Q Boro, specifically The Bridge
Don't ask no more question, ya know what it is

[Hook] (x4)
Where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?
Where where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?

[Verse 3: Nas]
Whether chrome sparking or loan sharking
Busting rachets or numbers rackets or drug traffic
My funds are wrapped up, no concerns who has what
Financer, skull doo wrapped up
Mob life, prizefights, plasma tvs or first floor
Diversified all my circle
Amid the most sickest groom the proof swiftness
Numero uno, annuit coeptis
That's the language of our Latin ancestors
On the back of a dollar, the plan and the message
In the Rolls Royce like the King of Nigeria
My criteria, smoke cigars
Change rap like Jimi Hendrix changed Rock And Roll
With a broke guitar, diamonds flashing
Almost put a million cash in, in my mommy casket
Seen more green than St. Patrick-trick

[Hook] (x4)
Where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?
Where where them gangsters at?
Where them dimes at?



{*speaking softly, gradually getting louder*}

Turn my headphones up, it's pure
Nuttin' gonna stop me now, Stillmatic
Tye Fyfe remix, you know?
(I'm here now, we here, it's your world)
Ill Will y'all

Yo, all I need is one mic, one beat, one stage
One person front, my face on the front page
Only if I had one love, one girl and one crib
One God to show me how to do things his son did
Pure, like a cup of virgin blood; mixed with
151, one sip'll probably make me flip
See my name in the hieroglyphs, like Osiris and Isis
Parables written inside papyruses
Ackowledge it, we been all tricked time to come out of it
Seeds watch us, grow up and try to follow us
Police watch us {*siren*} roll up and try knockin' us
One knee I ducked, could it be my time is up
But my luck, I got up, the cop (shot) again
Bus stop, glass bursts, a fiend drops his Heineken
Richochetin' between the spots that I'm hidin' in
Blackin' out as I duck back, forget gettin' hit! {*more sirens*}
This is my hood I'mma rep, to the death of it
'til everybody come home, little brothers is grown
Hoodrats, don't abortion your womb, we need more warriors soon
Sent from the star sun and the moon
In this life of police chases street sweepers and coppers
Stick-up kids with no conscience, leavin' victims with doctors
IF YOU REALLY THINK YOU READY TO FLY, WITH MIND POWER
THIS IS WHAT NAS IS 'BOUT, BROTHERS THE TIME IS NOW!

{*whispering again*}
Yo, all I need is one mic..
All I need is one mic.. that's all I need
All I need is one mic.. all I need
All I need is one mic.. yeah

{*gradually getting louder*}
All I need is one cup, one page, and one pen
One prayer - tell God forgive me for one sin
Matter fact maybe more than one
Look back at all the hatred against me, touch alla them
Jesus died at age 33, there's thirty-three (shots)
From twin (Glocks) there's sixteen a piece, that's thirty-two
Which means, one of my dunns was holdin 17
Twenty-seven hit your crew, six went into you
Everybody gotta die sometime; hope your funeral
Never get caught up, pain'll go through the innocent
Nothin' is fair, brothers roll up, (shootin') from wheelchairs
My heart is racin', tastin' revenge in the air
I let this all slide for too many years, too many times
Now I'm strapped with a couple of (macs), too many (nines)
If y'all people really wit me get busy load up the (semis)
Do more than just hold it explode the (clip) until you empty
There's nothin' in our way - they bust, we bust, they rush, we rush
(Lead) flyin', feel it? I feel it in my gut
THAT WE TAKE THESE DUDES TO WAR, LIE 'EM DOWN
CAUSE WE STRONGER NOW MY PEOPLES THE TIME IS NOW!!

{*whispering again*}
All I need is one mic.. that's all I need, that's all I need
All I need is one mic.. there's nuttin' else in the world
All I need is one mic.. that's all a (nigga) need to do his thing y'know
All I need is one mic..

{*starting loud this time, getting quieter*}
ALL I NEED IS ONE LIFE, ONE TRY, ONE BREATH I'm ONE MAN
WHAT I STAND FOR SPEAKS FOR ITSELF, THEY DON'T UNDERSTAND
Or wanna see me on top, too egotistical
Talkin all that slick stuff, while my name is biblical
Wonder what my secrets is, enemies'll move on you
Only if they know, what your weakness is I have none
Too late I'm mad young I'm laughin' cause I'm a cool brother
Thought I wouldn't have that ass done? Fooled you brothers
What you call a infinite brawl, eternal souls clashin'
War gets deep, some beef is everlastin'
Complete with thick scars, brothers knifin' each other
Up in prison yards, drama, where does it start?
You know the block was ill as a youngster
Every night it was like a, (cop) would get killed body found in the dumpster
For real a hustler, purchased my Range, people throwin dirt on my name
Jealous cause fiends got they work and complain
Women left me cause they thought I was finished
Shoulda knew she wasn't true she came to me when her man caught a sentence
Diamonds are blindin', I never make the same mistakes
Movin' with a change of pace, lighter load, see now the king is straight
Swellin' my melon cause none of these brothers real
Heard they were, tellin' police, how can a kingpin squeal?
This is crazy, I'm on the right track I'm finally found
You need some soul searchin', the time is now

All I need is one mic.. yeah, yeah yeah yeah
All I need is one mic.. that's all I ever needed in this world, (fuck) cash
All I need is one mic.. (fuck) the cars, the jewelry
All I need is one mic.. to spread my voice to the whole world



[Cormega](Nas)

Ayo check this out son
This is my man Nas Escobar
And I go by the name of Cormega you know
(you gonna get your self murdered)
Yo check this out on the real son
Anybody diss the Firm yo on the real yo
I'm bringing it to you I ain't even saying the word
Cause I ain't allowed to say it on the radio
(any Firm members come out your mouth wrong)
We keepin' it crazy real son on the real
(violate the grand you get split in half)
Son you gonna set it? set it son
Matter of fact though

[Nas]

I peep you frontin, I was in the Jeep
Sunk in the seat, tinted with heat, beats bumpin'
Across the street you was wildin'
Talkin bout how you ran the Island in eighty-nine
Layin up, playin the yard with crazy shine
I cocked a baby 9 that nigga grave be mine, clanked him
What was he thinkin on my corner when it's pay me time
Dug em you owe me cousin somethin told me plug him
So dumb, felt my leg burn, then it got numb
Spun around and shot one, heard shots and dropped son
Caught a hot one, somebody take this biscuit 'fore the cops come
Then they came askin me my name, what the ugh
I got stitched up and went through
Left the hospital that same night, what
Got my gat back, time to backtrack
I had the drop so how the fuck I get clapped
Black was in the Jeep watchin all these scenes speed by
It was a brown Datsun, and yo nobody in my hood got one
That clown cat's through, blazin at his crew

I can't believe it achieve
Yo Cormega whatever whatever whatever

[Cormega]
Pushin' a red lex
With many screams inside the headsets
So much beef, police surprised I ain't dead yet
I keep red tech in the passenger seat
To match their heat
It's so real if I don't see you I'm splashing your beep
It's on the kid
Whoever gets his first
It's going to kids dirt
My soldiers be cold blooded vultures
And cold blooded
Yo on the street we control hundreds
I drink polatas so all my people roll blunted
Your man froze when I rolled up
I symbolize death like a cobra
Attacks your life here it's over
Black you effed up
Never should've messed up
My black cocksucker scared to die tough luck
You know my steelo im like Al Pacino
Yo Nas Escobar grab the mic and flex a bar

[Nas]
I'm in the black limo
Jack Daniel through the crack window
I spot the fake red dot his face like a Hindu
Grab the symbol
Show examples to make examples
Essential amounts you owe to the fam crew
Firm affiliation paper chasing
Chip glossy rich pablo es cubano
Sophisticano
Yo blazing halos like shadow
Yo nigga im the castro
Im coming through on your wack crew
What you gonna do
Cormega pick the mic come through

[Cormega]

Ay yo I get mines
Well enough to be considered big time
My crew a chosen few legit minds
Who live prime
Shorty's on some fly stuff
Admitted that can't resist mines
Mahogany complexion
Body probably dressed in
My ill tommy hill collection
When I be flexin', sketch it
My selection of words are type effective
When I rhyme words are verbalized remain present
In mines, I'm like an with air macs nikes on
Recite nice on mics strike like a python
My gold chain with ice on lookin' trife on
My Jacuzzi filled with tight warm relaxed lookin steaming
Lounging like a falcon on a mountain top at Egypt
Cats schemin when they see my rocks gleaming
Mega shine forever rhyme wicked like a demon
Where my charcoal, new balance a lot yo
The narcs go knocked my man Marco
His money was marked yo
I regulate a sharp flow
But in my life bucaso
My mom died when I was five and never left my heart yo
I symbolize rive alive niggas
Ghetto's where I live
Considered my rhyme the oasis
Because rap was a desert
And I helped minds escaped it
Yo Nas link it up it's like an ill typed bracelet

[Nas]

Fake thug, no love
You get the slug, CB4 Gusto
Your luck low
I didn't know til I was drunk though
You freak cats get played out
Get robbed and laid out
Prostitute turned snitch
I got the gauge out
96 ways I made out, Montana way
The Good-F-E-L-L-A, verbal AK spray
Dipped attache, jumped out the Range
Empty out the ashtray
A glass of 'ze make a man Cassius Clay
Red dot plots, thirty-two shots
Ya'll niggas don't want none of this

[Cormega]

Ayo check it my man Joe Shan is downstairs
My man Georgie is lounging downstairs
My man Big Ice he lounging in Queensbridge
And all you real cats know what time it is
On the real all you crabs cats know the deal
On the real all you crabs cats know the deal
On the real all you crabs cats know the deal
Now check the new verse
Check the new verse it's ill
Yo my millennium got people mind prisoner
Pain digital wood brain material
Rims spin sinister
Grin like John Dillinger
Iced out medallions my style will keep killin' ya
Misery and jealousy when you envision me
I'm getting mines and still livin' on the strength of me
You never bust nothin' or got ill touched nothin'
My baby face ice grill I heard something for real
In any cipher i'll serve em like a viper
I go for mines like I go for time on Rikers
Steelo like pacino benzino benz bilo we know
People we dope like mafiaso like gambino
Where Sergio Tacchinio took a jab in a casino
I like sony cause they saw my man keeno
Can't forget my home girl Faith Newman
She be boomin'
My people they representing
Every percent in
In my firm team
We so ill our people burn cream
Rhymes I design
Can make your mind turn fiend
I respect green I breath
For keepin Queen regulatin'
Nas be regulatin'
Smoother type regulations
Yo Escobar grab the mic just like you flex a car
You know my style son we in here ye ye

[Nas]

Yo no doubt Cormega get in for the firm biz
Straight out the bridge peace to my man Havoc
You know what I'm saying
I know you going through it right now baby
Don't wet it though
You gotta keep it going

[Cormega]

Keep it flowing like that
Yo and to my man twin yo god bless your life
Yo my man harry god bless your life
Yo my man trip god bless you son
It was an accident, you know it was an accident
Life is real a lot of trife things be happening
I love yall kids I love my whole mobb deep fam
It's real like that you know life has tied me man
Yo I lived the life of 62 pick ups
Pumping on corners beat downs and stick ups
Seeing events in which you have to stay silent
Murder extortion and all types of violence
Yo kids living a life ghetto heaven
Selling cracks getting ready to attack with nines and mac elevens
You know my style
You can't stop what knocks me down
Peace to AZ, Nas, and figure Foxy Brown
My whole firm team is ill no doubt
I can't forget the commissioner he's called Steve Stoute
With the ill benz
He rocks the ill dimes and ill rims
You know my steelo
I'm like Al Pacino
God bless the life of my man nino

[Nas]

It's sort of like the conclusion to "Color Purple"
Brothas is losing, confusion, with one time all pursuit moves in
Grabbing niggas up in this movement to rule shit
Cop verses the block, shorties is too quick
Lesson number one. If you're arrested and hung
Where Brothas is from gotta keep a lid on your tongue
It's like silent murder, I hit blunts hard like Ray Mercer
The violent words of a prince in a palace of Persia
The cognac plurger plus the trees
But whose the faul one to make his nose take a freeze
And got enough gold to rock ice in all hype
Used to be a general but just lost his stripe
Pipe dreams and white feinds and all-nighters, collect calls from lifers
Astoria walls with cypress, but yo that's another subject
I love teks let's get it off
Yo what up what up

[Cormega]

Yo funkmaster flex you know I got the ill lex
I wear my guests in apendix
And cash my cheque in flesh shit
My man escobar be lighting a weed
And I proceed with all the ill types of rhymes you need
I'm not the new jack, or crew rack I'm like the next man
Cormega, I just got signed to Def Jam
My man Nas is down with me
A lot of sucker rappers they can't diss me
It's like that, you know it's like that
We'll strike back Queensbridge style
My mobb deep people is mad foul
A juvenile delinquent wet your prequit
I get my money numerous occasions
It's frequent my man Ike
Tried to avalanche ice watch
You know my steelo Al Pacino
Yo Escobar

[Nas/Cormega]
Escobar season
Cormega 4 reason
We with it what
I'll stay high triple beamin
Queensbridge



[Intro]
Uh, yeah turn it up, check it out

[Verse 1]
The transition from a young fool
Broke, still on his neck, he hung jewels
Live his life in the ghetto where guns rule
It was cool wasn't mad, I had to take out cabs
Made my first LP afforded H-Class, my face gassed
'94, Sold out in every record store
Local hood rats who wouldn't speak
Now I'm who they're checking for
Shown crazy love, ran up on stage with 80 thugs
After the shows, my niggas robbed the bar and wrecked the clubs
Happy, no hating, more henny, more blunts circulating
My single in rotation on every radio station
Eyes popped when I drove my first ride on the block
Summertime, block parties, cookouts, I spend my knot
Truly, niggas was fighting over who was closely to me
Happy with the new representative of QB
To hit the top first you have to gotta fall before you make it
With for 4 minutes of your time, watch me demonstrate it

[Hook Slick Rick & Nas]
This was the rise and fall of my fast lane style
(From Nasty to Nas to Nas Escobar)
(Mega popular center of attraction)
I was the main event on the TV for a while
This was the rise and fall of my fast lane style
(From Nasty to Nas to Nas Escobar)
(Mega popular center of attraction)
I was the main event on the TV for a while

[Verse 2]
Cayman Islands in the winter, summer bus rides to Great Adventure
I've brung New York back to real rap inventors
New crib, diamond rings, killers on my team
Infinitis for my girl for giving birth to my queen
3 g's worth of chronic a week, promoters were mad
I stopped doing shows to spend time in the street
Loot declined, eventually so did my shine
Repo looking for my Lex, back then I wasn't buying
You can guess niggas started saying, with all the success
"Why is your mom still in the projects?" I answered them vexed
Fuck out my face, pistol in my car, full clip
I read about Pablo Escobar and got on some shit
So called mans would plot on my chips, I was fronting
Niggas thought I was rich and got mad cause they was pumpin'
My assumption, niggas want me pumped in the casket
Kept the gun the same three-fifth a nigga got bagged with

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Caught a case now, I'm home staring off into space
Flashbacks of all the jewelry, cars, crossing my face
Rappers I met, hoes on video cassette
No management, no more good life and no respect
Hearing crowds roar, crystal pouring mixed drinks
Haunted by the thoughts of second album sophomore jinx
Where did I fail? Death threats, woke up in cold sweats
Thinking about all these murders that know where I rest
From hanging with crazy cliques that's known to take shit
Bracelets, and all that beef now I'm involved, was paperless
My cars were auctioned off, now I catch rides with kidnap-niggas
Who snatch babies up to get back figures
Lessons from heaven, every night I slept with my weapon
To guard my family for a minute I forgot my profession
Not from Columbia or Nicaragua
Don't distribute coke from Antigua, that shipped out to Panama
Pablo Escobar's bloody reign came to an end
Far from my life; a kid who made his fame from a pen
Hit the studio and change the game again
Wrote down all the pain within, top of the charts, triple platinum
Got the fake love back, money stacks, more plaques
Had to see who I was just to know where I was at
Saw both sides of the game, all the ups and downs
This goes out to the future rap kings coming up now

[Hook]



The G-O-D
Aiyyo, check it out...It's God's Son
I know I always give you clowns a little lean to come out
Cause I drop every two years...but it's over now, you know? Hah

[Hook] x4
The G-O-D S-O-N
K-I-N-G O-F N-Y-C
That's me

[Bridge]
Is it because I got the city on smash now
Oh woe woe
Or is it because your time's up and it's a wrap now
Hey hey hey hey

[Verse 1]
In the papers you read that Nas is crazy
Lost his mind as he leavin Sony
The INC got him signed
It's only a figment of your imagination
Went to way with New York's Hot radio station
Lost my patience, had to Zone Out
Rappers blown out, I have the throne now
The real shall reign, I feel your pain
You too R&B, follow me, spell my name

[Hook]

[Bridge]

[Verse 2]
God's Son across the belly
Pardon, I'm hardly a bully
But what y'all done to hip hop is scary
Nas'll be truly the, last soldier to roll with
Holdin it down, my proteges are over with now
A producer like Swizz Beats, on fire
So is the control room, soon as my vocals are down
Nas - God's Son, and y'all my little children
So bounce with it, if you can pronounce the correct spellin

[Hook]



[Eban Thomas]
It is absolutely silly, and unproductive
To have a funeral for the word "nigga"
When the actions continue..
We need to have a movement to resurrect brothers, and sisters
Not a funeral for niggers
Cause niggers - DON'T DIE {*echoes*}

[Nas]
Uh, yeah..
Yo, I'm creepy and crawlin, in your sink and your toilet
I be drinkin from your spit, anything cause I'm all less
An insect with four legs; people come in, I fake dead
Correction: I got eight legs, climbin on top yo' plate, bed
Wherever I smell food, it could be even jail food
Stale food that's molded, a roach is what I am, fool
The ghetto is my land, fool, I'mma never be able to
Fly like a bumblebee, try not, to be underneath
Your sneaker, pitiful creature, I'm not afraid of
Your pesticide or RAID cause, in heaven's my Creator
I love it when the light's off, eatin from same knives, forks
From, ANY man's dinner, see my antennas
You can't win, you can't stand the crunchy sound I make
If you squash me, learn to live with me
How much your roach motel costin' you in the city?
But yo, we everywhere! Check your house good, I bet we there!
LOOK THERE!

[Eban Thomas]
Niggers are like roaches - they're never gonna go away
Learn from them what we should not become
Cause niggers - DON'T DIE {*echoes*}



[Verse 1: Nas]
I had a dream, I was a gangster drinking Moets, holding Tecs
Making sure the cash is correct, then I stepped
Investments in stock, sewing up the blocks
To sell rocks, winning gun fights with the cops
Custom-made suits, hands full of ice and gold
Making thousand dollar bets on the dice I rolled
Girls working night patrol, the whore market
When I walk, niggas is rolling out the red carpet
Now how good could a black man have it?
Living like a king, is a habit I keep an automatic
The whole crew life is love above word
Rumors about the way we make niggas well heard
Nicknamed the "Killa Clan"
Soon to kill a man
If there is still a gram
I shake my left hand
And not do a minute on the rock
Cause if I do a minute on the rock
The juries getting knocked
I'm 'bout girls, that kept braggin'
Cause I own all the runner-ups in every state's beauty pagent
Inside a lamborgini, called the Martini
Little kids in the streets, they wanna be me
I'm living in a mansion, hold a niggas wife for ransom
I'm like a rich Charles Manson
A view, backyard, about 40 acres
You read about me in the papers
I hit the jackpot
Every night from all my crack spots
We attack cops for props
I got sons with guns, they all done crimes
They so wild, they even scare my ass sometimes
Other niggas on the blocks is so corny
I got my dime, I'm lookin like someone smoke for me
Bad bitches kissing my ass
I got a few mill. in the stash
With beds made of cash
But on my head was a price
I made the bad-guys in Miami-Vice, look nice
All of a sudden, I got raided
My crib was invaded
But, the Nas still made it...
To the getaway car
And now my driving skills got to be up to par
The cops parked the car
And sprayed till it was smoked up
That's when I woke up

[Hook: Piano hook]

[Jungle]
Yea Nas, nigga
Word Life Kid

[Verse 2: Nas]
The whole thing was a nightmare
I fell asleep watching Scarface
Laying in the chair
Standing on the block
It was flooded with cops
Through the parks... Was the D's and the Narcs
Watching me walking out my building
Staring and hawkin shit
But I as fortunate
I usually be going out with the 9
Instead, I had 10 bucks to buy a dime...
Bag of weed
Never cracks I ain't with that
I bought buddha, some phillies, and a Kit-Kat
Now I'm walking back, through the drug infested area
Which is filled with hysteria
When a cop yelled, "Come here black."
I thought to myself, "what part of the game is that? "
I didn't do no crime, for you to be wasting your time
With your antagonistic mind
He said that I was being smart and I better run
He looked like a Klans-man with a gun
So I started floating
Police in Queensbridge, they don't be joking
I ran up my crib, in the nick of time
Rolled up a philly and stashed the 9
Police later left, I was outta breath
And what not
Somebody got shot, that why it's hot
I called my man and told him the adventure
And later, I meet him at the community center
I need a six pack of Beck's
It's Just Another Day in the Projects!

[Hook: Piano Hook]



{Note: Sample From: Isley Brother's +For The Love Of You+}

[Intro: Nas & (Ron Isley)]
Good Morning, Yea (Yea, well, well Yea)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Good morning the same old jerks goin' to work
Garbage man pick up the dirt, the birds don't chirp
There's this nice Lady I know, she always speak
Wit her two children, headed to the school buildin
Then rush home and again to lit housin'
And they are puttin' out the new ceilings
Cuz her shit is leakin'
Water keep drippin'down, so she beefin'
Husband keep cheatin', he've been out all-evenin'
Good morning, police shifts the hood is on-in'
So they drive around all-day wit bench warrants
Eatin donuts and sippin' on coffee
Ooops!, sudden stop, it spills on the walkie-talkie
"Damn this nigga is a creep"
Whispers the police at the Wino in the middle of the street
Wit missin' front teeth twist blunts deep in the cut
It's my nigga so I holler it up, niggas good morning

[Hook: repeat 2X]
Good morning cause I'm still here
Didn't get a wake-up call from out there
So I'm head back to the street for my lesson
And only live by God's blessings

[Verse 2: Nas]
Good morning, yawnin, dawn is no gon'in'
New day, toothpaste brushin my screwface
Follow the light, it's just a great feelin'
And I love life, every minute is pure healin'
Can't you tell I'm much happy nowadays
No more child play, livin' life the foul way
My man just came home speedin
Tryin' to catch up wit 9-years of no freedom
The paper say - "They finally caught 'em"
He back in, I guess street life got too borin'
Kind of quiet, half the hood is still sleep
If you saw the night before you won't believe it's the same street
Put on my lenses, leave the Phantom
Take the low-whip for a trip up to Pan Pan's
Scramblin' white turkey cacon
"Ma pass the hot sauce from out your apron"

[Hook]



Tracklist
1.  Album Intro
2.  The Message
3.  Street Dreams
4.  I Gave You Power
5.  Watch Dem Niggas
6.  Take It In Blood
7.  Nas Is Coming
8.  Affirmative Action
9.  The Set Up
10.  Black Girl Lost
11.  Suspect
12.  Shootouts
13.  Live Nigga Rap
14.  If I Ruled The World
15.  Silent Murder
16.  Affirmative Action (Saint-Denis-Style Remix)

Album art




[Intro]
I'm a black man in a white world
I'm a black man in a white world
I'm a black man in a white world
I'm a black man in a white world
I'm a black man in a white world

[Verse 1: Nas]
I can see the saddest life, a savage life
Snakes and thieves, every man has his price
It's hell below, who will or won't sell his soul
What's my goal? Go to jail or fail, hell no
In the streets there's a few ways out cause face it
Time is short, think fast while I resort
To a life of crime and fast cash?
Nah I'm destined to be king, stayin' on the right path

[Hook: Michael Kiwanuka]
I'm in love, I feel sad
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I found peace and I'm not there
(I'm a black man in a white world)
All my nights and all my days
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I've been tryna runaway
(I'm a black man in a white world)

[Verse 2: Nas]
I'm left in a world oppressed
How do I express
My very own ghetto Gettysburg address
My platform is a rap song
Black man is politically attacked on the norm
My life's survivin', at night I'm ridin'
Smokin', hopin', dreamin', speedin'
White lightenin' steamin', streets triflin'
I keep writin', it gets deeper
My brother's keeper are divided?
I decided to keep risin', yeah

[Hook: Michael Kiwanuka]
I'm in love, I feel sad
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I found peace and I'm not there
(I'm a black man in a white world)
All my nights and all my days
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I've been tryna runaway
(I'm a black man in a white world)

[Verse 3: Nas]
New York, New York, the irrefutable
The city if you make it out here it's beautiful
And the streets can deceive you when times are hard
And the pressure leaves your mind, body, and soul so scarred

[Hook: Michael Kiwanuka]
I'm in love, I feel sad
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I found peace and I'm not there
(I'm a black man in a white world)
All my nights and all my days
(I'm a black man in a white world)
I've been tryna runaway
(I'm a black man in a white world)

[Outro]
(Let me out here)
We need to wisen up
We risin' up
These times is rough
(I'm a black man in a white world)
For real
(I'm a black man in a white world)
For real
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Yeah
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Yeah
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Yeah
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Let's rise
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Yeah
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Come on let's rise
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Come on y'all
(I'm a black man in a white world)
Yeah
(I'm a black man in a white world)



[Intro: Damian Marley]
Now greetings to the world
The accumulative intelligence of Mankind is what makes us special amongst all other species
Everything is built upon the foundation before it
Huh
Boom

[Hook: Damian Marley]
These ancient thoughts
This ancient look
These ancient hearts
This ancient soul
These ancient songs
These ancient people

[Junior Reid]
Like the Earth, and the sky
And the sea, and the birds
And the trees, and the songs
With melody

Like a mountain, like a valley
Like the river, like the lake
Like the earth, when it quake
It's anciency

[Verse 1: Nas]
This is rock and roll meets Aristotle
I fly those G5's through the skies to Cabo
Martial arts more ancient than Tae Bo
Swordsman, more ancient than Zorro
Ancient like the pharaohs or priests of Yoruba
Or Obeah, your phobia, you paro
Your path narrow like climbing Mountain Kilimanjaro
Ancient men traded cattle
Before Columbus was lost in travel, ancient canoes got paddled
Before the horse saddle there was camel
Spears before arrow, arrow before ammo
Tribal paint before camo-
Flage, chief before sarge, or lieutenant
Village elders before the Senate
Used to sail the seas before the compass was invented
Ancient people spoke free, they didn't need a 1st Amendment
In the beginning, the drum was the text sendin
There was moons before months, and time before minutes

[Hook x2]

[Verse 2: Damian Marley]
From love, on to language, on to hieroglyphics
Di invention of the wheel, on to mathematics
Di almanac, di calendar, on to geographics
Herbal medicine, to antibiotics
Ginseng to horse tonic
Water pump, water pumpee on to hydraulics
Moonlight, candle light, on to electronics
Instinct to knowledge, classroom to college
Ayyy
All of these ancient thoughts

[Hook x2]

[Verse 3: Junior Reid]
Man ah buss di earth, man ah buss di sky
Junior Gong and Junior Reid we meditation it so high
Man ah trod de gravel, it dutty and it dry
Oh oi, dem nuh see nuh wings, but man ah fly
Babylon fi splurt, dem nuh know what life is worth
Oh Oi, tell dem stop polluting Mother Earth
Man ah mek ah trod, mi robe, mi sandals and mi rod
Dem shoulda know, ancient man, yes man ah God

[Outro: Damian Marley]
Ancient thoughts
Ancient look
Ancient hearts
Ancient soul
Ancient songs
Ancient people



[Verse 1: Nas]
Born in NYC beastin', the lord left me no choice
Christian pendants, Islamic thoughts, criminal courts
Father forgive, I wanna die like Godfather did
Standing in lineups I'm paying lawyers, ain't trying to bid
Alliances surveillance watching 'em careful when plottin'
My boys were captured on video, farewell to my partners
Ski masks and fake tags in case the car was spotted
Lavish hotels, Central Park West, fly apartments - let's rob it
Forensics get us sentenced so we the smartest
It's livest as Saturday night as I load up a cartridge
Let off the fully, got alibis, no need to worry
Done right, we don't see the prosecutors or grand jury
Reputed mobster style, take the money and run
Count it in warehouses, leave town and live 100 years like crocodiles
Straight up NYC like a Mets fitted
This a tower heist, even Donald Trump can get it

[Hook x2: Nas]
You want respect, money and power, right?
Well let's ride tonight; it's a tower heist

[Verse 2: Rick Ross]
I got my shades on, got my money in my pocket
Got my J's on, spend a hundred for my watch
I feel amaz-on, it's a jungle in these streets
Choppers be going "bang", your people need be deceased
Everyday is war, living legends you must applaud
So light my cigar, or for the foreigners living large
Dealin' straight raw, the Mercedes in my garage
Your girl on my dick and I may just feel like menage
I came for the cash, me and Nas behind the mask
Cause, bitch, it's a heist, give me ice or lose your life
My profit's so nice me and dog gon' count it twice
It's poppin' tonight, roll the weed, give me a light - UGH!

[Hook]



[Produced by Dame Grease]

[Intro:]
Where my real niggas at
There's a lot of real niggas out there
There's a lot of real niggas everywhere
That's why you don't fuck with just anybody
A lot of niggas is just on the low, chillin'
Not botherin' nobody, until one muthafucka fuck with 'em
And then all hell break loose

[Hook 2X]
Quiet niggas will kill
Loud niggas talk shit
Them be the ones who get killed
It's wild where we walk, kid
Is you brave nigga
Is you a slave nigga
Is you a made nigga
Or is you a paid nigga

[Verse 1: Grand Wizard]
Well known gangstas, entrust, that we bust
Your heart and soul lies with us, let's see
Boldly go where we once took a nigga before
Now the muthafucka beggin' for more
It's Thorazine
Standin' here shakin', hatin' the haters, they watchin' my paper
Realize, a 4-5 will open his eyes
Now what the fuck you think he saw before he drop?
Nigga standin' there just like a cop
Braveheart I'm screamin up the block
Now the soldier, cadet, general in fact
Don't let me get up and show y'all muthafuckas respect
Plans connect
The twinklin' diamonds upon my neck
More Jazz than Hornacek
I blast, leave your corner wet
Straight on top of ya
Spittin' like the Trench Coat Mafia
In a schoolyard, we make it hard
What's poppin' y'all?
We made our change; what's stoppin' y'all?
They spray y'all names Rest in Peace on the project wall

[Hook 2X]
Quiet niggas will kill
Loud niggas talk shit
That be the ones who get killed
It's wild where we walk, kid
Is you brave nigga
Is you a slave nigga
Is you a made nigga
Or is you a paid nigga

[Verse 2: Horse]
I wave gang signs at the youth, that's down for the cause
Sling them things 'til the very end, you better get yours
Time is runnin' out
Your streets is gettin' smaller as we speak
Giuliani turns these lights on so niggas can't creep
I miss the shit out of David Dinkins
Please free John Gotti
They kept the black man eatin', not killin' everybody
Drug wars is real
You have no friends in the outfield
Foul balls is death, umpires keep ice grills
There's no tomorrow, it's the bottom of the 9-9
Can't die a broke man with a bitch that's fine
My heart's full of braveness, so who the fuck will want to save this
Fallen angel from fallen, startin' chaos on this nation
Don't play us on your station if you pussy or you hatin'
You could find us in the hood, thuggin' and regulatin'
Don't play us on your station if you pussy or you hatin'
You could find us in the hood, thuggin' and regulatin'

[Hook 2X]
Quiet niggas will kill
Loud niggas talk shit
That be the ones who get killed
It's wild where we walk, kid
Is you brave nigga
Is you a slave nigga
Is you a made nigga
Or is you a paid nigga

[Verse 3: Jungle]
Yo, we here to eat food, my peoples be lethal
Shots in your body make you see-through
Quiet niggas become jail riot niggas
25 to life bid, never cry niggas
Floss when they up north
Chest gettin' bigger
Celebs on the V.I., respect that nigga
Reggy on the regular, chops it up, like a editor
Come through one man gang like The Predator
If your wake, I'll wet it up, Jungle set it up
The jackal rock you to sleep while I'm comin' at you
Air out your area, Queensbridge forever, what
Ill Will the label
Bravehearts, y'all scared of us

[Verse 4: Nas]
Yo, when those niggas ran, these niggas stayed
When those niggas switched up and bitched up afraid
These niggas clicked up and ripped up the gauge
Those niggas got jail and sick 'cause we paid
Don't even rep QB, you ain't got hood stripes
Looters come through catch you frontin' and it's good night
Know how much force this is
Jungle, Horse, and Wiz
Nothin' but horses, kid
We go to war for this

[Hook 4X]
Quiet niggas will kill
Loud niggas talk shit
That be the ones who get killed
It's wild where we walk, kid
Is you brave nigga
Is you a slave nigga
Is you a made nigga
Or is you a paid nigga



[Intro:]
Take it to the bridge
To the motherfuckin' bridge
Queensbridge in the motherfucker

[Hook:] x3
It Ain't Hard to Tell

[Verse 1:]
The buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop, place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jewel, inhale from the L
School a fool well, you feel it like Braille, it ain't hard to tell
I kick a skill like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills I'm Ill plus Matic
I freak beats, slam it like Iron Sheik
Jam like a Tec with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magnetize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave 'em froze like her-on in your nose
Nas'll rock well, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x3

[Verse 2:]
What's a beat if the rap don't click
I spit rhymes like I'm sick, dying loss in a pit
The only way I can escape is by vocals
Verbalize a strife
Stabbin' ears like a knife hood like
The Prophet of the gutter
Lyrics are silk mega butter
I flow never stutter
Clever poetic brothers on a mission
Dissin' all who perps the fraud
Scrams listen, (and) do what the experts record
Burn your pen and pads, mics you'll need not
Well I be packin' like a rasta in a weed spot
Hittin' your hearts like a hollow tip
Verbally illin' minds manipulated
My raps a nickel-plated
I illustrate it, X-rated, then move out
Nas the parlayer takes you on a new route
It's suicide poetry released from a cell
With immense clientele, I excel
It ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x3

[Verse 3:]
Now, I'm blessed with the finesse to express like Shakespeare
The blocks "Cape Fear" drop metaphors when the breaks clears
My mic check is life or death, breathing a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like the Shining, sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket lining
Hit the Earth like a comet – invasion!
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian, half-man, half-amazing
Cause in my physical, I can express through song
Delete stress like Motrin, then extend strong
I drink Moet with Medusa, give her shotguns in hell
From the spliff that I lift and inhale, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x3



[Produced by Salaam Remi]

[Hook:]
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants diamonds without the bloodshed
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants diamonds without the bloodshed
They wanna shine on 'em
Shine on 'em
Shine on 'em

[Verse 1:]
Yea, they dug me out the soil and the mines of the motherland
Now I'm displaced, one hand to another hand
Illegal smugglin', people strugglin'
Wish they could just throw me back in the mud again
Yea, guess that's how we got here, slave trade and the diamond trade
Every childs afraid when his mother and father get sprayed
Forced in the army, young killer brigade
Get's a new name, then he gets his nose glued
Till his mind can't take what he's going through
Lookin' in the dirt for that ice so blue
Then the royal family the ice go to
And this thing has to change, feelin' half ashamed
As I rap with my platinum chain
When you shop for me you think about the misery?
The same way we made apartheid history
We can do the same way to the conflict ice
But everybody wanna shine right?

[Hook:]

[Verse 2:]
My VVS glimmers on my chest, 200 thou encrusted watch on my wrist
I wonder how how people starve to death, when God blessed the land that lacks the harvest
The stones are quality, but their homes are poverty
And the whole world ignores the robbery
Bought my girl pretty rocks, but she mad at me
Tear drop shape, ugh, perfect clarity
It shocks so many are killed annually
Cause of greed, lust, and pure vanity
Stop talkin' and do somethin' about it
Every holiday season, jewelry stores crowded
Kids snatched from they homes, mutilated alive
Husbands separated from wives
Keep a Jesus Piece to be fly
But there was a time back in the day when they called that shine

[Hook:]

[Outro:]
Incomprehensible singing



[Cee-Lo (Nas)]
La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la..
(Uh-oh, yeah)

[Nas]
Mr. International
The man centerfold women loathe
Voice bump out the Bose in a tinted Rolls
Craftiness, take a stab at it
Don't ask if Nasty's back at it
I don't run out of magic
Popular, box-cutter flow
Time is money; the watch cost dough
Shaking the dice, fragrances from some beautiful ladies
The lights, the ambiance, yeah, this is the life
The money, hotties on each arm--It's on
I party like a rap star, baby the facts are
The third time's a charm
So meet me by the Eiffel Tower
Bring a bottle of Dom

[Cee-Lo]
I am here (I am here)
This is the place (This is the place)
The atmosphere of espionage at expensive tape
And each one that I see is an unfamiliar face
So I guess I'll just cut straight through the chase
And before I could say the name of who've I came to see
Someone suspicion then came to me
I'm so close and I've come so far
A glass of red wine sits from the women at the end of the bar
I love to talk to you; but I don't have the time
She looks like the prettiest part of a perfect crime
Ohh if I could I could I'd put a picket fence around a wild flower
But darling I have Less Than an Hour
(I.... have Less Than an Hour)
(I.... have Less Than an Hour)
Hmmmm... Ohhhh... funny how time flies when you're having fun
(Nas: Yeah, let' em know) But I got to do what must be done

[Nas]
You're on a winning streak
You've survived the killer streets
Now you at the crap table, where the real villains meet
Number seven might get you to Heaven
You break the bank, just might make you a legend
It's after eleven, you playing against a poker face
Genie eyes, light green, sipping on Bellini's
You play your cards right, she'll let you touch
She'll be a devil in disguise; lady incubus
Better know who to trust
She might roll with thugs who roll bodies up in Asian rugs
I'mma rush up and move on 'em, put the uz' on 'em
The crews do something new, inform me

[Cee-Lo]
(I.... have Less Than an Hour)
Ohhh... time will wait baby
(I.... have Less Than an Hour)
Ew-ohhh.... ewwwwwwwww.... hmmmmm..
I'm in the pursuit of my own personal power
And I only have an hour



[Nas]
First I see a flashin' light, then on my own
I hear nothin', the smell of fire in brimstone
I feel hundreds arms grabbin' me, fallin' down the hole
Is it because there is no Gravity my body leaves my Soul
Is the Devil mad at me? will I go to Hell?
Or is it Heaven that awaits me?, is too early to tell
Is it now that I'm to be judged?
Will I face thee bright tunnel warm lights?
Will embrace me before force takes me
Like I'm movin' through high winds
See my self in baby carriages, relatives and friends
Things manifest, kings from every planets rest here
Beams of light hear the voice of the Nazareth near

[Hook: Nas]
You 'Amongst Kings' from both far near land
Made in my image son of God son of man
You came in the spirit for I am that I am
Father of all worlds Fallen Angel and the Lamb

[Nas]
Seen my body layin' down in the ground
It was painless, didn't feel a thing
Shots ring felt the anxious to get up and run
I was atheist, committed Suicide
I wish I could erase this shit
I seen a new life before the Christ
He created night & day, the sun & moon
From the virgin woman's womb
We lookin' down at my body, emergency room
Doctors frownin' at me surgical performs, I'm doomed
It's my day of judgment, eternal peace & fire
Far past the stars far past the Orion
I asked that you forgive father, I was tryin'
Many thrones in the light but only one's truly shinin'

[Hook]

[Nas]
Faster then the blinkin' eye, is the master and I
Face to face (uh) fightin' my case so we debate (where?)
Countin' all my sins (ok), where do we begin
When I stabbed the man in the train station or drunk gin
When I grabbed the man let the shells hit him from the Mac 10
It was all retaliation, (from what?) from way back then
Now I got the black Benz (and) trips from Aspen (and)
Disney World for my little girl and I'm askin'
You would recognize all the good deeds I'm worth (Dear God)
Send me on a trip God please the Earth
So I can deliver thou want it, stop playin'
He gave me life, I screamed out loud that "I Am..."
(Nas... Nastradamus)

[Outro: Nas]
And I saw another mighty angel come down from Heaven (I Am)
Clothe wit the cloud (Nastradamus)
And the rainbow was upon his head as a Crown (I Am)
And his face was lit as were the Sun (I Am)
And his feet as pillars of fire (Nastradamus)
And his name was Nastradamus (I Am)
(I Am Nastradamus)
Nas...
Nas...
Nas...



[Chorus: Emily]
I see people hating other people
Tell me what's the reason
That your kid is hungry, you ain't got no money
What's the reason?

[Verse 1: Nas]
By the time of age nine I'm already decidin'
If I can protect mommy from the hood by fightin'
Or usin' a knife or a gun when I'm twenty-one
By by then them hoods woulda pushed their way in our apartment
And we die then, so I been a young nervous wreck in the projects
Watchin' them older niggas pass pot and they high man
I'm just a young boy, snot nose, hair nappy
Cops ride by squeezin' their trigger fingers at me
So I would go to school and try to get good grades
Teacher wrote mommy and kicked me outta school for havin' braids
So she cussed them, said "My son ain't no motherfuckin' hoodlum"
They judged us, thinking that we dumb cause where we come from
Got a little older and now I see
Young niggas wanted by the powers that be (powers that be)

[Hook: Emily]
I see people hating other people
Tell me what's the reason
That your kid is hungry, you ain't got no money
What's the reason?
For these wars we're fighting with each other
Season after season
When you're workin' hard, but there ain't nothing comin'
What's the reason?

[Verse 2: Nas]
Uh, picture a Black nanny and a baby in a basket pushin' down 5th Ave
She never had it, it's not hers to begin with
She gives it breakfast, baths and dinners
Treats it so tender while her own kids live alone at home with no phone on
Ain't had a good meal in so long, but so long as mommy's a maid
Cookin' and cleanin', she wanna feed her kids and her kids are dreamin'
Where's my daddy, who's my daddy, have you seen him?
I could imagine them askin', what type of human be-ing
Could leave his family, go back to the Carribean?
Was he locked up, shot up, does he have freedom?
Mom said wipe your tears, keep readin'
But daddy's somewhere, spirit broken, feelin' defeated
A man feels he has to conquer all
The world is his oyster, his pearl so y'all know

[Hook: Emily]
I can't find no reason why we can't all live in peace
Cause this world keeps spinning, yet still I wonder what's the reason

I see people hating other people
Tell me what's the reason
When you're workin' hard but there ain't nothin' comin'
What's the reason?
Oooh-whoa-ooh-whoa

[Verse 3: Nas]
I know a girl, her boyfriend was a fugitive
She's intuitive, be on some stupid shit
She called the cops cause she hated his mother
Now he away doin' numbers, now she gay with her lover
How many niggas gon' die this summer?
I pump life in my music, but still life is a wonder
There's a officer in a squad car, he's a prostitute serial killer
It's odd, huh? Cause he's the same cop in church with his wife
He's molestin' his son and she ignores it at night
Little bad ass bastard, lights a match and kills Betty Shabazz
In her pad while she slept
They said Prescott Bush funded Hitler while the world's in a twister
Nigga, what you expect? Imagine what's next

[Hook: Emily]

Emily harmonizes as Nas talks:
"Uh, uh, man, man'll search the whole planet, looking for what
Try to conquer all. So what? To all my niggas with they
Kids that love they kids, man. All the daddies out there
To all the niggas that died tryin'a figure out what's what
Tryin'a be the biggest of the big, you know. Yeah, yeah
Ladies forgive us. Gotta forgive us. For we know not what
We do. Breakin' hearts, leavin' the crib, buggin' out and
Shit. Just man... man."



[Hook: Nas ×2]

Some of us have angels (the kingdom, the power)
Some of us have angels (the power, the glory)
Some of us have demons (greed, and lust)
Some of us have demons (lust, temptation)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Now this is you, dressed in all black, fatigue hat, ready for combat
A good nigga, you don't leave tracks
A hood nigga wantin G-stacks, do what you gotta do to get that
You feel you need that, where the jooks at?
These are your niggas, creepin' they be leavin niggas sleep witchu
Loc' style, quiet no smile, it's the official
Sometime they grimy, speakin' on they own people
They snake you if they have to, raised tattoos
Now these are your bitches, phonin lonely homey chickens
All the homies stick em, you think you own em man listen
She stab you in your sleep with a knife from out the kitchen
Put a root on you, next week they find you missin'
Dead in your Expedition in the forest, fell off the cliff and
Tumbled til you blew up, Feds told her and she threw up
Fake bitches, actresses, wicked witch practices
Two sides of us, negative or positive

[Hook ×2]

[Verse 2: Nas]
Now this is your mom, your good luck charm
Pushin you to do no wrong, prayin for you that you live long
Nobody kill my baby, but she know her baby crazy
In and out of jail, mom's screamin, "God take me!"
This is your pop, chip off the old block that made him
The man of the house, mom and pops seperatin
Spittin image of a gangster the way pop walked
The way pop talked, got older and you thanked him now
This is your hood, poor folks drugs and robberies
Turnin into the things moms wanted you not to be
Crime followin the wrong dudes who have no values
Life's cheap as the dime in the minds of those around you
This is the test, the stress, the conflict the ups and downs of
Niggas around you make threats
They tell you keep it gangster, no matter the predicament
Even though your decision won't help you benefit

[Hook ×2]

[Verse 3: Nas]
Now once again this is you, entertainin your desires
Bitches money and guns, aimin and you fire
Everyday is grief, if it ain't beef, it's feedin your seed
Tryin to eat? You form material needs
The weed make your brain sizzle, a pistol make it cool off
By stickin up niggas, make them take they jewels off
His reputation is, bigger than his whole life span
He never planned to fail, he just failed to plan
What does it take to realize, Satan's alive, he whispers
And any chance he get, he can take niggas
He comes in all shapes and sizes, his best disguise is
When he stand beside us, but God is inside us, within me
You are your worst enemy - my mom's words echo in my head
And if I let go I'm dead
He stepped at my door, the takes motivate my spirit
An out of body experience, so now I feel it
Lookin at my blessings, the bullets - that missed me coulda hit me
Them court cases coulda put me in the penitentiary
I never hate, that's just wasted energy
The past is gone, the present's a gift, so what's the mystery?
The future - and time only reveals, what fear is
False expectations, appearin' real
We only human, love thy neighbor, so I was told
And I will til permanently, my eyes are closed

[Hook ×2]



[Intro]
Order in court, order in the court
No one else but Mr. Jones has the right to be speaking right now
Order in the court or I’m gonna start making some arresting here
You don’t belong in the court house anyway, your rap concert has been canceled
Order in my court, …

[Verse 1: Nas]
I wake up, wake up in the morning shake my third leg in the toilet
Uzi on my night stand, I’m the man you go to war with
Not the man you go to war against,
Patience I get you if that means I can’t sleep a whole year
I get you, I'm official not a tisket, a tasket
I put you in the casket with a biscuit
The ratchet, the smoke a biscuit, the planted trees advanced weed
Doomed forsakers you fucking fake bloods like movie makeup
I flow tight as tootie bracers, who he hating us
I’ll be on the state bus, shackles is my eight bus
Cause y'all some tellers, opposite of bankers
I’m the shit for ages, my clip steel wheel … gangsters
Click still move like free masons, so we’re from on the flow from the law
Cause large is all across the nation, Nas is bread for the plan
The hold the grand dragon head in his hand
Come and get me, here I am
Pok’em, pok’em

[Hook]
I’m not a law prayer, so you could tell your mayor
I’m a non-stop driven by poetry slayer
One, two, three, down for the count
The result my lyrics oh yes, no doubt (X2)
Pok’em, pok’em

[Verse 2: Chuck D]
The good man in me gets money and stay on the path
But the Pimp shit in me says yo, keep looking for ass
My daughter gave me a gift, something to hold
A little city in water, when you shake it, it snows
I told her never let a sucker nigga take off her clothes
Better wait till
You’re grown, when in love you will know
Everybody’s gotta dream I hope to wish to own a six times two
… against who I don’t know
So one who fed you won’t blow, you won’t eat, you won’t cake
Pay mistake, blaming me for their failures I'm fresh
Getting tale single breasted
A lip brush is sense less some pimp shit
A women hates a man and stays with him for many years
Tell him she loves him and be jealous of him
Now lame is how the ghetto judge him, cause he’s still with her
She take his cash give it to some other real nigga, like me
Pok’em, pok’em, pok’em

[Intro Repeated]



[Verse 1]
In the Rotten Apple, take a bite, taste the worm
Embrace the world of reality we're faced to learn
Coke connection drug bust, graveyards where thugs rest
I keep my mug blessed,the evil is illegal substance sold
Roll mob deep, guns in the black Jeep
MAC-11's and legends, cracks in the streets
Patroller, gold money-folder, gun happy soldiers
Never sober, takin' over, my blood is colder
Niggas respect violence so I become it
I'm from it, I even done it blunted, so run it

[Interlude]
Yeah, son, you know what this is
Take it off, [come on, dunn
Don't even come at me like that]
[Dunn, come on, dunn]

[Hook]
Imagine this: no guns, no knife
It's a one on one so now we gots to fight, son
Imagine this: no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, now we got to fight, yeah
Imagine that, no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, now we got to fight, yeah
Imagine this: no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, son…

[Verse 2]
Yo, I'm a cream fiend with a mean dream
Brain full of schemes, my crew's rollin' fresh out the greens
Give you what you never seen, the inf on the MAC-10
It's 2:10 in the A.M. in the streets of Queens
Try hard and die hard
Chances of survivin' the game is like tryin' to feed Allah lard
A walk a piece with a deadly shadow
They want to blow me with the double barrel, found no sorrow
I brawl with Blanka, caught Bison in a thinker, Dome
Make hell your new home, with the blue chrome
Mid-State wants me, suave fellow but raunchy
The soul of a cold body haunts me, I flee the country
But only to shed tears for years
Too wild for my own self, hopin' help is near
Street fightin' was cool, but in school I brought a new tool
Duelin' with the devil, a rebel, a fool

[Hook]
Imagine this: no guns, no knife
It's a one on one so now we gots to fight, son
Imagine this: no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, now we got to fight, yeah
Imagine that, no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, now we got to fight, yeah
Imagine this: no gun, no knife
It's a one on one, son…
Yeah, take it to the bridge – Queensbridge

[Interlude]
Yo, whassup money? [Yo yo, do you remember this face?]
[Yeah yeah yeah, run these, run these]
*sounds of brawl* [Break you down! Get broke!]
[No hands, run that, run that, run that, no hands]

[Verse 3]
I hear Jake walkie-talkies in my sleep
Marked money I keep, play the benches all week
I visualize Coups, alligators in suits
Elevators in my mansion that rises to the roof
Sippin' 80 proof, watchin' Juice, but hold up
I see some brothers tryin' to roll up, wishin' I could fold up
It's hard to see their faces in they hoodies, I better boogie
Too late, I tried to swing when they jigged me – I'm out

[Outro]
Yeah yeah, kid, don't front
360 degrees, knowhatI'msayin?
That's how it comes back at you
Queensbridge, that's how we live
South side, all that
New York, light it up, light it up
Yo yo, you saw how I snuffed that kid?
Yeah, I saw that, I saw that
Ain't no half  steppin' out here
That's how we do out here in the street fight!



[Intro: Malcolm X]
The white power structure of today is just as much interested in perpetuating slavery as the white power structure was 100 years ago, only now they use modern methods of doing so. And, uh…

[Paul Mooney]
White folks made up nigga and don’t want me to say it
Ain’t that a bitch?
You made it up, you shouldn’t have made it up!
You done fucked up, you shouldn’t have made up nigga
And you made up a song to go with it
Please don’t make me sing the song
Eenie meenie minie, you know the god damn song I’m talking about
And you change the words when you see black folks

[Nas]
This is my opening scripture - I've been preparing this album
My whole life, might be uncomfortable for most you listeners
Satan's bombarding me with propositions, but I decline
I started in the Bridge without a pot to piss in
I overcame all the opposition
My teachers told that I'd a broken mayne on a cot in prison
Cloaked in the finest drapes, not bathin' apes
But we still filthy, Supreme Court say we still guilty
This is the Genesis, and I don't even see a worthy arch nemesis
I get loose like the Jena Six, they put a noose on 'Pac
Now I'm defending Vick, and free that nigga T.I.P
I'd take the grave or a bid
To let some dirty clan members run up in my crib
And plant cracks on the man that's going to church
Plants packs on the man that's going to work
And build cases, meanwhile they daddies and they brothers
Is recruiting all my brothers and cousins to fill bases
The nerve of y'all to call Escobar racist
Nigga, nigga, nigga, nigga, nigga, nigga hatred



A body map of Nas's tattoos, starting from the top-right, working down to bottom-left
Neck
Nasir

Right Arm
Cross
Destiny

Left Arm
Cross
Rip Ill Will
Left Chest
Braveheart

Stomach
God's Son
Malcolm X

Back
Scarub

Removed
Kelis



Album Art for Illmatic XX:






Track List:

Disc 1:
1. The Genesis
2. N.Y. State Of Mind
3. Life’s A Bitch
4. The World Is Yours
5. Halftime
6. Memory Lane (Sittin’ In Da Park)
7. One Love
8.One Time 4 Your Mind
9. Represent
10. It Ain’t Hard To Tell

Disc 2:
1. I’m A Villain (previously unreleased)
2. The Stretch Armstrong and Bobbito Show on WKCR October 28, 1993 (previously unreleased freestyle)
3. Halftime (Butcher Remix)
4. It Ain’t Hard To Tell (Remix)(promo single)
5. One Love (LG Main Mix)
6. Life’s A Bitch (Arsenal Mix)(promo single)
7. One Love (One L Main Mix)
8. The World Is Yours (Tip Mix)
9. It Ain’t Hard To Tell (The Stink Mix)(UK single)
10. It Ain’t Hard To Tell (The Laidback Remix)(UK single)



[Intro]
Crime, life, bitches, money
Time..
For my Braveheart's.. my Braveheart's
Uhh, uhh, uhh.. what, what, what?
One time.. two times..

[Verse 1]
From "Breaking Atoms" to "Illmatic", to goin platinum
Shit did change course since rippin it with Main Source
Nine-one, nine-two, time flew
Out of the blue, time for a new young king to rule
Younger frame, older state of mind
Find my name on a page in your Qu'ran, I learned that, in '89
When I was slingin cocaine and baby 9's
Put it in rap and I gave y'all a way to rhyme
God guides us, from public assistance to high rises
Condos, houses where y'all can't find us
Move on your cliques in silence, and wet it up
My meal everyday was a slice and 7-Up
Took advice from a street legend
Identities have been changed, to protect the innocent
Witnessin niggas mistakes, visits at niggas wakes
Cause jealousy infiltrates and seals your fate

[Hook]
Look way deep inside yourself
Discover the diamond inside, find ya wealth
Once you get it, you gotta live it the limit
Niggas never wanna see you with it, FUCK THEM THO'
Niggas can't come close enough to touch the dough
The lifestyle I live is untouchable
So we clutch a few, guns that'll touch your crew
Cause we learned to do what the hustlers do

[Verse 2]
Different ways to come out the hood - in cuffs or a casket
Or crazy, or shootin three pointer baskets
Or maybe - it's the rap shit, all type of tactics
We use to get dough, some choose kickin in doors
I asked a reverand, my mother and a best friend
Less than ten years ago for me to get dough
What y'all recommend is either dope weed or blow
Cause high school was slow, and jewelry was hot
Duckin truancy cops, trains I hopped, to make it downtown
Cisco in my veins, pissed between trains
Canal Street, just lookin at rings
Outside through a glass, went in the store and asked
How much it cost, Korean man brushin me off
For some other big time customer, probably a hustler
Who looked down at my small chain and chuckled up
I said, "I'll be just like you soon, motherfucker what?"

[Hook]
Look way deep inside yourself
Discover the diamond inside, find ya wealth
Once you get it, you gotta live it the limit
Niggas never wanna see you with it, FUCK THEM THO'
Niggas can't come close enough to touch the dough
The lifestyle I live is untouchable
So we clutch a few, guns that'll touch your crew
Cause we learned to do what the hustlers do

[Verse 3]
To them niggas who get life and throw a smile at the judge
Wildest thugs, who blow trial, exiled from the hood
Keepin bitches, comin through on visits
You will survive, them weak freaks think you finished
You first time in you known for poppin your toast
By your third year in you forgotten by most
Niggas wife cut them out of they life, niggas don't write
Friends actin like they don't be gettin your kites
It be ill, niggas coming home and no time, they get killed
Not even home a month and they get peeled, backwards
In they own backyard or in the park
One to the head, two to the heart, you should be smart
In the projects, who gon' die next?
Hoodrats know who let the gats blow and who keep cashflow
Like the niggas know the rats, with some good asshole
Blunts be a good-ass roll while passin your 'dro

[Hook]
Look way deep inside yourself
Discover the diamond inside, find ya wealth
Once you get it, you gotta live it the limit
Niggas never wanna see you with it, FUCK THEM THO'
Niggas can't come close enough to touch the dough
The lifestyle I live is untouchable
So we clutch a few, guns that'll touch your crew
Cause we learned to do what the hustlers do

[Outro]
Feel me?
One time, huh, two times, uhh uhh uhh
What what what? Uhh uhh uhh..



[Intro: Nas]
Yea, uh, uh, real niggas dawg, ya heard
Yea, journey to the life, just journey

[Verse One: Nas]
I'm the nigga that ain't loud
Throw C-low, never ace out
Only move out wit a particular crew, I hate crowds
The observer, money and murder the hood praise it
I was raised in it, early age
Was presented with the ultimatum
Be a boss with a army, drop the Atari games
Hard cocaine that had my neighborhood strung out
Brains numb out, guns out
I was smart high hopes in my heart
But dope cartels would emerge
Bloody shirts on niggas while they hollerin'
'Til their lungs don't work
Figures I end up with a scarred memory of my youth
With dudes in the drug loot, feelin' henny "SHOOT"
My nigga Will still here, man I wish it was truth
Buried in his favorite shit, FILA sneakers and FILA suit
My eyes are the window of my soul
My niggas let the Indo roll
Thinkin' time flies we gettin' old
That's the words of my right hand man, my main dawg
We been rollin since day one, he down for the cause
All he talk is extortion, kidnap shit, big gat shit
I'm like - "yo think positive", but he act sick
He only think about lettin' his Mac spit
He like fuck who he hit
Me it bothers, cause he know I'm rent 'em it regardless
If he keep wildin' out he's makin' both of us targets
So I pull him, tell him on some deep shit, try to school 'em
We already lost niggas by how we was movin'
We still livin', but our lives need much improvin'
I think I'm gonna lose 'em

[Hook: Nas]
I was blind in this world
All I thought about was diamonds and pearls
I had beef wit a nigga, then I'm clappin' his girl
Nappin' his kids, ransack and run through his rib
Blow up his mom's crib, there's no way he could live
It's gettin' clearer, starin' at the man in the mirror
Like all this time, it's just a fragment of my mind
Come to find out, shit wasn't what is made to be
In reality +My Worst Enemy+ was me

[Verse Two: Nas]
Feelin' like I got the dons clout
Trigger pawn cocked Glocks spray up your moms spot
I ain't playin' wit you, war, fuck pistols
Bring machines, icy bell buckles, ten guns, M-1'S with ice muzzles
Life's a struggle, get your wifey touch too, everybody involved
Homicide, doctors patchin' up your war scars
Task Force chargin' at us, news flash, thug crews blast at officers
Coroners pick you up from the grass
Livin' fast 'til somebody tries meltin' my chest
I'm high loosin' it, could of hit my own self with the tec
Refuse to quit, but I tried tellin' me to relax
It's like I can't hear my words 'til I'm trapped to the max
Even then I blame everybody else except me, pops left me
I was just three, I cried for help, moms was busy
That don't mean nigga's stupid
But I got a habit wit - makin' up excuses
Was born ruthless, hated school, they ain't teach me I'm a bad seed
Planted in this ghetto, where my niggas can't read
Multiply, subtract; only knowin' how to count cracks and count stacks
Now what y'all know about that
One side of me wanted out of this life
Glue traps on the floor for the mice
'Til the nigga saw the light
I wanted money when I got it, I would spend it
I wanted jewels, but when I heard it, yo I wouldn't listen
All of the drama in my life I got my self into
All the toxins my body took in, faded my mental
I let these niggas words get to me
But I'm tired of my ice, tired of Bentley
It's the end of the century
I recognized the world is a beautiful place
Niggas opinions ruinin' my musical taste
Cause everytime I caught a case, could of got me in jail
If you wasn't scared of jail, you more likely to fail
I thought the whole world was cursed, from the hand I was dealt
And +My Worst Enemy+ was my self
Word to my self...word to my self...word to my self...

[Hook: Nas]
I was blind to the world
All I thought about was diamonds and pearls
I had beef wit a nigga, then I'm clappin' his girl
Nappin' his kids, ransack, run through his rib
Blow up his mom's crib, there's no way he could live
It's gettin' clearer, starin' at the man in the mirror
Cause all this time, it was a fragment in my mind
Come to find out, shit wasn't what is made to be
In reality +My Worst Enemy+ was me



[Nas]
Third grade, singin Star Spangled Banner
Using proper manners, learned to handle anger
Animal behavior
Later on my block rockin wit my jocks on
Eating Bon Ton cheese popcorn, hummin a KISS rock song
Socks long to my knees
Summer breeze runnin through the leaves
Playin freeze tag, can I stay out, please dad?
Can I hang wit my little gang out?
Hearin shots rang out, heard my moms call my name out
Come upstairs, run up stairs
Take a bath, shit stained underwears
Wipe yourself wit paper
Bad little ass in my bed at 8:30
Wash my plate, ate dinner up late
Gazing at the wall, prayin basketball
Was my future for this young one
Hooping in the sun, proud to be where I come from
Later shootin guns fantasizing
Fascinated by gold rope chains
Looking back at my hood days but things ain't change

[Hook] *all Nas samples* 2x
"Nasty-Nasty-Nasty Nas is a rebel to America"
"Lyrical professor, keep ya under pressure"
"It's like that, you know it's like that"
"Nas-Nas'll catch wreck", "You got the mad fat fluid"

[Nas]
Bumpy Johnson style, old timers, crocodile shoes
Pinky rings, bank robbers wit two's, boss of wild crews
Slacks overlapsed, apple jack hats, quarter field coats
Cadillacs wit white walls and chrome wheel spokes
They was organizing, investing in a piece of the hood
They had drugs, bettin numbers, police understood
They played the Cotton Club, red carpet, hoes on they arm
Plush minks, pimped out gangstas, civil rights wasn't won
E'ry Christmas they was Santa Claus
Nixon was the anti-christ
Bitches ass was bigger than sniffin nose candy white
Listenin to Malcom speak, talcum powder shaving cream
Layin back, barber chair, straight razor clean
Babies is born, big families started to blossom
Mad people just applied for apartments and got em
Used to be rules to this game of hustlers and dealers
From tommy guns to mac 10's
QB's new born killers (shit is changed)

Chorus 2x

[Nas]
Yo everytime I turn around, niggas shot, niggas stabbed
Winter nights, pregnant girls strugglin to get a cab
Fiends lurkin, D's searchin, pat pockets
Kids quick to bed but they heads from gats poppin
Queensbridge slingers hoppin out Benzes, don status
Dope fiends got syringes, poppin out they arms sractchin
I remember park jams
Gazelles, perfect wave shell
Adidas, smellin reefer way before purple haze
Private stock bare, niggas wit ill walks like Mark Clare
Hats tilted, wild niggas lickin shots in the air
Me and Pop was there, through the years our names would switch
Ain't nuttin changed but the names Nastradamus and Blizz
What project is this?
QB, Vernon and Tenth
12th Street, murderous pimps, hot as hell's heat
What could you tell me, nigga's seen it all in this game
When it's all said and done, just remember my name

Chorus 2x



[Verse 1: Nas]
How should I start this?
How should I begin, to sin?
Grab the microphone and my rhymes'll win
Wheel of Fortune, spin, around
Check it out, I'm not a rap clown
Get smacked down by the fuckin' four pound
In your dome
Hit you with the nick plate chrome
Queensbridge, thats my motherfuckin' home
Off the top of my head, yo, I'm a blunt head
Police... Police want a nigga dead
But, I'm not going out like that black
I kick the actual facts in so low
Cold as a Polar Bear, I swear, word to Will
But I'mma chill, rhymes'll kill
Niggas know the style when I freak the profile
Asiatic Child, yo
Grand Wizard on the side of me
Yo, Get on the mic and bless the M-I-C

[Interlude: Grand Wizard]
But I'mma pass it off to my man Six-Nine
Kick it one time

[Verse 2: 6'9"]
Hey, Yo, Six-Nine a true to life nigga
Yo, my style is iller, iller than Halle Berry's figure
Niggas don't fuck with the Six-Niner
Shorty watch your mouth, I smack you back in your vagina
Heres to reaper crack and sunrise tequila
Kill the margarita heres a 50 get some more cheaper
The ghetto trooper, so sparred up the booth buddha
My thoughts stay nasty like the underground sewage
To be the man you gotta beat the man
It ain't nothing, so start come here but nothin' mark my timberlands
You want static? Lets have it knuckles will flow like the Atlantic
But sink like the Titanic
Since birth I was thinking too fast, my first beef was with the doctor
When he smacked me on the ass
The trigger man, I'm crazy like Sam
My skills so Ill like a with a white chick with a suntan

[Verse 3: Nas]
One for the money
Two for pussy and foreign cars
Three for Alize, niggas deceased or behind bars
I rap divine, God, check the prognosis: is it real or showbiz?
My window faces shootouts, drug overdoses
Live amongst no roses, only the drama, for real
A nickel-plate is my fate, my medicine is the ganja
Here's my basis, my razor embraces, many faces
Your telephone blowing, black stitches or fat shoelaces
Peoples are petro, dramatic automatic .44 I let blow
And back down po-po when I'm vexed so
My pen taps the paper then my brain's blank
I see dark streets, hustling brothers who keep the same rank
Pumping for something, some'll prosper, some fail
Judges hanging niggas, uncorrect bails for direct sales
My intellect prevails from a hanging cross with nails
I reinforce the frail, with lyrics that's real
Word to Christ, a disciple on streets, trifle on beats
But, Chill! Place the microphone and say peace
So Sudan, take the microphone in your hand
Kick the flim flam

[Verse 4: Sudan]
Queensbridge, when will the drama ever cease?
I like to say peace Willie and rest in peace
A cool brother who's all about justice
I still can't understand how he left us
Well... he's gone and life goes on you know
We had a crew but one by one we go
Memories of his face that was full of joy
Rock-a Rock-a bye Rock-a bye homeboy
Reminiscing with the brothers standing on the block
Never talk a lot, never was a big shot
It's so hard to say goodbye a sad song
And damn I can't believe my man's gone
Digging back in the days when we used to laugh
Now its a memory that's haunted from the past
Poor Willy its a shame how the ghetto got him
And word is bond - I wanna cry when I think about him
Three bullets to his back on his own block
Not a way to go, killed by the buckshot
Queensbridge wake and up and smell the air
And stop killin' like a villain, like you don't care
Remember Willie and times we had with joy
Rock-a Rock-a bye Rock-a bye homeboy
Rock-a Rock-a bye Rock-a bye homeboy
Rock-a Rock-a bye

[Verse 5: Jungle]
My skills are ill like the prez with a plan
My brothers run from Sudan then the Ku-Klux-Klan
Like a kamikaze, Sadaam Hussein then won
Feel the buns of a nun, put tricks for funds and chill
I slow a verse so you can understand
I kill rappers more freaky than a motherfuckin' a Mic Man
And when it comes to a battle
I stand out tall like the man who played the man on The White Shadow

[Verse 6: Nas]
To my man Jungle
Dwelling in the jungle
Where must we go?
Where must we wander
Deep out the skies come the MC Nas
Not to surprise, but to civilize
Yo, the dumb men wandering around the streets
Listenin' to a nigga rappin' on fly beats
I just kicked a mad philly style
Get bucked wild cause you know my style
I could run a word, kick it to a herb
Make 'em turn into a rich man
Increase the plan, the master plan
Yo, I'm buggin' out cause the weed got me buggin'
Plus the Guinness Stout
Grand Wizard yo, you my physical
Why don't you mic the mic, make the microphone miserable

[Verse 7: Grand Wizard]
It's cuisine, the G the Wiz (?)
You know our culture gone get Biz
I got my man Nasty on the side of me
My man Six-Nine, you know we're not hotter G
I am the man that'll break it down
I'll break all down cuz I got the sound
I got Queensbridge in the back of me
The Tec and everything, I'm coming strapped G

[Verse 8: Nas]
Money and murder, money and murder
The sick shit you heard comin' from my motherfuckin' my  swerve
The words are poetic, I sound energetic
When I'm blunted or Moet'd
My microphone's upsetted cause I'm crazy
Now you know, never lazy
Yo, I'm gonna get all the cash I can
Don't give a fuck if I gotta shoot a policeman
Pluckin' a church and snatch a fuckin'... nah can't be flippin' like that
Cause you niggas try to jock the style
But I left that shit to get the new shit, float like the now
Now you can't catch up G
Cause I got the new styles on the M-I-C
I keep gettin' newer, can't step to her
Nigga from the Bridge, so you keep that shit
And I'mma flip the script next year
And my real name is Nasir
Can't spell it cause I say it too clear
The alphabets are not enough words or letters to use
When it comes to mics I bruise
I just go, with the magical mystic flow
Niggas don't know, that's word to the man Bo
I get Illmatic with the style that's insane
Comin' outta fuckin' murderous brain
Grand Wizard, please take this Mic from me
Before I bug the fuck out and end up D-E-A-D







[Intro]
Yo it's your boy Rodney Darkchild
Cracking it up..
With my favorite DJ, DJ Stolen
You already know..

[Verse 1]
Heard you got your master's, did college up
Never looked back, now that's what's happening
And it's good to see you made it out the hood
With a degree, a true man with passion
Now you could enter the so-called
"White Man's Society" and go right past them
Looking in the Wall Street Journal for your face
But it's always absent
You know that's him eating foie and ambrosia
Watch on his arm, golden, Latin
Try to get his attention
But he's flinching, guess my grimy clothes threw him off, so I mention
We were neighbors some time ago
He was kinda cold, in this restaurant
Full of his kind and more
He sighed, tried to look surprised, I know
His side of the city where he resides, so
I had to go
I heard him laugh hard at some sad black jokes
Hate so-called "intellectuals"
No balls, he suggests we vote
He stand all proud, speaking to correct his folks
He want to lecture folks
Cause he professional and he suggest that we don't sell dope
Suggest that we don't sell dope
And I guess it's true, but who the fuck are you?

[Hook]
Who are you, tryna tell me who I am?
Tryna tell me who I am?
Who are you, tryna tell me what I'm not?
Tryna tell me what I'm not
Who are you, tryna tell me who I am?
Tryna box me in, tryna find who I am

[Verse 2]
I'm Idi Amin, Marcus Garvey, H. Rap Brown
I'm Muhammad Ali, I'm Reginald Lewis
George Washington Carver, I'm Nas with incredible music
Let's do it, thinking of a master plan
Sipping on disaster, smoking on gangster
Watching niggas argue, killing like a boss do
With my hell up in Harlem, hat in hand
With a girl named Pat, she more than a waitress
To order a drink with. She divorced a banker, and bought the bar
She got an automobile, she gives an order to kill
You get caught and robbed
We could see your walk is off, you could lose your rhythm
When you walk in the gutter for a while
You easily go to soft from hard
Now we all about hustlers, number runners
Hoes and sharks and we all know the code of the block
And you talking some gibberish, anti-nigga shit
Cause you marched back with Rosa Parks
Brother don't start, go build your Noah's Ark
You could float to the end of the world
And pretend what you not, but I know what you are
While I roll in my car, and I'm spending my knot
While my enemies plot, you ain't out of the shot
Matter of fact, you're an easier target
And I respect everything you accomplished
But I hope I never get old and talk that nonsense
So who the fuck are you?

[Hook]

She Queen of Nzinga
Winnie Mandela, Ida B. Wells
So why can't you tell? Why can't you tell?



[Verse 1: Nas]
It's the late night greasy spoon patron, poolhall making
Big bets, midsection got the 8 in
Dior Christian pimping, got that penal system diction
Riffing, you don't want it you snitching
Spit a few at a traitor with that new AR
Try to kill me I'm the leader, that's coup d'etat
Streetsweepers in that Coupé all black, bitches want my chipped tooth back
Steel mac, so my kufi never gets smacked
Squeeze a fifth with a grip as I dip from the paparazzi
Still playing numbers you can't stop me
Still wearing bundles and spark weed
If I ever say 'Queens get 'em', you know they got me
Success, scandal, bone deep, personal beef
So lead by example or get trampled
Since Hip Hop is Dead, this is the N
Congratulations in order 'cause we did it again

[Hook: Nas]
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still getting it and don't even love the doe
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still ripping, and I don't even love the hoes
Still getting it and don't even love the doe
Steel gripping it, you know that I tug the fo'
Stay splifted cause you know that I love the dro

[Verse 2: Nas]
The style is taboo, the chain's offensive
Brain on airplanes, Gucci frames are vintage
The two Tec Don in Yukon's and Benzes
Chicks who suck other chicks tits like infants
The Apprentice but not Trump, I'm the nigga with Glocks and pumps
That you don't see much, sucker free from chumps
Homes with cobblestones in front of 'em
He's got guns in cummerbunds, so understand you under son
Don't make me have you running from a hundred guns
Don't make me grab your only son, I'm coming from
A place Tanqueray and weed's the only escape
From phonies who hate when you rolling with papes
That's why the god party with juicy models
They mob me, the gnarly, Charlie Luciano - hardly
Have to tell y'all, I kill y'all for spitting songs that involve me nigga
Original verbal assassin, have to carve me a nigga

[Hook]

[Outro]
Yo this is Nas, Queens own
Hip Hop Is Dead so put this shit in your vein
Queens Own
Queens Own



[Verse 1]
Yo, my man was regulatin on niggas he used to thug with
Older niggas in this murder game, drug czars
BM, Jaguars, they cash was large
Since he was wild, they let him in
He did a crazy number of things
To put himself deeper under they wing
It didn't take long for duke to get on
Studied they movements - who would kill, who was strong
Studied like a student, got it bloody, he was shootin
Drivin they cars, robbin connects
Drivin his Lex, keys was movin
Young don, now they know they weakness
They never seen it comin
Son was on some real take over the streets shit
Now he got his own crew of young guns clickin now
Richer now, now they run shit, see how it flips around?

[Verse 2]
Dudes be, comin from bids thinkin shit is different
Cause the streets move fast, you blink, you could miss it
I just sit back and, think of my last 20 years
6 pack, gunnin my years, jet black, blunt in my ear
Real relaxed, readin real loves stories like
Ceaser and Cleopatra, we need another actress to play her
Cause Liz Taylor's hot, but the Egyptian queen
On the movie screen needs to be portrayed in a proper flava
Hopped in the shower, threw on the boxers with the baby oil
Baby powder, night owl, movin to later hours, only
Fuckin with kings, niggas official
If you phony, come in the circle, niggas'll diss you
We converse on the state of hip hop
We share the same views and feelings
He sling cain, crib costin 2 million
He plan to leave the streets forever
But niggas that wanted him left him
Dead in the streets 'fore I can tell him



[Intro]
La la
La la, la la, la la la la la la la
La la, la la, la la la la la la la

[Sample 1: Live at the Barbeque]
Street's disciple, my raps are trifle
I shoot slugs from my brain just like a rifle
Stampede the stage

[Sample 2: Halftime]
Nas, why did you do it
You know you got the mad fat fluid when you rhyme, it's halftime

Check me out y'all

[Sample 3: It Ain't Hard to Tell]
From the spliff that I lift and inhale, it ain't hard to tell

[Sample 4: The World is Yours]
It's yours
Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine; whose world is this?

I sip the Dom P, watching Gandhi til I'm charged
Then writing in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin

[Sample 5: One Love]
One what?
One love, one love, one love, one love

[Sample 6: The Message]
Fake thug, no love
You get the slug CB4 Gusto
Your luck low, I didn't know 'til I was drunk though

[Sample 7: Street Dreams]
Street dreams are made of these

Everybody's looking for something

[Sample 8: If I Ruled the World]
Just some thoughts for the mind
I take a glimpse into time
Watch the blimp read "The World Is Mine"

If I ruled the world (Imagine that)

[Skit]
[Horse]: Yo Jungle, how you feel about that Nas shit?
[Jungle]: Niggas heard that shit, man, the fuck is that, man? Sorry man, y-you gotta play that shit to niggas man, niggas know what the fuck time it is man. (Horse: Okay man) Word man, it's your shit man, it's your time man, fuck all these niggas out man. Word is bond man, we ain't gonna fuck about  none of these motherfuckers man. It's your time man. Word [?]. It's real man. Try to tell these niggas one, two times man. This the motherfucking third time we telling these motherfuckers (Horse: What!?) man. The third time man. And this time gonna be the worse time man. Word is bond man out for the ghetto man, for all the motherfucking corners, all the motherfucking thugs man, real gansters man. Niggas in jail and shit man. Niggas with real-real motherfucking money, niggas with real motherfucking things on their minds man, word is bond man. [?] bitch ass niggas man (Horse: Fucking faggot emcees). Fucking weirdos man, y'all weirdos out there man. Fuck all of y'all niggas. Yeah man y'all niggas can write what y'all want. Suck my motherfucking dick. You're-you're a bitch! What the fuck y'all want, man. Listen to this gangster shit, this is gangster. Real shit! How 'bout that? For the Nas, man. [?] Drugs, man
[Horse]: Fuck all y'all faggot motherfuckers



[Nas]
Uh, word
You dont get this everyday word

With so much drama, in QBC it's kinda hard bein Escobaro
Eldorado red sippin Don out the bottle
My lifes like a Donald Goines novel,
We wave glasses like bravo Drunk niggas with mad problems
Shot pockets niggas on the block rock this
Buy cocaine cook it and chop it, lookin to profit
In triple ways goin through this difficult stage called life
With each year my physicals praised,
Niggas slip beyond the reach of help
Caught in the street, thinkin they can teach they self
When all we wanted was a piece of wealth
And randomly feed our family these streets are insanity
Amber me, caught inside a thugs fantasy
Richest nigga in showbiz is what I plan to be
Heavy desire hold this 9' ready to fire, you know me show me the money like I'm Jerry McGuire, it's on..

[Nature]
Its time we set it straight, connect with Dre the correct way, predicted Platinum in less then a day
So for that we toast, this ones for us why you acting Hov, all I do is write rap, stack, relax and smoke
Watchin my dreams come true, stay humble in the eyes of others, politicing with the wisest brothers
Its Nature, one a the latest, peak how I play this, straight from the Bridge one of your kids favorites
From now till the day that I'm stiff, foul flagrant, pay the rent, always stay swift
Stuck in my ways type chauvinistic, since a youth I had a thing for big hoops, flooded rings and older bitches
Holdin my riches in lump-somes for trust funds, fully recovered thugs lust to bust guns
While some'll get drunk beat wives and cuss sons, a slow process called life lets show progress..

[Dre]
When I said I hold my own I wasn't frontin never claimed to be the baddest for skills, I got a little something
Coming through never the same old, hit a slick verse sippin drinks under a tropic rainbow
Nothin could give me more pleasure to spark this I worked the hardest, ducked the farthest makin me illest producing artist
Done crimes I ran from one time, could catch me with my crew bustin rhymes in the Sunshine
State, no case to fear I been with millionaires, out to make a killin for real's my resolution this year
Few places I walked most imagine, new faces I met at beauty pageants, past cuties now wanna do me
But never forgot where I was from, I check for family and every nigga who was down from day one
If you ain't speakin money language I can't hang with peak, your conversation is weak, I need the heat to get us famous, so it's senseless speak



Ayo I hit the Earth like a comet, Invasion
Nas is like the afrocentric asian
Right here with the amazing Green Lantern
Serious radio, y’all know what it is

NaS too real, NaS true king
You know the king

Cars with police radars on highways boppin
Bullpin therapy cell block dodging
Pissy stairways missed them days not when
They shut down the stores when I’m shopping
Used to be pop locking, train hopping
Face covered in stocking
Six pack Bud drinking gambler
Fuck them cameras in front of the man
Sing the hustlers mantra, hands of luck
More hits than gambling huff
I hollered Indosia, 40 belows covered the toes
I was a soldier with the Popeyes sippin Amota
Nigga honestly I call this a culture
My sister’s a snake, my brother’s a vulture
My mother’s the block, my father’s a ghetto piranha
Swimming with sharks my tones false settle drama
Obama, if the kids mirror you
We’ll all push Masaratis with the silver hue
They fear that connection
I rather die in a box than live safe in witness protection
Gotti was a racist but he still get praises
We don’t give a fuck, nigga gangsta is gangsta
Bricks come with Bill Clinton’s name on it taped up
Hollywood Lohan parties people they facing them
Kim Kardashian, body with the waist slim
Know some hood girls who did time that could take them
Rappers changing families, fags are all lost
I’m at the Waldorf, Vancleave under the sleeve
Save the small talk, I feel alive
New Porches Jordan number fives
Already said I’m the last real nigga alive

Nas, let my words guide you
From crips to piru this is survival
Turn my voice up
Let my words guide you
From crips to piru this is survival
Invasion!



[Hook: Amerie]
The rest of my life
The rest of my life

[Verse 1: Nas]
LIFE, dead presidents, devilish meant
Overthrow king from they thrones cause of their negligence
DEATH, real shit'll start comin' to light
Niggas you ain't like dickin' your wife, WHAT?
Kind of undermining, grimy, stiff corpse shapin'
Pork bacon, double-cross Satan
HEATHENS, non-god-fearing, lace thong wearing demons
But glory go to God, y'all BENEATH HIM
If y'all don't know that, rap with a old cat
He'll show you streets where them big dealers DROVE AT
Where low-key killers let the fo' clap
Blocka-blocka-blocka -- OH
The glow, the 'dro, the dough for shows
Everything a hood brother thing he needs -- YO
You'll find a goal in a ghetto superstar's roadmap
And I'mma use that for the

[Hook: Amerie]
For the rest of my life
For the rest of my life

[Verse 2: Nas]
Burnt-out, kicked to the curb
So I had to learn how to turn around a hundred thou' REAL FAST
In '95 that was my last, I went back to the ave thinkin' rap's a thing of the PAST
Rest in peace E Money Bags, no more cabs, got caught with the ratchet in the stash
Lawyer want CASH, my ba'y bro blast burners at cats who gell
They burnt a range with a Molotov COCKTAIL
My little man got fourteen-years for car-jackin' a undercover
Them cops SWEAR, my little nigga told on me
I'm thinkin, "Hello, where's the L-O, V-E"
Pigs play games, my little man'll never say names
Word to his pops with elephant veins
They both locked-up still, word to Will
I'll make it and chill for the

[Hook: Amerie]
For the rest of my life
For the rest of my life

[Verse 3: Nas]
My man gave his mommy coke
So she wouldn't hit the block all crazy for the smoke
DAMN NIGGA, could you picture you supplyin' your own moms
So she don't have to bone for DIMES?
Or give dome for nicks' in the roofs of the projects
Where dogs shit and PISS
Yeah, we all plan to get rich but it's all about how it's executed
Lexus coup-ed, brigettes from cubics
Mighta been stupid, but I got far from twenty-six BARS
To ten LP's, what can him tell me? Of them? Of y'all?
I'm NAS, on a track that's unorthodox
Like my life coulda been offed by THE COPS
Told y'all, Nas will prevail by the book when it's up for sale
About the rest

[Hook: Amerie]
For the rest of my life
For the rest of my life



Nature: (talking)

Yo Yo Yo Son
You ever felt a funny vibe
What you supposed to do?
And ya man's ain't ya man's
And ya friend's ain't ya friend's
And ya money ain't yours anymore
And niggas wanna count your money
Niggas wanna see what the fuck you got

You know what I'm sayin
Sometimes I gotta take long trips and get away from this shit
I can't take this shit no more
This shit right here be fucking niggas like me up Knowhatimsayin
I been exposed to too much and too long
All my niggas out there in the hood and shit
That be bringing that real shit
Put your fucking Phillies in the air
Your Back Woods your White Owl
Your Dutchess and we goin smoke and ride to this shit right here
This that real shit here
This is the soundtrack to the realness right here
Niggas in too deep knowhatimsayin
It's all real what what live nigga what what nigga

Nas:
Yo A yo A yo A yo
I thank a dead homey
Incarcerated penpal I got the feds on me
A constipated mental'
Always rains in the ghetto it's pain in the ghetto
Caskets do u believe in angels or devils?
Welfare it's dark and there's no help here
Killer cops shooting black kids to instill fear
But we still here not afraid cracks is made stacks get made
A "G" will get you gats sprayed
At my man's funeral it's like nobody cares
The police get shot the mayor and everybody there
Graffiti on the lobby stairs, kids with knotty heads is greedy
Soldiers small faces painted on the walls
I was born to ball
Rings you can't afford name a clothes line I done worn it before
Dictate the naked soul of Nas, henny four fives
Ho's with thick thighs be the wives of rich guys
Never trust a bitch cuz a bitch lies
Enemys close cuz friends switch sides when shit gets live
Dealin' with a lot of pressure I'm in too deep
Life of a thug born and raised in the streets

Chorus:

Nature: You want war I'mma give u war
Nas: I'm in too deep
Nature: You want peace I'mma give u peace
Nas: Raised in the streets
Nature: You want love I'mma show u love
Nas: Life of a thug
Nature: There's no love for me in these streets
Nas: I'm in too deep
Nature: It's just hustlers in the streets
Nas: Raised in the streets

Nature:

Yo A yo
When you in too deep you better climb out and find out
Are you the one they looking at cuz when you looking back
It's your time to fear if the drama's severe
I see scars starting off at the side of they're ear
Ending up by the jaw of the throat another law broke
I try to patch it white kids is buying acid
Closing down spots popping a knot
Heard the foremores use binoculars watchin the blocks
Calling phantom on the tape
I'm the phantom of the wax
Now meat the man behind the music examing the facts
I use it, to my advantage do this shit everyday
Like sneaking gats up in Great A
Six Flags, catch me getting on the popular rides
If a nigga violate he getting popped on the line
Small hot ones locked in the spines
Transformed roll out pass it off to my man no doubt
I keep six disguises six shirts in the trunk
Imagin it gets six times worse when I'm drunk
Prepare for death first of the month
Open your eyes, it's right here in front of you open your eyes
I can't explain it cuz it's not normal, is niggas loyal
I talk about life and live it for you this shit is soil
Like the dirt that I walk on you talk on
Used to have love for ya know it's all gone all gone

Chorus:

Nature: You want war I'mma give u war
Nas: I'm in too deep
Nature: You want peace I'mma give u peace
Nas: Raised in the streets
Nature: You want love I'mma show u love
Nas: Life of a thug
Nature: There's no love for me in these streets
Nas: I'm in too deep
Nature: It's just hustlers in the streets
Nas: Raised in the streets



[Verse 1 - Nas]
If Macy's don't have it
A hatred addict
I need faces mad with frowns when I'm around
Or I'm wasting fabric
I don't feel great until my plushest pieces
Cause you to suck your teeth
Some mean-mugging on my clean thugging mean nothing
Women dream I'm your husband
I'm Alex Pushkin, the black poetry writing Russian
Ice disgusting. I started bling
How could you question my direction?
I'm king, I'm cultured, not just cause of
The foreign movie posters, the frames
Starring French names, look closer
? to the worm food
I despise and watch fake wise guys who turn stool
And speak highly of late made guys who once ruled
Hard-bottomed shoes, chauffeurs flaunt ambrosia
My baby moms wrote a book that couldn't harm a soldier
Muhammad Ali hobbies, no pilates, jogging, jumping rope
Til my body cut up like a bag of dope
And hope I die ?

[Hook - Nas]
Worked too hard, stayed up too many nights
If I'm wrong for being me, I don't wanna be right
Nah! No not never, no not ever
I don't wanna be right, hood star, we are

[Verse 2 - Nas]
Diggi-diggi-dignitaries, Carhart congress
Fitted hat high rank officials
World Bank like Rothschilds
Take the wool from over your eyes
Who conspired to deceive you and I
It's easier for a man to believe a big lie
Than a small truth. Money's not evil
It's the love of money that's the root
Not a luxury car worshipper, but I purchase
Particular vehicles, so me and my dudes, we can cruise
Upsetting policia They study my natural sleepy eye
To see if I'm high. I got my piece of the pie
My 40 acres is my 40 karats on my piece, that's fly
Carti bracelet, you talk that talk and walk that walk
You wouldn't understand our thoughts
How many black leaders are bought
Why the fuck you care if I rap about
How much my sneakers cost? I'mma floss

[Hook - Nas]
Worked too hard, stayed up too many nights
If I'm wrong for being me, I don't wanna be right
Nah! No not never, no not ever
I don't wanna be right, hood star, we are



Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally

He really really really fucked my coochie
He really really really turned me out
He really really really got to gut me
He really really made me scream and shout

He really taught me how to work my body
He really taught me how to do it with my mouth
He really really tried to hurt me hurt me
I really love his thug and gangsta style

Yeah what up ma
Take a look, you hypnotized
On how my long dick stretch your insides
For real ma, with your thick lips and thick thighs
Stroke both holes, pass it to Nas
Or pass it to Naish, or pass it to Jung
Or pass it to Horse, then that ass gettin' tossed
Fuck a Hustler book, Penthouse or Blacktale
I got bitches sendin my niggas flicks in jail
I fuck a bitch face more than her waist for real
And ain't no pussy like new pussy that's how a nigga feel
Bust three times throw her the peace sign
She sleep then my dick sleek and I aint gotta' call her for weeks
Long leg hoes, mo'head hoes, married bitches
Me and my dog - fuckin them both they got us switchin'
Is the nigga gangsta? Yeah, that's how I'm livin'
That's how I'm playin' - I got these freak fuckin' hoes singin'

Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally

He really really really fucked my coochie
He really really really turned me out
He really really really got to gut me
He really really made me scream and shout

Little young thing go around my dick with your tongue ring
Deep throat my nine inch, gut from the front and
Grind from the side and, fuck from behind and
Grab her hair slap her ass, she screamin' like she dyin'
Make her come four times without even tryin'
I'll beat that pussy up there's no denyin'
Hit her where she doodie at, make that booty fat
Little cutie rat, walking by with the doobie wrap
Tight blue jeans, air max
Small Gucci bag
No loot and no job
Stay home giving blow jobs
Like no prob, it's simple
Holla out the window it's the project nympho
Fuck my whole crew, you know how we do
You got that good pussy I can share with my people
Be a brave girl, do your thang
Let them tities hang, I'll have all the bitches sayin'

Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally

He really really really fucked my coochie
He really really really turned me out
He really really really got to gut me
He really really made me scream and shout

When it comes to sex I'm similar to the Thriller in Manilla
Bitches call me Horse the pussy filler
I'll fuck a big boned or slim chick
Beat that pussy up real quick then send home the bitch
Aint no sleepin' in my bedroom
When henny's in my dick
When Flex drop the bomb I bust a nut on this bitch
Deep throat, ceaser gold or pun wicked hoes
Who like the way i thug and the way i flow
I like head in the Benz, the four door or the Coupe
Head in the staircase, the cellar or the roof
Head in the studio, the bathroom or the booth
Head from a project chick or one with crazy loot
Like Nia Lomg in a cherry thong with the lights on
Sippin Perignon with Kelly Price on
I pull out my python, I hit it while my wife's gone
Long dick the bitch all night, I'll make her pussy sing the song

Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally, oo-chie bang bang
Oo-chie wally wally



[Produced by Bud'da]

[Hook x2]
(I'm cryin gangsta tears) Only a few can feel my pain
(I'm cryin gangsta tears) Only if I could show you
(I'm cryin gangsta tears) Only if you was in this game
(I'm cryin gangsta tears) You'd feel the whirlwind blow you

[Verse 1]
My daily dose is ferocious
I smoke dope, just as strong as opium
Hopin I'm close to just breakin frustration;
Speakin on podiums
Facin this cold world head-on, dead on arrivals
Young black, poor education guns crack
The gang violence done that
Nighttime, the guns blow, streets got snitches
Dealers, bitches, killers and blunt smoke, clubs open
Benzes, Jeeps, dubs pokin out tires
Thugs with heat, pay security, to let them slide in
Huh, I'm at the corner driftin, sippin, Cognac
To' back, know dat soldiers is packin no secret
Though I'm broken hearted women done left me hopeless in darkness
Smokin, driftin in sickness, stand by oceans watch the sun glisten
I'm soul-searchin, I'm soul-hurtin
What happens when money don't make you happy
I wish this on no person
Ate at the classy places, made all my fashion statements
I got no friends I'm lonely, don't want no pity save it

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
Yo, ride in the nighttime, I'm high, got on my flight suit
Hood with the Nike sign, dark colors on
Pull up the block my brother's on
I hug him and we blow trees (sup nigga?) Scopin for police
Guns on our hip, fiends want a fix, stumblin tricks (right here)
We left the drug game alone
Brothers is jealous cause we still call the hood our home
What could you tell us?
At funerals my eyes swell up (damn)
Look at my dog lay in the casket
Twin shotgun barrels had blasted
And rest in peace Barkin, is all I could whisper
As I paid respect, kissed his face and felt hard skin
It's part of God's plan, but why so many niggas have to die?
It's crowded in this place, let the priest and pastor by
Bandana covers my eye, I'm scopin through the room
I see killers and thieves, mob bosses and goons
And yet I feel responsible when my nigga's pronounced dead
Inside the hospital, I wish there's somethin I could do, but..

[Hook]



[Rich Nice]
What's happenin brothers and sisters?
Welcome to our time

[Jessica Care Moore]
Afro-Angels hide my weapons in tangles
Black Star Spangled, fragile like hematite with the East oils I write
Despite the lack of sunlight, got my battle boots tight
Now that the government's gone, can't tell your left from your right
Winged assassins laughin while the New World's collapsin
Mother Earth's ribs crashed in, armed with cowries, I'm blastin
As the Earth rebels my womb swells
The birth of Black Magic, savin my people force of habit
You can't find if you ain't never had it
Spiritually crafted black-listed hair-twisted ghetto embargo lifted
Power-shiftin comb-fistin I predict Goddesses you runnin after witches
I kiss my fourteen stitches
Keep all my baby girl wishes
I predict all the oceans turn dry
Not one baby girl will cry as you attempt to grow broccoli from the desert
We will take our pregnant bodies, drink from underground rivers
Wash your face between our legs
While recreating humanity, we will summon yemanja
Search for our fertility, ban all pink and yellow pills
Ban all pink and yellow pills
I predict killing fields of ghetto armpatch anti-Hatch
Hate groups will be bombed
Childbirth becomes outlawed
Always will be branded numbered and logged
All paper money is gone
Confused scholars can't interpret our scrolls
Your sky has holes
We know the young is old
Nastradamus tell us how the story gets told



[NAS]
Yea (House of Hits)
Finally up in this nigga
On the real, all you crab niggas know the deal
On the real, all you crab niggas know the deal
To my seed, May I lead you into no breed of evil
In the categories and stories I breed my sequel
You know the money, blues, blunts, broken 22's
Monkey see, Monkey do
A shorty sipping sunny dew
Now its V.S.O.P. in a G.S. thats mad smokey
Murder tree's, Crusin gun in the stash so it won't poke me
Up in the Marriot, Suite 3010
Don't make no noise cause we dirty, tell the hoes to hurry in
We got the room lit up with perfume, and mad boom
And there's video taping of booming ass's on the zooming lens
Rolling on you non descript niggas
Your marked for death like colombians with bad coke that gip niggas
Tilt the dutch, twisting up the uwee if your skilled enough
In Will we trust, salute the dead the nine mili's bust

Chorus
On the Real all you crab niggas know the deal
On the Real all you crab niggas know the deal 2x

[K-L from ScrewBall]
Now its verbal abuse cause the mic's in use
This is your sorry excuse
Get your neck put in a noose
K-L is quick to let loose, to make your blood count reduce
Over the snare drum
We reproduce like cum
Impregnating the track, making it fatter than it was
Giving life to idea
Through the verse is what he does

[Kamakazee a.k.a. KL]
See a close call about two clicks from my fortress
We rolling squad deep, on the Kawasaki hourses
QueensBridge got the drop on you niggas trying to toss us
We metal down now its time to show these clowns who the boss is
We live for the shit, Ain't trying to take no lossess
Accumalating to much cream for you to touch
Fucking welcome to my clutches, wipe the blood on off my chuckers
From the ruckus
Your gone and your crew still love us
Can't call it, I'm in love with this good life shit
I'm working with jewels, car, chicken clits, paying rent
Murdered Presidents, running wild, stacking in piles
Onyx pendants, and Rubied down shit from the nile
Kamikaze style, sought the antique three pound
Yo Nas, lets cop this brick and let the mobb supply the town

Chorus 2x

[Cormega]
(Play some treats on us)
Drugs in my shirtsleeve
The side bubble converti
Eyes low cause the lye blow
Five-oh know we dirty drive slow
Write a line sipping a glass of wine
The block is mine cause I am a live criminal mastermind
When I rhyme, I perfect this, niceness, I'm blessed with
Exhale precise shine like cocaine white
Its the life of Pablo, Escobar niggas I know
With diamond rolexes, that drive infinit's and lexus
So send my enemies a message
My Tommy Hilfiger vest, is bullet proof, so when niggas shoot
I'm still protected
So never ask why I write so violent
My brain storm formed on a dorm in Rikers Island
I remained calm while you tried to bite my style and
When I performed niggas mic's went silent
To the kid who made my man Ill Will's blood spill
(On the real)
When I catch up to your ass you know the deal

[Nas and Cormega]
On the real

Chorus 4x



[Intro (Sampled)]
Angel Dust
Yeah, Angel Dust
Yeah
Yeah, Angel Dust

[Verse]
Angels with dirty faces, angels with broken wings
The devil's dust, PCP invading bloodstreams
People lining up to get it, fantastic, knew how to flip it
Illegal substance constructed and plus addictive
Trusted and respected, almost got me arrested
All the time I invested in school is now of question
Child prone to violence like a dog returns to its own vomit
A fool for chaos, taking what we could salvage
Hustling is a art, I'm just tryna be smart
Strung out bodies found in the park, Shaolin was my heart
We stood for loyalty, all we had was each other's back
My raps were like crystallized powder before crack
Raw, uncut, like what is sold in front of the storefront
The sidewalk was my brother's office
We cut our losses, I had choices
I took a pen, became the voice for the voiceless
My people walking in a zombie state
Life is short, even mine's at stake

[Interlude]
"The government says that angel dust can kill you if you take it or it can cause you to kill others."

"The scourge of angel dust has been linked to psychosis, violence, schizophrenia, and the epidemic runs especially rampant in the Bronx. My administration will hunt down these poison pushers and arrest them one my one until we get directly to the source."



Ruk:
Ill Will...yeah yeah yo...Queensbridge niggas...crud love baby..

Verse 1: (Ruk)
Aiyo, I zone out
Feelin' like I'm in Capone's house
Starin' at Manhattan and The Bridge with the chrome out
Ki's on the table, black tanktop, long cable
Thoughts of overtakin' the table
Dismantle and disable
Verbal, made fatal, what drug paper do
Straight duct tapin', apin' a few
Takin' Mo' and Henny straight and things loose
Puffin' the fruits, thug in a duece
Flaggin', pants saggin', fuckin' ya goose
I'm like nothin' to you
Dumpin' the Rug' and your group in a red coog'
Jump in the Isuzu and cruise
Blank tints, bulletproof, red Timb boots
Nigga loose, license plate screamin' "Fuck you"
Drunken days, I wish ya'll knew
Thug dreams, what it means to you
Red seams, triple beams
40 inch blings, Ill Will the fuckin' team
This for my niggas in the Bridge from Queens

Chorus (Nas)
Illmatic Ice, Goon, Sonny, and Smitty (real niggas)
Big Felton, Chick, Petey, and Sarge (real niggas)
Yambo, Bar, Spank, and Will (real niggas)
Some is here, some died in the field (real niggas)
Richie Luke, Arkay, Marty, Tahay (real niggas)
Rico, Black, Party Rob, and Eighty (real niggas)
Y.G., Nut, Foul One, and Lord (real niggas)
Blink, Ice, Cliff, Super nice, and Draws (real niggas)

Verse 2: (Nas)
Bumpy Johnson style, old timers, crocodile shoes
Pinky rings, big rounders with tools, bossin' wild crews
Slacks, overlaps, applejack hats quarterfield coats
Cadillacs with white walls and chrome wheel spokes
They were organized, investin', had a piece of the hood
They had drugs, bettin' numbers, police understood
They played the Cotton club, red carpet, hoes on they arm
Plush mink, pimped out gangsta, civil rights wasn't won
Every Christmas they were Santa Claus, Nixon was the Anti-Christ
Bitches asses were bigger then, sniffin' nose candy white
Listenin' to Malcolm speak, talcum powder, shaving cream
Layin' back, barber chair, straight razor clean
Babies were born, big families started to blossom
Mad people just applied for apartments and got 'em
Used to be rules to this game of hustlers and dealers
From Tommy guns to MAC Tens it's Q.B.'s newborn killers

Verse 3: (Ruc)
96 buildings of children, guns, and bad feelings
Q.B. see we rep by the Millions
Each block, ten spots, a hundred different villians
In abundance my dunnettes run this drug dealin'
Stash the jums in hallway ceilings
Gangsta paradise, watch the ice, nigga make a killin'
In the cut on the steps yo gettin' good neck
Only in the projects, we die with respect
Pussy niggas quiet as kept will riot the set
Six blocks of real niggas vexed
Assorted irons and vests, stress on they chest
20 half a G's on Henny, Son, the whole hood is wet
In memory of...who's next?
Train they set, lend they Teck, earn your check
Nigga, you better rep
Real niggas come out the projects
40 to the 41st, Vernon to the 12th

Chorus (Nas)
Sherm the Worm, High, Papoose (real niggas)
Black Ed, Killa Black, Wee-Wop (real niggas)
Body G, Divine, Hot Day (real niggas)
J.L., Earnie, Q.T. (real niggas)
Karate Joe, Big Killa, Beefstick (real niggas)
Lloyd, Floyd, niggas we miss (real niggas)
Al Womack, Spunk, World, and Fun (real niggas)
Goodfellas, 40 Busters, Young Guns (real niggas)
Vernon Posse, Tre Bag, Black Born (real niggas)
Green Eyes, Small Shan, Duhan (real niggas)
Peace, Tommy, Ron, Keyshawn (real niggas)
Herb, Bohound, Crazy (real niggas)
Jungle, Horse, Wiz, Bravehearts (real niggas)
Havoc, Prodigy, Mobb Deep (real niggas)
Killa Kids, Infamous Mobb (real niggas)
Rambo, Face, Shayquan (real niggas)
L.E.S., Big Things, Nashawn (real niggas)
Crime Fam, Ron, Smack, Don, Alawn (real niggas)
Justice, Understanding, Joe Grimes (real niggas)
Lou, Frank, John, Hope, Fall Guy (real niggas)
J-Roc, Bumpy, and Little Black (real niggas)
The list is gettin' too long for this track (real niggas)
Gangsta, Gangsta, Gangsta...to all my real niggas from Queensbridge
From the grave, in a cage, or walkin' on stage doin' they thing gettin'
Paid...my Nigga Mr. Ruc who don't give a fuck
Queensbridge to the death niggas
2001 and so on and so on...

(Ruc)
My nigga Bowser, my nigga Spank, shoutouts to Sudan
QBC's finest, Bing, Crime Fam, Killa Kids, Malik The Hitler
Hot Bars, Mo King, shouts to Pop, Wild Gremlins, Germ and Norm
Let's get it on.....



Chorus:

Honies, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, 'hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas to Nas to Escobar

The path we all walk, starts out long it's like a boardwalk
Monopoly, some make it around, some go down, it's prophecy
Happy days balancing with life's atrocities
Hoppin' in v's, knowin' some day I got to lead properly
High up in a five realizing the price paid
For this life laid in the light shade
One might say, top of the world's two whips, a crib and a girl
Quick to celebrate it, poppin' corks like they made it
Pretentious, arrogant niggas is senseless
Pro ball players with white wives, peep they night lives
While you could catch me in a crisp white five
Dark tinted, dijon-scented, with Al Green on
My theme song, love and happiness, how can it seem wrong
I mean before this, I used to rock a taurus with the donuts
Now I grown up, got it chromed up
Got the rap game sewn up, sho-nuff
Niggas acting cool, but it's really no love
I feel a slow buzz, off the dutch
This is everyday, every second
Got to make it pay, every lesson I learnt
Got me open while most of these rappers'll stay burnt

Chorus 2x (the second time "Honies" changes to Money")

With so much drama in QBC, it's kinda hard being Escobarro
Elderado Red, sippin' Dom out the bottle
My life is like a Donald Goines novel
We wave glasses like bravo
Drunk niggas with mad problems, and shot pockets
My niggas from the block rock this
Box cocaine, cook it and chop it
Looking to profit, in different ways
Goin' through this difficult stage, called life
But each year my physical's praised
Some fell beyond the reach of help
Cut in the street, thinkin' they could teach theyself
When all we wanted was a piece of wealth
And randomly, feed our family
The streets are insanity
Amply, living in ths thug's fantasy
Richest nigga in show biz is what I plan to be
Heavy chain and my QB sway, living this king's life
Magazines write about me, in this dream it's all tight

Chorus 2x (The Second time "Honies" changes to "Money")

Now the main thing that boggle my brain be all the bottles of pain
Iced the chain and all the followers came
They tried to throw me off track, but I caught that
They thought I lost that
But I'm continuing to make more stacks
Halftime, new york state of mind, it was written was hittin'
Trips overseas, southeast, diamond and riches
Sleepin on the plane, wake up when we land feelin' real scared, on the
Ground
Rollie flush, princess cuts, and large rounds
The crews up, findin time to shine rocks
It's real, you violate, be in a pine box
If it go there, I lay you before you lay me, it's crazy
I didn't make the game, the game made me
Records for the babies so they raised up in mansions
Haters keep hating, and ladies'll keep glancing

Yall know the routine out this muthafucka.... word up



[Intro]
I'd like to dedicate this one here, to my star
Someone I cherish, she loves me unconditionally
No matter what, our love will always be here for you baby
Yeah
So from God, he gave me this gift, you (ha ha)
And I give you this, the world (If I had it all)

[Hook]
(If I had it all) daddy's little girl I would give you the world
Little girl I'd give you the world (If I had it all)
Yeah, just me and my little one
Just me and my little one (If I had it all)
I'd give you the world

[Verse 1]
Even though we don't live in the same home
And I mightta miss your graduation
And no matter how many miles I'm away from you
You know that I love you
Hear daddy on every station
Thinking, I'm loving my occupation
I know I got you home waitin', Desy
I do it all for you (if I had it all)

[Hook]
(If I had it all) daddy's little girl I would give you the world
Little girl I'd give you the world (If I had it all)
Yeah, just me and my little one
Just me and my little one (If I had it all)
I'd give you the world

[Verse 2]
Even though you'll be grown soon
You gotta stand on your two
Please listen what daddy told you
I know you think that I'm old school
You'll see that I was right soon
One day, you will meet the right groom
And then, you will see your life bloom
And then you'll know what's right for you (If I had it all)

[Hook]
(If I had it all) daddy's little girl I would give you the world
Little girl I'd give you the world (If I had it all)
Yeah, just me and my little one
Just me and my little one (If I had it all)
I'd give you the world

[Verse 3]
Respect your mom, no one will replace her
She's the one who went through the labour (If I had it all)
But you don't owe her no favours
But her respect is due
See, daddy just wanna show you (If I had it all)
All the heartache I go through (If I had it all)
It's for you

[Outro]
If this world were mine, I'd give it all to you (If I had it all)
Yeah, (If I had it all)
It's your world baby girl
Yeah!
Yeah, just me and my little one (If I had it all)
Just me and my little one (If I had it all)

(If I had it all)
(If I had it all)



[DJ Clue]

With The Firm intro
From my man Steve Stoute's birthday
Happy birthday nigga
Peepin'

[Steve Stoute]

Motha fuckin' fake ass bastards
Steve Stoute the commissioner nigga
I walk NYC dolo
The fuck
Niggas ain't got no paper
Ain't pop no crisp
No bitches no nothing no paper
Just on my dick
Player hating on me
Wanna be me
Check out my crew nigga

[Mary J.Blige]

What we have here
Is the firm y'all
Introducing...
Nas Escobar
Noreaga
Nature
And Femme Fatale

[Nas]

Black pirellis rolling over this makaveli
Two platy LPs
Still the feds tap my celli
Made a mil and another mil
Just signed another deal
From the bridge ever summer deal
Niggas run to steal
Cracks and bundles
Wanna be down ask Jungle
React humble but we blast guns too
Now to son you is a deeper plan
So when I jam
Reach the pan
Check the sale let the sound scan
Keep a brown tan
From vacationing
Chicks in Vegas
Tryna guess us how much we made to spin
Two Tiphannys from the Colosseum
Green olive BMs
Tracks from TM lack when we see em
Grip the heat
When the sixth season
Jump out the S4s
And test yours
Tudor watches
Allah watches
Stubborn, you won't admit that Escobar got this
On top let me explain what the cock is
Firm Biz came livin'
Naturally fly, diamond rings glistenin'
Make it seem sickenin'
What's really ill is how the team's clickin'
Femme Fatale on some dope shit
Flow sick we stay incorporate
Firm giving you a dosage
Of high explosives
You kidnap we kidnap
You blast shit, I did that
Cuttin' through the chase we bring it to where you live at
I wouldn't play you
I'd rather try you by your label

[Mary J.Blige]

Miss maximillion
Exotic diamonds let it charm
Legal life of bear arms
Protecting my squad from harm
Murder, Danger
Backstabbers and snakes
Murderers and Jakes
Spend thugs but the drugs a case
Fuck y'all feel
And them accusations you make me
Wow femme fatale we increasing the stakes
Platinum plates choosin' isles
Like my cheese willie style
850 on the dig and if you see me

[Femme Fatale]

Major league mamis
With the bodies
Got your clique quick to buy these
Who wanna try these?
Firm colleagues
Somali's, think they're badass
16 bars on that ass
Y'all niggas shat ass
Ali aye quatro
Play the passenger of chaco
6 to got though
Think you hot but you not though
Play the corner
Be the type of bitch to run up on ya
Much longer
While y'all get short bread like launa
You're a goner
Rhyme shoota, top shootas
With the lugas true das
Stats rulas
Firm biz grab the cougas

[Noreaga]

It be the firm biz getting it off
Slow regez the elegant black prince
We take the top gator
Black and shrotopass like im a raider
Sophistacater
Hang tight like dre right
Flow like hawian in the broad day light
I give all that I have
All in my power to see the day
That the crowd weighted
You expired and outdated
Re segregated
None of my people graduated
Ain't no progress in the projects
It's the same process
Rise to the top of New York
Keep the digest
Through all my cornets
Global solar
It's young omar
The shuffuler
We analyze who they really are
Familiar, blow holes into your interior
You minute, little man
You think you general?

[Nature]

I put the hinds betters
Fake thugs styles glued together
Saying old rhymes show signs
You're through whatever
Eat your heart out
I play my part now
Fiend to be part of the squad
But I'm not gonna be shot down
Who's how now? I'm disgusted at you
Rap doo doo
It's funny if you let these cats fool you
The whole no wait
Your values dying at a slow rate
Opposition track live niggas pop gats
Been doin' this since the days of hot tracks
Claimin' you in the firm how's that?
When you got your spot jacked
Read between the lines
The foulest dreams was lead to blind
Tonight is excellence redefined
In the form of Nature, Noreaga
Nas, Mary J. Blige
Femme Fetale on the rise
Manager extraordinaire
My man, Jungle
Pussy rebundled like desert plans
Spitting vivid raps
My whole clique rocking fitted hats
Millionaire status play the block give it back
Thanks to who?
My pen names tight like langston hughes
Generating chips, picking which banks to choose
Clever robberies, on deposits
I got this, why niggas on the blocks
Stare at bitches gossip
I pop shit so understand me
From day one I rap whole new guns
That run in the family

[Noreaga]
Wa dada dang wa da da dang Hey Listen to my mac milli just go bang
Wa dada dang wa da da dang this is the firm biz



Nas - "Stillmatic"



Track List

1. Stillmatic (The Intro)
2. Ether
3. Got Ur Self A...
4. Smokin
5. You´re Da Man
6. Rewind
7. One Mic
8. 2nd Childhood
9. Destroy & Rebuild
10. The Flyest
11. Rule
12. My Country
13. What Goes Around
14. Every Ghetto



[Verse 1]
Where we met, I had to give her her respect
She was with her man, he took a drag from her cigarette
He told her he'll be back
He jumped in the meter cab, just took her cell and told her where to meet him at
Now she was mad, And I was looking for my car
She had some plastic bags, coming from the supermarket
Cooking for his ass..how she gone get to the projects?
She ain’t got no cash, and she struggling while walking
So I drive past, "Yo" I say "I ain’t no stalker wit yo big ole ass
Here’s my help I’m tryna offer, I give you a lift"
Who woulda knew it turn to this? Now we in the mix
Baby moved up in my crib and she left my ex, damn we speedin

('Now girl, you mean the world to me' repeats)

I’m a king, you the queen
His and her 6’s and diamond rings
You don’t have to look back at him
Just get your bags packed and then..
A new life soon begins
Like I told you when I’m in, I’m in

[Verse 2]
Baby girl had a son
He was 3, yea I took him in
Now she call him little me, I even look like him
Naw, I mean he look like me, a couple shades darker
She be calling him Blackie..that’s cause his real father jet black
So she treat him like it’s a setback..
I don’t respect that
Now his pops calling collect at the new crib on the new number
Now how he get that?
See, now I knew we was a mismatch
I’m laid back, you too used to getting pimp smacked
I see where I went wrong at
I just tried to bring out the queen in you..
But when you make a girl leave a man..
You never really know where she stand..
How you know she really yours?
Somebody could do the same to you..!



[Verse 1]
Girls I got 'em locked so similar to a prison
Hear this monster jam, I be callin' it 'GANGSTERISM'
I murder you for dope, I'm the street distributor
I'm homicidal, pointin' the pump, scope to shoot you
Street connects, Mob ties on East and West
We gouge out your eye balls if you seen too much
Hopin' out drops wit blings and stuff
Wit ball players wives, Mercedes 5
Dangerous lives and haters die rollin' with convicts
Conscience who tolerate no nonsense
Fake rappers in doo-rags, get shot-up at their concert
Your bitch bleed, bitin' her nipples with my chipped tooth
I drink her blood, like I'm Dracula, mack in the 6-Coupe
The sky becomes red, heard y'all niggas work with the feds
Doesn't matter, blood'll splatter, everybody must dead
I got urge for self-reinvention, but I'm old-fashioned
From the corner's with the winos laughin'
Dealers and five-o blastin'
Capitalist thoughts like Presidents
I'm burnin' Bush's, Nas the realest, it's nuttin' to fuck wit

[Hook: Uncredited Female (Nas)]
You think you know me but I... (Tell 'em Ma)
..Don't think so (Don't think so)
It takes a 'lil more than... (What?, what?)
What do you know about me?
(See what you don't know me you'll never will)
(And what you don't know will get yourself killed)
About me
(See what you don't know me you'll never will)
(And what you don't know will get yourself killed)
You'll never know

[Verse 2]
I smoke weed like them sixties rebellions, hippies on heroin
Spliffs inhalin', what I speak strictly for felons
Dippin' in their 6-4, hittin' the switches
Or sittin' in their Bentley Azure's, feelin' the riches
Or just ridin', truck drivin' Impalas, Denali's
I fuck with those but I lust for silver Ferrari's
I fuck hoes with the ceilings, have mirrors to watch me
My bed shaped like a pyramid, feelin' the dry heat
Spillin' Courvoisi', I'm half slave-master
Half Apache, half African, mutts is what I call us Black men
Lead astray, drugs and cups of alcohol, cause back when
They let us off ships; the soul of man was lost or trapped in
But every ghetto, every hood, no matter where the town
It's all haunted, all on top slave burial grounds
Dead cooks, workers and maids, under this Earth in rage
Ancient whore houses that explain my sexual ways
Money and murder: interprets the American dream
The world loves a gangsta, I found my place in this thing
Royce's, diamonds and bosses, woman who're gorgeous
Traitors, killers and enemies, remorseless, we live this

[Hook: Uncredited Female (Nas)]
You think you know me but I... (Tell 'em Ma)
..Don't think so (Don't think so)
It takes a 'lil more than... (What?, what?)
What do you know about me?
(See what you don't know me you'll never will)
(And what you don't know will get yourself killed)
About me
(See what you don't know me you'll never will)
(And what you don't know will get yourself killed)
You'll never know

[Verse 3]
Gypsies, preachers, choirs, churches, liquor stores
The world is full of liars, curses, people rich or poor
Without God to worship, see we would be more lost
Gotta believe in somethin', or their would be no laws
A ghetto child occasionally blunted in Mansions
My cup overflow with Cristal, hundred exotic dancers
Niggas is plastic, ass gets jealous and passive
My pistol blast at; cowards, leechers, and rappers
Niggas I fuck with is 'Bravehearts', make G's
Before rap music to me, was wind blowin' the trees
Birds chirpin', rain fallin', perfect and free
But bitches saw my video and think they know me
These niggas bad talkin', claimin' they gon' do me
Stay out my path homey, you fuckin' wit a true G
Bitch +You Don't Know Me+

[Hook: Uncredited Female (Nas)]



[Intro - Nas]
Uhh yeah yeah yo
It goes Tick Tock this is for my niggas in the Bridge, blocks
Comin' through better hide your wristwatch
Because niggas well live they shits pop
Hey hey
Tick Tock this is for my hoes make your hips rock
Light a L baby let the Crys' pop
Get your Tick Tock from this hip hop, anyday

[Verse 1 - Nas]
5'8" with double-X-L pen saggin' blunts draggin'
But never lived well, imagine, a felon on a two-way street
One way is where blood money coke and homicide leap
The other street opportunity the chance to live sweet
Think positive k-nowledgement k-cypher complete
So you can be an architect design appartments and shit
Or you can wind up on a jail bus dirty in clip
Soon as I'm on the set I'm never on a chick I play it cool
But still ain't pussy muscles get wet it's just the booze
Check my niggas, what's the gossip, what's the word
Puff some herb, all I see is niggas runnin', chin shots
All I heard, dip behind the car, see somebody on the ground
Ambulance came and got 'em they start calmin' down
Now it's back to the same old shit, you know, the Tarzan and Jane-o shit
In the jungle swingin' on vines, I saw the gat with the same old clip
Another nigga layin' the hit, bloodied up, scream that I'm dyin'
I be in Queens where the famous hood rats and ghetto stars are
Pimps do the shuffle at night with slutty bars pah

[Hook - Nas]
Tick Tock this is for my niggas in the Bridge, blocks
Comin' through better hide your wristwatch
Because niggas well live they shits popped
Hey hey
Tick Tock this is for my hoes make your hips rock
Light a L baby let the Crys' pop
Get your Tick Tock from this hip hop, anyday

[Verse 2 - Prodigy]
It's like this nigga
It's on, toilet up for me, roll that shit big
While I reveal the story of a wild street kid
Cock your seat back, relax, while I spit
The spittin' image of how I live
Well first I was hollyin' for years by them old timer clicks
I was like twelve, they was like, blood, listen
Keep your mouth closed and your eyes and your ears wide open
Gangsta, I soaked it all in, my first ammo was a one shot
Deuce deuce, had my pockets full of bullets I was real loose
Thug parties out in wave crash always got shot up
Thug parties out in Queensbridge always got shot up
No wonder we bugged out it gets so frantic
Niggas aim on the fight, we cut yo melon
Drinkin' that old english red bull and blue bull
Mean I draggin' with that cheap shit fuck it we was broke
Little badass, my nigga Rap sat me down, like this
He said: P you gon' wind up dead
You and Hav' real good with that music shit
You need to stick to it, dunn, get your mind of the street
And it stuck in the back of my head, though
I still did my little bit of menacin'
Every now and then bang-outs in broad daylight
Like these things really happen niggas get cut up
I put it in my rappin'
It's non fiction it's the real deal fiscale
It couldn't get more graphic I'm so trail
I said it's non fiction it's the real deal fiscale
City you havin' let me touch that ass

[Hook]



[Intro: Swizz Beatz]
Swizzy!
Wherever you are (Shine)
Whoever you are (Shine)
Wherever you are (Shine)
Whoever you are (Shine)
Wherever you are (Shine)
Whoever you are (Shine)
Hey, Hey, I told ya

[Hook]
Ridin’ with my top down, and my jewelry on
Hey, I’m just getting my hood on
I’m just, I’m just, doing my thing
I’m just, I’m just, (pimp) doing my thing
Hey (yup) hey (yup) hey (yup) hey
I said I’m ridin with my top down, and my jewelry on
Hey, I’m just getting my hood on

[Verse 1: Nas]
It’s the late night greasy spoon patron
Poolhall making
Big bets, midsection got the 8 in
Dior Christian pimpin’
Got that penal system diction
Riffing, you don’t want it you snitchin’
Spit a few at a traitor with that new AR
Try to kill me I’m the leader, that’s coup d’etat
Streetsweepers in that Coupé all black
Bitches want my chipped tooth back
Steel mac, so my kufi never gets smacked
Squeeze the fifth with a grip as I dip
From the paparazzi
Still playing numbers (you can’t stop me)
Still wearing bundles, and spark weed
If I ever say “Queens get ‘em”, you know they got me
Success, scandal, bone deep, personal beef
So lead by example, or get trampled
Since Hip Hop Is Dead, this is the end
Congratulations in order ’cause we did it again

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
The chain’s offensive
Brain on airplanes, Gucci frames are vintage
The two Tec Don in Yukon’s and Benzes
Chicks who suck other chicks tits like infants
The Apprentice but not Trump
I’m the nigga with Glocks and pumps
That you don’t see much
Sucker free from chumps
Homes with cobblestones in front of ‘em
He’s got guns in cummerbunds, so understand you under son
Don’t make me have you running from a hundred guns
Don’t make me grab your only son
I’m coming from
A place Tanqueray and weed’s the only escape
From phonies who hate
When you rolling with papes
That’s why the God party with juicy models
They mob me, Denali, Charlie Luciano – hardly
Have to tell y’all, I kill y’all
For spitting songs that involve me nigga
Original verbal assassin, have to carve me a nigga

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Nas]
I got the armour tucked with the no drama luck
Tatted up, everywhere, my neck, arms and stuff
Like I roll my body around on wet comic books
The Dalai Lama prodded up, lighting chronic up
Ugh, of course I’m at it again
When I do it you know N, I throw caution to the wind
I talk about the life I’m in
But I swear to God I may never write again
But if I hit em hard, they say the World must kneel
Baddest girls gon lick my Tim’ boot heel
Sayin’ Nas running out of time
This is my last chance
Gotta shoots to kill, this is my last dance
I say hell nah, don dadda
Goons act fly, fly swat ya
Rapping ducks, modern day dracula’s
What you coming out your caskets for
This game been dead but guess who came back for more

[Hook]



Nas - God's Son Cover



Track List

1. Get Down
2. The Cross
3. Made You Look
4. Last Real Nigga Alive
5. Zone Out
6. Hey Nas
7. I Can
8. Book of Rhymes
9. Thugz Mansion (N.Y.)
10. Mastermind
11. Warrior Song
12. Revolutionary Warfare
13. Dance
14. Heaven



[Intro]
This is a Core DJ Exclusive....

[Nas]
Ayo, check it out, this is Nas
Is Hip-Hop dead or is it still alive? Ha ha
Well, check it out
Right about now, I'm ridin' with my homies from the Westside
(West Coast)
Showin' love
(West Coast)
I asked where are they now?
(West Coast)
2007, they right here, yeah
(Where are they now?)

[Breeze]
Yo, it's time to rhyme, keep it in mind, I'm gifted
With the strength to go the length, and if it’s
Rough enough to keep the crowd wonderin'
Breeze and L.A. Posse (Where are they now?)
Still layin' in the land of the palm trees
Warm breeze, sippin' on Dom P, still chillin' with King T
Slowed on MCin’, pass the series green
Gettin' money off the words I spit, yet still gee-in'
Still the young son but now a nigga got a baby girl
Tryin’ to raise her right and guide her through this crazy world
Still got a slow flow and fast raps know
Reppin' twenty years, still gettin' ASCAP checks
Still, spittin' the truth when I mentor the youth
On how to be professional when they step in the booth
And never cuppin' the mic so you can hear me clear
Nas wondered, yo, where are they now?
I'm right here, G

[KAM]
Goddamn, that nigga KAM back on the scene
With the O.G. West on the same team
Hittin' corners in a Six-Trey Chevrolet
Ragtop Impala, gettin' dollars every day
For pushin' heavy yay to this rap shit
Fuckin' with niggas I done put L.A. on the map wit’
So that the legacy lasts long
We're givin' it up for all the homies that done passed on
And you can check Bobcat’s file
He can tell you who we are, what we did and where we at now
This bullshit, niggas tired of that
Fools runnin' they mouth, so where the Southside riders at?

[Hook: Breeze, KAM, Nas, King T]
Everybody’s talkin' about the South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
(West Coast)
Everybody talkin' about this South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
West Coast, yeah, Nas's ridin' with you right here
(The who?)
West Coast

[King T]
Hey, watch it resurrect from the jump
House shoes, Khaki suit, riot gauge pump
Black Raider hat with ‘Bitch Please’ on the side
Central and Greenleaf, 1989
Just in time, King T pushed the line
The G's had to have it, Eazy and Dre had it
I was a damn fool, now dudes wanna act it
(Where are they now?) He's still active
We go back like the Jheri Curl shag
When Pooh was from the Gate, Bobcat was from the Aves
I was in that green 6-4 with the rag pull back in slow motion
T-La showboatin'
They lookin' for that West Coast Trojan
Thought to be in exile but I'm just posted
Blessed to be the best to crack the West Coast open
King T-La back, muthafucka, it's a wrap

[Candyman]
The C-A- to the N-D-Y-The-M-A-N
I still melt in your mouth, not in your hand
I love to hear the story, again and again
But it originated from this man, The Candyman
Damn, it feels good to hear my West Coast peers
Makes me wanna shed a tear for the ones who ain't here
I was just a young player in these Westside streets
Motivated to be innovative like Ice-T
King T, Toddy Tee
R.I.P. to Mixmaster Spade, MC Trouble, Rudy Pardee
And it's a trip to witness trap rap
When I’m on the first album cover with Eazy-E doin' that shit way back
Hell yeah, we need a new West, Dirty South respects
I remember doin' shows out there
They never tripped off the Westside
Spend all their chips at the Best Buy
Groovin' like they just don't care

[Threat]
No mistakes, can’t get away
Dumpin' with them funky rhymes
Yep, that's MC Deadly Threat
They play him on the radio all the time
I love my folks, I love my G's
They can't kill Cali, they love my weed
West Coast done it, East Coast did it
Then the South came wit’ it like ‘let's go get it’
Red Ghost did it like the ones before me
The batterram came and took all the glory
I got an Army like Uncle Jamm’s
K-D-A-Y bumped the jam
Bobcat, Battlecat and DJ Pooh
L.A., S.C., but we say Zuu
It still never rain or snow in Cali
We're gettin' blunted in the back of the bowling alley, like..

[Hook: Breeze, KAM]
Everybody’s talkin' about the South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
(West Coast)
Everybody talkin' about the South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
Where are they now?

[Ice-T]
This is it, dope from the fly kid
Iceberg bang for the West, servin' a life bid
Westside nigga for life, ride or die
I get so gangsta, I stay so fly
Saggin' my Khakis, reppin' my flag
Nigga, break out the gun, bitch, let's play tag
Every day in the street, somebody calls me Cube
I tell ‘em that's my loved one, but it’s Ice-T, dude
I come from that Crenshaw strip, ya heard?
It’s way Cripped up, chrome when the 6-4 lift up
It's hard to rock a party, L.A. don't like nobody
Niggas rather pop the trunks and dump shotties

[Sir Mix-A-Lot]
I'mma show my nigga Nas what I got in my garage
Yeah, my publishin' is large, water fountains in my yard
The Posse left Broadway to get ‘em on the glass
I got class, but still I like a fat ass
Mix-A-Lot sheenin' with this S-Class gleamin'
Aggressive pimp leanin’, marked the game like a demon
From TVs to movies, Hollywood use my shit
Seven-figure years keep comin’. Who's your pimp?
F430 with these black paddle shifters
This may not uplift ya but I'm still takin' pictures
And I'm lovin' all you sisters, Mix'll never disrespect ya
Westside vet; you need your paper? I'll connect ya

[Hook: CMG from The Conscious Daughters]
Everybody’s talkin' about the South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
(West Coast)
Everybody is talkin' about the South and the East Coast
But what about the West Coast?
(The who?)
The West Coast

[CMG from The Conscious Daughters]
It's the rhyme-spittin' kitten you’re never hittin’
The legendary, all-time great phenomenal female
Monarch, hittin' charts
Flowamatic nine spitta shoot like darts, blowin' bitches apart
It's The Conscious Daughters, still stompin' over soil
Holla at your folks, the females is royal
Bay Area OGs, still gettin' cheese
Like we sidin' on the block with 'Pac and Eazy-E



[Hook]
I know all of y'all hear me, none of y'all scare me
Cause niggas die daily
Coming out with my guns real early
Laying in your stairway, cause niggas die daily
So I got niggas around you
Mad like they're back for their man
You've killed just a year ago today
So call it a death anniversary
Rushing to emergency, niggas die daily

[Nas]
What if I told you that AZ didn't exist
And I put him there, played it like a ventriloquist
Cause niggas spit fake shit and y'all respect it
I spit that real shit and y'all won't buy the record
What if me and the rapper homey was really cool
And we used that whole thing as a media tool
Would you say I was a sucka or say I was savvy
If I told you mothafucka's that me and K wasn't married?
What if Jungle wrote my shit and I'm really illiterate
And the whole Nas catalog was just an experiment
What if I really died when Ill Will got shot
This is Will rhyming right now while Nas is chilling with 'Pac
What If I did all the advertisements thrown my way
And I've boned every chick that would throw me some play
I'd have to load another AK cause niggas be jealous
Cause we real like them Brazil favelas

[Hook]

[Nas]
Scream at the nigga "breathe don't breathe your last breath"
But you know a nigga dead when he pee on himself
Blatter giving up on 'em, face start to puff on 'em
Bloating up, nigga cold as fuck, trying hold on 'em
Loosen up the nine out of his fingers
Angels coming only he can hear the psalms that they're singing
And it hurts me, the planets cursed, B
This your niggas first year anniversary
This how it goes down in every ghetto
So it's quite natural for rappers to settle
And make pop music, nursery hooks
Cause back then we thought the only thing that worked was the jooks
They're tryna pimp a game that done pimped them first
I'm pimping the industry so they acknowledge our worth
The next anniversary we all unite
Let's all get together or we're loosing the fight

[Hook]



Nas: "This ain't for everybody. Y'all know who y'all are
Yeah you, y'all know who y'all are. These are our
Heroes."

[Hook: Nas]
Let's hear it, one for the coons on UPN 9 and WB
Who 'Yes Massa' on TV, what ever happened to Wheezy? The Red Fox's?
Never got Emmy's but were real to me
Let's hear it, two for the spooks who do cartwheels
Cause they said they played they parts well
Now they claim caviar, hate that oxtail
Lambda Sigma Phi badge on lapel
Whitey always tell him, "Ooh, he speak so well"
Are you the one we look to, the decent Negro?
The acceptable Negro -- hell nah
But they say, "These are our heroes"

[Verse 1: Nas]
Uh, Massa used to breed us to be bigger to go play
Athletes of today in the NBA, make me proud
But there's somethin' they don't say
Keep gettin' accused for abusin' White pussay
From OJ to Kobe, uh let's call him Tobe
First he played his life cool just like Michael
Now he rock ice too just like I do
Yo, you can't do better than that?
The hotel clerk who adjusts the bathroom mat?
Now you lose sponsorships that you thought had your back
Yeah, you beat the rap jiggaboo, fake nigga you
You turn around then you shit on Shaq
Who woulda knew, Mr. Goodie-Two-Shoes
He love a little butt crack, got enough cash
Little kids with they bus pass who look up to you
To do something for the youth, stupid spoof
But you let them use you as an example
They would rep, but our heroes got they hands full

[Hook]

[Verse 2: Nas]
You Homey The Clown, bowtie, apple pie, Bo Jangles
But we love Bo Jangles, we know what he came through
But what's your excuse, dude? You talk Black
But your album sound like you give your nuts for a plaque
You don't ride for the facts like um, say Scarface
You don't know what you feel, y'all too safe
Election done came and went, y'all worked so hard for it
Huh, and in the end we all got dicked
These are our heroes, thanks a lot public school systems still rot
Still harassed by cops, snitches on blocks
Sellin they peoples out - some real folks with clout
Tavis Smiley, Michael Eric Dyson
Stokely Carmichael, let's try to be like them
Nicky Giovanni poetical black female
Jim Brown to the people who sing well from
Fela to Miriam Makeba
The mirror says you are the next American leader
So don't be, acceptin new 'We are the World' records
These pickaninnies get with anything to sell records
Cause it's trendy to be the conscious MC
But next year, who knows what we'll see?
Ha-Ha, these are our heroes

[Hook]

[Nas:] "Yeah, I wanna give a special shoutout to the -- y'know
The crew doin' they thing out there reppin' us hard
Big up to Tiger Woods. Yeah, ya don't stop. Big up
To Cuba Gooding Jr. Y'know, yeah, y'know. Tay Diggs
What up my nigga. Yeah, ha-ha. And you don't quit
And ya don't quit, and ya don't stop and ya don't quit."

[Male Heckler:] "Yeah-Yeah, what you doin' for the hood though
Homie? What you doin' for the hood, man? Look at
All that paper. Drivin' around like a playboy in
My hood. What type of shit is that?"

[Overlapping dialogue]

[Nas:] "I'm outta here. Please, excuse me, 'xcuse me -- please
Let me get to my limousine, I'm outta here. I know, I
Got a plane to catch. And I love you back. Ha-Ha
Yeah yeah -- And I'm outta here. A-ha-ha -- PEACE."

[Thug Heckler:] "Come on man, give back to the hood. Cocky
Motherfucker!"



[Intro]
Ay yeah, what's happenin mommy? How you doin baby?
Oh you lookin kinda good and everything, I see you with them stilettos on baby
Ay check this out, you ain't got time to talk to me?
Ay let me put the bug in your ear baby
Why don't you turnin' them floor shoes into some ho shoes, ya dig?
Yeah, check this out, this Universe Finest, your Royal Highness
You know what baby? I can do a whole lot of thangs for you
Guess why, cause I'm a motherfuckin pimp

[Hook: singer]
(Like me...) Hustlin and grindin babe
(I be...) Stayin on that paper chase
I-In this life there's pimps and hoes
Tell me which one are you, you a nigga
(Like me...) Hustlin and grindin babe
(I be...) Stayin on that paper chase
In this life there's pimps and hoes
Tell me which one are you

[Verse 1]
The good man in me say "Get money and stay on the path"
But the pimp shit in me say "Yo, keep lookin for ass"
But my daughter gave me a gift, somethin to hold
A little city in water, when you shake it, it snow
I told her never let a sucker nigga take off her clothes
Better wait till you grown, when he love you, you'll know
Everybody's got a dream, a hopeful wish to own a six times two
Cylinder whip, a fantasy, a bone to pick
Or ends to get against who I don't know
Someone who said you won't blow, you won't eat, you won't cake
They mistake blamin me for they failures, I'm fresh, gettin tailored
Single breasted, a lint brush, it's senseless, some pimp shit
A woman hates a man and stays with him for many years
Tell him she loves him and be jealous of him
Now lame is how the ghetto judge him, cause he still with her
She'll take his cash and give it to some other real nigga

[Hook]

[Interlude]
Ay pimpin been goin on man for eons and eons man since the beginnin of time
You know me, the only thing I need to do is get on the grind and get mine
So the only thing I gotta tell you man is you know, do what you gotta do man
Bring my money back, get on that track and get on your back

[Verse 2]
I heard 'em say the NBA's a bunch of million-dollar slaves
Or Poitier wasn't real back in the days, the point I make is
Jerry owns the Lakers, his yearly takings
Let's just say more than collectively all of his players
That's business, not really pimp shit
Maybe a tid-bit similar to when we rappers make big hits
And not own the masters, that's the deal
By the way, Poitier helps all the Denzels excel
He kept it more than real, but Hollywood can turn a girl out
I knew a girl bout, 5'9", so fine, she could result grind
She was sleek, sheek, with a classic mouth
Movie directors always fucked her on the casting couch
She came out with a blockbuster, can't knock a hustler
She not a hooker, she focused, a hopeless soul on a lonely road
I showed her all my stones and gold
I said "Bitch, life is cold, you need to roll with a nigga"

[Hook]



[Jessica Care Moore]
Global warming between my legs, screams against the waves
Gave birth to thirteen daughters, so now we never run out of water
My skin layered in diamonds and sage
Left alone in confused forest's, enslaved by days
Time keeps on whorin us
Ghetto saviors can't keep ignorin us
Flowers and flames flew from her fingers
Rifles pointed from her sac
Or was it simply a bag of sticks and stones
Either way, she wore a compass on her head
Rains don't stop the grass from turnin red
Her hair was half permed, half dread
We gave up walking in a past-life and so we danced
Arms wrapped around my breath and choked me back to life
A new world wife, reflecting the sun and rolling dice
Symbol of the drama yet to come - too late to run
Time travelling was late
Watching was a blind man's mistake
All his assets melted right in front of his face
His right leg drabbed with demon pace
Shoes stayed angel laced
Never count your blessings with haste
Even a prophet can catch a case
Didn't realize how sweet the future might taste
Telepathically cutting through mental gates
Words were weapons against their hate
Shepherds search for stars in her hair
Her chest grew fermented like yeast
She broke her body like aged bread
He gave her truth from all the books he'd read
She wrote her poems inside the mud
Sacrificed her cervix to fix the future
Named their poison, spit truth inside his mouth
Read warm prophet, writing twisted scriptures inside her belly
Resurrected from bones and dirt
She made hard niggas smile
Left her seeds inside the Earth
Gave hustlers and killers life's worth
This is the life we chose, remember who was here first
Find a reason why you curse
Gold rushed tongues by dreams too loose
Sporting electronic nooses
Hoeing humanity love takes over lust
Despite the damage to Destiny you can't take the best of me
In God We Still Trust



Produced by DJ Premier

[Intro: Nas + Alicia Keys]
Nasty (yeah, yeah)
(New York, New York, New York, New York)
Ayo, black, it's time again! (yeah, yeah)
(New York, New York, New York, New York)
Yeah. Premier! (yeah, yeah)
(New York, New York, New York, New York)
(Ayo, black, it's time)

[Verse 1: Nas]
If you knew my streets
You would know all everybody talk about is who got beef
Who's snitchin', who told police
Who came home, who's still gone, who rest in peace
Now they killin' over music money, not drugs, rap replaced it
Cause thugs with no brains got no patience
New jacks I pistol whip 'em with the funky rhythm I be kickin'
Musician, inflictin' composition of pain
I'm like Saddam Hussein
Still alive, lookin' at his dead children's burnt remains
I birthed the game, learned you lames a new lesson
Your crew's soft man, y'all need some new weapons
The Ps breed warriors in skullies and Timbies
Around micks, spics, niggas, and guineas
From my ghetto kings in deep thought, we don't blink
But don't think we wastin' our time
It's a New York state of mind

[Chorus: Alicia Keys]
New York, New York, New York, New York City, whoah ohh
New York, New York, New York, New York City, gritty

[Verse 2: Alicia Keys]
It's like a jungle out here
So much struggle out here
And my dreams steal my rest
Sleep's the cousin of death
Always feels like a race against father time
In the Streets of New York
(New York state of mind, New York state of mind)
All I see is street hoes
And bullet holes in our people
Only crime fills the brain
Feels like I'm goin' insane
The revolution has to start, don't waste no time
In the Street of New York
(New York state of mind)
New York state of mind
(New York state of mind)
C'mon

[Altered Chorus: Alicia Keys]
New York, New York, New York, New York ohh
State of mind (New York City)
New York, New York, New York, New York ohh
State of crime (New York City)
New York, New York, New York, New York ohh
Big dreams (New York City)
New York, New York, New York, New York ohh
Big schemes

[Bridge: Alicia Keys]
Oh, it's like the game
Just ain't the same
Baby thugs and girls
With no shame
Can't get away (get away)
Epidemic plague (plague)
Every hood in every state
Don't have no reasons cause believing's hard to find
In the streets of New York (New York state of mind)
In the streets of New York (New York state of mind)
In the streets of New York (New York state of mind)
In the streets of New York (New York state of mind)

[Verse 3: Rakim]
I'm from the home of a million legends and trend settin'
A lot of footsteps to follow, I been steppin'
Mind stressin' tryna find direction, crime spreadin'
Time precious, I ain't have rest since 9/11
I live fast, hustle like today is my last
I get cash, the struggle's like a day on the Ave
Crack, D and raw, gats squeezin off
Manhattan streets in awe from casualties of war
The eve of the Apocalypse, evil people in politics
Every block is at risk, the metropolitan metropolis
The opposite of Liza Minnelli and Frank Sinatra
Alicia Keys, Nas and Ra the gangsta's opera
So New York City, walk with me, talk gritty
It's up to us New York, it's our city
Here the man come with the anthem, hands up
It's time, the thrill is back New York, so stand up

[Chorus + Outro/Coda: Alicia Keys + Rakim]
New York, New York, New York, New York City, whoa ohh
(Uh. Yeah.)
New York, New York, New York, New York City, gritty
(Crucial Keys. Ya God, Rakim Allah)
New York, New York, New York, New York City, whoa ohh
(New York City. Nasty Nas)
New York, New York, New York, New York City, gritty
(A. Keys. Yeah, c'mon)



[Verse 1]
Queensbridge, 41st side
Yo yo yo
I gots no birth records, no next of kin
Know a lot of mothafuckers, got no best friends
Know the weather checkin 1010 WINS AM
First and fifteenth I'm layin at the check cashing
Think I'm playin, blink and I'm sprayin
Wrong move, ask yourself what leg you wanna lose cuz you gon' lose
I cripple niggas, from the complex to simple niggas
Keep showin y'all what difficult is
Half the world sayin "Dunn" but never been to the Bridge
What type of shit is that, fraudulence, what's the cause of it
Nature came threw erasing all of it, stop the presses
Goofy niggas ask a lot of questions
I repeat this is not a question
If you don't reply quick enough I gotta press em
Keep the Glock by the intestines, .38 waist
Wit a belt, regardless of your stats you can catch a shell

[Hook]
Believe me when I tell you this (Believe me when I tell you this)
There's nuttin y'all can do for me (There's nuttin y'all can do for me)
I don't believe in selfishness, this time I want my crew to eat (My crew)
We comin through a hundred strong (Comin through a hundred strong)
We comin wit a hundred miles (A hundred miles)
Bumpin shit all summer long (Bump that)
We want it dead and want it now (We want it now)

[Verse 2]
Yo aiyyo I rap for my niggas and rap for the hoes
Rap when I'm gettin dressed, when I iron my clothes
Depressed, I kick raps that change your whole mood
And somehow stick to your ribs like soul food
Rap for wheelchairs, rap for canes
Ace bandages and niggas wit sprain, stay limpin in pain
I rap for math, english, even rap for science
Gotta try to laugh, keep myself from cryin
I rap for Giants, the Jets, the Yankees, the Mets
It's New York New York, from Clue to Flex
New cassettes stay poppin up, your boo let me throw my cock in her
Rappin got me two proper nuts
It's crazy, I even rap for high school coach
White folks fiend out like in Michael Doates
Creamed out, dope stashin
For those askin, I flow for TV, HBO and closed caption

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Aiyyo aiyyo aiyyo aiyyo
Don't go to Texas, don't go to Watts
Don't go to Queensbridge, nigga don't go to cops
Don't snitch when you're gettin bagged
In the penns, don't bitch when you gettin stabbed
Just hold that, I pose for Kodak's, rose to stardom
Hoes in Harvard, sophmores get knocked off, nigga watch yours
I watch the game like it's Saint John's
It ain't wrong, take a blank piece of paper, a pen paint songs
Type colorful, writin that shit a thug'll do
In the heat of the moment, type to make a sudden move
Some'll snooze, some'll snore, they won't admit that dunn is pure
Once I quit, niggas wanted more
Cop my shit once it come in store
The first week be at the top of the charts, got it jumpin off
Hot verses wit a hundred thoughts
One theme, gettin caught in my zone you'll become a corpse

[Hook



[Verse 1: Quan]
Can we please have a moment of silence?
That's for my niggas doin' years in confinement
And for my soldiers who passed over, no longer living
That couldn't run whenever the reaper came to get 'em
Can we please pour out some liquor?
Symobolizin', let's take in time to consider that
Though our thugs ain't here, the love is here
And we gon' rep 'til slugs kill us here
This for my dawgs stuck in the struggle tryin' to gain
Smokin' trauma, sniffin' Ra while sellin' cocaine
Trapped in the game, not knowin' how to stop and get by
To live it alive, so instead they live it to die
Can we please have a moment of peace?
For every G that fell for his flag in the streets
Bloodin' and thuggin', folkin' and lokin'
Crypin' and creepin', Latin and kingin'
Or just for poor righteous teachin'

[Hook: Quan sings]
As days goes and nights fall
For the rest of our life we'll miss y'all
And even though life must go on, we'll still mourn
While wishin' y'all were home

[Verse 2: Nas]
Yeah, and can we have another moment of silence?
For brothers who died from black-on-black violence
From here to the Dark Continent were rebels sell diamonds
To clients allover the world, got little Black girls dyin'
And can we please pour some more liquors?
For Will, Bokeem, Bar, Pappy -- my niggas
Here's another Warrior Song from Nasty and Quan
It's to him I pass the baton to carry this on
Street's Disciple, salute to those who's gone with bullets
And I promise through rhymin' Quan gon' rep his life to the fullest
And can we please have a moment of truth?
For soldiers and troops away with helmets and boots
And families back home who pray they make it home safe
Hopin' that they don't get hit with a stray or missiles
This is just a moment to let you all know that we miss you
Mommy I'm still here, wishin' I was there with you
Let's take 'em home

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Quan]
And can we please have a moment to mourn?
For Pac, Biggie and Pun cause through us they live on
Jam Master Jay, Freaky Ty and Alliyah
Big L and Left Eye, when we die we wish to see ya...

[Nas]
Photographs of lost memories
On the blocks with blunts and Hennessey
Picture some niggas in mock neck shirts
Ballantine Ale in brown bags
Brothers like to brag 'bout their cousins
That locked in the system
We all fall victims, we all call Christian
Or Islamic faith, to restore all our faith
Barbed wire and tall brick wall
But we all can escape

[Hook]



[Verse 1: Nas]
You cocked back
You thought you had it planned, you thought you had your man
He saw you comin', he ran when you tried to blast that man
You missed him by inches, he sprinted
Some of his boys on the corner was who your bullets entered
Two of 'em pull through, but one didn't, son's finished
You took the life of him
The part about it that's crazy, you was aiight with him
Tight with him, why was he in the way?
Why was he standin' next to the enemy that specific day?
His style never hollas loud, stays reclusive
Good dude, got that look like he always about to do shit
Side of his mouth toothpick, one eyebrow raised
Got into it with dude who still tried to live out his old wild out days
They never had no probs
Somehow they rubbed each other wrong like a bad massage
These two different personalities had to collide
Niggas could not aim and innocent niggas died
You ask why, cause of a

[Hook: Nas]
Accident murderer, act like you killed on purpose
Liars brag, you put work in
You ain't mean to murk him, your gun's a virgin
Streets are full of them, read the bulletin
Accident murderer
You just a accident murderer

[Verse 2: Rick Ross]
We grew up doin' graffiti
Now hollows is gettin' heated
Seated in foreign cars, constantly gettin' weeded
Proceeded to count profits, I know they got on binoculars
But fuck 'em all, we ballin' 'til they come lock us up
Twenty to life, I'm clubbin' blowin' twenty tonight
We the Marlboro, Marley Marlin' all through the night
Addicted to wealth, never cold turkey to war
Snatch a tec off the shelf, live forever that's Insh'Allah
Memoirs of a rich nigga
Sweat suits, gold chains, old drug dealers
New Benz, chrome rims are for show, killer
You niggas accidental shoppers in back of the limo
Pay your tithes, stay alive, can't be dodgin' my clique
Hundred check, I use your bitch for some bargainin' chips
In a hole, sell your home nigga don't sell your soul
This forty-five in control, God forgives and I don't

[Hook]

[Bridge: Nas]
Accident murderer, accident murderer
You just an accident murderer

[Verse 3: Nas]
Yo, for my nigga that got killed, got hit up
Vodka spills on the concrete, light a swisha, we miss ya
And for that girl who never made it home, shot in the dome
How they gon' kill that beautiful sista?
Violent adolescents, homicidal with weapons
Not a lot of knowledge inside of they minds, that I'm guessin'
Tell me who you impressin'?
Shooters I knew them when they was babies, I used to test them
Make 'em throw up they hands, choke 'em out playin' wrestlin'
Watch 'em grow to a man, I see them now they reppin'
But they cold-blooded, homie, wonderin' where the respect went
Can't play with these little niggas, gangsta little niggas
Can't hang with these little niggas, they killin', they reckless
Wish I could build with him, but will he change really?
Some real killers, I think of Wayne Perry
Fake 'til my nigga draws, what you want a name? Tell me
You ain't mean to kill him, it wasn't necessary

[Hook]

[Verse 4: Ryan Leslie]
Born on June 4th - the mind of a Gemini
Plight of a societal OutKast - Aquemeni
You bought a hammer just to silence the clamour
For another real G on the block, after your man got popped
When shots rang out, you ran for cover
Bought your first gun, spent a couple grand for another four
Told your mom you was preparing for war
She signed the shape of the cross each time you ran out the door
But you ain't never had the mind of a killer
You was more of an actor - with the movement of a small time dealer
When the feds came they got you for light work
Facing a few years, defence attorney told you it might work
To cop a plea and turn informant - you could save a few tenants
And at the same time reduce your sentence
You wore a wire to the home of your old supplier
And when they raided, you ain't make it - you was caught in the fire
Of an accident murderer

[Hook]



[Verse 1]
I wouldn't marry a black woman here's the reason why
(Why)
Black women's evil, do things on the sly
(No)
You look for your supper to be good and hot
(Hot)
She never put the neck bone in the pot

[Hook 1]
She's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(She's on the road again)
She's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(On the road again)

[Verse 2]
I went to my window, my window was propped
I went to my door, my door was locked
I stepped right back, I shook my head
A big black nigga's in my folding bed
I shot through the window, I broke the glass
I never seen a little nigga run so fast

[Hook 2]
He's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(On the road again)
He's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
God, a natural-born eastman
(On the road again)

[Verse 3]
Your friend at your house just to rest his hat
Next thing he wanna know where your husband's at
She says "I don't know he's on his way to the pen"
Come on mama, let's get on the road again

[Hook 3]
She's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(She's on the road again)
He's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(On the road again)

[Verse 4]
I'm with my black woman let me tell you
(Why)
Black women's evil, do things on the sly
(No)
You look for your supper to be good and hot
(Hot)
She never put the neck bone in the pot

[Hook 1]
She's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(She's on the road again)
She's on the road again
(Just as sure as you're born)
Lord, a natural-born eastman
(On the road again)

[Outro]
Yeah!
Uh-huh
Yeah



[Intro: Nas]
Uh huh, a love story, but not your ordinary love story
Not hardly, you heard
Get into this shit right here, check this shit out
You know, check it

(Chorus: Lauryn Hill) X2
As he turned the corner, I called out your name
I felt so ashamed, when it wasn't you

[Nas]
Companions, commitments, relationships
They can be so nice in days picnics, advance slow nights
You start to miss it all when you got no wife
Seeing couples, walking, holding each others hands, talking
Like everything around them don't exist
And yo they stop before crossing the street so they can kiss
That remind me, my love for this 'lil mami
A slim body from Saudi Arabia probably (uh, huh)
We met five day into her stay, a thirty day visit
Her second time in the USA
But my first time to gaze at her
And wave at her was at KNICKS game
Islamic name hard to spit game
My thug look made nervous, her Secret Service
The floor seats next to Spike Lee, I had to purchase
Later we met on Tavern on the Green and after we dined
I said "I got to have you just one time", she said

(Chorus: Lauryn Hill) X2

[Nas]
Seduced her fast, surprised me, laying beside me
Rolling in my satin sheets, flexible body
Hair, black and long, Indian skin complexion
Eyes, nose and lips resemble the Egyptian
It's against rules to make conversation, with anybody new
Which was strange in our situation, that admired her more
Everyday I gave her a tour
Of New York streets, the parts that remained hard-core
It was coming to the day when she had to depart
When she left I felt the butcher knife stabbing my heart
Without a number to dial, continent near by the Nile she reside at
She said she would write, so she could fly back
Private airplanes, been a year, letters never came
In the short time we were together it never rained
Just sun shine when our tongues climbed
Each others body, wish I can see you one time, cause now

(Chorus: Lauryn Hill) X2



[Intro:]
(Whose world is this?)
La-la-la-la-la
(Whose world is this?)

[Verse 1:]
I sip the Dom P, watching Gandhi til I'm charged
Writing in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin
To hold the mic I'm throbbin', mechanical movement
Understandable smooth shit that murderers move with
The thief's theme - play me at night, they won't act right
The fiend of hip-hop has got me stuck like a crack pipe
The mind activation, react like I'm facing
Time like Pappy Mason, with pens I'm embracing
Wipe the sweat off my dome, spit the phlegm on the streets
And the Nikes on my feet keep my cipher complete
Whether cruising in a Six cab or Montero Jeep
I can't call it; the beats make me falling asleep
I keep falling, but never falling six feet deep
I'm out for presidents to represent me (get money!)
I'm out for presidents to represent me (take money!)
I'm out for dead fucking presidents to represent me

[Hook:]
(Whose world is this?)
The world is yours
Disciple of the projects slash verbal murderer
(Whose world is this?)
Yea, the world is yours
To the Philly blunt-heads, crack pumping drug murderers
(Whose world is this?)
The world is yours
To my niggas coming home from lockdown with new plans
(Whose world is this?)
Fuck it, the world is mine, holding the stolen cop's Glock with G notes in my hand

[Verse 2:]
To my man Ill Will, God bless your life
To my peoples throughout Queens, God bless your life
My insight enlights vision words of wisdom
Niggas pay me in tuition to listen
The murder paragraphs of mysticism
Man plants seeds that bring forth multiple breeds
So many cultures on one planet but one culture's free
Son I need weed to proceed
Change the flow speed
I'm gettin' vexed Giuliani at 666
There's no days for broke days sellin' smoke pays
I tote the chocolate potent Phillies never wrote roach-sprayed
Shit is a hassle, The Bridge is like a haunted Castle
The mic's my religion the system is the devil's lasso
And yo, the trife life is most influential
The colors on mens skin and pens is coincidental
How you livin', large or broker
You wastin' time extortin' papers from smokers
Catchin' court papers gettin' broker

[Hook 2:]
The world is mine
Persona of late Tony Montana, yea gettin' mine
(Whose world is this?)
The whole world is mine, who wanted?
I never fronted, I'm forever blunted, getting lye
Henne up with the lye, never stop, we don't stop the - henne low, puffin' lye ya'll
Don't stop the henne low, we puff the lye, everyday puffin' lye, plus the henne low

[Verse 3:]
I'm the young city bandit, hold myself down single-handed
For murder raps - I kick my thoughts alone, get remanded
Born alone, die alone, no crew to keep my crown or throne
I'm deep by sound alone, caved inside, 1,000 miles from home
I need a new nigga for this black cloud to follow
Cause while it's over me it's too dark to see tomorrow
Trying to maintain, flip, fill the clip to the tip
Picturing my peeps not eating can make my heartbeat skip
And I'm amped up, they locked the champ up, even my brain's in handcuffs
Headed for Indiana, stabbing bitches like the Phantom
The crew is lampin', Ill Will style
Check the gold-toothed smile, plus I profile wild
Stash loot in fly clothes, burning dollars to light my stove
Walk the blocks with a bop, checkin' dames
Plus the games people play
I check the dames plus the games people play
Bust the problems of the world today

[Outro:]
(Whose world is this?)
Yea, Wizard, keep that lye in the air, yo
I wanna give a shoutout to the whole fucking Queens
My man Tipster on the boards, keeping it real lord
The Queensbridge nation, get it on
Faking no fucking jacks
Fuck around get your wig pushed back
Big shoutout to my man killa, Ron do is on you
L-A-S is on another murder quest
'94, we out
Keep the lye in the air, Hennessy everywhere
(La-la-la-la-la-la)
Keep the la-la going
(La-la-la-la-la-la)



[Intro]
You are who you associate with
Look around at your five closest friends
And that's who you are
If you don't want to be that person
You know what you got to do

[Hook]
Association breeds similiarity
That's why I'ma stay with real rich niggers
'til six niggers carry me
Poverty's a mind state
Time waits for no man
But no man
Wants to die a poor man
With no plan

[Nas]
You try to kill me, but I come back
Hate me, that's a small thing
Demons let the sword swing and sever off my offspring
Bitches try to see me down, hugging the floor
Bullets pulling me, playing tug of war
With my body, gravity got me
Police want me arrested, just to see me naked
Snakes want my necklace, fake niggas make me set-trip
Thugs shooting wreckless, everynight, niggas
Wonder, how will I exit from this life, niggas?
Think you a killer, get cement shoes in the river
You should watch them people with you
Let them street rules hit you
If you hang around snitches, you get judged for that
Cause you condone it, you know there ain't no love for that
There's slugs for that
Oh, you didn't know your man was talking?
That's why you stand with him, till you both land in the coffin
When you first heard he was snitching, then you should have thought
Everytime this nigga got caught selling, they let him walk
Early on a nigga was taught, stay away from them niggas
So a nigga like Nas got nothing to say to them niggas
I fuck with, only the trusted thug clique
Who really done shit, run up in your bitch, busting guns quick

[Hook]
Association breeds similiarity
That's why I'ma stay with real rich niggers
'til six niggers carry me
Poverty's a mind state
Time waits for no man
But no man
Wants to die a poor man
With no plan

[Nas]
Some bitches lie a lot
They could be fly or not
Actresses cry a lot
Their girlfriends spy a lot
They can shake your hand, girl
Then they take your man, girl
The whole hood knowing
We got something good going
None of these hoes is after me
'Til they saw us happy
And that you bagged me
Now they wishing that they had me
So watch who you hang with
And who you cling with
You know these bitches ain't shit
They hoping to bank chips
With the baller after she done gave him some head
He never called her
He gang it and he left her for dead
Birds of a feather fly together
But chickens don't, they eat their own shit and die
And you affiliated, now you look weak
Cause your peeps is freaks
Credit card stealing hoes, well known in the streets
And they brought your down in the dirt
You was a pretty, young, smart thing
Going to work, I bet it hurt
Cause you had a clean rep
But the girls you seen with make these niggas say
"I bet that bitch suck a mean dick"
Word

[Hook]
Association breeds similiarity
That's why I'ma stay with real rich niggers
'til six niggers carry me
Poverty's a mind state
Time waits for no man
But no man
Wants to die a poor man
With no plan

[Stic Man]
A warrior walk alone, there's one spot on this throne
Fake friends be off and on, but a man stand up on his own
I'm raised by a different code, cut from a different cloth
Never been a follower, my momma told me be a boss
Watch who you hang around, don't let nobody bring you down
Friends come and go like seasons, leaves turn to brown
And some only come around when everything is green
Be careful not to let a snake infiltrate your team
For every Jesus there's a Judas, every Caesar there's a Brutus
If somebody tell you jump off a bridge -- are you gon' do it?
There's two types of influence: either healthy or deadly
Keep your circle small, away from all the hate and the envy
Don't come nowhere near me with it, I'm bullshit intolerant
My politics bosses up, for you black empowerment
I stay in my element, braveheart intelligent
Only associate with those for my betterment
I'm out for dead presidents to represent mines
Only click with my kind, my best friend is my grind
Everybody got big dreams, but few follow through
And it's deep: the company you keep become apart of you
Don't just be sitting around smoking weed letting time fly
If your homies don't inspire you to rise, tell them bye
You're better off dolo than rolling with a weak ass crew
I'm like Scarface: Who I trust? -- Me, that's who



[Intro: Nature]

[Verse 1: Nature]
Y'all know my pedigree, hoes blow the gods voluntarily
We're world wide, my heart pumps where the ghettos be
Young sharks be telling me, y'all niggas can't swim, y'all drowning
From my hood to your hood, the anthem, y'all wilding
I die for my coalition, the foes whispering
Hating, Wild Gremlins and those that roll with 'em
So I chose rap, we vamped to neva go back
Until this life of animosity, the high velocity
Niggas be on the same team planning to blow shots at me
Be the same mouths I try to feed
I write shit, entice it properly, 'til it hurts me
The same game as James Worthy, they spread my name like it's Herpes
Nature, niggas on the block boxing me, y'all not complete
We take this shit to where it gots to be, now smile philosophy

[Verse 2: Nas]
Sex and money go together like techs and nine shells
Swiss cheese you and cover it up like Roswell
Cartel, you ain't seen no iller regime
The Celest team, prophecy, project warrior, owns property
Crackers hate it, cops get jealous cause I stay with
The '98 temporary plates on my whip
The system thing is not right
A rich thug could fuck a cop's wife
Cause I'm on television and live the pop life
I rock mics, make mills, sound scan sales
One point whateva records, professional skills
Money's the root of evil but it'll make you happy
Don't wanna shoot my people but still they might clap me
Cause I talk like Dr. Malachi york, played the sidewalk
Hold fort, diamond plate chain, gold fork
Get in tune, rich life Ricky for silver spoon
Frank Lopez's crib, elevators and living room

[Verse 3: Noreaga]
Ayo we're still in Queens, same place where we use to be
Often you won't see us, cause we're usually out touring
Leave the hood now the hood boring
NORE, you know me, we're regulating
Straight from Iraq with QB affiliated
It's like a higher learning
From 99th street down to Vernon
Letting our heat burst burning
Like henny wet, throwing up my set
Catch me on star tec, 'bout to set the connect
Yo sex, drugs, money and murder, beers and sex
Lands and Lex in the projects
The 4th floor where we score through our cook-up
D's shook-up, hit the block and now you look up

[Verse 4: Nature]
Whispers turning to screams, from screams to hollers
Fans turn to fanatics, go home and dream about us
My zone, I need the chronic, my habit daily
Spitting, rapping fury, I got more steps then Alvin Ailey
Thousands will feel me, my nickname Braille
Dietec, the fakest niggas, cause their cliques ain't real
Each verse be pain filled, force to taking Motrin's
From the street to the screen, pictures be major motion
Nature grossing, holding my square where snake's approaching
React quickly, keeping gats where my dick be
A buck equal a hundred, so a half is fifty
Y'all do the math with me, before I hurt you
It's personal, you and I know, my whole squad be U-N-I-versal
From blood in to blood out, we thugged out
Fuck a four-four, I go to snub route, leave you rubbed out

[Verse 5: Nas]
Death followed him, before it swallowed him whole
It was signs he should of read that was inside his soul
Niggas light dutches to 'em now
So long miss a mutha fucka but still life goes on
Hope I'm rich on my last day, clutching some ass
Nigga said he came in with, got a nut when he passed
An old man laying dead on my bed, with some young shit
Screaming out "freedom" when I slumped her chest
After that, chill, be a bitch with a hex
Every nigga she sexed, be the next put to rest

[Verse 6: Noreaga]
Yo since a young sibling, had every flavor Timberland
Always had a jump shot and always dribbling
John McEnroe, Jose lay like Casserole
Doling Mike Tys', the jungle low, cut the china white
Come check ya, mixed the henny with the nectars
On straight flights while y'all cats connectors
If it was up to me, the whole world would be comfortably
But since its not, y'all niggas stay fucked up
I think about y'all too much and be bankrupted
So niggas get yours, I got mines niggas, so what, what?

[Outro]



[Intro: Nas]
Yo this Nas niggas whuttup?
QB Album coming, niggas Ill Will, Bravehearts
My nigga DJ Clue - put this shit on these niggas
Desert Storm baby 2000!

[Nas]
A Drug dealers dream - flip his last Ki out the game
Cause entertainment money now is off the chain
I put blunts in niggas caskets, lost in the game
I learned about pain, bodies burnt in drug game
But I'm neva gon' die, I neva heard of death
Energy could neva be destroyed
Only the flesh, when you niggas try to murder me
With bullets to my head
This is my you can't kill me niggas
I'm already dead, BRING IT!!
I'm busting bodies fall in the cemetery
Black blood raining on the street
All you niggas, buried y'all
Niggas just came home, fresh out the state greens
Five time felon, thinking he jelling in Queens
It's pitiful - what bid could do, especially federal
Y'all young thugs wilding, see prison
Got a bed for you waiting, I clapped that Satan
But thought I was dreaming
I woke up masturbating in the bed with demons
I cried with every bit of strength of my small body
This is the life I chose, under God I'm tiny
Hard to find me, I popped up, lock shot-up
You can't B.I., see I'm eternal, not luck
You get shot-up, boxed-up next for the grave
Your flow is one dimensional, your level is 2nd grade
You're on top -- WHAT?
Copy and fuck, I said it first, you repeated
Your false crown covered in dirt - defeated
Y'all niggas all hail, the King is dead
He running like a bitch with his tail between his legs
'Stillmatic', still eye 4 an eye, wanna be God
You're just the next rapper to die, fucking with Nas



1. Album Intro
2. The Message
3. Street Dreams
4. I Gave You Power
5. Watch Dem Niggas
6. Take It In Blood
7. Nas Is Coming
8. Affirmative Action
9. The Set Up
10. Black Girl Lost
11. Suspect
12. Shootouts
13. Live Nigga Rap
14. If I Ruled The World
Bonus Tracks:
15. Silent Murder
16. Affirmative Action (Saint Denis Style Remix)



[Nas]
Alka Seltzer... in this motherfucker... I gotta take shit
Ay there go my book... I been looking for this book

What, What... Yea

[Nas]
I ain't seen as much death, nor seen as much crime, since the blackout in Queensbridge in 79'
Everybodies a killer now... pimps, playas, and dons
Shorties on the block, push drops and carry on
Niggas look through our window, where ever we drove
Through the tint, to see if the Benz is matching the clothes
We the Queens Kings
I used to view the cats that I owe... see things...
That made me real, but my skin and my soul
Girls who turned hoes
Friends who turned foes
Bad luck niggas who bring Death where ever they go
Never sleep, it feels better to know... it's all real though!...

[Hook:]
Everything Is Real... And... Where We Heading Now... Up to more Money... It be More Fun... Leave with Mo' Bitches... and Carry More Guns

Where We Heading Now... Where We Going Yo... Getting Real Son... We Gon let It Flow... Leave with Mo' Bitches... And Be More Dough... It Be More Fun... Holding More...

[Nas]
How the hell, are we supposed to excel from the street...
Where the Jakes Crew face young kids who wanna eat
Quantum Leap to this Black World, Hustlers, and Ghettos
Cell mates, millionaires, who tussle with the Devil
Bust a lil metal lead (led)
Wrestle you... to the pebbles... on the hard gound
That's if the God's down
It's a struggle, brothers jump bail
To come chill with they niggas on the block, with them rocks for sale
On the hard with the god Shapelle... a Queens Conrad
Yo run and come with the dime bag

[Shapelle]
Yo, Yo-Yo
Ayo I need dat
I got to smoke dat...
Sell me some Chunky Black

[Nas]
So I could smoke away the pain
Try to find my brain
But the thought still remain
Yo it's on again
Once the jail take these chains
Cause I been through it
The drug game I thought I knew it
I got knocked, went to trial
But I blew it
25... but only lived 20 years of my life
Took 5 from me
Got me wrapped up like a Mummy
Now I'm in the system... aka the Devil's Home
Where they tell you where to eat, sleep, shit, and use the phone
Now I'm living with... drug dealers, and chain stealers...
Bitch niggas, who got knocked and turned squealers
Imagine sharing a cell with a rehabilitated addict
Who love fucking with faggots
But I sip alot of Savage
I sat him down, and made him study mathematics
Now I'm sitting in the cell thinking...
About this reefer I'm a get this weekend
On the V.I. (visit)
I rather be... uh, dam, dam

[Fades Out]



Pre-Illmatic:
Freestyles-

17 Year Old Freestyle(W/ Commentary At Beginning)


(Freestyle) 1st Time On Stretch & Bob


(Freestyle) 2nd Time On Stretch & Bob


(Freestyle) 3rd Time On Stretch & Bob


(Freestyle) The Wake Up Show(Anthem)


(Freestyle) Capital Rap Show

Freestyle In The UK


Songs(AKA Demo Tape Tracks)-

Nas Will Prevail (Original Version of "It Ain't Hard To Tell":


Number One With A Bullet:


Deja Vu:


Life Is Like A Dice Game:


Understanding:


Everything Is Real:


On The Real (Original Version):


Just Another Day In The Project:


Represent 93 (Original):


Live From The BBQ:


Back To The Grill:

It Was Written/The Firm:

Freestyles:

Biggie and Nas Freestyle (1995)

Tracks:

Jackin Beats Pt. 1, 2, & 3

Take It In Blood Pt. 2

In Too Deep

I Am/Nastradmus:

Freestyles:

Bonnie & Shyne Freestyle

Songs:

The Second Coming

Afterlife (Intro)

Almost Kings



I came from the city
Yeah, got my name from the city
Where? The most dangerous city
Let's take a trip back, back into time
1977, it was maximum crime
The President neglected us, him and 6 masterminds
6 powerful men put New York through some drastic times
The rich and selfish ones, feed off the welfare ones
And which borough suffered the worst? Hmm, where I'm from
The Bronx
We had to rumble with rivals on the rubble
While buildings around us would crumble
I dreamed right but it seemed like nothin' found me but trouble
I see the light, it's right there at the end of the tunnel
Had to find my rope, to pull me up
Cause I needed some kind of hope, to fill me up
'Til I met one guy, took me under the wing
I could have died if this man ain't intervene
He was an orphan, my savior, free spirited
No man braver, he was honored and gifted
His name was Shaolin Fantastic, the lady-killin' romantic
Can't forget the day we met, and this story recants it
But yo my life began last year, sophomore of high school
That summer I saw her, said to myself, "She'll be my wife soon"



[Intro: Nas & Maxwell]
*Oooooooooooh!*
Maxwell go and sing
*Ooohh, this for the ladies*
M-A-X
*Doin' it*
N-A-S
*I'm back again (who's back)
Again, again, I'm back again (who's back)
Ooh, tell me (who's back)
I'm back again (who's back)
Again, again, I'm back again*

[Verse 1]
Uh, yeah the booty is the bass
The highs, the beauty in ya eyes
First glance I became alive
She went through a lot of dangerous guys, surprise
Now she would decide on Nas
Cause I ain't choose her, she chose me
In the party, it was a early day a March
When I first had ya legs arched
In the park, wasn't even dark
We was in the zone, we ain't care who watch
Baby was the wine though the trees was sparked
She said till you get enough, please don't stop
So I played wit it, got the moist spot hot
If I ain't hittin' the bottom, I'm getting some top
My hair cut look air brushed
Whatever I wear is straight plush from the ears to chucks
As we sashayed across the dance floor
Just, me and you no one else but us two

[Hook: Maxwell]
No other girl in the room
No other girl in the room but you
(There's no other girl lookin' as good as you)
There's nobody but you
(They can try, they can try)
No other girl in the room
(But you know, you know, you know)
No other girl in the room
(Oh, oh, ooo ooo)
No other girl in the room but you
(There's no other girl, no)
There's nobody but you
(They try)
No other girl in the room
(There's nobody to,)

[Verse 2]
In the early eighties, shorty had me off the wall
A super freak as my thoughts revolved
It's like a menage Winona Gaye and Leila Hathaway
Both they fathers a tell me to play, sip Jose
On our honeymoon everyday
We dance to the same tune everyday
Beauty and the goon they would say
You promise, savage beast
You a sexy freak
Your moist lips negates the ecstacy
Number one in my book, no discrepancy
When you walk on the earth, you be reppin' me
I'm obsessed with thee, cherish every breath you breathe
No matter what's going on around us
All I could hear was the sound of (her)
Twirlin' her around just (her)
See nobody in the crowd just (her)

[Hook: Maxwell]
(No other)
No other girl in the room
(No one)
No other girl in the room but you
(There's no other girl)
There's nobody but you
(Thinkin' about you baby, baby)
No other girl in the room
(Never ever, ever, ever, see you)
No other girl in the room
(Oh)
No other girl in the room but you
(No other girl has, they're not you)
There's nobody but you
(Oooh baby yeah)
No other girl in the room

[Bridge: Nas]
Uh, horns!
Clap
Everybody clap
C'mon, clap
Max mellow 'em out

[Maxwell]
Oh it's just my, it's just my, it's just my girl
Oh, it's just, just my, just my baby, you
Just you, just me, no one else but you
No one, no one, just me and you, oh babe

[Nas]
Clap! Break it down

[Olu Dara]
You know it all comes from Africa
But my version is the blues



[Intro]
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
{*rewind*}
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
Check, one, two

[Verse 1]
Yo I'm hot like 95 Fahrenheit
On a summer night, tight spot where bodies rot
Rats drink from water drops, in the streets niggas
Little kids scared cops, wit red dots
Philosophical gangsta, wit violent priors
Goin' back like black and white TV's wit pliers
Leanin' on broke down cars, wit flat tires
Flash iron, anybody tryin' on, the blocks I'm supplyin' on
Madicon, my peeps, tie ballons up
And swallow 'em and the P now got goons, lots of 'em
Cops see them and run, don't want no drama
Certain parts of the streets, the beast don't want a part of
Martyr, hood haunted like the Dakota
Where John Lennon was shot up, but he sang for peace
He begged for freedom, hanged wit wild Jamicians
From Kingston, who drink Irish Malts
Listenin to Peter Winston, Machintosh
Lightning hits the top of the church steeple
When I'm writin', semi-automatic no hyphen
It's frightening.... {*scratches*}

[Hook]
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit

[Verse 2]
I take summers off, cause I love winter beef
Started '87, wit the shotty in the sheep
Three-quarter length beige, dressed to kill
Bust a shell at the ground, pellets hit the crowd
Nobody like a snitch, everybody shut they mouth
Woolrich, Carhartt, gun powder stains
Smellin' like trees, sensimille on the brain
Skeemin' on ya girls, bambooze or ya chain
Got ill up on the train, twistin' off a cap
Of a English in my vain, might of pushed you on the tracks
Deaf crack fiends, who can't speak, scream noises
Cause she bought a jum of soap, from one of my boys and, it's
.... Just another day in the hood
And I'm, wit some wild brothers, up to no good
We saw the movies, like Tony Montana, and 'em
But our style was let them pile then, we robbin' 'em
Money dudes, make 'em come up out they shoes
Run they jewels, word is bond, where my man Nino goin'
And I had to make a song, speakin on my old life
For the thief's who come out at night

[Hook]

[Outro]
One, two
Check, one, two {*echoes*}
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do {*echoes*}
{*explosion*}



[Nas]
Peace, how are you?
I ain't mean to be late
It was my night to watch my little girl
It's chilly out here
What happened? You crying?
Y'all got into it again huh?
See you gotta let them know from the jump
I don't care who they are, or who they're with
Yeah I know they know we're talking
Shh, why don't they just leave us alone?
I know it's hard for them to understand people like us
Could love each other
Come on, stop crying now
Oh, there's something I gotta tell you
I heard they're watching you
Yeah, they're watching, they're watching me too
But there ain't no reason to get low
I'm proud, I'm here
You know I'ma stand up for you, no matter what
And I know you'll stand up for me
I don't have no doubts about you being true to me
The world is ours
But right now it feels like the whole world is against us
So study, be strong, don't cry no more

*Immediately follows A Message To The Feds, Sincerely, We The People*



Now on July 13th, 1977
The blackout, streets is lookin' like Armageddon
Swelterin' heat, suffocate in this Hell within' the 5 boroughs
It's like the Sun roastin' the Earth
The hood was called turf, my girl was thrown out of her church
Out of her home, and by her family, she's disowned

She's the love of my life, up to us to go on
And everything's burnin', buildings illuminated by the fire
And the city was lost, we tryna save it, the cross
The Star of David we lost
We started prayin' to governor, he a gangster
In cahoots with the mayor, the roof startin' to cave in
No, it's not a game, all is dark except the flame
Now nothin' will be the same
Now the whole world's changed
Music is soundin' different
Radio stations don't pump us up in their mix yet
Disco still gettin' that air time for big checks

Yo, somethin' gotta give
And somethin' gotta die so somethin' new can live



{Intro}
Take it to the bridge
To the motherfuckin' bridge
Queensbridge in the motherfucker
(Hook)
It ain't hard to tell
*repeat 3x

[Verse 1]
The buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop, place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jew-el, inhale from the L
School a fool well
You feel it like braille ain't hard to tell
I kick a skill like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills I'm Ill
Plus Matic I freak a beat
Slam it like Iron Shiek
Jam like a tech with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magmatize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave'em froze like her-on in your nose
Nas could rock well
It ain't hard to tell

(Hook)
It Ain't hard to tell
*repeat 3x

[Verse 2]
What's a beat if the rap don't click
I spit rhymes like I'm sick, dying loss in a pit
The only way I can escape is by vocals
Verbalize a strife
Stabbin' ears like a knife hood like
The Prophet of the gutter
Lyrics are silk mega butter
I flow never stutter
Clever poetic brothers on a mission
Dissin' all who perps the fraud
Scrams listen, (and) do what the experts record
Burn your pen and pads, mics you'll need not
Well I be packin' like a rasta in a weed spot
Hittin' your hearts like a hollow tip
Verbally illin' minds manipulated
My raps a nickel-plated
I illustrate it, X-rated, then move out
Nas the parlayer takes you on a new route
It's suicide poetry released from a cell
With immense clientele, I excel
It ain't hard to tell

(Hook)
It ain't hard to tell
*repeat 3x

[Verse 3]
Now, I'm blessed with the finesse to express like Shakespeare
The blocks "Cape Fear" drop metaphors when the breaks clears
My mic check is life or death, breathin' a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like "The Shining", sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket linin'
Hit the Earth like a comet, invasion
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian, half-man, half-amazin
And in my physical, I'll express through song
Delete stress like Moltrin, extend strong
Drink Moet with Medusa, give her shotguns inhale
From the spliff that I lifted in Hell
It ain't hard to tell
(Hook)
It ain't hard to tell
*repeat 3x



Word word word word

[Nas]
I come through in a new double R listening to smiling faces
Check out my jewelry piled in your faces
Italian air forces leather laces with the basket weave
Iron in your face so fast from the draft so sneeze
It's the nastiest, flashiest, turn girls to masochist
Cause I be giving them pain, it's a cold world, I laugh as if
Bernie Mac will be snappin' on you
But I ain't a joke; you think I'm here to entertain you
Fallen angel after them halos
Nobody moves until I say so, take the money out the safe slow
Escape route and I'm out, I cake out like Entenmann's and Breyers
The flyest

[Hook]
You got to be the flyest
I know your ass is mean, like you be strappin them
Jeans, but you can work it like that
You got to be the flyest
You just take my pumps while standing in your pumps
Cause you can work it like that
You got to be the flyest
You just breathe and stare while I'm pulling your hair
Cause you can work it like that
You got to be the flyest
You can be Nas's angel, let the largest train you but
You work it like that

[Nas]
Uh, Philly rap a hydro, puffing on a line slow
Your CD needs me, keep it kickin' like Del Greco
Pull up at the Delano South Beach I know
For King Solomon jury security in the Tahoe
Spandex for money, I stay on the tight
G-packs and weed stacks stay on the flight
Elbow out the left window, K's on the right
Canary out her ears, you know she playing them right
Hilton style, Billionaire Boys club
Braveheart, y'all don't want no war with us
Dump a semi out a Maybach, I made girls bust
When I hit them full thrust, full throttle

[Hook]

[Nas]
Big living, what it tastes like, tapes right, used to hate life
To move an eight, every night was my passion
Pipe bombs safe from stashes, Aston's, Rolls Royces
Cold oysters and many sorts of women shake like horses
I got them peeling out their clothes, really about this dough
Problem, hear me out just scone from my pistol poppin'
It's at my mind, just a mystery school
Brainwash them, then fix them with my tools
Mami hit me with some moves
I'm addicted to spinning, dipping these women in different waters
Watching for dudes with tape recorders on them cause they informants
I been okay with these warmers
Girls harass me and gas me and say that I'm enormous

[Hook]

Move your waist girl.. Yeah yeah (x2)
You got to be Nas's Angel
You can be Charlie's Angel
You can be Nas's Angel



Dear Young Warriors fighting the wrong wars! Killing each other is definitely played out. Being hurt from the lost of a love one was never cool.

Dear Young Warriors fighting the wrong war! I know that feeling, that frustration with life and needing to take it out on someone, any one. But....

We chose the dumbest things to go the hardest for. I remember seeing deaths over 8 ball jackets, Fila sneakers, and name plate chains. Deaths over "he say, she say"!!!!! "I'm from this block or I'm from that block", or "my moms n pops is f*cked up now the whole world gotta pay"!!!

I remember feeling like I was the hardest "n*gga" breathing. And I couldn't wait to prove it. But let's think. What are we really proving?? And proving what to who?? Everybody knows Chicago breeds the strongest of the strong but I just feel, me, being ya brother from another state feels your pain as if I grew up with you in ya very own household.

You have the ability and mindpower to change they way we are looked at. Look who's watching us young warriors, look who's throwing us in jail constantly, look at the ignorance in the world. Look at the racist dogs who love to see us down. Loving to bury us in the ground or in jail where we continue this worthless war on one another.

Young warriors.... We are WASTING more and more time. We gotta get on our jobs and take over the world. Cuz this movie left the theaters years ago, Juice, Menace, Boyz n the Hood , Blood n Blood Out, Belly!

When we see each other why do we see hatred? Why were we born in a storm, born soldiers, WARRIORS....and instead of building each other up we are at war with each other.. May the soul of this young person find peace with the almighty. I'm with you young warriors. You're me and I'm you. But trust me! you are fighting the wrong war.
-Nas



Click, BOOM!, that's what I heard
Things crash

Listen up to what my soul conjures up
My tear ducts dry, can't cry, I conceal it, I die
My index finger and thumb push the pin to the drum
You ask where I've been, New York City, BX where I'm from
No figment of my imagination, sad situation for my dad
Killer came in my pad and started sprayin'
Father layin' on the floor, he breathin' no more
Shot to death, the reaper came like a thief through the door
Shaolin, he helps me, he wealthy in street knowledge
He deep in the path of drug dealin' and violence
Day in and day out, drama, we couldn't stay out
Livin' in my aunt's house, music the only way out
Cause we was in the broke down belly
Of a hungry beast
We stayed true, then we made up a crew
Shaolin gave me the name Book, I became a ragin' bull
Back when I was first enchanted by Grandmaster Flash
You had to be there, imagine him scratchin' wax
Up in his habitat in the Bronx, he got it on
The birth of a new group has spawned



Nas - I Am...



[Hook - Keyshia Cole]
I'm trying to put it all in words, but it's
More than I can say
It would take a whole lifetime to tell you
More than I can say
Every time I wrote a line it’s still
More than I can say
This is the realest shit I ever wrote
More than I can say

[Verse 1 - Nas]
Bottles and El Dorados, trapped in the allure
The sickness: dreaming of riches
Reality was the cure. My doctor
Physician was music, I'm sure
The prescription was super-model sandwiches
And suicide doors. I used to stand in my mirror
Fixing up my hat right
DMV don't make licenses for the fast life
Was taught never drop my head when I'm doing right
And though I may be watched by feds with the blue sights
I just want the whole world to bop their heads
Someone to stop my bread
If my pops was here, he'd be like "son, you the one
They gotta crown you, a gift from around you
Know they don't understand you, but what can they handle?
If they was wearing Gucci loafers, they'd be through, over
Just stay on point, do what you do
Soldier: remember I'm with you when the world get colder..

[Hook - Keyshia Cole]

[Verse 2 - Nas]
Keep having the same dream
About a mic, a gun, a cross, they all
In the middle of flames
An hourglass of salt dripping down to its last grain
Hear a voice that asks what do I claim?
I ask what it means. It's sort of a trance
As the planet Earth appears in the palm of my hands
I could do what I wish with it, and waking up
To study my dreambook, see if it links up
Looking for some significance, like does the dream
Represent this cold world I'm living in?
Ask my man, then his laughter begin
He had the same dream, but in his, he grabbed the gun
Damn son! I told him in mine I took the mic
The cross, I had it all my life, the same height
I'm trying to sneak sleep, so that my mind won't find out
Time out: my body won't wind down



Album Art:

Track List:

1. "Money Over Bullshit"
2. "You Can't Kill Me"
3. "Carry on Tradition"
4. "Where Are They Now"
5. "Hip Hop Is Dead" (featuring will.i.am)
6. "Who Killed It?"
7. "Black Republican" (featuring Jay-Z)
8. "Not Going Back" (featuring Kelis)
9. "Still Dreaming" (featuring Kanye West & Chrisette Michele)
10. "Hold Down the Block"
11. "Blunt Ashes"
12. "Let There Be Light" (featuring Tre Williams)
13. "Play on Playa" (featuring Snoop Dogg)
14. "Can't Forget About You" (featuring Chrisette Michele)
15. "Hustlers" (featuring Game & Marsha Ambrosius)
16. "Hope" (featuring Chrisette Michele)

Bonus Tracks:

17. "Shine On 'Em"
18. "The N (Don't Hate Me Now)"
19. "Where Ya'll At"



[Intro]
It's yours

[Verse 1]
I sip the Dom P, watching Gandhi til I'm charged
Then writing in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin
To hold the mic I'm throbbin', mechanical movement
Understandable smooth shit that murderers move with
The thief's theme - play me at night, they won't act right
The fiend of hip-hop has got me stuck like a crack pipe
The mind activation, react like I'm facing time like
Pappy Mason, with pens I'm embracing
Wipe the sweat off my dome, spit the phlegm on the streets
And the Nikes on my feet makes my cipher complete
Whether cruising in a Sikh's cab or Montero Jeep
I can't call it; the beats make me falling asleep
I keep falling, but never falling six feet deep
I'm out for presidents to represent me
I'm out for presidents to represent me
I'm out for dead fuckin' presidents to represent me

[Hook x4]
Whose world is this
The world is yours, the world is yours

[Verse 2]
To my man Ill Will, God bless your life
To my peoples throughout Queens, God bless your life
My insight enlights vision words of wisdom
Niggas pay me in tuition to listen
The murder paragraphs of mysticism
Man plants seeds that bring forth multiple breeds
So many cultures on one planet but one culture's free
Son I need weed to proceed
Change the flow speed
I'm gettin' vexed Giuliani at 666
There's no days for broke days sellin' smoke pays
I tote the chocolate potent Phillies never wrote roach-sprayed
Shit is a hassle, The Bridge is like a haunted Castle
The mic's my religion the system is the devil's lasso
And yo, the trife life is most influential
The colors on mens skin and pens is coincidental
How you livin', large or broker
You wastin' time extortin' papers from smokers
Catchin' court papers gettin' broker

[Hook x4]

[Verse 3]
I'm the young city bandit, hold myself down single-handed
For murder raps - I kick my thoughts alone, get remanded
Born alone, die alone, no crew to keep my crown or throne
I'm deep by sound alone, caved inside, 1,000 miles from home
I need a new nigga for this black cloud to follow
Cause while it's over me it's too dark to see tomorrow
Trying to maintain, flip, fill the clip to the tip
Picturing my peeps not eating can make my heartbeat skip
And I'm amped up, they locked the champ up, even my brain's in handcuffs
Headed for Indiana, stabbing bitches like the Phantom
The crew is lampin', Ill Will style
Check the gold-toothed smile, plus I profile wild
Stash loot in fly clothes, burning dollars to light my stove
Walk the blocks with a bop, checkin' dames
Plus the games people play
I check the dames plus the games people play
Bust the problems of the world today

[Hook x8]



"Watch Out"----8X

[Nas]
There's a man who live the life of danger
To everyone he meets stays as stranger
With every move he makes, another chance he takes
Odds are he won't live to see tomorrow

He's secret agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks, how he talks, how he lays his plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They give you a number then take away your name

Secret agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks how he talks how he lays the plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They give you a number then take away your name

Beware of pretty faces that you find
A pretty face can hide an evil mind
Be careful what you say, or you'll give yourself away
Odds are you won't live to see tomorrow
Agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks, how he talks, how he lays his plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They gave him a number and took away his name

He's secret agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks, how he talks, how he lays his plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They give you a number then take away your name

Yeah, (secret) yeah, (secret) yeah (secret) yeah, (secret)

Secret agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks, how he talks, how he lays his plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They give you a number then take away your name

Swinging in the Riviera one day
Then laying in the Bombay alley the next day
Oh no, who let the wrong word slip
While kissing them persuasive lips
The odds are I won't live to see tomorrow
I'm secret agent man, amazing man
How I walk and talk and lays my plan
Agent man advance the game
They give you a number then take your name
He's the, agent man, amazing man
Check how he walks how he talks how he lays his plan
Secret agent man advance his game
They give you a number then take away your name

"Watch Out" ---6X

Uh, secret agent man
Uh, uh, more bullet proof than a spook of set by the door
More legend than 007, more raw

"Watch Out" ---4X



[Produced by 9th Wonder]

[Intro]
Fuck Jay Z!
(What's up niggas, ayo, I know you ain't talking 'bout me, dog, you? what?)
Fuck Jay Z!
(You been on my dick nigga, you love my style, nigga)
Fuck Jay Z!

[Hook]
(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you – the king – you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I prove you lost already

[Verse 1]
Brace yourself for the main event, y'all impatiently waiting
It's like an AIDS test – what's the result? Not positive
Who's the best? Pac, Nas and B.I.G
Ain't no best – East, West, North, South, flossed out, greedy
I embrace y'all with napalm, blowed up, no guts left, chest/face gone
How could Nas be garbage? Semi-autos at your cartilage
Burner at the side of your dome, come out of my throne
I got this locked since 9-1
I am the truest; name a rapper that I ain't influenced
Gave y'all chapters but now I keep my eyes on the Judas
With Hawaiian Sophie fame, kept my name in his music

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
I've been fucked over, left for dead, dissed and forgotten
Luck ran out, they hoped that I'd be gone, stiff and rotten
Y'all just piss on me, shit on me, spit on my grave
Talk about me, laugh behind my back but in my face
Y'all some well wishers, friendly acting, envy hiding snakes
With your hands out for my money, man, how much can I take
When these streets keep calling, heard it when I was sleep
That this Gay-Z and Cock-a-Fella Records wanted beef
Started cocking up my weapon, slowly loading up this ammo
To explode it on a camel and his soldiers
I can handle this for dolo and his manuscript just sound stupid
When KRS already made an album called Blueprint
First Biggie's your man, then you got the nerve to say
That you better than B.I.G, dick-sucking lips
Why don't you let the late, great veteran live

[Interlude]
I... will... not... lose
God's son across the belly, I prove you lost already
The king is back, where my crown at
Ill Will rest in peace, let's do it niggas

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Y'all niggas deal with emotions like bitches, what's sad is I love you
Cause you're my brother, you traded your soul for riches
My child, I've watched you grow up to be famous
And now I smile like a proud dad, watchin' his only son that made it
You seem to be only concerned with dissing women
Were you abused as a child, scared to smile, they called you ugly
Well life is harsh; hug me, don't reject me
Or make records to disrespect me, blatant or indirectly
In '88 you was getting chased through your building
Calling my crib and I ain't even give you my numbers
All I did was gave you a style for you to run with
Smiling in my face, glad to break bread with the God
Wearing Jaz chains, no Tecs, no cash, no cars
No jail bars Jigga, no pies, no case
Just Hawaiian shirts, hanging with little Chase
You a fan, a phony, a fake, a pussy, a Stan
I still whip your ass, you thirty-six in a karate class
You Tae-bo ho, tryna work it out, you tryna get brolic
Ask me if I'm tryna kick knowledge
Nah, I'm tryna kick the shit you need to learn though
That ether, that shit that make your soul burn slow
Is he Dame Diddy, Dame Daddy or Dame Dummy?
Oh, I get it, you Biggie and he's Puffy
Rocafella died of AIDS, that was the end of his chapter
And that's the guy y'all chose to name your company after?
Put it together, I rock hoes, y'all rock fellas
And now y'all try to take my spot, fellas
Feel these hot rocks fellas, put you in a dry spot, fellas
In a pine box with nine shots from my Glock, fellas
Foxy got you hot, cause you kept your face in her puss
What you think, you getting girls now cause of your looks
Ne-gro please, you no mustache having
With whiskers like a rat, compared to Beans you wack
And your man stabbed Un and made you take the blame
You ass, went from Jaz to hanging with Kane, to Irv, to B.I.G
And Eminem murdered you on your own shit
You a dick-riding faggot, you love the attention
Queens niggas run you niggas, ask Russell Simmons, ha

[Outro]
R-O-C get gunned up and clapped quick
J.J. Evans get gunned up and clapped quick
Your whole damn record label gunned up and clapped quick
Shawn Carter to Jay-Z, damn you on Jaz dick
So little shorty's getting gunned up and clapped quick
How much of Biggie's rhymes is gonna come out your fat lips
Wanted to be on every last one of my classics
You pop shit, apologize, nigga, just ask Kiss



Da ha
Da ha ha ha ha ha
Da ha ha ha
Da ha ha ha ha ha

[Verse 1]
It was '87
Crack money was "Ghetto Heaven"
Niggas gettin' it
Every block rise to perfection
Green tops, boulders and bottles
Soldiers who follow leaders
You owed 'em dollars
Know that tommorrow you might not see it
Packs got knocked off by sprinklers that never worked
All the way to the monkey bars, cross that line you got murked
That's other niggas territory had fiends in the cheese line
They told them fiends calm down, ten dollars each dime
They never scared of Po-Po, was only one patrol car
They wasn't up for crack and I was up on the chin of Pa
Watching hustlers with tinted cars, money makin'
But one kid was into takin'
Had dreadlocks wasn't Jamaican
Fort green he laid
First nigga I ever saw rockin' dreads with a fade
Lead he sprayed on the corners in my hood
Dodgin' and runnin'
The glare in his eyes told you somethin' was commin'
They went to war, Godbless Rita, got shot by mistake
Niggas got knocked by them Jakes
Homicide suit and tie cops, Mayor Koch, screams in rage
Niggas so thugs got pits rocking thick chains
Stick-up niggas so thug they got pits with sick names
Clicks got bigger, extortion cats wasn't hearin' it
But he was regulatin'
A ghetto king, now he levatatin'
They say he smiled in his casket
This ends the first chapter of another Nas classic

[Hook: repeat 2X]
Tales from the hood, trails of blood
But it's all good, try to stay alive like we all should

[Verse 2]
Yeah I'mma help you nigga, cause I see evil's callin' you
Sick thoughts make you wanna take Ki's from other ballin' crews
Top of the world's all he views
A puff of weed, nothing but greed don't live by the rules
Fuckin' wit' me here's what I do
Try to sell your freedom I'm accustomed to
You could ball wit' me or get arrested too
It's easy to land where they dwell with the greasy hands
Twenty to L' what's your plan take your grams
You bought you a Lexus, BBS spendin' Abrahams
Never learned your lesson, choose the right direction
Thin line from life and death and my man checked in
A motel, same one as a young G he know well
Crossed 'em on a coke sell then went on a run
But shorty got his old folks killed, yo he got 'em done
Nobody to run to, what succumb to
My nigga just wanted to eat, now he hunted on the street

[Hook]
Tales from the hood, trails of blood
Yeah it's all good, try to stay alive like we all should
Tales from the hood, trails of blood
Though it's all good, try to stay alive like we all should

[Verse 3]
Little Gotti got down for his, let off seven rounds
The kid he hit is heaven bound if he's on the good list
Shorty who shot 'em ran knowing niggas would snitch
Five years passed he ain't been in the hood since
Shot this nigga over a hundred dollars, money, had borrowed
Time passed, on his birthday he couldn't afford a bottle
Least expected to see 'em, then he asked for his
Nigga said he don't got it, so he blast the kid
Escapes the scene, but he couldn't escape the dream
Or how the kid fell when bullets made it too late to scream
Seeing money's face starin' at him
In black space feelin' hands touchin' him
Wake up it got too much for him
Once liked to be alone
Until he started hearin' groans and seein' things
Now it's time to go home
Niggas shocked to see him
Gave him respect what he was missin'
All the way from VA his aunt yell "He hate to listen"
So he popped up, they gave him hugs, showed him love
Then he was reminded of that night when he sprayed all them slugs
He hangin' like nuttin' happened, police grabbed him up
Now he seein' ghosts in the cell, they got him strapped up
Psycho ward, rest of his life injected thorazine
Haunted memories in his mind of the murder scene

[Hook]
Tales from the hood, trails of blood
The book of the dead, translated in thug language, understood?
Tales from the hood, trails of blood
The book of the dead, translated in thug language, you understood



Intro:
Straight out of QB niggas
This is nas, lo
With my braveheart niggas
Jungle, wiz and horse
Fuckin with these cash money millionaires
So what yall gonna do about that
Niggas

Hook:
We on your block
We got rocks
You got robbed
The man got shot
That nigga's dead
Come get revenge
We getting money
We in the benz

We drive cars
We fuck your hoes
We taking charge
We gettin dough
Yall niggas pussy
I cut your face
I'm in your hood
Every fucking day

[Verse One: Wiz]
Yeah What up nigga im back
Fuck you got the mac
Touch you and them niggas you with
The bigger your clique the bigger my clip
The bigger my gun them niggas im with is horse and jung
And of course youll become a corpse if you fucking with me
The 44 caliber killer don't tussle with me
I been to war couple of times slept in the cold
Shed tears seen it all been outside for years
What this life mean to yall?
Money ice and cars Bustin nuts in broads
Never trusting god
You better trust him had with you when you hustlin
It was him that kept me alive when niggas was bustin
He ain't gonna save you so when I AK you and spray you
I run in your spot and take all whats yours
So you lay on the floor we expanding
What you gonna to do about it nigga?
Not a damn thing

Hook:
We on your block
We got rocks
You got robbed
The man got shot
That nigga's dead
Come get revenge
We getting money
We ridin in the benz

We drive cars
We fuck your hoes
We taking charge
We get the dough
Yall niggas pussy
We cut your face
We in your hood
Every fucking day

[Verse 2a]
What the fuck yall was born brave?
I put a slug through your cornbraids
Summertime broad day
You get your face blown right at the pay phone
I got big guns that break bones
Beef with me you take home to your family
Bullets fly randomly
Wet you like hard rain
Bravehearts gangbang

[Verse 2b: Nas]
Yo last night it was on Niggas came pistols drawn
Poppin off I had to run they shot one the kid is gone
Niggas quick to get it on know the block im living on
Queens bridge murders kings live merciless
Heartless crazy mercedes the projects young killas OG's enemies targets
Blow weed henessee more beef let it be
No chance of wetting me I hold heat in the streets
Rolls royce drop top crusing where the women be
Last nigga fucked around hes a hood memory
Fresh nikes wife beater knicks jersey white sneakers
Heavy like an ice freezer deadly not nice either
Ill fuck the ho with pussy that's mind blowing
Do my thug dance in clubs with my nine showing
Niggas tell they hoes, "why you fucking with nas?
He just gonna nut on your eyes
Have you suck all his guys
And also he say when you done cussin his by"
You ain't thuggin you lie bitch
Brave till we die bitch

[Verse 2c: Horse]
??? a nigga that would kill something over something small
The one you can't ??? with unless you paid in full
The one that hold grudges cause gun games for free
The only thing you wetting and splittin is ???
Im the one that lift the skirts up on fake ass rappers
That be killin for a long time but now it don't happen
All them tough guys is wanksters they ??? me in their songs
Im a braveheart till death so I got to die strong
A big man that's troublesome and follow no rules
Run through crews after smoking blunts and sippin on brews
Disrespecter pistol whippin hustlers for their cheddar
The deebo of the rap game but walk with a beretta
My heart is made of stone my eyes is filled with blood
Survivors of the street wars yall niggas know whats up
From the projects to penthouse yall niggas better look out
Before these braveheart motherfuckers put they gun in your mouth

Hook:
We on your blocks
We got Glocks
You get robbed
The man get shot
That nigga's dead
Come get revenge
We getting money
We ridin in the benz

We drive cars
We fuck your hoes
We taking charge
We gettin dough
Yall niggas pussy
We cut your face
We in your hood
Every fucking day

Shit talking at end:

We in your hood
Every fucking day niggas
Every day niggas, huh
Look around niggas
We on top
What you gonna do about it nigga?
What you got to say about it nigga?
That's right
That's right
Run all over yall niggas
What yall gonna do about it? Nothin
Bunch of corny ass phony ass niggas
Get brave nigga we brave nigga (bravehearts!)
Brave to the death baby
(bravehearts!)



So many niggas get fucked up in the game
See that's where they get caught out there in that word "Game"
Cause its not no fuckin game

When you hear shells coming at cha
Hot Ones from a shotgun I bet nigga runs faster
Loose a shoe to get away from a blaster
Think about that casket you don't wanna be in that shit
Quick to take his signin you taking every bodies package
Money over Bitches was a loyal practice
So you act as if money was no object
Spinin 5 zues trips for your whole projects
Epcot center linins for ya bitches, roli's for dogs
Now we in the mall slayin by his bitches
Everyday I reminiscing how he was living having fun
Cause any day could have led to prison
Not for a short bid cause if the feds ever caught kid
It be like 25 years conspiracy
Another 25 for rico snatching up him and his people
He had his jeep bullet proof with silencers on the desert eagle
Flipping bricks in Gary Indiana
He had it locked down from the streets to the slammer
Only trusted Two things his trigger and his hammer
Used to be a bum till had a six month run
Had a law suit three G's the case was won
Met with Mexican hoya cop boya
Bought barber shop named it after c shaday
There where they found his body
In a barber chair face down, bullets in his chest
Sliced apart from the waist down
Planned to sell his shop stick hoya for everything he got
Take jewels and his 5
Then his shoes where cemented
Drop his body in the tide but hoya was wise
Even when he ain't around he got ears and eyes
Gotta stay a step ahead of this game to stay alive

Chorus (X2)

Always wanted things always wanted cash
To Live fast get the girls with tha biggest ass
Fuck her 9 to 5 gotta drive a 5
Now that I got it the Hardest Thing To Do Is Stay Alive

Coke head Saundra she grew in Gruwana
Her man was large and Saundra was his baby mama
Stayed in drama Fighting with hood rats that he was fucking
No job all day she did nothing
They son was 7 years old, she really was a wifey
First should she would transport blow overnight for a G
He paid up front they laid up once
She got pregnant she would dead it
She had a boy, named her son infinite after his father who did dirt
She didn't noses after would follow
Capsules and bottles and crack in the back of his baga
He let her drive while he drove the burgandy 5
He often talked about how he wants to murder these guys
]From off of burger street, had nat workin the street
Lifestyle richest nigga from how he use to be
Never thought he'd rock diamonds never took weakness for kindness
That's how he gradually grew
Did a Favor for a favor now the nigga in with the crew
And Now he live major house in dix hills next to Brook Shields
With the cook and the maid shit was real
Saved his first bill, maid, and his bodega
Good Luck playa sign on the paper taped to the window
Escaped from a would be kidnap
And slept and thought niggas fearless rep until he got wet
Would had the world in his hands his girl did a scam
The owners rich is boning niggas to get rid of her man
Welcome To The Game Baby

Chorus (X2)

The Hardest Thing To Do Is Stay Alive...
The Hardest Thing To Do Is Stay Alive...
The Hardest Thing To Do Is Stay Alive...



[Intro]
Aiyyo whattup niggas?
Fresh off the honeymoon
The honeymoon's over
Fresh off vaca' (Yeah, yeah)
I'm jet-laggin', still jet-laggin'
But this just a preview
Let's get it on again y'all

[Verse]
I designed it, rhymed it, flow classic
You askin' who am signed with?
The real deal's Ill Will, stay scomit
Why's drama when other artists pay homage
You hatin any rapper I do a song with
"What's wrong with Nas helpin' crews get stronger"
You selfish, wantin' me to yourself
But prophets need help too, y'all see Nas get insulted
I ride for the real shit, High as the Lock's get melted
Twelve Years, givin' you nuttin' but big moments
How can Murda Inc not wanna fuck wit
The top hustler - R.O.C. crusha
Nas a legend 'fore BIG & Pac left us
Bubbled wit Dr. Drizze, you heard it on Makaveli
Sayin': "Nas is ring leader, brings Ether, brings heater"
Your dream teamer scream, "He's the Supreme Teacher"
Similar to anybody you know
Oh, I created, cremated, bodied that flow
Anyone you think is fuckin' wit me
Better be vets, better be Ra, better be Kool G, or KRS
Better be LL, or Slick or them
Neva put me in the Top Ten, bitch!
It's disrespect to the life that burnt the verses
Or nigga writes who comes first
It's the Ice Cube, MC Shan, them type dudes
So BET's list was wrong, don't get me wrong
I did chill in the throne alone so long
This is my My Will

[Outro]
Yeah, Escobaro Cigars, that's how we doin' it
Ayyo Quan, welcome to the game!
Shot-out to Ill Will (This is my my will)
Bravehearts stand up! Whuttup Scarface?
Whuttup Tre Williams? (This is my will)
Ill Will '05, what y'all know 'bout that?
Queens, Queens I know you miss me
I gotchu, I gotchu Queens, New York stand up!
Aha, I gotchu baby, let's do it again!



[NAS]
In my darkest days lighting up the rightous smoke
Cause I'm dealing with this thug life crisis and can't cope
Niggas on my dick beef don't stop
Niggas asking what happed to the Firm
Did you and AZ bone Fox? No
How was it working with Dre though?
Heard you was fucking Lil Kim and Mary J, Whoa , the list goes on
There is rumors that Brandy broke my heart
The world want to know what's in the life of the prettiest Don
Nas, was Jay fucking with your baby mom's?
Was she involved with a plot, to deceive my perfect degrees of
Three hundred and sixty, he ugly she pretty that's life
Never been married eloped with dope; Music's my wife
It's true, me and 2 PAC once steped to each other
Confronted our like's and dislike's in front of Suge Knight, we left it as brothers
As a child pop's blew his weed in my face, results, mixing ether with base
I'm the rebel to America, less is the nasal voice chipped tooth bastard
What your hearing is a replica
I never had a clue, that all you dudes should be in dresses
Double edges playing both sides of the fences

[Hook] [Nas & Lake]
Where my soul going to go when my ditch is dug?
One never knows do one
The things that I've seen in the streets I'm from
One never knows do one
The stuff that I've done what I've become
One never knows do one
Am I crazy what they make me out to be or what?
One never knows...

[LAKE]
The streets say what up wit Lake, not showin his face
And did he really shoot at the Jake's?
When he just came home, and dude shot at Capone, for his necklace
Why was Lake name mentioned?
Was he reppin on the island taking phone time?
Did he get Prodigy his chain back in "99"?
Who's writing his rhymes? He is
Do he be with Kingpin like Delson and Jesus, What was he thinking?
On Revolutionary Warfare when he said, He's a modern day Hitler
Did he shoot more niggas, Than every dude in QueensBridge?
Why his last case made the daily news in June?
Do he have the strength to unify heads from BX to Harlem?
Who did he stomp and walk naked in his Projects?
Did he get shot in his chest, never fall with no vest on shoot duke and walk off

[Hook]

[NAS]&[LAKE]
[N] A yo these niggas don't understand me
[N] There's going to be a murder my reason insanity
[N] The acts in the involvement with a homicide Nas
[N] Who did you shoot at the time when you could've got robbed?
[N] Do you call yourself a prophet of God?
[N] Did your hood set fire to your car in your project's in '95'?
[N] Did Jungle shoot up the club lately?
[N] Did Jungle kidnap Philly's Most Wanted, then they drove him to his safety?
[L] Yo, what happened to Puffy and Steve Stoute?
[L] Why did they scuffle with champane bottles smashing, what was it about?
[N] My video nailed to the cross
[N] Now Stoute started hating me, hanging with my enemies
[L] They ask everyday on my block
[L] How did I survive in ? by keeping it gangsta, why Nas
[L] Did you leave a clothes company after you made it millions?
[N] Cause Esco's weak I start a new line a ILL one

[Hook]



[Verse 1: Nas]

1 A.M., I'm at my best
Twistin' trees at my rest
Melt with hash, sippin' Heiny, hittin' states in a G.S
With my grimeys, - blowin' up throughout the 90's
Stayin' lit with the Chocolate Amaretto plus a dime piece
Takin' Gortex steps, cause shit gets hot
Pistols pop, some you hear, some you know when you drop
Twistin off the bottle top, contemplate, fate and plot
While niggas walk around with' all they got in one knot
For real, I build a mini-Israel, rough is the fishscale
Like the Red Sea, deep and deadly, though I'm a sit still
Imagine being gassed up, your time passed up
Thinking you Lord sippin wine out of brass cup your last supper's
Served, without Grace son about face
I hung a nun in '91 to captivate the rap race
You ain't from the pro's or the ject's, the nine's or the tech's
Chapter One, today's Math, 'True Dialect'



Nas:
I'm letting my people know why I'm not at the Summer Jam. I've been bamboozled, hoodwinked, and the whole nine. I was told and begged to do the Summer Jam. I was begged to come to Hot 97, cause I had a hot new record that nobody wanted to support except for the streets. I was told to come there and save Angie Martinez' job. I was told to come there and help the ratings at Hot 97 by Flex and the rest of the crew over there. I'm here to let my people know, all my Hip-Hop community people know that I was dissed this morning by Hot 97, and told what I couldn't do on the show. It's really outrageous and really shows that the wrong people are in power. This Hip-Hop thing comes from the streets. We need our freedom. If y'all ain't gonna fight for your freedom, y'all just gonna be like them sucka artists that just go up to the radio station and kiss A-S-S just to get some airtime, or just suck Flex or suck Clue and 'em, tryna get on their best sides so they can play your record. C'mon, man, take Hip-Hop back into your own hands, man. Throw a party in the streets for free. You know, make it safe, hire the Nation of Islam or somebody to protect it. It's time that we take it back into our hands, because when it's being held in bondage and slavery, it's really a big smack in the face to Hip-Hop and all the people who love it. You gonna tell Nas, me, myself, what I cannot do on a Summer Jam stage when it's been done--the same acts have been done

Power 105:
4 or 5 years in a row

Nas:
4 or 5 years in a row. And last year it happened to be that the diss was toward me by Jay, and he was all high and mighty. Then I dropped the Ether napalm bomb, and their whole crew was running like roaches. And now you got that station over there crying because he lost, unanimous decision he lost. They played his records like he was dead, like it was a Jay-Z memorial--not saying he was. Don't get me wrong, y'all, I'm not wishing that on any man. And that's my brother, but I'm saying--

Power 105:
You just looking for a fair play

Nas:
A fair play. And it's really out of hand, y'all, I'm not going for it. It's not gonna happen. This is a perfect opportunity, you have the alternative to choose any radio station you want to choose. And Power 105 plays everything: old school, new school, if you want to listen--

Power 105:
Pimp Juice! Mike Saunders, Pimp Juice!

Nas:
Yeah, big up to my man Mike right here who let me come up here. Big up to my man Donnie Ienner, everybody at Columbia Records who's totally behind my back. David Belgrave, everybody. The whole crew

Power 105:
We behind you, Nas

Nas:
And especially right here

Power 105:
The streets is behind you. Because you know what, after this, you probably ain't gonna hear none of your records over there. But it's okay, you know why? We have over 1200 stations, and we gonna hold you down

Nas:
That's love

Power 105:
I know Colb's gonna make a few calls. Mike's gonna make a few more calls. I'm gonna 2-way a few cats. Because we definitely appreciate this. This is what this is all about. This is real Hip-Hop, y'all. This is not synthetic Hip-Hop

Nas:
This is not synthetic. I have my freedom of speech, I'ma say what I want. I'm not worried about a record. I turn on that station, I hear people, rappers on there, talking about their record sales--that's played out--their rims on the truck, I mean what does that have to do with our community? What does that have to do with anything real? Let the rappers talk about it on their records. I don't wanna hear about rims on a truck. I don't want to hear the radio disc jockey making records that's terrible

Power 105:
Woah

Nas:
I wanna hear true Hip-Hop music. Nah, for real, man. This is real

Power 105:
This is true which is why I'm saying "ooh."

Nas:
You gotta realize I ate it. They had a Takeover show. And that was the song, ladies and gentlemen, the wack record Jay had trying to come at me. They named a whole show on that station "The Takeover." And I ate that. They didn't worry about my feelings when he made a record dissing my daughter's mother, with derogatory things about women in it

Power 105:
Two records

Nas:
Yeah, Jay just making records about how much he hates women, which really makes me curious. And I'm sitting here, they just support that and support everything he does. But when Nas, God's Son, answers him back, they team up with the evil. See, it's a whole evil empire funded by a bunch of other evil empires, Def Jam one of them, that's giving them money to play all their artists' records. Meanwhile the struggling artists have to try to recreate records that sound like Jay, and they're destroying themselves. If you listen to 90% of the rappers, they're not even creative. Pick up a Stillmatic album. Listen to the song Rewind. Listen to the song What's Goes Around ("comes around")

Power 105:
Listen to One Mic

Nas:
Listen to One Mic, my people. Let's get real and be creative. I buy these people's albums, and they ain't talking about nothing. From Cam to everybody. I mean, I like Cam and everything. He's a good lyricist, but the album's wack. Y'all brothers got to start rapping about something that's real

Power 105:
About life, man

Nas:
Nore, my man, Nore, I love you Nore. Step your rap game up. Nelly, you trying to battle KRS-One. Don't follow Nas, man. You can follow Nas if you're going to be creative. God's Son--yo, my next album coming out to school a lot of rappers on how to be a man, because these brothers got--they let Flex and them dictate what's supposed to be hot. That's why I'm here to let y'all know why I'm not at Summer Jam. I ain't no sucka, man. I'm right here, I'm made from Queensbridge

Power 105:
Let's give Nas a round of applause for standing up for the Hip-Hop community

Nas:
This is for the Hip-Hop community. I don't want nobody get it twisted

Power 105:
I'm cosigning everything

Nas: Yo, word is bond, I don't want nobody get it twisted. Word is bond. This is all about people know that I did not diss my fans there at Hot 97. I was told this morning what I could not do

Power 105:
And that's why you're not closing the show

Nas:
I'm not gonna close the show. They begged me to be the headliner, because Jay is mad at them, he got a fit with them, a little emotional attitude

Power 105:
Of course, cause he came over him and made the Power Switch. That's what that was all about

Nas:
He got a fit with them. They begged me not to go to Wendy's station because Wendy was slaughtering Angie Martinez. They was like, "please don't go there, Angie's not about to have a job." Don't confuse me into the Wendy Williams-Angie beef. I make rap records. They got me in the middle of that to boost up their ratings, and then treat me like a crab today, which is not surprising, which is a reason why part of me feels good for not showing up, when they told me what I could not do, and that I could just take it or leave it and walk, and just treated me with total disrespect. So that's why I'm here letting my people know. It's time to be real y'all. Make your own outlets, man. Listen to 105, make mixtapes, listen to Kay Slay. Go get Hip-Hop without dealing with that station over there

Power 105:
There it is, yo. Or you can get yourself a Nas album

Nas:
Get a gun and get real. Get some balls, man. You rappers, get some balls. You rappers are slaves



Yo

[Verse 1:]
Yo
The trains are New York Veins
The cities a cycle
People are the blood stream
Mean and ice cold
Laid back
Counter clockwise
The dice roll
Yank hats
Gang flags
Plane crash
Ground Zero
No lost angels
Ain't you from my from my man's and them area?
It's good to meet you
Ya man did 20 years for some FILA sneakers right
True
Had the 560 benz
Light blue
Where ed shot himself in the stomach
Smoke the dust
He let the culture culture bust
Back when we took the D train uptown
Shante and her whole crew
Groovy hair style
Yo baby yo baby yo t-shirts
Gold teeth smirks
At mark 125th
Hope the heat work
Few numbers I bagged
Then caught a cab back
To Jamaica Ave by the library
Seen the part of shabazz

[Hook:]
New New York New York York York
(all to those who live in Queens know just what I"m talking)
New New York New York York York
(all to those who live in Brooklyn know just what I'm talking)
New New York New York York York
(all to those that live in Harlem know just what I'm talking)
New New York New York York York
(all to those from South Bronx know just what I'm talking)

[Verse 2:]
Skate Key
Empire USA
Rooftop
2 O'clock
Skates off break north
To the rink
Minks
Springfield in Newark
The 6 borough Jerz
Car jack city
The GW bridge
The Coop City
Popo's hot
Glocks in your Benzy box
Stash
And we move fast
Dropped off Miss Pretty
Shakes her ass to the building
Knowing I just killed it
Dudes in front of her door blocks her entrance
Asking her "who she been with?"
She laughs "mind ya business"
Tinted windows
Pop dutches with box cutters
Drop brothers off at comstock to see locked brothers
Hick town up in New York State
Jakes
Hate a black New York face
Jumping out the phantom with the Baps
Planet of the Apes
With the hammers on her waist
Gorillas in the tristate of

[Hook:]

[Verse 3:]
It dont matter if I been out of town
Cigar lounge
Doing rounds of tequila
Soon as I touch down
In NYC streets
The heat is on
The Talk
Who said what
I catch up on
The New Teflon Don
Who got they death bond
Who still stable
Where beef got squash at the round table
Who still holding it
Who hanging with snitches
Couple of Zulu's from back in the days who still up in clinton
No more hand shakes fake arm swing
See if your flinching
Need to hold something thats mention in every nigga sentence
When I get it you got it
D's went up in the project
Bail a couple of homies out
No doubt
Ferrari's in the summer
When its the hummer
Or the turtle top band satellite
Spilling drinks
Hitting potholes with savage types
Club 17 marque
The team flash
Next day hit the spas and the steam bath
Knock out this business
Do some promo
Make paper in the grind capital
Sign a graph then hit the hood
See the folks reminisce on how it was

In the most powerful city that i love NEW YORK



[Verse 1]
Man, Prince was a pimp, appolonia vanity
Sheila E. had me on the edge of insanity
Swore if I made it in music I'd be similar
Here I am, this is the future, I'm where the woman are
Rocking with ?, y'all need me, shine a spotlight up
In the sky ? like Batman, I pops right up
This is Nas hate if u must hate been hot since the days of cassette tapes
T-shirts over the thermals dripped in our memories
Sipping that Hennessey .45th in my denim jeans
She told me she was my eyelashes
When we hump, I grunt just like a bull mastiff
They call me the best who ever did it
Only in the club one minute guess who I slip with
A chocolate dike ghetto thing sweet
We going to pop tonight, bon appetite

[Hook]
Do you know who I am? And she says
La lalala I already know
What we can't hold hands? And she says
La lalala I already know
You got to leave by three? you with me?
La lalala I already know
So until next week? you know, ma
La lalala I already know

[Verse 2]
You know, mirror, mirror on the wall
Who's the nastiest sexiest thug of them all?
I seen her in the mall, she was wearing ?
Degarsole keyoke mose cherry cologne
She was looking very alone
'Til this big weightlifting Mr. Universe clone starts grabbing her own
But she can't stop looking im in the zone
One look at the kid she taking of her stone
Cash crazy ass crazy hair long
And baby amaze me because im in rare form
She like an ice cold bowl of post honeycomb
Followed me in the shop while I cop Nina Simone
Tap me on the shoulder I told her I her im on the phone
I played it off well nobody was on the cell
Shit, she said the tone?
She said mister so and so should I leave you alone?
I said

[Hook]

Tick-tock, tick-tock time is passing
Hello?
Turn the television off, focus here

[Verse 3]
You know, lover not a fighter
I'm the vagina liner reconstructor, bed sheet ruffler
For you freak girls undercover who loves ya?
I'm not a priest don't front for me, but step in my confessional
That's the bedroom, tell the truth I'll be impressional
Wait before you pass your collection plate
Show me you a professional so we straight?
She tried to kiss my lips, but no I don't do that
Want me to kiss my lips but not with a new jack
Few stacks spend my chips, yeah I do that
See the problem with you women is, look I got 'em
You can hear a mouse piss on cotton
You don't want to miss it then listen, stop stressing the man
We out to get as much sex as we can
And you roll wit the plan, shorty you lie
But you got to leave, 2:45

[Hook x2]



[Intro:]
I-i-i-i-t-i-it ain't hard to tell
Nas, Nas, Nas is the king of discoing

[Verse 1]
It ain't hard to tell, I excel then prevail
The mic is contacted, I attract clientele
My mic check is life or death, breathing a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like the Shining, sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket lining
Hit the Earth like a comet – invasion!
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian, half-man, half-amazing
Cause in my physical, I can express through song
Delete stress like Motrin, then extend strong
I drink Moet with Medusa, give her shotguns in hell
From the spliff that I lift and inhale, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:]
Nas, Nas, Nas is the king of discoing
Nas, Nas, Nas is the king of discoing
Nas, Nas, Nas is the king of discoing
It ain't hard to tell

[Verse 2]
The buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop, place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jewel, inhale from the L
School a fool well, you feel it like Braille, it ain't hard to tell
I kick a skill like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills I'm Ill plus Matic
I freak beats, slam it like Iron Sheik
Jam like a Tec with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magnetize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave 'em froze like her-on in your nose
Nas'll rock well, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:]

[Verse 3]
This rhythmatic explosion is what your frame of mind has chosen
I'll leave your brain stimulated, niggas is frozen
Speak with criminal slang, begin like a violin
End like Leviathan, it's deep, well let me try again
Wisdom be leaking out my grapefruit, troop
I dominate break loops, giving mics men-e-strual cycles
Street's disciple, I rock beats that's mega trifle
And groove even smoother than moves by Villanova
You're still a soldier, I'm like Sly Stone in Cobra
Packing like a Rasta in the weed spot, vocals'll squeeze Glocks
MC's eavesdrop though they need not to sneak
My poetry's deep, I never fail
Nas's raps should be locked in a cell, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:]



[AZ]
Aiyyo, wassup wassup let's keep it real son
Count this money, yaknowhatI'msayin?
[Nas]
Yea yea
[AZ]
Aiyyo, put the Grant's over there in the safe yaknowhatI'msayin?
[Nas]
Yea yea
[AZ]
Cause we spendin these Jackson's
The Washington's go to wifey, you know how that go
[Nas]
I'm sayin, that's what this is all about right?
Clothes, bankrolls, and hoes yaknowhatI'msayin?
Yo then what man, what?? *echoes*

[Verse One - AZ]
Visualizin the realism of life in actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
'Cause yeah, we were beginners in the hood as five percenters
But somethin must of got in us cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some restin' in peace and some are sittin' in San Quentin
Others such as myself are tryin' to carry on tradition
Keepin this effervescent street ghetto essence inside us
Cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though, we know somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leavin thievin', we'll be leavin with some kind of dough
So, until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers'll be somewhere stackin plenty papers
Keepin it real, packin' steel, gettin' high
Cause life's a bitch and then you die

[Chorus - AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we puff lye
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we puff lye

[Verse Two - Nas]
I woke up early on my born day, I'm twenty years of blessing
The essence of adolescence leaves my body now I'm fresh in
My physical frame is celebrated cause I made it
One quarter through life some God-ly like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I puffs from
My skull causes pain in my brain vein money maintain
Don't go against the grain simple and plain
When I was young at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbin' foreigners take they wallets they jewels and rip they green cards
Dipped to the projects flashing my quick cash
And got my first piece of ass smoking blunts with hash
Now it's all about cash in abundance, niggas I used to run with
Is rich or doing years in the hundreds
I switched my motto -- instead of saying fuck tomorrow
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Time is Illmatic keep static like wool fabric
Pack a four-matic that crack your whole cabbage

[Chorus - AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we puff lye
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die; that's why we puff lye
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die

*Olu Dara plays trumpet until fade*



ALBUM INTRO
(N. Jones)
Produced by Nas and Trackmasters
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

THE MESSAGE
(N. Jones, S. Barnes)
Produced by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Scratches by D.J. Kid Capri
Mixed by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc. (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

STREET DREAMS
(A. Lennox, D. Stewart, N. Jones, S. Barnes)
Produced by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Keyboards by Delight for 2000 Watts Music
Recorded at Soundtracks Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
This song is an interpolation of "Sweet Dreams" as written by Dave Stewart and Annie Lennox and performed by The Eurythmics. Used courtesy of RCA Records and D'N'A Limited/Music Publishing  Limited (PRS). Administered in the U.S. by BMG Songs, Inc. (ASCAP)
This song also contains a portion of "Never Gonna Stop" as performed by Linda Clifford. Used courtesy of BMG Sons, Inc. (ASCAP)
© 1982 D'N'A Limited/BMG Music Publishing Limited (PRS)/Administered in the U.S. by BMG Songs, Inc. (ASCAP)
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc. (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

I GAVE YOU POWER
(N. Jones, C. Martin)
Produced by DJ Premier for Works of Mart, Inc
Recorded and mixed at D&D Studios, NYC
Engineer: Eddie Sancho
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/DJ Premier Publishing/Gifted Pearl (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

WATCH DEM NIGGAS
(N. Jones, S. Barnes)
Produced by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Keyboards by Delight for 2000 Watts Music
Recorded at Bearsville Studios, NY
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
This song contains a portion of "Sponge" as written by Earl Klugh and Bob James, and performed by Earl Klugh. Used courtesy of Warner Special Products and Soda Fountain Music
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

TAKE IT IN BLOOD
(N. Jones, R. Walker, J.T. Epps, J. Pruitt, W. Childs, C. Horne)
Produced by Live Squad, Top General Sounds and Lo Ground
Recorded at Soundtrack Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
This song contains a sample of "Mixed Up Moods & Attitudes" as performed by The Fantastic Four
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc. (ASCAP)/Grand Imperial Music/Bridgeport Music, Inc. (BMI) All rights reserved. Used by permission

NAS IS COMING
(N. Jones, A. Young)
Produced by Dr. Dre
Recorded and Mixed at Dre's House, LA
Engineer: Kelston Rice
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP)/Ain't Nuthin' Goin On But Fu-kin' Music. All rights reserved. Used by permission

AFFIRMATIVE ACTION
(N. Jones, A. Cruz, I. Marchand, C. McKays, S. Barnes, J. Olivier)
Produced by Dave Atkinson for Trackmasters Entertainment and by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Keyboards by Dave Atkinson for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mixed by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Recorded and mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc./Life's A Bitch Music (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music, Inc. (BMI)/A. Cruz/I. Marchand/C. McKay. All rights reserved. Used by permission

THE SET UP
(N. Jones, K. Muchita)
Produced by Havoc of Mobb Deep
Recorded and Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC
Mix Engineer: Mike Fronda
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP)/Juvenile Hall Music (BMI) (Administered by BMG -Careers Music Inc.) All rights reserved. Used by permission

BLACK GIRL LOST
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, Mtume, Lucas)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions, Inc
Additional production by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Featured background vocals by JoJo Hailey of Jodeci
Recorded at Sony Music Studios, and Soundtrack Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineers: Rich Travali and Bill Esses
JoJo Hailey appears courtesy of MCA Records
This song contains a sample of " Starlight" as perforemd by Stephanie Mills. Used courtesy of Polygram Records and Famous Music, Inc
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc./Mawkeen's Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Famous Music Corp. (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

SUSPECT
(N. Jones, L. Lewis)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions, Inc
Recorded at Chung King Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
This song contains a portion of "El Gatto Triste" as written by performed by Chuck Mangione. Courtesy of Mercury Records and Upam Music
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Mawkeen's Music, Inc. (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

SHOOTOUTS
(N. Jones, S. Barnes, J. Olivier)
Produced by Poke and Tone and Kirk Goddy for Trackmasters Entertainment
Recorded at Chung King Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc. (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music, Inc. (BMI) All rights reserved. Used by permission

LIVE NIGGA RAP
(N. Jones, K. Muchita)
Produced by Havoc of Mobb Deep
Recorded at Chung King Studios, NYC
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC
Mix Engineer: Ken "Duro" Ifle
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP)/Juvenile Hall Music (BMI) (administered by BMG -Careers Music Inc.) All rights reserved. Used by permission

IF I RULED THE WORLD (IMAGINE THAT)
(N. Jones, J. Olivier, S. Barnes, K. Walker)
Produced by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Additional production by Rashad Smith for Tumbling Dice Productions, Inc
Keyboards by Edlight for 2000 Watts Music
Recorded at Hit Factory Studios, NYC & Westlake Studios, LA
Mixed at Hit Factory Studios, NYC by Poke and Tone for Trackmasters Entertainment
Mix Engineer: Rich Travali
Featured vocals by Lauryn Hill courtesy of Ruffhouse/Columbia Records
Contains portions of "Friends (Instrumental)" written by L. Parker courtesy of Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Funk Groove Music, Inc. (administered by Zomba Enterprises, Inc.) (ASCAP). Under license from Jive Records
"If I Ruled the World" written by Kurt Walker, performed by Kurtis Blow. Courtesy of Kuwa Music (ASCAP). Used by permission. All rights reserved
© 1996 Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. (Administered by Zomba Music Enterprises Inc.) (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music, Inc. (BMI)/Slamuwell Productions, Inc./Kuwa Music (ASCAP) All rights reserved. Used by permission

-
ADDITIONAL CREDITSMastered by Tom Coyne at Sterling Sound, NYC

Executive Producers: Nas, Steve Stoute and Trackmasters
A&R Direction by Faith Newman

Administrative Assistance: L'Oreal Coppedge, Joy Burrell
Sample Clearances by Nikki Johnson of Sample Thatt!!
Management: Steve Stoute for Stiggedy Entertainment
Art Direction and Design: Aimée Macauley
Photography: Danny Clinch

-
THANK YOU'S[in progress...]



Untitled Cover:




Track List:
1. Queens Get The Money
2. You Can't Stop Us Now
3. Breathe
4. Make the World Go Round
5. Hero
6. America
7. Sly Fox
8. Testify
9. N.I.G.G.E.R. (The Slave & The Master)
10. Untitled
11. Fried Chicken
12. Project Roach
13. Y'all My Niggas
14. We're Not Alone
15. Black President
16. Like Me
17. Proclamation (Nigga Hatred)



May laughter
For backstabbers
Turn to tears faster
For you I wish no snakes would slither past ya
Ya have ta
Keep your vision clear
Only a coward lives in fear
My surroundings, got only real powerful niggas here
Real friends we have a code of ethics
No question
No feminine tendencies
We not expecting
No gossip
No phony logic
No counting your homey pocket
Spare no expense
For legal defense
If your homey locked up
Who cares who was the last who looked out?
Selfishness
That's a character flaw
No holding out
Yo what happened to the honor?
You're dealing with
Sensitive prima donna drama
Teflon love
For my dudes who solid



The Lost Tapes Cover

Track List:

1. Doo Rags
2. My Way
3. You Gotta Love It
4. Nothing Lasts Forever
5. No Idea's Original
6. Blaze a 50
7. Everybody's Crazy
8. Purple
9. Drunk By Myself
10. Black Zombie
11. Poppa Was A Player
12. Fetus



[Hook]
To the kids in the p.j.'s
Ghetto children I know it ain't easy
Ya'll wanting millions
Sunshine turns to rain
Its ghetto pain
When a one time raise
Sometimes the young is slain

To the kids in the p.j.'s black babies
Brought up in this world where it's wild and crazy child of the Nile
Future lifestyle looks hazey
Dreams to drive a Mercedes
With a pile of ladies

[NAS]
Third grade singing star spangled banner
Using proper manners
Learnt to handle anger animal behavior
Later on my block rocking with my jocks on
Eating Bon Ton cheese popcorn
Humming a KISS rock song
Socks long to my knees
Summer breeze running through the leaves playing freeze tag
Can I stay out please dad
Can I hang out with my little gang out
Hearing shots rang out
Heard my moms call my name out
Come upstairs run up stairs
Take a bath shit stained underwear
Wipe yourself with paper bad
Little ass in my bed at 8:30 wash my plate
Ate dinner up late
Gazing at the wall praying basketball
Was my future for this young one
Hooping in the sun
Proud to be where I come from
Later shooting guns fantasizing
Fascinated by gold rope chains
Looking back at my hood days
But things ain't changed

[Hook]

[Millenium Thug]

In my hood niggas smoke wood
Nothing is good
Look at my eys and see what I could
Living my life and feel what I felt
The hand that I was dealt
Drama that my uncle Shabazz had
I was a little lad
Niggas shooting through my Grams window shattering glass
Had the chicken pox
On that toy horse that rocks
My moms grabbed me down to safety
Everybody in the crib was going crazy
That was in the 80's
And now im 17
Money cash dreams
Niggas be slave
I be brave spit like A.K.'s and S.K.'s
Close range niggas see brains
Millenium Thugs the name
But now it's slash cocaine
Blast niggas in vaine
Satch yo' chain
Cherrish the life
My niggas got a fetish for ice
Turn out the lights
I bust so I could spar up the night
Uniting the pipes
Queensbridge niggas is sheist
Need no price body yall dudes on spite
Who knew I would of spazzed out
Little Nayshawn owner of the crack house
Get my papes on
Tired of 'friderators all the steaks gone

[Wiz]
Now picture this shit
With six Aunts five Uncles
Thugging a double apartment out
Kids, cousins, and brothers
There I go in the pamper by the radiator
Cursing eatin first
Little nigga with a appetite that got worst
Firs day of school ten man cliq
All I'm learning is how to extort shit
'cuz class I forefit
Graduated on another level
Selling birds busting birds
Fuck with the herbs
Never we fuck up the herbs
Make 'em pay like you
Stick 'em up get down
Since ten was taught to turn 'em around
Rip they pockets out
Bust two the way they run
I ain't give a fuck that's how I was
I was young

[Hook]

[Horse]
Horse was born as a brave child
Big for my size
A bully to little guys
With chocolate miks and apple pies
The playground was mine
I stayed scarred up all the time
From shopping carts flipping
Now we race to the finish line
Hated playing cooties 'cuz that shit
Wasn't fun all the honey's say I'm it
Then they little ass run
I was sweared to put a hickey on the ones
That I caught
I was a nasty little nigga I learned to hump before I walk
Kept a sling shot on my side to shoot
Squirrles and cats
Wanted to be Captain America with the
Shield and the hat I started getting older fell
More in love with the streets
Infactuated by the ropes and the shiny
Gold teeth I was to big to break dance
Fuck spiining on my back
My role models now run numbers and sell
Crack this project child blessed
Chasing ghetto success
He needs a name for himself
To ge the same respect



[Intro: Nas (Redhead Kingpin)]
Aiyyo check it out y'all this is Nas, y'all know what I do to the business
(Yeah! Uh!!!) I bring back the business (Nas you my dude for this B)
Awww man y'all ain't ready (Straight check it)
Here they are the remix, let's go

[Verse 1: Redhead Kingpin]
It's Kingpin plus two I'm on the guestlist fam
But if this dude ain't like thirty he don't know who I am
Boo boo my name, monetary gain is better than fame
But let's face it without the spotlight you thinkin Red is Eddie Kane
If I was drugs then I used to be a key
Now I'm a couple ounce, on the come up hustle me
Yeah, and hip hop man ain't no 401K
I got my MPC I'll see you one day

[Verse 2: Rob Base]
("Hit it!") I'm still here, still flippin flows
Still rippin shows, Rob Base let me get ill yo!
It's the O.G., (who?) R to the O-B
B to the A-S-E, reppin N.Y.C
I toured the country, since I dropped my first CD (what?)
"It Takes Two", remember me?
If you don't it's the one that hit you with the WHOO YEAH
Used to make it so hot, you couldn't breathe the air

[Verse 3: The Original Spinderella]
Ain't but too much for you to sweller
Hard body, fuckin wit a Coke bottle model
Auburn, full back and observe
While I BLAP BLAP to your nerves, uh! (OH!)
I'm that Original, S-P twelve hunnid
Anything y'all will do, Spin dunn done it
The baguettes, the Prada stilet's
On the turntables, call me Gillette

[Verse 4: Father MC]
Yo! First of all big up to Nas the killer rip spitter
The Q.B. hitter called this Far Rock nigga
Yeah I'm drippin heavy from my head to my feet
From the bars that I spit to my name on her cheeks
Catch me on the mixtape, Bentley with the Queen draped
Pilot on deck G5 when I gotta skate
Let you know when I'm out on the dough that shows I'm sellin them
My LP's drugs nigga be like runnin listen

[Chorus: Nas]
(HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
{Awww man can you believe it it's like a holiday man}
{It's like Nas bringin a rap holiday man, ha ha ha, yeah}
(Where are they now?)
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)
{Here they are , two thousand and seven they right here, yeah, they right here}

[Verse 5: Monie Love]
One baby drop two to the three
Is she out for the count UK mic deceased?
You never heard again from words not the least
I checked first set net worth mic relief
Remain calm more vowels spit battles
And associate the kid when they hustlin up the cattle
I don't care to give when they ride like a saddle
Hip Hop crowd well in doubt where are you now?

[Verse 6: Mike G. from The Jungle Brothers]
It's the Jungle Brothers (housin) with that fiiiiiive thousand
Blowin up your project housin, Baby Bam Lee just bouncin
Make me wanna crack a 40 ounce and, and straight get LOUD and
Chase her blouse and, turn her out
Cause I know we rockin party it's all about
Aiyyo cool calm collected and my name is Mike G
And I'm reppin for Nas and my crew the J Beez!

[Verse 7: EST from 3XDope]
Eight bars, ten stars, fuck five mics!
I'm (The Source) and the boss, show you what it's like
To play bad mitten at the top of your position
Wit a whole lotta niggas wouldn't play but it's written
I'm the first to murk, chea! Representin Philly boy
The same kid that spit this wrote ?Baby Gram?
Nicholas one son the (Greatest Man) livin
True school be like e'ryday thanksgiving

[Verse 8: Positive K]
Pos. K! Uh, uh, still spits this summer
Came up like I hit the number, yeah y'all know me!
I'm not a stranger to y'all in the orgies
Squeeze ya dick up in ya in the ear as if ya for me
I'm more "primetime" than Maury
Plus I took ya to the "Bridge" like James Brown and Nas applaud me
My rhymes is suppository, it feels shit
Top {?} watch Nemo then they watch the stories

[Chorus: Nas]
(HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
{Yeah did you hear your favorite yet?}
{I know some of y'all buggin out, did you hear the dudes y'all used to like? the crazyness?}
(Where are they now?)
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)
{The Original Spinderella, all that, awww man, I can't believe it yo, don't go nowhere}
{I got more!!! I got more!!!}

[Verse 9: Krazy Drazy from Das EFX]
Miggity [microphone check], "Where Are they Now" Nas remix
Feel how real Hip Hop needs this
Wish B.I.G, Pun, and Pac could see this
Diggity Das-EFX piggity pioneers in this
Made his kids just reminded y'all
Throwback go back to the nineties y'all
Look it up, hook it up, get the catalog
We your favorite rappers, rappers, rappin dog

[Verse 10: Mr. Do It All from Lords Of The Underground]
Yeah I go Nas, Lord Do It All
Me and you got something in common through Marley Marl
Burst in the bricks, talked to buyin ?leather?
Golden aged flows, you sound undiscovered
I do this with a passion, spray-paint tag in
Hip Hop's alive, and I'm the breathing dragon
On the stage whylin, jumpin and laughin
It's Lords of the Underground and that's if you're askin!

[Verse 11: Chip Fu from The Fu-Schickens]
Yo! I strip the booth anytime my lips move
And it spews, my screws and they loose, I'm a move and it's proof
Now give me two minutes I'm still wicked and still kickin it
With skills built and hot {?} you can't step in my shoes YO!!
When I'm in the mood, when I'm in the booth and whenever when you
I spit phantom in a boost you better just prepare to make room!
Nas give me eight bars, eight stars Escobar
Yo we rule, and we still ain't got nothin to prove, yo!

[Verse 12: Dres from Black Sheep]
For the second I'm wreckin I got you double-checkin
For me to flash your big chain wheeler, shiny weapon, step in and holla
I gotta hit the kids that shit Hip Hop
The wack gets spit lot, the man bullshit stop
Yo they call lot and I accept the invitation
But I not try and snitch upon my ?inclamation?
On the real God, I'm good, a brother been in mediation
And my mind has been kenotic, kill the pres led a netion, Dres

[Outro: Nas]
Aiyyo Chi Ali hold ya head up in the peniles
This your man Nas, here they are
Unbelievable, Hip Hop is Dead
Let's see what happens aight!!!



Nastradamus Album Art:






Track List:

1. The Prediction
2. Life We Chose
3. Nastradamus
4. Some of Us Have Angels
5. Project Window
6. Come Get Me
7. Shoot 'Em Up
8. Last Words
9. Family
10. God Love Us
11. Quiet Niggas
12. Big Girl
13. New World
14. You Owe Me
15. The Outcome



"It's much more than a march
It will be the beginning of a movement
Millions more movement; let us begin"

"Tell us what you hear"

[Nas]
Dear people of the globe
I hope that you're in good health
By the time my voice hit you
I hope it all is well with you
My mission is to bail with you
Touch upon some real issues
Senators, Government Officials
Sit at the conference and listen
Have a Coke or mineral water and say I'm reminiscing
George L. Jackson, Malcolm X last wind when I'm rapping
Americans, Africans, Asians, Russians, and Arab men
Send your clergymen to journey with Nas from Queens, projects
I promise an unforgettable experience
Compare me with, Amenhotep get in more debt
History was stolen, get in my zone
What makes the powers that be, less gangsta then Al Capone?
The Rosetta stone was stolen like Chicago was
Think I'm a thug?, let's talk about some conquerors
Napoleon, Sun Tzu, Genghis Khan
Hitler, Edi Amin, Attila the Hun
Let's bring back to the cat that invented the gun
From the Indians all the way to the Pentagon
I'm sitting on Capitol Hill
I'm composing this rhyme, guaranteed to make all of y'all feel
The beauty that was trapped under siege
Believe in yourself you'll be free, take it from me

[Voice Samples]
"We will not surrender or we will not back down, we keep overacting"
["Throw up a fist for black power" --Nas
"Tell us what you hear"
"Why do we march? to protest Government policy
We march because it's time to fight back
We march for education"
"Throw up a fist for black power" [--Nas
"Tell us what you hear"
"Why do we march? we march to save the soul of America"

[Nas]
The rejection of what's right could mean you in denial
It either breaks you or makes you becomes hostile
I swallow many lies before tasting the truth
In the beginning there was darkness, beautiful you
How will life be without night?, no tranquility?
No way to get away and rest, no stability?
I can't see the sky without the moon and the stars
The sunlight blocking everything, the king I'm in raw
People worship the Madonna in the shrines in Spain's
I'm proud to share the same blood type in veins
The holy mother -- the loneliest color remains
Can't be tampering, diluted the chains
They try make you not want it, make you run from it
The wickedest men, want the ebony punished
It's so seductive, it's sensuous in my clutches
Hot as fire when Moses saw burning bushes
So abused and misused and mistreated
Naked men wanna get drunk and get weed it
People wild when she comes out pull out and party
Catch her body, fornicate some start beef
Chain reaction cause it's in the air
The lost tribe scattered everywhere
From the North thru West Hemisphere
Scientist and Archaeologist conceal the obvious
The dead, living and little children over time of this
Obsession, caressing, every essence of magnetism
Every organism when it come to it
All question about Resurrection and your connection with God
It's answered with the beast in your heart

[Voice Samples]
"We will not surrender or we will not back down, we keep overacting"
"Throw up a fist for black power" [--Nas
"Tell us what you hear"
"Why do we march? to protest Government policy
We march because it's time to fight back
We march for education"
"Throw up a fist for black power" [--Nas
"Tell us what you hear"
"Why do we march? we march to save the soul of America"



1. No Introduction

2. Loco-Motive feat. Large Professor

3. A Queens Story

4. Accident Murderers feat. Rick Ross

5. Daughters

6. Reach Out feat. Mary J. Blige
7. World’s An Addiction feat. Anthony Hamilton

8. Summer On Smash feat. Miguel & Swizz Beatz

9. You Wouldn’t Understand feat. Victoria Monet

10. Back When

11. The Don

12. Stay

13. Cherry Wine feat. Amy Winehouse

14. Bye Baby

Bonus Tracks for Deluxe Edition:

15. Nasty

16. The Black Bond

17. Roses

18. Where’s The Love feat. Cocaine 80s

19. Trust

20. The Don (Don Dada Remix)



[Intro: Nas] (Redhead Kingpin)
Aiyyo check it out y'all this is Nas, y'all know what I do to the business
(Yeah! Uh!!!) I bring back the business (Nas you my dude for this B)
Awww man y'all ain't ready (Straight check it)
Here they are the remix, let's go

[Verse 1: Redhead Kingpin]
It's Kingpin plus two I'm on the guestlist fam
But if this dude ain't like thirty he don't know who I am
Boo boo my name, monetary gain is better than fame
But let's face it without the spotlight you thinkin Red is Eddie Kane
If I was drugs then I used to be a key
Now I'm a couple ounce, on the come up hustle me
Yeah, and hip hop man ain't no 401K
I got my MPC I'll see you one day

[Verse 2: Rob Base]
("Hit it!") I'm still here, still flippin flows
Still rippin shows, Rob Base let me get ill yo!
It's the O.G., (who?) R to the O-B
B to the A-S-E, reppin N.Y.C
I toured the country, since I dropped my first CD (what?)
"It Takes Two", remember me?
If you don't it's the one that hit you with the WHOO YEAH
Used to make it so hot, you couldn't breathe the air

[Verse 3: The Original Spinderella]
Ain't but too much for you to sweller
Hard body, fuckin wit a Coke bottle model
Auburn, full back and observe
While I BLAP BLAP to your nerves, uh! (OH!)
I'm that Original, S-P twelve hunnid
Anything y'all will do, Spin dunn done it
The baguettes, the Prada stilet's
On the turntables, call me Gillette

[Verse 4: Father MC]
Yo! First of all big up to Nas the killer rip spitter
The Q.B. hitter called this Far Rock nigga
Yeah I'm drippin heavy from my head to my feet
From the bars that I spit to my name on her cheeks
Catch me on the mixtape, Bentley with the Queen draped
Pilot on deck G5 when I gotta skate
Let you know when I'm out on the dough that shows I'm sellin them
My LP's drugs nigga be like runnin listen

[Hook: Nas]
(HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
(*Awww man can you believe it it's like a holiday man)
(*It's like Nas bringin a rap holiday man, ha ha ha, yeah)
(Where are they now?)
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)
(*Here they are , two thousand and seven they right here, yeah, they right here)

[Verse 5: Monie Love]
One baby drop two to the three
Is she out for the count UK mic deceased?
You never heard again from words not the least
I checked first set net worth mic relief
Remain calm more vowels spit battles
And associate the kid when they hustlin up the cattle
I don't care to give when they ride like a saddle
Hip Hop crowd well in doubt where are you now?

[Verse 6: Mike G. from The Jungle Brothers]
It's the Jungle Brothers +housin+ with that fiiiiiive thousand
Blowin up your project housin, Baby Bam Lee just bouncin
Make me wanna crack a 40 ounce and, and straight get LOUD and
Chase her blouse and, turn her out
Cause I know we rockin party it's all about
Aiyyo cool calm collected and my name is Mike G
And I'm reppin for Nas and my crew the J Beez!

[Verse 7: EST from 3XDope]
Eight bars, ten stars, fuck five mics!
I'm +The Source+ and the boss, show you what it's like
To play bad mitten at the top of your position
Wit a whole lotta niggas wouldn't play but it's written
I'm the first to murk, chea! Representin Philly boy
The same kid that spit this wrote ?Baby Gram?
Nicholas one son the +Greatest Man+ livin
True school be like e'ryday thanksgiving

[Verse 8: Positive K]
Pos. K! Uh, uh, still spits this summer
Came up like I hit the number, yeah y'all know me!
I'm not a stranger to y'all in the orgies
Squeeze ya dick up in ya in the ear as if ya for me
I'm more "primetime" than Maury
Plus I took ya to the "Bridge" like James Brown and Nas applaud me
My rhymes is suppository, it feels shit
Top {?} watch Nemo then they watch the stories

[Hook: Nas]
(HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
(*Yeah did you hear your favorite yet?)
(*I know some of y'all buggin out, did you hear the dudes y'all used to like? the crazyness?)
(Where are they now?)
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)
(*The Original Spinderella, all that, awww man, I can't believe it yo, don't go nowhere)
(*I got more!!! I got more!!!)

[Verse 9: Krazy Drazy from Das EFX]
Miggity +microphone check+, "Where Are they Now" Nas remix
Feel how real Hip Hop needs this
Wish B.I.G, Pun, and Pac could see this
Diggity Das-EFX piggity pioneers in this
Made his kids just reminded y'all
Throwback go back to the nineties y'all
Look it up, hook it up, get the catalog
We your favorite rappers, rappers, rappin dog

[Verse 10: Mr. Do It All from Lords Of The Underground]
Yeah I go Nas, Lord Do It All
Me and you got something in common through Marley Marl
Burst in the bricks, talked to buyin ?leather?
Golden aged flows, you sound undiscovered
I do this with a passion, spray-paint tag in
Hip Hop's alive, and I'm the breathing dragon
On the stage whylin, jumpin and laughin
It's Lords of the Underground and that's if you're askin!

[Verse 11: Chip Fu from The Fu-Schickens]
Yo! I strip the booth anytime my lips move
And it spews, my screws and they loose, I'm a move and it's proof
Now give me two minutes I'm still wicked and still kickin it
With skills built and hot {?} you can't step in my shoes YO!!
When I'm in the mood, when I'm in the booth and whenever when you
I spit phantom in a boost you better just prepare to make room!
Nas give me eight bars, eight stars Escobar
Yo we rule, and we still ain't got nothin to prove, yo!

[Verse 12: Dres from Black Sheep]
For the second I'm wreckin I got you double-checkin
For me to flash your big chain wheeler, shiny weapon, step in and holla
I gotta hit the kids that shit Hip Hop
The wack gets spit lot, the man bullshit stop
Yo they call lot and I accept the invitation
But I not try and snitch upon my ?inclamation?
On the real God, I'm good, a brother been in mediation
And my mind has been kenotic, kill the pres led a netion, Dres

[Outro: Nas]
Aiyyo Chi Ali hold ya head up in the peniles
This your man Nas, here they are
Unbelievable , Hip Hop is Dead
Let's see what happens aight!!!



"Uh. What?! What?! Uh."

Street dreams are made of these
Thugs drop Beemers wit' three-hundred E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reachin' a ki
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees for playas wit' big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'

[Noise and a gun shot]

My man put me up for the share, one-fourth of a square
Headed for Delaware wit' one change of gear
Nothin' on my mind but the dime sack we blazed
Wit' the glaze in my eye that we find when we crave
Dollars and cents- A fugitive with two attempts
Jakes had no trace of the face, now they drew a print
Though I'm innocent 'til proven guilty
I'mma try to get filthy, purchase a club and start up for realty
For real, G, I'mma fullfill my dream
If I conceal my scheme, then precisely I'll build my C.R.E.A.M
The first trip without the clique
Sent the bitch wit' the quarter brick, this is it
Fresh face, NY plates, got a crooked eye for the Jakes
I want it all, ArmorAll Benz and endless papes
F' God sake, what a nigga got to do to make a half million
Without the FBI catchin' feelin's

Street dreams are made of these
Thugs drop Beemers wit' three-hundred E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reachin' a ki
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees for playas wit' big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'

From fat cat to papi, niggas see the cat
Twenty-five to flat, push a thousand feet back
Holdin' gats wasn't making me fat, snitches on my back
Livin wit' moms, gettin it on, flushin' crack
Down the toilet- Two sips from bein' alcoholic
Nine-hundred-ninety-nine thou from bein' rich but now I'm all for it
My man saw it like Dionne Warwick
A wiser team for a wiser dream, we could all score it
The cartel, Argentina coke with the nina
Up in the hotel smokin' on sessamina
Trina got the fishscale between her
The way the bitch shook her ass, yo, the dogs never seen her
She got me back livin' sweeter, fresh Caesar
Guess, David Robinson's, Walle' moccasins
Bitches blow me while hoppin' in the drop-top B-M

"Word is bond, son, I had that bitch down on my shit like this."
("Uh. What? What? Word?")

Street dreams are made of these
Thugs drop Beemers wit' three-hundred E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reachin' a ki
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees for playas wit' big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'

Ill designer fleece, studded marquise
A letta L on my car keys- Thuggin' hard on Cavarse
'Posters be Franchesco and all these bets
Mobile phones in the armrest, ladies be the bombest
I creep tinted, parked the whip and grabbed the rented
Seems like I'm changin' my location every minute
Like a plague is on my head, son- I vision red rum
Warrent squads knockin' at the same time the Feds come
Pandemonium got me puffin' Cambodian
Grand openin's of barber shops and stock
My jew-el rock, tokin' pronto- Livin' like a pablo
Papi like a poncho until the state patrollers pulled us over
Found the guns and the good
Had a nigga like 'Nas had to run through the woods'
Sneakin' out the next mornin'- Looked up to God
Guess in all this was a fuckin' warnin'
Took my diamonds in for the pawnin'
Now I'm back on the climbin'
Movin' consigned through rain, sleet, whatever climate
So many ups and downs shiftin', I was twisted minded
'Mazed on top, all the hoes and pussy had me blinded
Big lip bitches, suckin' dick rediculous
GS'es and vest-es, larger rays lookin' sentious
Back on the block buggin', how the fuck I been through this?
Nearly caused my life but now I can't show a cent from it

Street dreams are made of these
Thugs drop Beemers wit' three-hundred E's
A drug dealer's destiny is reachin' a ki
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'
Street dreams are made of these
Shorties on they knees for playas wit' big cheese
Who am I to disagree?
Everybody's lookin' for somethin'

[Noise and a gun shot]



Yo this Nas niggas whuttup?
QB Album coming, niggas ill Will, Bravehearts
My nigga DJ Clue - put this shit on these niggas
Desert Storm baby 2000!

A Drug dealers dream - flip his last Ki out the game
Cause entertainment money now is off the chain
I put blunts in niggas caskets, lost in the game
I learned about pain, bodies burnt in drug game
But I'm neva gon' die, I neva heard of death
Energy could neva be destroyed
Only the flesh, when you niggas try to murder me
With bullets to my head
This is why you can't kill me niggas
I'm already dead, BRING IT!
I'm busting, bodies fall in the cemetery
Black blood raining on the street
All you niggas, buried y'all!
Niggas just came home, fresh out the state greens
Five time felon, thinking he jelling in Queens
It's pitiful - what a bid could do, especially federal
Y'all young thugs wilding, see prison
Got a bed for you waiting, I clapped that Satan
But thought I was dreaming
I woke up masturbating in the bed with demons
I cried with every bit of strength of my small body
This is the life I chose, under God I'm tiny
Hard to find me, I popped up, lock shot-up
You can't B.I., see I'm eternal, not luck
You get shot-up, boxed-up next for the grave
Your flow is one dimensional, your level is 2nd grade
You're on top - WHAT?
Copy and fuck, I said it first, you repeated
Your false crown covered in dirt - defeated
Y'all niggas all hail, the King is dead
He running like a bitch with his tail between his legs
'Stillmatic', still eye 4 an eye, wanna be God
You're just the next rapper to die, fucking with Nas



Street's Disciple Cover:



Track List:

Intro
A Message To The Feds, Sincerely, We The People
Nazareth Savage
American Way (feat. Kelis)
These Are Our Heroes
Disciple
Sekou Story (feat. Scarlett)
Live Now (feat. Scarlett)
Rest of My Life
Just a Moment (feat. Quan)
Reason (feat. Emily)
You Know My Style
Suicide Bounce (feat. Busta Rhymes)
Street's Disciple (feat. Olu Dara)
U.B.R (Unauthorized Biography of Rakim)
Virgo (feat. Ludacris & Doug E. Fresh)
Remember the Times (Intro)
Remember the Times
The Makings of a Perfect Bitch
Getting Married
No One Else In The Room (feat. Maxwell)
Bridging The Gap (feat. Olu Dara)
War (feat. Keon Bryce)
Me & You (Dedicated To Destiny)
Thief's Theme



[Intro]
"This has once again proof that no routine police stop is actually routine. We saw that last week of course, in Brooklyn with the tragedy over there and then again last night here in Tottawa, another police shooting"

Here's what they think about you

"I hate little motherfuckers like you. Little niggers like shit! Think your tough, huh? Blow your head off, your little Smith and Wesson couldn't do shit. How you feel now?"

[Hook- David Banner]
Cops keep firing in my environment
Middle finger to the law nigga gripping my balls
Cops keep firing in my environment
Middle finger to the law nigga gripping my balls
Cops keep firing in my environment
Middle finger to the law nigga gripping my balls
I like to see them fall, guilty for doing wrong
Middle finger to the law nigga gripping my balls

[Verse 1 - Nas]
Now all you hypocrites, witness the injustice
Conversations taped illegally, then they cuff us
U.S. attorneys, public defenders send us off to hard prison time
Whether you innocent or did the crime
Say you come from who this cops pursue you hard
Run your plates, put guns in your face
Put you in the car, for nothing
Now your strugglin', tied up, standing in line-ups
Call your lawyer, they charged you with murder
Why? Cuz these liars said you shot another man on his driveway
Guilty, just for being black on a Friday
Polygraph test you failing, because you're nervous
Charged for murder you didn't commit, then they serve ya
Fifteen years, maximum security
Slashing, stab wounds, broken bone injuries
You were placed there intentionally
Either you bang or you miss me, listen to me

[Hook]

Im grippin' the Nina, visions of 9/11
Visions of three sixes, no sevens
This is Bushonomics, George is a modern day Ronald Reagan
I pray to god in the midst of Pagans
Niggers I'm just saying
When do we stop playing?
When do we stop pimping and start spraying?
50 shots for every cop that popped Sean Bell his body lay'in
But they acquit cuz they know
That our generation won't do shit! Nothing, nada
But every rapper is a shotta or a Don Dada
Or a killer, but you ain't killing nothing
And it's peace unless it's another nigga
Tryna raise boys to Superman
And while I'm at it fuck Arthur J. Cooperman
It's never justice for blacks but they send just us to Iraq
With poor whites and Latinos
I pray to God that you hear this single
This is Banner's middle finger y'all

[Hook]

[Outro]
You still want to be nigga too?
(*Gunshot sound)



[Verse 1: AZ]
Visualizing the realism of life in actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
Cause yeah, we were beginners in the hood as 5 percenters
But somethin' musta got in us cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some rest in peace and some are sittin' in San Quentin
Others such as myself are trying to carry on tradition
Keeping this Schweppervescent street ghetto essence inside us
Cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though, we know somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leaving thievin'
We'll be leavin' with some kind of dough, so
Until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers, will be somewhere stackin' plenty papers
Keeping it real, packing steel, getting high
Cause life's a bitch and then you die

[Hook: AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
Cause you never know when you're gonna go

[Bridge 1: Nas]
Times is Illmatic
Times is Illmatic
Times is Illmatic
(Destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it)

[Bridge 2: ?]
You gotta get the ground beneath your feet partner
Get the wind behind your back
Ride the blades of Glory if you got to
Otherwise you ain't shit
You might as well be (?) your damn self

[Verse 2: Nas]
I woke up early on my born day; I'm 20, it's a blessing
The essence of adolescence leaves my body, now I'm fresh and
My physical frame is celebrated cause I made it
One quarter through life some Godly-like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I pus from
My skull cause it's pain in my brain vein, money maintain
Don't go against the grain, simple and plain
When I was young, at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbin foreigners, take their wallets, their jewels, and rip their green cards
Dipped to the projects flashing my quick cash and
Got my first piece of ass smokin blunts with hash
Now I think about cash in abundance
Niggas I used to run with is rich or doing years in the hundreds
I switched my motto; instead of saying "fuck tomorrow"
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Times is Illmatic, keep static like wool fabric
I Pack a 4-matic to crack your whole cabbage

[Hook: AZ]

[Bridge 1: Nas]

[Outro: Arsenal]
Yea, you know the flavor, Nas and AZ on the remix joint
This is another explosion from the Arsenal
Yes, man



1. "Stillmatic (The Intro)"
(N. Jones, R. Scott, J. Neal, J. Bynoe, N. Walden, B. Hull)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Big Trock Publishing (BMI)/WB Music Corp. (ASCAP)/Cotillion Music, Inc. (BMI)
Produced by Hangmen 3 Productions
Recorded and mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineer: Paul Gregory
Contains excerpts from the Stacey Lattisaw recording "Let Me Be Your Angel" written by Narada Walden and Benny Hull published by WB Music Corp. (ASCAP)/Cotillion Music, Inc. (BMI). Produced under license from Atlantic Recording Corp. by arrangement with Warner Special Products

2. "Ether"
(N. Jones, R. Turner)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Copyright Control
Produced by Ron Browz for Family Tree Entertainment
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Lobo Recording, Long Island, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineers: Jake Ninan and Paul Gregory

3. "Got Urself a..."
(N. Jones, Megahertz, C. Burnett, S. Edwards, P. Marsh, R. Spragg, J. Black)
Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./Dors-D Music Publishing (ASCAP)/Chrysalis Music Limited (PRS)/Arc Music Corporation (BMI)
Produced by Megahertz Music Group
Recorded and mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineer: Paul Gregory
Contains elements from "Woke Up This Morning" performed by Alabama 3. Written by Burnett, Edwards, Marsh, Spragg, Black, published by Chrysalis Music Limited (PRS) and Arc Music Corp (BMI). Under license from Universal Music Enterprises, a division of UMG Recordings, Inc. and One Little Indian Records

4. "Smokin'"
(N. Jones, L. Gates)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./Shelly's House (ASCAP)
Produced by Nas for Ill Will Music and Precision for Precision Crafted/Davert Entertainment
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Lobo Recording, Long Island, NY
Mixed by Jason Goldstein at Sony Studios, NYC
Assistant Engineers: Jake Ninan and Pablo Arraya

5. "You're da Man"
(N. Jones, P. Mitchell)
Zomba Enterprises Inc./Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./EMI April Music, Inc./obo itself and Large Professor Music Ltd. (ASCAP)
Produced by Large Professor for Paul Sea Productions, Inc
Recorded by Devin Crouse at The Hit Factory Studios, NYC and Bryan Golder at Sony Studio, Santa Monica, CA
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineers: Jonathan Merritt and Paul Gregory

6. "Rewind"
(N. Jones, P. Mitchell, R. Rubin, L. Armstrong)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./EMI April Music o/b/o itself and Large Professor Music Ltd./Sony ATV Tunes/Universal MCA Music Publishing a div. of Universal Studios Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Large Professor for Paul Sea Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Lobo Recording, Long Island, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineers: Jake Ninan and Paul Gregory
Contains excerpts from "It's Yours" written by Rick Rubin published by Sony/ATV Tunes, performed by T La Rock courtesy of Warlock REcords
Also contains excerpts from the J Geils Band recording "I'm Not Rough" written by Lillian Armstrong published by Universal MCA Music Publishing, a division of Universal Studios, Inc. (ASCAP). Produced under license from Atlantic REcording Corp. by arrangement with Warner Special Products

7. "One Mic"
(N. Jones, C. Thompson)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Ninth Street Tunnel Music/Sony ATV Songs
Produced by Nas for Ill Will Music and Chucky Thompson for Chucklife Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Studios, NYC
Assistant engineers: Paul Gregory and Pablo Arraya

8. "2nd Childhood"
(N. Jones, C. Martin, P. Bryson)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./Gifted Pearl Music/EMI April Music/WB Music Corp (ASCAP)
Produced by DJ Premier for Works of Mart, Inc
Recorded by Dexter Thiubou at D&D Studios, NYC
Mixed by DJ Premier for Works of Mart, Inc. and Eddie Sancho at D&D Studios, NYC
Assistant Engineer: Dexter Thiubou
Contains excerpts from the composition "Born To Love" written and performed by Peabo Bryson, published by WB Music Corp. (ASCAP) used by permission. Used under license from Capitol Records, a division of Capitol Records, Inc

9. "Destroy & Rebuild"
(N. Jones, P. Hendricks, M. Risko, L. Parker, S. La Rock)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Baby Paul Muzik (BMI) and Mike Wrecka Music admin. by The Royalty Network, Inc./BDP Music/Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Baby Paul for P.G. Sole Productions, Inc. and Mike Risko for Heat Holdas Productions
Recorded by Osie Bowe at Compass Point Studios, Nassau, Bahamas and Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineers: Alex Dixon and Paul Gregory
All instruments played by Mike Risko and Baby Paul
Contains interpolations from the composition "The Bridge Is Over" written by Lawrence Parker and Scott La Rock published by BDP Music/Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)

10. "The Flyest" feat. AZ
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, A. Cruz, S. Thomas)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./Wakeen's Music (ASCAP)/Lotus Petals (BMI)/AZ (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. and Staff for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by James Porte at Right Track Recording, NYC
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Assistant engineer: Paul Gregory
AZ appears courtesy of Motown Records

*11. "Braveheart Party" feat. Mary J. Blige & Bravehearts
Written by Nasir Jones & Jean-Claude Olivier
Produced by Swizz Beatz

12. "Rule" feat. Amerie
(N. Jones, S. J. Barnes, J. C. Olivier, A. M. M. Rodgers)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Ekop Publishing/Sony/ATV Songs LLC (BMI)/Enot Publishing/Sony/ATV Tunes LLC/Mi Suk Publishing (ASCAP)
Produced by Track Masters Entertainment
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Lobo Studios, Long Island, NY and Patchwerk Studios, Atlanta, GA
Mixed by Jason Goldstein at Sony Studios, NYC
Assistant engineers: Jake Ninan, Steve Fisher, Ismel Ramos and Pablo Arraya
Amerie appears courtesy of Rise Records/Columbia Records
Contains interpolations from the composition "Everybody Wants to Rule the World" written by Chris Hughes, Roland Orzabal, Ian Stanley and published by EMI Virgin Songs (BMI). Used by permission

13. "My Country"
(N. Jones, M. Sandlofer)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc. (ASCAP)/Sound Lofer Music (BMI)
Produced by Lofey for Soundlofer Music Inc./Desert Storm/Skane Management
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recording, NYC
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Studios, NYC
Assistant engineers: Paul Gregory and Pablo Arraya
All instruments played by Lofey

14. "What Goes Around"
(N. Jones, S. Gibbs)
Ill Will Music, Inc. admin. by Zomba Enterprises Inc./EMI April Music, Inc. o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Salaam "The Chameleon" Remi for Dashiki Productions, Inc
Recorded by Gary "Mon" Noble for A Path to Your Soul, Inc. at Playpen Recording Studios, NYC
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Studios, NYC
Assistant engineers: Alex Ndione and Pablo Arraya
Guitar, bass, drums, Rhodes, organ and percussion by Salaam Remi
Background vocals by Keon Bryce

Bonus track: 15. "Every Ghetto" feat. Blitz
Written by Nasir Jones & Leshan Lewis
Produced by L.E.S

-

Thanks:
Thank God, the spirits and guardian angels, ancestors, fallen soldiers, grandparents, life and death. To every ghetto, from Queensbridge, to Kingston, to Africa. Thanks to all the real rap niggas and lovers of God's music from the streets. To Destiny (my life) and Mom (my strength). Shout outs to everyone... keep smilin', life is pain... get over it. Be happy, fuck negativity. We kings and queens of the universe, makers and molders, gods and goddesses. Don't take anybody shit! Get smart, get started, get money and get high. The time is now! Peace blessing and miracles. Be a leader. Make love and history. Learn from foul, lost people! You are everything

To Ill Will 4 watchin' my back and guidin' me. Can't wait to see you dawg. Don't worry, I got u!

-

Executive producer: Destiny Jones
Album mastered by Chris Gehringer at Sterling Sound Studios, NYC
A&R direction: Lenny "Linen" Nicholson
A&R manager: Max Gold
Product manager: David Belgrave

Art direction and design: Chris Felmann
Stillmatic tag: Julian Alexander
Imaging: Will Kennedy
Photography: Sacha Waldman
Styling: Tomeka Foster

-

℗ 2001 Columbia Records, a division of Sony Music Entertainment

-

[Note: Credits for tracks 11 & 15 adapted from Wikpedia (source)]

*This track was included on the first pressings of the album, but it was removed from later versions



"Ladies and gentleman
In this corner
The champion of champions
From Catskill, New York
Iron Mike Tyson"

And in the other corner
The lyrical champion
Hailing from Queensbridge, New York
Is the one and only
Nas

And now, ladies and gentlemen and boxing fans joining us around the world.  IT'S SHOWTIME!

Verse 1:
Spirit of the streets
Walks in the ring
From Brownsville to spar fit
To boxing king
Man or machine, an animal
Physical strength and intelligence
But that type of intellect
Y'all respect
To connect those punches
Still as a kid he stole lunches
To mak'in millions and the hundreds
Chaotic conscience
The rage, the stage, the grander
Had to endorse slander
Took it like a man
Cause the mighty stand alone
In the bigger ring hole
The penitentiary
Barbed wire and stone was amp up
They locked a champ up
Even my brains in handcuff
The robin hood, seasonal santa
And y'all give him nothin to begin with
Dilapidated buildings
The drug epidemics
Historical stories
Pain, love and glory
Mike Tyson
Never see another like him

? voice over: Speed
Nas: strength
? : skill
Nas: Power
? : Accuracy
Nas: Legacy
? : Victorious
Nas: Legendary

Verse 2:
True legend
His hands was two weapons
Understand this minds a true blessing
Designer jewels and diamond
A modern day Jack Johnson
Flying private jets and fully protect'in
Automized with ladies Godiva complexions
Lots of sex'in
Hung with a lot of stars
Learned a lot of lessons
Between dead homies and best friends
And getting domed out in stretch Benz
Educated from the hood and pestilence
The dead presidents don't see your pockets
You just gett'in
You got a full court press for them
Benjamins, I've seen money be the death of men

It's a warriors world
Only the strong survive
Who's next to try
Who's next to be the next
T-Y-S-O-N
He gave us hope
May the best man win

Outro chorus:
Iron Mike is in the house
Nas: Strength
Iron Mike is in the house
Nas: Power
Iron Mike is in the house
Nas: Legacy
Iron Mike is in the house
Nas: Legendary
(repeat)

DJ Green Lantern:
This is an invasion man
Best of both offices, what's good
Team Invasion, let's go man, let's get money!



Italiano motto
Train like Cus D'Amato
Guard your plant
Recline low black milano
Blessed God feelin kosher
One in the top of the toaster
???
My nine is stuck in a holster
Dump quick
Chasing my dick
Made a bum bitch rich
Stalefish
Heard she naked in jail flicks
Mamacita
Black widow turned to be a back seater
Satin pillows a pimpstress in willow
Cookin my blow and heads low
Eye swellin
The son of the grain
I gotta split my wife's melon
So I can see the seven seeds of my circumference
Beaver lunged it
Polishin pistols at the gunsmith
Clever
My mama told me take cheddar
Buy slugs or drugs whatever calculate better
When cakes measured
Lock the front door secure
See the gleaming white crystal when its pure

Fuck the snake hoes and jealous ass niggas
That smash your Benz windows
Detecting fake niggas signals
Yo live niggas get it too
Scarin rappers like the fed time Gotti was acquitted to
Bloodshot red eyes, high
Yellow envelopes of lye
Opening cigars let tobacco fly
Kicks matchin my shit my gun on
Thinkin of names for my mans unborn
Spill the Puerto Rican rum on imaginary graves
Put my hat on my waves
Latter Day Saints scream religious praise
Heat grazed the baby yo
Foul shit made a welfare mom crazy
More bodies drop by the ratio
Paces flow
Grisly thoughts for makin dough
Haitian bitch cast a spell on my life for cash flow
So now its on never wasted a slug
Time is money
When it comes to mine
Take it in blood



[Pop] (Intro)
Uhh, still out in these motherfuckin projects
Still a nigga ain't never gonna get the fuck up outta here
Niggas just don't understand the story

Chorus: [Pop]
Niggas die for the street glory
Go to trial get tried for each story
And each nigga got a story
And QB the streets call me
So if you see me slippin' reach for me
I'm goin' after street glory
Go to trial get tried for each story
And each nigga got a story
And QB the streets call me
So if you see me slippin' reach for me
I'm goin' after street glory

[NAS]
Yo
Every time I turn around niggas shot, niggas stabbed
When tonight's pregnant girls struggling to get a cab
Fiends lurkin', D's searchin', pat pockets
Kids put to bed duck they heads from gats poppin'
Queensbridge slingers hoppin' out Benzes
Don status, dope fiends got syringes
Poppin' out their arm scratching
I remember park jams
Gazelles, perfect wave, shell Adidas
Smellin' reefer way before purple haze
Private stock peer nigga with ill walks like Mark Clare
Hats tilted wild niggas lickin' shots in the air
Me and Pop was there, through the years our names have switched
Ain't nothin' changed but the names Nastradamus and Blitz
What project is this? QB, Vernon and 10th
12th street murderous pimps, hot as hell's heat
What could you tell me? Nigga's seen it all in this game
When it's all said and done just remember my name

[Pop]
I'm familiar with the dead grass drama black gates and crime
Embryo of the ghetto born face and time
Niggas shatter they dreams while I'm chasing mine
Ghetto fame got a fellow's name draped and shined
How do I describe an atmosphere where streets are polluted?
Where corruptors and new police being recruited
Somehow I make it through the day stayin' secluded
While the blues aim leavin' another slain, executed
Many thought's cause I see the past grimmly
That could've been me, explodes out on 41st and 10th street
Through all the pap grease and street chases
Sudden raids and confrontations leadin' the misdeamenor weed cases
I blew smoke through hallway window
Watched the buddah clouds linger
Pluckin the blunt brokes from my fingers
My eyes flip different shades
Similar to people you meet everyday who be displayin' wicked ways
Seein' nothing but another day
In this six story rat trap
Them gats clap another nigga's blazed
Events in my hood rotate
Like the barrel on the 38 snob in the world of fake love
Before I blaze son, I'm kissing the slugs
Coming at you kisses and hugs
When death calls who's really a thug
The street glory got me deeply in love
Can't shake it, can't take it, can't make it
Got me needin' this drug

(Chorus)



[Nas]
Don't hurt nuttin..

[Hook]
A teenage thug (you can't tell them shit)
A teenage thug (nigga just chasin his dick)
A teenage thug (he want the world to recognize)
A teenage thug (he's a man now, fuck his size)
A teenage thug (can't stop him, they on the rise)
A teenage thug (the court of law despise)
A teenage thug (wanna fuck and puff lie)
A teenage thug

[Nas]
Dreams of bein a doctor will deteriorate
Takin over the underworld was a clearer fate
Luxury cars, a hundred girls at my face
Laced the name brand, had my game plan mapped out
Lost respect for those cracked out
Most of my elders were failures
To the poison that killed Len Bias from bein Celtic
The later I would hang, the greater my slang
It took my english, replaced it with game
Only cared about, sneakers and two-two bullets
Influenced by the hood, wasn't scared to pull it
Dared to do what I would
First blunt they passed me tasted nasty
Then overwhelmed in the spell the blunt had me
Eyes red, pants saggin
My first dime cut me off for braggin
That we was home alone tappin
Experimentin liquors, doin mixes, feelin sicker
Finish the Henn, throw the bottle, hope it hit ya

[Nas]
Blacked out, I can't see shit sober, not the least bit
Hold your head little man, y'all can't tell me shit
Try to knock the pants off shorty, my hair just cut
My Timbs just bought, the chain I sport I floss
Thugs walkin through the block party, hands on my drawers
Poppin cham' corks, posin like the man of New York
Talk to this hottie with my niggas who quick to blast you
If you old cats, to these niggas, they harass you

[Millenium Thug]
Hey yo cuz, growin up, I almost shattered my plans
Some might say, I'm young at heart, but I'm a grown-ass man
Givin food to my fam, damn, remember the first time
A street thug showed me how to pitch dimes
Only twelve in this hell where kids die
I want bricks off the scale and just slide, and let my shit fly
My Range shift by, I peel the road up
With my shirt up, sweatin, with the ice restin on my chest
Wild as a teenage thug

[Hook]

[Millenium Thug]
Livin and lovin this life, cap peel pump niggas
And since these thugs is trife, give 'em dap for that
Yo where your mack at? I got mine
Twist weed pop wine shift finds, at the end of the night, it's all fine
Livin and lovin, cash stack cousin
Yo' own fam blitz so quick, put clips through whips
Six type shit let you hold it, ice roll with
Twenty below with gat golden, my hand look swollen
Under my glove shit rocky
Unless somebody in my life try to stop me, get popped papi
A breddern, straight to the head that my medicine
No fam of mine do time, we crime settlin
Deliverancy unbelivable, Na'shon tracks smash people
I chill up in the regal Eagle
And plus it clap happy all of them hoes that's born happy
I rip nappy, nature's to cut the roof off of Caddies
You see me?

[Hook w/ variations]

[Nas]
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin
Don't-don't-don't, don't, don't hurt nuttin
Don't hurt nuttin.. {*fades out*}



[Intro: Marsha Amborious (Nas)]
Oooh oooh, oooooooooooooooohhhhhhhh! The struggles of life! (Life!)
Oooh, oooh, oooh, da da da da da da! (Everything I ever wanted)
Oh, oh (Yeah Yeah!) Do do do do do do! (Yeah! My life, so real)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Before I use to dream I could rule the world
Now it's thorough I survived the perils in my fly apparel
Seven forty five appeal, no candy paint no chrome wheels
I Close deals tried to see my face on my own bills
The president here, he's honest and fair
Prayed for the days, when the kins of slaves is honered and shared
January 20th I was there
I'm aware the part I played to get young voters to care
Recession is a blessin in disguise
For a new economy to rise somethin old has to die
I'm still sippin' Rose' PJ's it be's like that
I brung the eighty seven Fila's back
Save collect, B.I.G.'S dream came correct
Tryin' to push seven hundreds, they made them yes
I used to think United College Fund was for bums (Nah)
The ghetto advocate for education look what I become

[Hook: Marsha Ambrosious {Nas}]
Before I use to dream I ruled the world
{I use to have to imagine, now I can actually have it}
So here I am, to rule the world, world
But now you used to dream you ruled the world
(Now, you, use, to, dream, you, ruled, the, world!)
{I use to dream} (Ruled the world)
So here we are, are, are, are (Yeah! Here we are!)

[Verse 2: Nas]
I don't say I'm maintainin', that's a lame's language (word)
Poor English, from a wise man I learned patience
Me not distinguished, is like a fiendless Queensbridge
I don't say I'm grindin', cause everything I do is redefining
Cause when you know the streets to the science
Apply it very moderate, 'til your business'll watch you profit
Rap game, NBA to NFL, the kids'll yell, "Will I win? "
The fella ends up in the cell - nonsense
Cause they can grow to be part of the Congress
Be responsive, to these inner-city problems
Behind a tent with a chauffeur, I rep for the culture
Rep for the thugs and STILL see eye to eye with Oprah
I was a dreamer a wisher would hope for
A better life for these kids while I sip on a Mosa
I plan yo, you should watch the black and white's hand, yo
Who's the best? Next to me, they couldn't light a candle
Yep!

[Hook: Marsha Ambrosious {Nas}]
Before I use to dream I ruled the world
{I use to have to imagine, now I can actually have it}
So here I am, to rule the world, world
But now you used to dream you ruled the world
(Now, you, use, to, dream, you, ruled, the, world!)
{I use to dream} (I Ruled the world)
So here we are, are, are, are (Arrrrreeeeeeee!)

[Bridge: Marsha Ambrosious (Nas)]
You can be who you wanna, say what you wanna (Marsha!)
Tryna make it better, our sons and our daughters (Yeah!)
Use your mind - make a change
Yes, we can - see a brighter day
Gon' be struggle, gon' be pain
But no excuses to be made
This is the time that we've been waiting foooooooooor!

[Verse 3: Nas]
I done seen it all, I got it on with the weak and strong
There's no relief, it's like the beef keeps keepin on
I can't count the amount I drew heaters on
Cause we was warrin in the Ps', it was Vietnam
Now I got you in arenas, watchin me perform
The songs rappin 'bout them same beefs and the street I'm from
Thankful, for the art form I'm eatin from
I never see no losses, I only see we won - yeah

[Hook: Marsha Ambrosious {Nas}]
Before I use to dream I ruled the world
{I use to have to imagine, now I can actually have it}
So here I am, to rule the world, world
But now you used to dream you ruled the world
(Now, you, use, to, dream, you, ruled, the, world!)
{I use to dream} (I Ruled the world)
So here we are, are, are, are (Here we are this day!)
Before I use to dream I ruled the world
{I use to have to imagine, now I can actually have it}
So here I am, to rule the world, world
But now you used to dream you ruled the world
(Now, you, use, to, dream, you, ruled, the, world!)
{I use to dream} (Oh we come so far!)
So here we are, are, are, are (Here we are this day!)



This is what it sounds like
When a thugs dies (pow, pow ,pow) (we won’t cry)
This is what it sounds like
When a thug dies (pow ,pow, pow ) (tears from your mama's eyes)

When I’m with my niggas this is how it sounds
It ain't nothin nigga give my niggas pounds
This is what it sounds like when I’m with my hoes
Hard dicks bitch you fuckin with a pro
This is what I’m thinkin when u bitch niggas plott'en
I’m gonna kill this nigga right now I got him
This is what he say right before the lead hit him (yo please don’t shoot)
Man fuck'em, did him
When the cops come this is what a rat say
He shot em 4 times and he ran that way
Now a nigga on the run, this what real nigga do
You can stay at my crib I heard what happened, come thru
A bitch or a nigga can help a nigga hide
Open up the front door and welcome u inside
Coward nigga want war, well then we gonna ride
Wit the pump and the 44 and catch a homicide

This is what it sounds like when a thugs die (pow pow pow) (your moms cry)
This is what it sounds like when a thug die (pow pow pow ) (mamas cry)
This is what it sounds like when a thugs die (pow pow pow) (tears from your mama's eyes)

At his funeral this is what u heard (oh my god oh my god)
Ya that was that nigga's bird
And that ***** is foul
Do u know that ho's style
When u was locked up she had another *****s child
The other *****s me, I knew that was his wife
What the fuck am I gonna do, bitch is begging for the pipe
And I was coming through on the reggy every night
But then this nigga came home I said it wasn't right
9 months later shit got crazy
***** flipped out when she said it ain't his baby
Slapped her up, gun butt her with the nine
Put it to her head til she told him it was mine
(you fucking bastard I'm gonna bury em 6 feet deep)
Heard he looking for me daily, carrying his heat
Now he’s under the ground may he rest in peace
Cuz he was married to a ho and I was married to the street

This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (moms cry)
This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (moms cry)
This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (tears from youe eye)
This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (tears from your moms eyes)

Its been 2 years ain’t nobody catched me
Hennesy and pepsi, my Tech will protect me
Out of state made alot of cake, they respect me
Got a new identity, hoes want to sex me
Havin memories of my seed kind of stress me
Cuz my son is 2 and his appearance reflects me
Gotta new Lex GS chrome wheels nigga
Drove all the way home, man shit is real nigga
Got back to the hood it was raining and pouring
Knocking on this bitche's door like 3 in the morning
She knew I was comin, I saw a cop 2 of em running
Let off 4 shots then I caught 2 in the stomach
She set me up, the rain and the led wet me up
(pow pow pow) that’s the sound of a thug dead cuz

This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (moms cry)
This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (moms cry)
This is what it sounds like when thugs die, pow pow pow (tears from your moms eyes)



[Produced by Godfather Don & V.I.C.]

[Verse 1]
What up kid? I know shit is rough doing your bid
When the cops came you should have slid to my crib
Fuck it, black, no time for looking back it's done
Plus congratulations, you know you got a son
I heard he looks like ya, why don't your lady write ya?
Told her she should visit, that's when she got hyper
Flipping, talking 'bout he acts too rough
He didn't listen he be riffing while I'm telling him stuff
I was like yeah, shorty don't care, she a snake too
Fucking with them niggas from that fake crew that hate you
But yo, guess who got shot in the dome-piece?
Jerome's niece, on her way home from Jones Beach
It's bugged, plus little Rob is selling drugs on the dime
Hanging out with young thugs that all carry nines
And night time is more trife than ever
What up with Cormega, did you see him, are y'all together?
If so then hold the fort down, represent to the fullest
Say what's up to Herb, Ice and Bullet
I left a half a hundred in your commissary
You was my nigga when push came to shove, one what? (One love)

[Hook: Sadat X]
One L
To the o-v-e
Representing kids on lockdown from stress on the street
One L
To the o-v-e
It's all real watch the feds son, duck that shield
One L
To the o-v-e
Representing kids on lockdown from stress on the street
One L
To the o-v-e
It's all real I got the hustle son I can't be the meal

[Verse 2]
Dear Born, you'll be out soon, stay strong
Out in New York the same shit is going on
The crackheads stalking, loudmouths is talking
Hold, check out the story yesterday when I was walking
That nigga you shot last year tried to appear
Like he hurting something, word to mother, I heard him fronting
And he be pumping on your block, your man gave him your Glock
And now they run together, what up son, whatever
Since I'm on the streets I'mma put it to a cease
But I heard you blew a nigga with a ox for the phone piece
Wilding on the Island, but now in Elmira
Better chill cause them niggas will put that ass on fire
Last time you wrote you said they tried you in the showers
But maintain when you come home the corner's ours
On the reals, all these crab niggas know the deal
When we start the revolution all they probably do is squeal
But chill, see you on the next V-I
I gave your ma duke's loot for kicks, plus sent you flicks
Your brother's buckwilding in 4-Main, he wrote me
He might beat his case, 'til he come home he'll play it low key
So stay civilized, time flies
Though incarcerated your mind dies, I hate it when your moms cries
It kinda makes me want to murder, for reala
I even got a mask and gloves to bust slugs but one love

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
Sometimes I sit back with a Buddha sack
Mind's in another world thinking how can we exist through the facts
Written in school text books, bibles, et cetera
Fuck a school lecture, the lies get me vexed-er
So I be ghost from my projects, I take my pen and pad
For the weekend hittin L's while I'm sleeping
A two day stay, you may say I need the time alone
To relax my dome, no phone, left the nine at home
You see the streets had me stressed something terrible
Fucking with the corners have a nigga up in Bellevue
Or HDM, hit with numbers from 8 to 10
A future in a maximum state pen is grim
So I comes back home, nobody's out but Shorty Doo-Wop
Rolling two phillies together in the Bridge we called 'em oo-wops
He said "Nas, niggas caught me busting off the roof
So I wear a bulletproof and pack a black trey-deuce"
He inhaled so deep, shut his eyes like he was sleep
Started coughing, one eye peeked to watch me speak
I sat back like The Mack, my army suit was black
We was chilling on these benches where he pumped his loose cracks
I took the L when he passed it, this little bastard
Keeps me blasted and starts talking mad shit
I had to school him, told him don't let niggas fool him
Cause when the pistol blows the one that's murdered be the cool one
Tough luck when niggas are struck, families fucked up
Coulda caught your man, but didn't look when you bucked up
Mistakes happen, so take heed never bust up
At the crowd catch him solo, make the right man bleed
Shorty's laugh was cold blooded as he spoke so foul
Only twelve trying to tell me that he liked my style
Then I rose, wiping the blunt's ash from my clothes
Then froze only to blow the herb smoke through my nose
And told my little man I'm ghost, I broze
Left some jewels in his skull that he can sell if he chose
Words of wisdom from Nas: try to rise up above
Keep an eye out for Jake, Shorty Wop, one love

[Hook]



Illmatic 10th Anniversary Album Art:






Track List:

Disc 1:
1. The Genesis
2. N.Y. State Of Mind
3. Life’s A Bitch
4. The World Is Yours
5. Halftime
6. Memory Lane (Sittin’ In Da Park)
7. One Love
8.One Time 4 Your Mind
9. Represent
10. It Ain’t Hard To Tell

Disc 2:
1. The World is Yours (remix)
2. One Love (remix)
3. It Ain't Hard to Tell (remix)
4. On The Real
5. Star Wars



[Intro] (Nas)
Chi-ching, haa, chi-ching, haa

[Hook]
(Nas)
Take a picture, cherish it, I'm God's Son, inherence it
This is level 7 where gangster and mobsters stepping
(Nashawn)
Take a picture, cherish it, its Nashawn
My feature is heaven, safe for the bitches, this is level 7

[Nas]
Number 1, uhh what does it take to have a woman's bra?

[Nashawn]
Intelligently they mind done

[Nas]
And what about shopping and copping expensive things

[Nashwan]
Take them on yachts and lobster, rocks and rings

[Nas]
? Crash with a transvestite on its best night
But nigga not me on a hot night
I'm with a sister whose thick as shit and she knock me

[Nashawn]
You hit her off properly then let her get on top of me
Level 2 is elementary stage

[Nas]
The first thing a slave learned is its country amazing

[Nashawn]
They separated the families on ever plantation

[Nas]
Feeing for that black pussy, slaves masters chasing

[Nashawn]
Chase they women like they chicken feet
Violating, raping 'em
Rip their clothes, let their niggas see

[Nas]
And that's the start of the first black pimps history

[Nashawn]
Told his queen if they want to fuck, make them pay a fee

[Hook] - 2X

[Nas]
Level 3, God answer me, is there any devil in me?

[Nashawn]
Naw there's thug and there's rebel in me

[Nas]
Hood like ghetto tears falling down my eyes

[Nasahwn]
How about the staircase, kill them with a surprise

[Nas]
I'm willing to live and willing to die

[Nashawn]
Kill a man for a cause, I'm willing to fry

[Nas]
While my people say it's a fucked up predicament

[Nashawn]
You talk the wrong thing, school learned ignorance

[Nas]
Now my religion is the all mighty Dallam

[Nashawn]
There's everybody making this money
Turn this street game to pimp game scholar

[Nas]
Level 4, never make a whore to a house wife
With my charisma

[Nashawn]
It takes a special kind of dude just to pimp her

[Nas]
Level 5, I leaned the ways of the streets when I was only 9

[Nashawn]
Turn nothing into a dime, beer into wine

[Nas]
Wine into Champaign, Chris, level 6

[Nashawn]
Only millionaire shit, buying buildings, and real estate
Me and my gorillas chill to sell a home away

[Nas]
Went from savvy to humane
Welcome to level 7, enter the life of true fame

[Hook] - 2X



[Intro]
(AZ) Ayo what's up what's up let's keep it real son
Count this money, you know what I'm sayin'
(Nas) Yeah yeah
(AZ) Ayo put the Grants over there in the safe you know what I'm sayin'
Cause we spendin' these Jacksons
The Washingtons go to wifey, you know how that go
(Nas) I'm sayin' that's what this is all about right
Clothes, bankrolls and hoes you know what I'm sayin'
Yo then what man, what

[Verse 1: AZ]
Visualizing the realism of life and actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
Cause yeah, we were beginners in the hood as 5 percenters
But something must have got in us cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some resting in peace and some are sitting in San Quentin
Others such as myself are trying to carry on tradition
Keeping this Schweppervescent street ghetto essence inside us
Cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though, we know somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leaving thieving, we'll be leaving with some kind of dough, so
Until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers, will be somewhere else stackin' plenty papers
Keeping it real, packing steel, getting high
Cause life's a bitch and then you die

[Hook: AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
Cause you never know when you're gonna go

[Verse 2: Nas]
I woke up early on my born day; I'm 20, it's a blessing
The essence of adolescence leaves my body, now I'm fresh and
My physical frame is celebrated cause I made it
One quarter through life some Godly-like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I puffs from
My skull cause it's pain in my brain vein, money maintain
Don't go against the grain, simple and plain
When I was young, at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbing foreigners, take their wallets, their jewels, and rip their green cards
Dipped to the projects flashing my quick cash and
Got my first piece of ass smoking blunts with hash
Now it's all about cash in abundance
Niggas I used to run with is rich or doing years in the hundreds
I switched my motto; instead of saying "fuck tomorrow"
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Time is Illmatic, keep static like wool fabric
Pack a 4-matic to crack your whole cabbage

[Hook]



This one here’s for all the snitches
Gangsta’s keep ya heads up
Yeah, Snitch alibi

To the snitch alibi nigga I can't tell
I know you gon tell, I know you know well
On the block plotting us, while we make our mill
While you claim to be a gangsta nigga
I can tell nigga, nigga I can tell, nigga you gon tell
And before you go to jail nigga you gon tell
Before you get a bail nigga you gon tell
To the snitch alilbi’s

I know you niggas is fed up
Eat Fed cereal, fed lies
Work for the Federal Bureau
Man you’re a loser or zero
J Edgar Hoover’s you’re hero
Therefore you lack brain like a scarecrow
Lose dough cause you in the crack game like a scared ho
So, nigga ya better be careful

There are rules in this game
Better not say my name
Gotta watch how you play cause
They gon tell, they gon tell
There are rules in this game
Better not say my name
Gotta watch how you play cause
They gon tell, they gon tell

To the snitch alibi nigga I can't tell
I know you gon tell, I know you know well
On the block plotting us, while we make our mill
While you claim to be a gangsta nigga
I can tell nigga, nigga I can tell, nigga you gon tell
And before you go to jail nigga you gon tell
Before you get a bail nigga you gon tell
To the snitch alilbi’s

You better be careful, cause you walking on the wrong side
Sending nigga way up state for the long ride
Where brothers is left to die
Muthafucker you FBI
What happened to street code, honor, respect
Turned into Al Pacino and Johnny Depp
Cause you tell undercover’s lies singing lullabies
Thought you was a stand up guy

To the snitch alibi nigga I can't tell
I know you gon tell, I know you know well
On the block plotting us, while we make our mill
While you claim to be a gangsta nigga
I can tell nigga, nigga I can tell, nigga you gon tell
And before you go to jail nigga you gon tell
Before you get a bail nigga you gon tell
To the snitch alilbi’s

They gon tell, they gon tell, they gon tell

(Interlude)

To the snitch alibi nigga I can't tell
I know you gon tell, I know you know well
On the block plotting us, while we make our mill
While you claim to be a gangsta nigga
I can tell nigga, nigga I can tell, nigga you gon tell
And before you go to jail nigga you gon tell
Before you get a bail nigga you gon tell
To the snitch alilbi’s



[Talking: Nas]
The wild Gremlins
Ya'll know the F. right?

[Verse 1: Nas]
When the winner lose... and the losers win
Nobody scores just a few good men
But everybody sins
A lot of young die
Fall in the trap, strung high
Try to go legal, but the hood calling you back
Flipping the crack, cause I miss it for example
Watching base-heads wildin' on my first sample
I elevated up, since snakes in my circumference
Now I hit my niggas with cakes and say, "Pump This"
Thank god for cracks, corners, and marijuana
Hoodrats and good gats to carry on ya
I got dead friends, misled friends, crackhead friends
Wild Gremlins, who "bust led" friends
Silent weapons for quiet wars
Or loud gats
Tussle too long, some shiny moves the crowd back
It's powerful, niggas would die over respect
And money is secondary to that whole aspect

[Hook: Nas]
I Love it, when I'm... High
I'm at my Best, when I'm... Hiiigh
I like my sex, when I'm... Hii-iiigh
Cash, Tecs... Flash Tecs, when I ride through ya projects
And clap at sets, a nigga... High
North, South, East, West, riders get... Hiiigh
I take ya'll niggas on a lyrical... Hii-iiigh
I twist it up, Listen up to the real shit, feel this, REALNESS!

[Nas:]
Niggas rushing to the top, not knowing what it takes to be...
King Of The Industry, the wise move patiently
Ya niggas is hating me, won't be happy till I'm back witcha...
Selling crack witcha, half & half on a pack witcha
My pen and pad, paint a black picture...
Of young goons passing liquor, after-hour store mass of niggas
Street corner combos, stagger and Wan knows...
Tahoes coming through, blasting songs I know
Niggas scheme, girls pregnant by sixteen
Clique out to get rich...
Empty clips for cream
Same funeral home, for different stiff bodies
Once I'm up a new family goes there, it don't surprise me
Cry to the tears, dried up inside me
Revenge to the end, laws in NYC
Got up by the way I used to be...
Apartment 5D... where dope fiends in the hall try your knob when you sleep
Surveillance Cameras in my house now, watching you creep
Spot you from deep, guns for all possible beef
Niggas try to rock you asleep
Kidnap your whole fam for a week
Asking for ransom, niggas starving, dieing to eat

[Hook: Nas]
I Love it, when I'm... High
I'm at my Best, when I'm... Hiiigh
Yo... I like my sex, when I'm... Hii-iiigh
Cash, Tecs... Flash Tecs, when I ride through ya projects
And clap at sets, a nigga... High
North, South, East, West, riders get... Hiiigh
I take ya'll niggas on a lyrical... Hii-iiigh
I twist it up, Listen up to the real shit, feel this, REALNESS!



[Verse One:]
Yo, the Lord is my shepard
The sword is my weapon
Reward is a blessin', that comes from the struggle
Shoes been scuffled, blood's been shed, another Mother loses a son
Cause where I'm from the young chooses a gun
Before they choose an education
But once dead their ain't no awakenin'
So like once said, life ain't for fakin
Yo, you wit' me when I say duct tape 'em?
Fuck waitin'
Got the truck outside, Benz jeep for navigation
Everything in position, they'd rather be fuckin' wit' Satan
When I aim I ain't missin', master of assasination'
I heard he call himself Esco, drive a Lexo
Rocks his hat sideways, showin' off his waves with a chipped tooth
Is this the truth?
This is what we do, sip a brew
Wait around his crib until it turns around two AM
As soon as he walks in the door we slay 'em
You guys got fat while I was away, so start payin'

[Hook:]
Okay, you wanna play rough?!
(gun shots) (scratching - a thug changes, and love changes)
Okay yo, we could play rough!

[Verse 2:]
Okay now, drive up to my crib, am I high enough?
Who these niggas tryin' to hide in their truck
I ain't order cable, why in the fuck these niggas
Ducked in they seat?  are they lookin' for me?
But I ain't do shit, could it be that niggas thought
I slept like B.I.G. and Pac did
May they rest in peace, but while I'm alive I pop shit
P-11 Glock spits 17 shot clips
Put these niggas in boxes, where they Moms and Pops is
Pull the strap from under the seat
Back up in the street
Watch these niggas thats tryin' to watch me, I carefully creep
Take off my shoes, barefoot nigga poppin' my heat
Empty every shell in their direction
Its you, I should've guessed it!
Same niggas that I was connected wit', I know sent you
Now I'm'a take you off here, you dont know what you got into

[Hook:]

[Verse 3:]
Walked in his house, smackin' him up, "what you talkin' about?" he said
Shut-up nigga! knocked him in his head with chrome
Never thought I'd be in his home
With his wife taped up for my niggas to bone
Fuckin' with me, you should've known
I'll have 'em write "stupid nigga" on your tombstone
What money can do, get you hit for less than a G
For threatenin' me
I'm'a do it myself, take you to Hell, this ones for free
Killin' you niggas with nothin'
Left him dead, engine runnin'
You the only I'm makin' sure that gets whats comin'
Look at your Woman, anal ripped out, its your fault
They gang banged your bitch out in your face and you saw it
But before I let you have it I'm searchin' your crib
For pictures of relatives, addresses to where they live
Shit like that, incase a nigga wanna strike back
I'll be right up in his ass to blow 'em out with the Mac
Niggas treat you like Fam, and you on it like that?
Now you gotta lay flat, gettin' eatin' by rats
Gettin' even's never wrong, its only right to react
Eye for an eye, cause the sweetest part is payback
Somebody kncokin', who dat?
"a cop man", let him in
And give that mothafucka one under the chin
Can't believe this nigga down with the Feds!
The copped screamed out your government before he dropped dead
Dont explain, I put the pound on his head
Blew 'em! before that I can't remember the last time I said......
Okay, so we gonna play rough!

[Hook:]



[Swizz Beatz]
Yo man, it's a real game out here
Know what I'm sayin Nas?
Beats back in effect man
Swizz Beatz da monsta (what's poppin?)

[Nas]
Get in line, everybody get in line
Listen the fuck up, to what's going down
Pay attention, aight?

[Hook]x2
Niggas salute me, bitches salute me
The block salute me, the hood salute me
You should salute me, they should salute me
So fuck who you are
I'm the motherfuckin general

[Nas]
When I walk through everything stops, silence
Remain quiet, babies don't cry thugs don't buss
Cops cut off sirens, oxygen freeze
Noises to a minimun nigga, I pop and I squeeze
I represent the pain and struggle
Cut out your eyeballs then brain-fuck you
Yo you testin with death
I'm confronting the justice, expressing my voice to the public
They got to free some brothas or we kidnap the judges
They got to free some sistas or we kidnap the judges
They got to beat the system that's enslaving the poor
Our practicing, gun rages, they R's and .44's
Many fought teams and for green this is war
This is life and I'm the hardest, got ya label all scared
Callin up the radio, don't want my records to air
Y'all ain't playin fair, to every rapper in the game
I'm comin fo y'all blood, make room for the king...Nas

[Hook]x2

[Nas]
I'm the leader, that's it, nobody higher
Nobody touchin my crown, nobody dyin
Nobody smoother, harder, tougher, believe it
I'm much more smarter, much more strategic
Scholarships and hollow tips, a lot of walkin caskets
They talk a good one but there's never no action
And I'm the type to poison ya sista, twist her
Through wit her, put the gun in your face and make you hit her
Make you quiver -when they silhouette of a Don, Benson
Light up a Cu-ban, recite a few psalms
Enlighten you quick, teach you how a king wins wars
Keep your ears to the street, love your enemies more
'Cuz hate can frustrate, and confuse
Too eager you lose, patience, plan your attack then you move - ghetto
Green Berets, got freaks got hoes
Who be jumpin out of movin cars and land at my feet - because

[Hook]x2



[Intro]
Check me out y'all
Nasty Nas in your area
About to cause mass hysteria

[Verse 1]
Before I blunt, I take out my fronts
Then I start to front; matter of fact, I be on a manhunt
You couldn't catch me in the streets without a ton of reefer
That's like Malcolm X catching the Jungle Fever
King poetic. Too much flavor, I'm major
Atlanta ain't Brave-r, I'll pull a number like a pager
Cause I'm an ace when I face the bass
40-side is the place that is giving me grace
Now wait, another dose and you might be dead
And I'm a Nike-head, I wear chains that excite the Feds
And ain't a damn thing gonna change
I'mma performer strange, so the mic warmer was born to gain
Nas, why did you do it
You know you got the mad fat fluid when you rhyme, it's halftime

[Hook]
It's halftime
Hey yo, it's halftime
It's halftime
Check it out

[Verse 2]
It's like that, you know it's like that
I got it hemmed, now you never get the mic back
When I attack, there ain't an army that could strike back
So I react never calmly on a hype track
I set it off with my own rhyme
Cause I'm as ill as a convict who kills for phone time
I'm max like cassettes, I flex like sex
In your stereo sets, Nas'll catch wreck
I used to hustle - now all I do is relax and strive
When I was young I was a fan of the Jackson 5
I drop jewels, wear jewels, hope to never run it
With more kicks than a baby in a mother's stomach
Nasty Nas has to rise cause I'm wise
This is exercise 'til the microphone dies
Back in '83 I was an MC sparkin'
But I was too scared to grab the mics in the parks and
Kick my little raps cause I thought nigga wouldn't understand
And now in every jam I'm the fuckin' man
I rap in front of more niggas than in the slave ships
I used to watch "CHiPs", now I load Glock clips
I got to have it, I miss Mr. Magic
Versatile, my style switches like a faggot
But not bisexual, I'm an intellectual
Of rap I'm a professional and that's no question, yo
These are the lyrics of the man, you can't near it, understand?
Cause in the streets, I'm well-known like the number man
Am I in place with the bass and format
Explore rap and tell me "Nas ain't all that"
And next time I rhyme, I be foul
Whenever I freestyle I see trial, niggas say I'm wild
I hate a rhyme-biter's rhyme
Stay tuned, Nas soon - the real rap comes at halftime

[Hook]
It's halftime
Check it, it's halftime
It's halftime
We're like that

[Verse 3]
I got it going on, even flip a morning song
Every afternoon, I kick half the tune
And in the darkness, I'm heartless like when the NARC's hit
Word to Marcus Garvey: I hardly sparked it
Cause when I blast the herb, that's my word
I be slayin' them fast, doing this that and the third
But chill, pass the Andre, and let's slay
I bag bitches up at John Jay, and hit a matinee
Putting hits on 5-0
Cause when it's my time to go, I wait for God with the .44
And biters can't come near
And yo: "go to hell" to the foul cop who shot Garcia
I won't plant seeds, don't need an extra mouth I can't feed
That's extra Phillie change, more cash for damp weed
This goes out to Manhattan, the island of Staten
Brooklyn and Queens is living fat and
The Boogie Down, enough props, enough clout
Ill Will, rest in peace, yo, I'm out
Bet you I'm out

It's still halftime
Little greens switch through
You know it's halftime
Ninety-two
It's halftime
Halftime
The police, man
Come on man get out in here
Yeah










[Hook: Nas] **2X**
'Come Take a Ride' you can fit up in my two-seater
Nas a thug you can catch me in my wife beater
Blowin' my drugs you know how I like the cheeba-cheeba
And if you hatin' and I prolly don't like it either

[Nas]
Fresh dressed like a million bucks
Threw on my black jeans and Timberland Chucks
I got some moneys in my pockets got some money to spend
Got some hoochies I'mma hook up wit quarter to ten
My daughter wit me and we came from the mall
Don't need no baby mama drama
Kissed her on the cheek and dropped her back off
I hit the car wash at half past four
Some kid was star struck
I pulled off my grass and let 'em puff sour
My deuce-deuce rims shinin' happy as they can be
I went to the famous Project that they call QB
I saw some brothers gamblin' on the curb
A shorty pulled a pistol took they paper, nigga that's my word
I turned the corner wit my burner and palm
Niggas know my name and game I'm a murderous Don
Saw my peoples then extended my arm
Pulled on the sidewalk, no time to talk
If y'all comin' come on; come on!

[Hook: Nas] **2X**

[Nas]
Talk like a champion, walk like a champion
Body like a God and I promise that Nas'll a hit you off
Flow like a gangsta, brum bum bum bum bum
Bustin' black dummies and dustin' all y'all niggas off
I've been around a couple of times, know how things go
I dealt wit 'em all on different occasion
The same things'll come in different stages
So when them things rise up or pop up
I look right past as if its weightless
Meanin' it won't intervene the thought process
So I can levitate to more important topics
Laughin' the Face of Death, flash back of car crashes
20 L's Grey Goose vodka and tall glasses
Dippin' in the twilight
Wit gangsta smokin' weed in my ride light
The same stuff is still a bitch livin' like I'm rich
Bang broads call me Mr. International, ghetto stars come on

[Hook: Nas] **2X**

[Nas]
Slow like I robbed Brinks truck, haters all fold
Cuz my 9 is aimed up, I left four seasons
My niggas bleedin' cause of four reasons
Jealousy, hate, laziness and envy even
Up in the Benzie squeezin' a couple Henny wit my comrad
Conversatin' on what we believe in
Like honey in the way she's been cause he's spend
G's a week in the make freak knees bend
I told her to pimp hard, see the hoes we left in the room
They nymphomaniacs prolly lick homegirls womb
As respect just phone 'em and leave 'em & shit
They not your wife keep your cash nigga don't even trip
Pass the grass accordingly, you saw police
But when I puffed and coughed
Seconds later screamin' "Fuck the Law"
Got CD's, TV's, guns tucked in the floor
Once again I hit the streets and y'all don't see no more
So uh...

[Hook: Nas] **5X**



[Nas]
Uh, it's real, it's real, it's real
Uh, uh, owe me back, uh shorty
Shorty, what up, huh?
Come on
[1 - Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe me something
[Nas]
Yeah, owe me back like you owe your tax
Owe me back like forty acres to Blacks
Pay me back when you shake it like that girl
[2 - Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe, owe, owe
[Nas]
Yeah owe me back like you owe your rent
Owe me back like its money I spent
Pay me back when you shake it again
The don, all the time, with all the shine
You small time, I ball with mine
Links, minks, Bentley, it's all with mine
My jams bump out to the borderline
UK hot with it, blew spots with it
Every continent love when I spit it
Corners to blocks, even the cops feel it
Brothas on lockdown on their cots feel it
It's real in the field the Last Mohican
Who survived in the streets and did something decent
Now I got plans to buy the whole hood
Legit' now, I ain't gotta lie to no judge
I make hits now, money I flip now
Hood fella every honey wanna kiss now
I lit up my neck, pinkie, and wrist now
So girls everywhere, this is how we get down
[Repeat 1]
[3 - Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe, owe, owe
[Nas]
Yeah owe me back like you owe your rent
Owe me back like its money I lent
Pay me back when you shake it again
[Nas]
Play to win, girls in the club moving
I get 'em real hot, my songs seduce 'em
I flow, I'm so mysterious
Nas, and Nasty's the alias
Everything platinum I glow
Cadillac trucks pulling up to the do'
On top out the car, lounge at the bar
We spent a thou', we wild, look at how rowdy we are
Feel like a million dollars, feel me holler
To the max with the Benz and chrome wheeled Impalas
Thugs and renta's, to the playas and ballers
Sexy mamas, fly ladies lookin' proper
Look good enough to be taken shoppin'
Earrings, bracelets, now you rocking
Your body's so nice that I give you this option
Let you wear my big chain if we get it popping
[Repeat 1]
[Repeat 2]
[Ginuwine]
I put the shackles on your feet (You owe me)
I think you owe me some (You owe me)
The shackles on your feet (You owe Nas)
I think you owe me some (You owe Ginuwine)
(You owe Timbaland, you owe me)
[Nas]
Lock you down baby, you know what you owe me
Mack like Goldie, it's the same story
Let you hold something, you spending it right
Know where you gon' be by the end of the night
Make it bounce, shake it, move it around
Wiggle it a little bit, throw it to the south
Fantasizing me inside and you riding
Throw it like a stallion, you wearin' my medallion
[Ginuwine]
Shorty, say what's your price
Just to back it up
You can hold my ice
Now let's say you owe me something
(You owe me something, oh yeah)
I said shorty, say what's your price
(You owe Nas)
Just to back it up
(You owe Ginuwine)
You can hold my ice
(You owe Timbaland)
Now let's say you owe
You owe us something, baby
Oh, oh, oh



[N] Ayo God, yo meet me at the Deniece Williams concert tonight man
[N] E'rybody there, Stacy Lattisaw, Teena Marie, e'rybody man
[A] Yeah yeah no doubt
[N] I'mma bring one of my baddest stallions man
[N] You do the same aight
[A] You know how we play baby, listen
[A] I'm at a car wash right now
[A] but I'mma hit you as soon as I'm right over there
[A] Right in front right, okay, aight gotchu

[N] Son, who laced you with the ill haircut
[A] Lenny, he blessed me with the sharp blade, that nigga's paid
[N] He make a pretty penny
[A] Fo'sho, you hurt 'em with the new Prada's (true)
[A] Check mines they royal blue
[N] My shits is baby blue
[A] They powder blue (yo' shits is hotter)
[A] You hotter with them frames on
[N] Nigga you James Bond, and you stay low
[A] Y'know my style babe bro (yeah, make dough)
[N] Manicure, facial, face glow
[A] Fuck it if you say so; I keep you P.I.!
[N] That's how we break hoes
[N] We throwin ivory dice across the concrete
[A] And of course that don't make him your man because y'all palm weed
[N] We had boxed bumpin La-Di-Da-Di (word?)
[N] Shotties was blastin, pellets jumpin into everybody
[A] They never got me
[A] Was cool with all the park shooters, sparkin bazookas
[A] Sharpen your tutors, cause we don't pardon the snoozers
[N] Yo son I wouldn't change my life for nuttin
[A] And that ain't like you for frontin
[N] Who's the nicest? (Nuff talkin, light somethin)

[Refrain: AZ and Nas]
Yo we hard hit, just like Comacho and Vargas
Who's the target
Now watch how we close the market
We both hard hit, just like Hagler and Hearns
Add the math, be concerned, if it's beef you burn
Yo it's sorta like, Poitier and Bill Cosby
'Let's Do It Again,' a beautiful blend, let's do it to win
My nigga - my nigga - my niggas - my niggas
My niggas - my niggas - uhh..

[N] What's today's mathematics
[A] We had it, we let 'em hold it, we shoulda sold it
[N] We back it, we could grabbed it
[N] But fuck it, just let 'em have it
[A] Al 'Humdulillah
[N] Allahu Akbar
[A] God is the greatest
[N] Planet Mars, we carvin the faces
[A] You couldn't catch us in a car without the bangers
[A] Believe, I touched a couple of movie stars and entertainers
[N] Indeed, one in particular, almost started to name her
[N] I was there when you first pushed up and started to game her
[A] Been a long journey, certain shit just don't concern me
[N] They ain't hurtin shit; we flip, they hire attorneys
[A] Yo I'mma stay custom, 'til I'm old grey and rustin
[A] Reminiscin the number of chickens that claim we fucked 'em
[N] Bet some badda hoes than them other funky rappers chose
[N] I'm tryin to wife a chick, light a spliff
[N] This might be like another part to "Life's a Bitch"
[A] Write ya lips, who's nice as this? We righteousness
[A] No mic assists, it's murderous - granted the right to flip

[Refrain x2]

[Nas]
Like, Spinks and Hearns
Sorta, Poitier and Bill Cosby
'Let's Do it Again,' nigga



[Verse 1]
What up kid? I know shit is rough doing your bid
When the cops came you should have slid to my crib
Fuck it, black, no time for looking back it's done
Plus congratulations, you know you got a son
I heard he looks like ya, why don't your lady write ya?
Told her she should visit, that's when she got hyper
Flipping, talking 'bout he acts too rough
He didn't listen he be riffing while I'm telling him stuff
I was like yeah, shorty don't care, she a snake too
Fucking with them niggas from that fake crew that hate you
But yo, guess who got shot in the dome-piece?
Jerome's niece, on her way home from Jones Beach
It's bugged, plus little Rob is selling drugs on the dime
Hanging out with young thugs that all carry nines
And night time is more trife than ever
What up with Cormega, did you see him, are y'all together?
If so then hold the fort down, represent to the fullest
Say what's up to Herb, Ice and Bullet
I left a half a hundred in your commissary
You was my nigga when push came to shove, one what? (One love)

[Hook: Q-Tip] x5
One Love

[Verse 2]
Dear Born, you'll be out soon, stay strong
Out in New York the same shit is going on
The crackheads stalking, loudmouths is talking
Hold, check out the story yesterday when I was walking
That nigga you shot last year tried to appear
Like he hurting something, word to mother, I heard him fronting
And he be pumping on your block, your man gave him your Glock
And now they run together, what up son, whatever
Since I'm on the streets I'mma put it to a cease
But I heard you blew a nigga with a ox for the phone piece
Wilding on the Island, but now in Elmira
Better chill cause them niggas will put that ass on fire
Last time you wrote you said they tried you in the showers
But maintain when you come home the corner's ours
On the reals, all these crab niggas know the deal
When we start the revolution all they probably do is squeal
But chill, see you on the next V-I
I gave your ma duke's loot for kicks, plus sent you flicks
Your brother's buckwilding in 4-Main, he wrote me
He might beat his case, 'til he come home he'll play it low key
So stay civilized, time flies
Though incarcerated your mind dies, I hate it when your moms cries
It kinda makes me want to murder, for reala
I even got a mask and gloves to bust slugs but one love

[Hook: Q-Tip]

[Verse 3]
Sometimes I sit back with a Buddha sack
Mind's in another world thinking how can we exist through the facts
Written in school text books, bibles, et cetera
Fuck a school lecture, the lies get me vexed-er
So I be ghost from my projects, I take my pen and pad
For the weekend hittin L's while I'm sleeping
A two day stay, you may say I need the time alone
To relax my dome, no phone, left the nine at home
You see the streets had me stressed something terrible
Fucking with the corners have a nigga up in Bellevue
Or HDM, hit with numbers from 8 to 10
A future in a maximum state pen is grim
So I comes back home, nobody's out but Shorty Doo-Wop
Rolling two phillies together in the Bridge we called 'em oo-wops
He said "Nas, niggas caught me busting off the roof
So I wear a bulletproof and pack a black trey-deuce"
He inhaled so deep, shut his eyes like he was sleep
Started coughing, one eye peeked to watch me speak
I sat back like The Mack, my army suit was black
We was chilling on these benches where he pumped his loose cracks
I took the L when he passed it, this little bastard
Keeps me blasted and starts talking mad shit
I had to school him, told him don't let niggas fool him
Cause when the pistol blows the one that's murdered be the cool one
Tough luck when niggas are struck, families fucked up
Coulda caught your man, but didn't look when you bucked up
Mistakes happen, so take heed never bust up
At the crowd catch him solo, make the right man bleed
Shorty's laugh was cold blooded as he spoke so foul
Only twelve trying to tell me that he liked my style
Then I rose, wiping the blunt's ash from my clothes
Then froze only to blow the herb smoke through my nose
And told my little man I'm ghost, I broze
Left some jewels in his skull that he can sell if he chose
Words of wisdom from Nas: try to rise up above
Keep an eye out for Jake, Shorty Wop, one love

[Hook: Q-Tip]

[Outro:]
Oh, One Love, means keepin' it real
For the brothers that's locked down
Keep that one love
For the brothers out in the East
Keep that one love
For all the brothers uptown
Keep that one love
For all the brothers in jail
Keep that one love
One love means keepin' it real
One Love, One Love
One love means keepin' it real



I want you to close ur eyes, n' envision
The most beautiful place in tha world
If you in the hood, the ghetto street corner
Come on this journey, the best journey, its a mansion
Acres of land, swimmin pools and all that, check it out

[Verse 1: Nas]
I'm capable of anything, my imagination could give me wings
To fly like doves over the streets watchin' many things
Kids walking home from school, on drug blocks, missionaries
Pass out papers that read love god
I see faces cases, judges and jurors, masons lawyers and cops
I watch 'cause every thugs face is my mirror
But this was one in particular
This kid he was the vintage stick 'em up pro
16 years old did his jail since there was no where to go
Every morning calls his comrade to come n get em' a smoke
He insane already gone mad, blames himself for his setbacks
Dangerous street corners where his sets at
Sling from dusk till dawn, detectives act like they maniacs
Chasing him, his ass was flaring
Smoking like a chimney on Remy of course he not caring
He needs a place to go to keep his mind expanding
I give em a helping hand, bring em out to Thugz Mansion

[Hook]
Every corner, every city theres a place where lifes a lil easy
Lil hennesey, lay back and cool, every hour cuz its all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside, every wrong done
Will be alright, nothin' but peace, love n street passion
Every ghetto needs a Thugs Mansion

[Verse 2: 2Pac]
Dear mama don't cry, your baby boy's doin' good
Tell the hommies I'm in heaven and it ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night
It had me shook drinking
Peppermint schnapps with Jackie Wilson and Sam Cook
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin there kickin it with Malcolm till the day game
Lil' Latasha sure grown, tell the lady in the liquor store that she's forgiven
So come home
Maybe in time you'll understand, only God can save us
Where Miles Davis cutting lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past that passed on
They in heaven found peace that last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in Heaven
So right before I sleep dear God what I'm asking
Remember this face, save me a place
In Thugz Mansion

[Hook] (Wanna go...wanna go)

[Verse 3: Nas]
A place where death doesn't reside, jus' thugz who collide
Not to start beef but to spark trees, no cops rollin by
No policemen, no homicide, No chalk on the streets
No reason for no body's momma to cry
See I'm a good guy, I'm tryin to stick around for my daughter
But if I should die, I know all of my albums support her
This whole year's been crazy, asked the Holy Spirit to save me
Only difference from me and Ossie Davis grey hair maybe
Cuz I feel like my eyes saw to much sufferin
Im just 20 some odd years I done lost my mother
And I cry tears of joy, I know she smiles on her boy
I dream of you more, my love goes to Afeni Shakur
Cause like Anne Jones, she raised a ghetto king in a war
And just for that alone, she shouldn't feel no pain no more
Cause one day we'll all be together, sipping heavenly champagne
Where angels soar, with golden rings, in Thugz Mansion



1. "Get Down"
(Nasir Jones, Salaam Gibbs)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP), o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Nas for Ill Will Productions and Salaam "The Chameleon" Remi for Dashiki Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Circle House Studios, Miami, FL and Right Track Studios, New York, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Contains elements from "Funky Drummer" written and performed by James Brown, published by Golo Publishing/Unichappell Music, Inc. (BMI). Used courtesy of PolyGram Records, under license from Universal Music Enterprises
Also contains elements from "The Boss" written by James Brown, Charles Bobbitt and Fred Wesley, performed by James Brown, published by Donna Dijon Music Publishing/Universal Songs of PolyGram/Dynatone Publishing (BMI). Used courtesy of PolyGram Records, under license from Universal Music Enterprises

2. "The Cross"
(Nasir Jones, Marshall Mathers, Jeff Bass)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/8 Mile Style (BMI)
Produced by Eminem
Recorded by Steve King at 54 Sound, Detroit, MI
Vocals recorded by Kevin Crouse at Electric Lady Studios, New York, NY
Keyboards and programming by Jeff Bass
Mixed by Steve King at 54 Sound, Detroit, MI

3. "Made You Look"
(Nasir Jones, Salaam Gibbs, Jeremiah Lordan)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP), o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Regent Music Corp. (BMI)
Produced by Sallam "The Chameleon" Remi
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL
Assisted by Mike Sroka
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Cresent Moon Studios, Miami Beach, FL
Contains excerpts from "Apache" written by Jeremiah Lordan and published by Regent Music  Corp. (BMI). Performed by The Incredible Bongo Band courtesy of New Millennium Entertainment

4. "Last Real Nigga Alive"
(Nasir Jones, R. Turner)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Browz Music (BMI)
Produced by Ron Browz
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recordings, New York, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY

5. "Zone Out" feat. Bravehearts
(Nasir Jones, Salaam Gibbs, Jabari Jones, Michael Epps)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP), o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Jabari Jones Publishing Designee/Michael Epps Publishing Designee
Produced by Salaam "The Chameleon" Remi for Dashiki Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Circle House Studios, Miami, FL and Right Track Studios, New York, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Bravehearts appear courtesy of Ill Will Records/Columbia Records

6. "Hey Nas" feat. Kelis & Claudette Ortiz of City High
(Nasir Jones, Salaam Gibbs, Kenni Burke, Allan Felder, Norma Wright)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP), o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Top Bound Music (BMI)/Third Palm Music (BMI)/Jobur Music Co., Inc. (BMI)
Produced by Salaam "The Chameleon" Remi for Dashiki Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL
Assistant engineer: Michael Sroka
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL and Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Flute: Mercedes Abal
Contains interpolations from "Risin' to the Top Bill" written by Kenni Burke, Allan Felder and Norma Wright, published by Top Bound Music (BMI), Third Palm Music (BMI) and Jobur Music Co., Inc. (BMI)

7. "I Can"
(Nasir Jones, Salaam Gibbs, Roy Hammond)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP), o/b/o itself and Salaam Remi Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Street Tuff Tunes (ASCAP)
Produced by Salaam "The Chameleon" Remi for Dashiki Productions, Inc
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL
Assistant engineer: Michael Sroka
Children's lead and background vocals: Angela Hunte
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL and Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Flute: Mercedes Abal
Contains excerpts from the composition "Impeach the President" written by Roy Hammond and published by Street Tuff Tunes (ASCAP). Performed by The Honeydrippers courtesy of Tuff City Records

8. "Book of Rhymes"
(Nasir Jones, Alan Maman, David Camon)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/A. Maman Music (ASCAP), admin. by The Royalty Network (ASCAP)/Every Knight Music (BMI)
Produced by The Alchemist
Recorded by Kevin Crouse and Mathew Ryan at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL
Assistant engineers: Michael Sroka, Elise Thomas and Jonah Egolf
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Contains excerpts from "For the Dollar Bill" written by David Camon and published by Every Knight Music (BMI), performed by Tommy Tate courtesy of Juana Records

9. "Thugz Mansion (N.Y.)" feat. 2Pac & J. Phoenix
(2Pac Shakur, Johnny Jackson, Claudio Cueni, Michael Herring, Nasir Jones, Larry Loftin)
Amaru Publishing (ASCAP)/Universal Music (ASCAP)/Black Hispanic Music, admin. by BMG Songs, Inc. (ASCAP)/Cueni Publishing (ASCAP)/Colorblind Fish Music (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/From the Soul Music/Zomba Music Publishing (ASCAP)
Produced by Claudio Cueni & Michael Herring
(Original version produced by Johnny "J" for KLOCK WORK Entertainment)
Recorded by Kevin Crouse and Claudio Cueni at Can Am, Tarzana, CA, Skip Saylor, Los Angeles, CA, Circle Sound Studios, Miami, FL and Electric Lady Studios, New York, NY
Assistant engineer: Mark Vinten
Guitar by Michael "Fish" Herring
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Contains a remixed version of "Thugz Mansion" featuring 2Pac as embodied on the 2Pac LP Better Dayz

10. "Mastermind"
(Nasir Jones, Alan Maman)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/A. Maman Music (ASCAP), admin. by The Royalty Network (ASCAP)
Produced by The Alchemist
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Electric Lady Studios, New York, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY

11. "Warrior Song" feat. Alicia Keys
(Nasir Jones, Alicia Keys)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP) o/b/o itself and Lellow Productions (ASCAP)
Produced by Alicia Keys for MBK Entertainment/Krucial Keys Productions
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recordings, New York, NY
Assistant engineer: Pablo Arraya
Mixed by Rich Keller at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY

12. "Revolutionary Warfare" feat. Lake
(Nasir Jones, Alan Maman, Patrick Adams, Terry Phillips, Leroy Jackson)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/A. Maman Music (ASCAP), admin. by The Royalty Network (ASCAP)/Crystal Smiles
Produced by The Alchemist
Recorded and mixed by Kevin Crouse at Right Track Recordings, New York, NY
Contains samples from "We Made It" written by Patrick Adams, Terry Phillips and Leroy Jackson, published by Crystal Smiles. Performed by Black Ivory courtesy of Today Records

13. "Dance"
(Nasir Jones, Chucky Thompson)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ninth Street Tunnel Music/Sony ATV Songs LLC (BMI)
Produced by Chuck Thompson for Chucklife Productions, Inc
Recorded by by Mathew Ryan at Transcontinental Studios, Orlando, FL and Kevin Crouse at Electric Lady Studios, New York, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Horns: Olu Dara

14. "Heaven"
(Nasir Jones, Eddie Holman, Sheila Holman, A. Griffith, K. Wailoo, Jully Black)
Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Damian Music Publishing/Schoochiebug Music/Virtu Music/Countless Endeavors Music Ltd. (SOCAN)/Lounge Music Publishing/Warner Chappell Music Publishing (SOCAN)/Achandre Music (SOCAN)
Produced by Agile for Big Black Lincoln Music
Co-produced by Saukrates for Big Black Lincoln Music
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at Lobo Studios, Long Island, NY
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at Sony Music Studios, New York, NY
Lead and background vocals: Jully Black and Saukrates
Contains samples from "I Love You" written by Eddie Holman and Sheila Holman, performed by Eddie Holman and published by Damian Music Pub. Co., Schoochiebug Music Pub. and Virtu Music (ASCAP). Used courtesy of MCA Records, under license from Universal Music Enterprises

-

To Moms: Thank you for giving me the strength to continue. I didn't think I could finish this album. I love you Ma. 4.5.02

Album Dedication: Ann Jones; We love you, Mommy
-Nas & Jung

-

Thank You's
To Moms: Thank you for giving me the strength to continue. I didn't think I could finish this album. I love you Ma. Death You Motherfucker! To Pops: Thank you for bringing me to this shit called earth. To Destiny: Everything I do, I do for you. I know you may not believe me but I'm working hard. I know I'm always away but daddy is working & I thank God for you my little angel!
To Ill Will: R.I.P. The Graham Family, R.I.P. Spank, Barkim, Money Bags, Stretch, all my fam. Ivan Baird a.k.a "Clark Kent," Ill Will Mgt. Love you dawg. To the Governor! Love ya Dawg OOOWEEE!!!! All Bravehearts dead, free or in jail, Malik, Beezo, Sudan, Zaire, Horse, P. gotti, Polite, Wallet Head, Slate, Spud, Black Jay, Meatdog, Rod Zilla, Mike Jones and the whole 40 side of Vernon! Felon Magazine, Tree, Tee and Jewel, Feds Magazine crew and Kim Sorio, Lake Entertainment (Lake, Supa, Rappa G, Sherm, Green and the whole crew). "We ready 4 the big ride" (baby) bay-bay! God bless all the brave children. Kev, Kwave, Craig, Big Steve - Warriors 4 life! What up Big Ryv! Salaam Remi, You inspired this whole recorde period! Love ya bro. Linen Lenny, love ya dawg! Couldn't have dunnit without ya. Thanx 4 holdin' me down. Adisa Iwa, whatup, nigga! Love ya. To my baby mama Carmen: Love you, girl. The whole 25th floor. D.I.!!!!, Dave Belgrave, thanx for everything. Chris, you and Dave are incredible! My dawg Miguel. To OJ, Footy Charles and the whole street team: Thanks to Kay Slay for holdin' me down! The whole Technitions crew, Columbia Online. To Large Professor: One love! To Akinyele my brother from another motha! To Steve Stoute: a.k.a "Don King!" a.k.a. "The Commissioner" a.k.a. "Wide Face." The bottom line is I love you dawg! This life is crazy. Write a book!!! To Kiane and Talik, whatup lil bros! Q.B.-All Souljahs, Family, The Inc., Bump Knucks, Mobb Deep, CNN. To all my women, thanx for takin' care of me. Keep treatin' me good. Love y'all for that from Nas a.k.a. "Superman" a.k.a. "Rick James." Shout out to Kevin Crouse and Solange. To cousins Dee and Gee, Diante, my whole fam. It's too many of y'all, and to my gradman Ella, I love you. Stay Beautiful! Afeni Shakur and Molly (Amaru Records). Fredrika Newton & The Huey P. Newton Foundation, Inc. R.I.P. 2Pac, B.I.G. and Big Pun

-

The Nas Squad
Executive producers: Nas for Ill Will Records, Inc. & Steve Stoute for Casino, Inc
A&R direction: V.P. of A&R Lenny "Linen" Nicholson
Management: Steve "The Commissioner" Stoute
Ill Will management: Ivan Baird a.k.a. "Clark Kent"
Album mastered by Chris Gehringer at Sterling Sound Studios, NYC

Art direction and design: Chris a.k.a. "Brother Feldmann"
Photography: Jonathan "I Stay Focused" Mannion
Photography assistants: "Uncle" Louis Rivera & Erskine "E-Double" Childers
Stylist: Crystal Streets at B Lynn Group
Assistant stylist: Dacia McIver
Imaging: "Swill" Will Kennedy
Illustrator:: Jarrett "J-Blood" Demartino
Graphic artist: Frank Carbonari a.k.a. "Megatharp"
Production: Go Scout
Barber: Mike Brinkley a.k.a. "The Razor"

-

© 2002 Sony Music Entertainment, Inc



It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Street's disciple, my raps are trifle
I shoot slugs from my brain just like a rifle
Stampede the stage, I leave the microphone split
Play Mr Tuffy while I'm on some Pretty Tone shit
Verbal assassin, my architect pleases
When I was twelve, I went to hell for snuffing Jesus
Nasty Nas is a rebel to America
Police murderer, I'm causing hysteria
My troops roll up with a strange force
I was trapped in a cage and let out by the Main Source
Swimming in women like a lifeguard
Put on a bulletproof nigga I strike hard
Kidnap the President's wife without a plan
And hanging niggas like the Ku Klux Klan
I melt mics till the sound wave's over
Before stepping to me you'd rather step to Jehovah
Slamming MC's on cement
Cause verbally, I'm iller than a AIDS patient
I move swift and uplift your mind
Shoot the gif when I riff in rhyme
Rapping sniper, speaking real words
My thoughts react, like Steven Spielberg's
Poetry attacks, paragraphs punch hard
My brain is insane, I'm out to lunch, God
Science is dropped, my raps are toxic
My voicebox locks and excels like a rocket

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Fatal is merciful and they curse me
When I grip the mic I show no mercy
I got heart, I rip the party apart
From the seams and hem up like bell-bottom jeans
But you get done, you get blues like 501
Brothers are live but I bet ya I'm liver son
So let me get upon the scene and redeem
The dream of a team, and knock 'em out like Mitch Green
Smoke some thai weed, flow at a high speed
Rap on off breaks stomping like Northlakes
Cause I'm living larger than the founders of Fendi
An Asiatic brother that many rappers envy
So round up your crew and entourage
And let the God Merciful just take charge

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Some of them said (said what?) that the Ak should quit
But I don't sweat it, cause I'm too big for that small shit
Like pigs when it comes to a showdown
Huff and puff but the Ak won't get blown down
Cause I come strong, rather than come at all and not be ready
That's what separates me from the petty
MC's gas themselves by drinking too much Getty
And get torn the fuck up like confetti
I'm rich and thick, your lyrics like Aunt Jemima
It doesn't take Keenan Ivory Wayans to know that I'mma
Get you sucker if you bite like a piranha
So save them preschool rhymes for the kids at Wonderama
Point blank, period, with no comma
Rhymes so dangerous, call for the homicide
Cause I knock 'em dead even when I'm at my worst
The only future that lies ahead of them is the lights from the hearse
Got game like a crackhead
But don't be misled, I keep rappers on lock like a dread
Knots in the head from the words that I said
So get a shovel and dig your grave cause the shit you talk is dead

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

I grab up girls like jacks
Add 'em on like tax, and I'm over like Hot Trax
As far as brothers are concerned a pressure cooker from start
To finish I diminish like a Cuisinart
Secondly, I'm sick of critics, who's necking me
(Ooh he got an afro) yo, but I got dough
Why's my name the Large Professor?
Cause I milked your cow in other words I hit your heifer
Don't talk about how you can break Rambo
That's just a bunch of mamba-ja-hambo
Propaganda, save it for Savanda
Joe and Amanda, Zach and Alexandra
Don't let the folks around your way puff your head
Cause you'll be the owner of a hospital bed
I'll kick fire out your ass so fast
You'll be as crispy as my man Bill Blass

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!



[Verse 1:]
Nasir bin Olu Dara bis do Allah
Fist full of dollars in a dice game god
D & D glass cloth Kangols guided by angel with white wings
Nas the Viking fresh from my ankles thankful
Gangster see gangster do I'm Langston Hughes predecessor
Gun on my dresser slang I use upset college professor
More knowledge than Webster dictionary obituary column plus sign 'em
The first fake rapper murdered for rhyming
The jig is up gut 'em like fish swiss cheese 'em up
My wrist is freezing up sick of these ducks on my hiatus
Poking out their chest like they tall as sky scrapers
But they small as a shanty in a African village
Soft as cotton candy we assassins and killers
Let shottie off in club floors pellets spraying your familia
You screaming like you love war

[Hook: repeat 2X]
Everybody's crazy
Somebody's gonna get shot get rob get done get stomp get drop
Ladies love thugs and my thug love hip hop
Thugs love ladies and ladies they love hip hop

[Nas:]
Peace fuck you with a fist in your ass
You pussy with yeast, you shook of the streets, you a Sisqó fag
You know blood baths I makes 'em fake thugs I hate 'em
8 slug I'm bustin' no discussion or waiting
Cause now Instead of coke rhymes it's laying
No analog it's digital criminals turned rapper times is changing
Niggas get flashier houses more plusher
Bitches giving ass up at ages more younger
Hands on the clock keep turning, hands on a Glock they keep squeezing
Bullets stop in your sternum they stop you from breathing
I'm light year far your mouth get all white
When I'm near you I frighten your heart
I want you to watch me notice stare look closely
Feel I'm who you posed to be real I know it hurts you
Soldiers approach you, you want to squash it, you older than most dudes
Although Nas did you and your whole crew, but

[Hook:]

[Verse 2:]
I know where niggas sleep; it's too many schemes too many plots
War plus money man I got too many spots
Hungry niggas get tutored to thinking new shit to come up
Killers fuck with killers you sleeping you getting stuck up
Not me your not ready I'm low but I be watching
We all connected so your man know my man
Your man knows my fam' they was cool when they was locked up
Beat cases and now niggas back on the block what
Bothers is taking secret routes when they drive
Tinted windows ears to the street stay on their job
Peep niggas that got prices on their head so high
Their own my will take the contract surprise
So we play a mental game intimidation
Got pussy niggas get pressed up on and paying
I wish these niggas would step up wait for the day an
Since I'm famous they thinking assault rifles won't be spraying
Who ever thinking coming to my vault for the safe
I got some niggas with acid get it thrown in your face
Play dirty catch your moms in J-30
Whatever whodie we all crazy we all 7:30 now

[Hook:]



[Intro]
New York city in the early morning after a night of no electric power. What it did have in the dark streets was a wild outburst of crime. Arson, looting, mugging, and a thousand false fire alarms. At 9:34 last night it all went black

[Verse 1]
I pour some Yac for the days of way back
The turn tables crates of wax turn to major to my earlier days
My world was ablaze, black outs in the summer
No electricity asked out
Breaking down doors, my city was hungry
We vandalized stores, poor
No lights in the project hall
Before the lootin' only 5 DJ crews was movin'
Till people stole DJ equipment the numbers risin'
Now there's friction
First time in Bronx history DJ's poppin' up, there's more mixin'
Everybody wants to be Flash
His name on the flier
The Grandmaster performin' live, no acclaim was higher
He was king and the dream was to be like 'em
Meanwhile C-Cypher's not around
Firehouses shut down
School was closed
Grandmaster (?) our domes with rules
Written inside the rap scrolls

[Interlude]
The revolution will not be televised

[Verse 2]
The revolution may not be televised
And we wonderin' who the hell is Koch
This man Koch wanted the mayor's seat
And he's campaignin' like he can't be stopped
Up in the Bronx they forever strong
Don't ever try to play 'em weak
The revolution may not ever be televised
Books command the speech

[Outro]
I want to stress first my total outrage that at this hour the city of New York is still without power



[Hook]
Yellow bird, yellow bird, yellow bird don't fly away x2
Not today

[Verse 1]
I'm in the game
Women only want my money or fame
Or they heard that Kendrick put them on blast
Or they feel I had so much ass
"What could he want from me? When he can have whoever he wants for company?"
The like, "he a slut, he a ho, he a freak
He my childhood crush, wish I met him '03
Now I need a simple life with a Christian man"
I was like, fuck it, get this money, get this power, keep slutting
Then I bumped into a cutie, looking at her
Not in a lusted matter, but in we need an introduction matter
Need her like fresh water from the springs of Florida
She hot for reasons more than one
Underneath the balling sun in Coachella where a I met her
She was staring
Since we began to hang, she my number one thing
Tell me your troubles, I'll listen, I'll try to numb your pain
You like to hug a king, I call you the color queen

[Hook]

[Verse 2]
Oh burn me love, it's not a drug nor complexion necessarily
It's an expression the canary sings
If that canary don't sing, I train her
On the wings of love, I took the top from the Wrangler
She riding shotgun with her shades on, a day will come
I'll put a natural yellow rock on your finger
Born a queen, love looking at you, smile made me change up
You a bright sunny morning, sex, amazing
I said it since day one, we was meant to be
When you put my clothes on and started posing like a G
Playfully with my chain then you liked what you see
Loving how daddy do it, no one quite like me
No games, no side chicks, me and my ride or die chick
We see eye to eye, maybe not when your heels are five inch
You so fly, you so mine, it's me you dine with
Fucking Nas with, later on we spawn

[Hook]



[Hook : Kids]
I know I can
Be what I wanna be
If I work hard at it
I'll be where I wanna be

I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be

[Verse 1 : Rakim]
I'm from the home of a million legends and trend settin
A lot of footsteps to follow, I've been steppin
Mind stressin tryin to find direction, crime spreading
Time precious, I ain't have rest since 9/11
I live fast, hustle like today is my last
I get cash, the struggle's like a day on the Ave
Crack, D and raw, gats squeezin off
Manhattan streets in awe from casualties of war
The eve of the Apocalypse, evil people in politics
Every block is at risk, the metropolitan metropolis
The opposite of Liza Minelli and Frank Sinatra
Alicia Keys, Nas and Ra the gangsta's opera
So New York City walk with me, talk gritty
It's up to us New York it's our city
Here the man come with the anthem, hands up
It's time the thrill is back New York, let's stand up

[Hook : Kids]
I know I can
Be what I wanna be
If I work hard at it
I'll be where I wanna be

I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Verse 2 : Nas]
For brothers who died from black-on-black violence
From here to the Dark Continent were rebels sell diamonds
To clients all over the world, got little Black girls dyin'
And can we please pour some more liquors?
For Will, Bokeem, Bar, Pappy -- my niggas
Here's another Warrior Song from Nasty and Quan
It's to him I pass the baton to carry this on
Street's Disciple, salute to those who's gone with bullets
And I promise through rhymin' Quan gon' rep his life to the fullest
And can we please have a moment of truth?
For soldiers and troops away with helmets and boots
And families back home who pray they make it home safe
Hopin' that they don't get hit with a stray or missiles
This is just a moment to let you all know that we miss you
Mommy I'm still here, wishin' I was there with you
Let's take 'em home

[Hook : Kids]
I know I can
Be what I wanna be
If I work hard at it
I'll be where I wanna be

I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Verse 3 : 2Pac]
I want money in large amounts, my garage full of cars that bounce
Movin' my tapes in major ways cause every dollar counts
Busters is jealous and half these niggas is punks
They runnin' off at the mouth 'til I fill it up with my pump
They jump, my automatic keep 'em wary
Why you frontin' like you Billy bad-ass, nigga you scary
I've been knowin' you for years, we was high school peers, in junior high
I was itchin' to kill, and you was, ready to die
While you bullshittin', niggas was dyin' and catchin' cases
Bustin' my automatics at motherfuckers in foreign places
Leavin' no trace, they see my face and they buried
Them bitches die in a hurry, still I ride, I'm never worried
Mr. Makaveli tell me to ride, and I'mma ride
Pick my enemies out the crowd, and motherfuckers die
It's not the way I wanna live, my nigga it's how it is
Homey got into a fight last night, that killed his kids
In this life I lead

[Hook : Nas + Kids]
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Hook : Kids]
I know I can (I know I can!)
Be what I wanna be (be what I wanna be!)
If I work hard at it (If I work hard it!)
I'll be where I wanna be (I'll be where I wanna be!)

[Bridge : Kids]
Ooohh

[Outro : Nas]
Save the music y'all, save the music y'all
Save the music y'all, save the music y'all
Save the music





Track List:
1. Surviving The Times
2. Less than an Hour
3. It Ain't Hard to Tell
4. Life's A Bitch
5. N.Y. State of Mind
6. One Love (from Illmatic)
7. If I Ruled the World (Imagine That)
8. Street Dreams (Remix) Feat. R. Kelly
9. Hate Me Now Feat. Puff Daddy
10. One Mic
11. Got Ur Self A ...
12. Made You Look
13. I Can
14. Bridging the Gap Feat. Olu Dara



[Intro - Rising Son]
Yo
Ha, Ha, Ha
DPP
Check, one two, one two
Who got more style than Son do?
None do (that's official)
Yeah, this is history right here (history)
Yo, Nas, Rising Son
Queensbridge to London
Let's go..

[Verse One - Rising Son]
Yo, Yo
This is the Thief's Theme
For the underground criminal street teams
Street dream chasing young hungry thugs that seek cream
Crack fiends and hatch schemes, knife-point robbery
Broad day blindeys, night-time thuggery
Sun down shinanigins, move without shadow...
...like ninjas, cat burglars, no fiasco
No commotion, make moves like locomotion
Crack-sport ambush, get the man bringing the coke in
Warehouse crime rate, mans throw they vans up
Bang job, "Freeze, everybody put your hands up"
Cash is nightmare, gun in ya faceplate
"It's not even ya money, don't make me put one in ya face, mate"
Thieves running this place, world trade, eight fare
Slave rift flashbacks; Bush killer, hate Blair!
Wish Mars was a mile away, cos I would escape there
On a Skyway railroad, to stick you from my tray fair, bitch...

Yeah, you know like when you kill somebody in Street Fighter
Uah, uah, uah, uah (fades)

[Re-Intro, Nas]

One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
{*rewind*}
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do
Check, one, two

[Verse 2 - Nas]
Yo I'm hot like 95 Fahrenheit
On a summer night, tight spot where bodies rot
Rats drink from water drops, in the streets niggas
Little kids scared cops, wit red dots
Philosophical gangsta, wit violent priors
Goin back like black and white TV's wit pliers
Leanin on broke down cars, wit flat tires
Flash iron, anybody tryin on, the blocks I'm supplyin on
Madicon, my peeps, tie ballons up
And swallow 'em and the P now got goons, lots of 'em
Cops see them and run, don't want no drama
Certain parts of the streets, the beast don't want a part of
Martyr, hood haunted like the Dakota
Where John Lennon was shot up, but he sang for peace
He begged for freedom, hanged wit wild Jamicians
From Kingston, who drink Irish Malts
Listenin to Peter Winston, Machintosh
Lightning hits the top of the church steeple
When I'm writin, semi-automatic no hyphen
It's frightening.... {*scratches*}

[Chorus]
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
Understandable smooth shit, that murderers move wit

[Verse 3 - Nas]
I take summers off, cause I love winter beef
Started '87, wit the shotty in the sheep
Three-quarter length beige, dressed to kill
Bust a shell at the ground, pellets hit the crowd
Nobody like a snitch, everybody shut they mouth
Woolrich, Carhart, gun powder stains
Smellin like trees, sensimille on the brain
Skeemin on ya girls, bambooze or ya chain
Got ill up on the train, twistin off a cap
Of a English in my vain, might of pushed you on the tracks
Deaf crack fiends, who can't speak, scream noises
Cause she bought a jum of soap, from one of my boys, it's
.... Just another day in the hood
And I'm, wit some wild brothers, up to no good
We saw the movies, like Tony Montana, and 'em
But our style was let them pile then, we robbin 'em
Money dudes, make 'em come up out they shoes
Run they jewels, word is bond, where my man Nino goin
And I had to make a song, speakin on my old life
For the thief's who come out at night

[Chorus]

[Outro]
One, two
Check, one, two {*echoes*}
One, two
Check, one, two
One, two, who got more style, the son do {*echoes*}
{*explosion*}



[Intro: Nas]
Every fucking day (3), everyday niggas
Look around niggas (3)
What you gon' to do 'bout it nigga? (3)
What you gotta say 'bout it nigga? (3)
That's right (3), that's right (3)
Run all over y'all niggas (3)
What y'all gon' do 'bout it? (3)

(Chorus: Nas)
Uh, Bossed Up when we roll (3)
Uh, Bossed Up in control (3)
Uh, Bossed Up when we roll (3)
Uh yea, Bossed Up in control (3)
Always, Uh, Bossed Up when we roll (3)
Yea uh, Bossed Up in control (3)
Yea uh, Bossed Up when we roll (3)
Bossed Up in control (3)
(Braaaaave)
Tossed up and get folded (3)

[Nashawn]
Yo, it ain't nutting else to do but party
Life is to short, you'll get bodied
Killers do killings for hobbies
I want a bad singing bitch to ride by me
Like Whitney did Bobby
With the future I'll take Ashanti
I'll settle for actress like Halle
Who workout and keep a tight body
Love how I polly probably
We into money like Bill Cosby
Kill somebody in your crib
Like Jayson Williams shotty did
With no accidents
Tryna to keep my hands on these Presidents
Til I'm a veteran, mind over medicine, Coke game to Heroin
Nigga only die once, you can't be dead again
Another bitch in my bed when you got here
Popped off in Delaware, top price to fight anywhere
New years, it's Nashawn coward
On them corners niggas get devoured
I spit outage, straight foulness, where you're crowded
Clowns get... straight lynched, nooses hanging over the tree
Tell your self you can't fuck with me, BITCH!

(Chorus: Nas)

[Nas]
Riding in my city on haze
Eyes on a million and one ways
To get paid and my goose is cooked
Rocking gear that some boosters took
Either mass market or target I maneuver the look
From soul food to Nobu, I'm schooling the cooks
Studio, old school, or pro tools, nigga, I'm O'Douls
That means no booze, I only gets greens
I got a inf beam that lay on the fifth lean
That sprays up your clique team
Indigenous but frivolous, different whips riding sideways
Nas pays attention to the littlest shit?
Mentioned by itty-bitty rappers with their chitty-chatter
Encircle their soul, purple, I smoke O's
Perverse verses poke holes, nigga, I birth flows
Tatted, fitted hat, savage, y'all aggie
Line us up, ask me who fathered their style
I say, "I the pappy"
High in the backseat, flat feet
Passerby's think I'm an athlete
Chris Childs or the rapper Lil Scrappy
So I sign their name, just as happy
Diamond chain, wrist is flashy
Times change, but this nigga's still nasty



[Nas]
"What we need to be thinkin' about is the future!
We don't know what's in store tomorrow!
All we can do is just guess! We want the best for tomorrow;
For our family, for our children, for our future
But if we don't get up andact like we want it
We gotta pray to somebody! We ain't to tough to pray!
You walkin' around like a gangsta, gangstas pray! Thugs pray!
Tell me somethin'; if you ain't prayin', where would y'all be today?
Where would y'all momma be today? How would you be here?
Somebody prayin' for you, nigga!"

[Horse]
I never thought bein' a man you could hang in the end
Facin' life with no parol and consecut' sentencin'
Got people witnessin', your co-defendent snitchin'
Your back against the wall, your left eye is twitchin'
Loyal ladies usual, a D-and A's the mutual
Scared to face the light of a courtroom site
Racist cops on each side cause the know I just might
Make a break for the door but I give it my all
If I die in this struggle, give my momma a call
Cause she always left these jewels: what goes up must fall
Since I fell dead broke, landed in jail
Refused to face the facts, how wifey skipped to town with the bail
I'm on my own now, V8, far away from home now
Palmer wealth state, the law changes each date
Secret inditements got me knocked, there ain't no price I can pay
To get me the fuck up out this shit, so to Allah I pray
For forgiveness - Yes, I sinned and I need to be held
And jail ain't no place a black man wanna be killed
Amen

I only pray when shit is fucked up!
I only pray when my life is lookin' bad luck!
I only pray when I'm in mothafuckin' handcuffs!
Callin' out for someone, somewhere!
Is there anybody out there?

[Wiz]
I look up at the sky, why do young niggas die?
Felt the stray hit me, somebody stay with me
Fallin' to the ground with the sound of a four-pound near me
Bitches screamin', wish I was dreamin'
I fought a thousand gun fights, near one bullet skipped me
On the morning run to get my little sisters Rice Krispies
Played the numbers knowin' that I got my lucky dice wit' me
See some niggas I know I can roll - Uh, uh!
Get them bitches, left all of them broke, left what they smoke
Hoes yellin', 'Watch ya back!'
But before I could turn around, before I could I react
Blaow! Blaow! Blaow! Would you look at me now?
Is this blood that I feel as I fell to the ground?
Feel like a head shot but maybe just grazed my temple
Niggas diggin' in my pockets, sayin' I just rolled a pimple
Yo, my mouth was movin' but it was nothin' I was sayin'
Only if they knew deep inside my mind, I was prayin'
Amen

I only pray when shit is fucked up!
I only pray when my life is lookin' bad luck!
I only pray when I need his help the most, what?!
Callin' out to someone, somewhere!
Yo, is anybody out there?

[Jungle]
Ain't nothin' stoppin' me - Untouchable - Hoes, I fucked a few
Style like The Greatest, Ali - Check what the knuckle do
Rock bubblegoose to mink, big links
Yellow ice, live the ghetto life, 'fuck y'all think?
Bravehearted; fuck around, get graveyarded
Dearly departed - The word on the street, I'm a target
I ain't runnin', I ain't hidin', I'm ridin'
I be gunnin', y'all be duckin' and divin'
When I come through buckin' this four-fivin'
Revenge you sayin' you gettin'
But shit is gettin' too wild, this lifestyle of sprayin' weapons
So I check out the preacher - Life is off the meter
Thoughts of homicide, tryin' to dodge the reaper
Confessions in a church cause it hurts, behind a curtain
Nigga talkin' to me, but I ain't certain
Voice sound familiar so I pulled the shade back
It was this stupid nigga that I popped way back
He set me up, he just got to the preist
I tried to reach but he had his heat pointed my way
And said, 'Pray'

[Nas]
"You've got to pray, huh! I mean pray, pray
And when you pray, you got to look up to the lord, huh!
You got to look up and you got to pray for your children, huh!
You got to pray for that man in front of the liquor store, huh!
You got to pray for that man on the corner! He know he doin' wrong
But somebody gotta pray for him, huh! You know we doin' wrong
But we gotta pray for ourselves! You know we are headin'
To this new millennium, goddamnit! They say a comet is comin'
To this world by the year two-thousand, I say it's God! It's up to you
To pray to that higher power higher than yourself and humble yourself
And, and, and beg for forgiveness cause it comes back to you!
A man told me that while he was in jail, all he did was pray
All he did was stay in his jail cell and pray to God..."



[Nas (Akon)]
Shakedown (Uh-oh-oh); Akon, Nas, here we go New York
(Uh-oh-oh) Here we go world, here we go y'all
(Uh-oh-oh, Cause it's a shakedown, uh-oh-oh)

[Ali Vegas]
The streets'll do whatever just to see me fail
Mama'll do whatever to keep free from jail
So she tellin' me to get my CDL
But papi said he got some things that we could sell
To turn the corner and to see VVS's
He said you liked girls to get beneath their dresses
You gon' need them SS's, VVS's, BBS's
Here go the keys to the Lexus (Uh-oh-oh)
Now I'm the center of attention like Kareem and them
My squad run around the borough like we Prem' and them
My gang with big truck, wifey's we beamin' them
Let's Esco, that tag team from Queens again
This is Shakedown, here go the breakdown
The big boys are back; 'lil niggas get off the playground
I got up with the homey A now
The kid babies 'bout to make the Earth quake now

[Hook: Akon (Nas)]
Uh-oh-oh, we back now
A bunch of gangsters strapped so make a way now
When they come wavin' them gats you know the lay down (Lay it down)
And give 'em all you got, cause it's a shakedown (Shakedown)
Uh-oh-oh, (New York to H-Town)
We back now (Here we go y'all)
A bunch of gangsters strapped so make a way now
When they come wavin' them gats you know the lay down
(Uh-oh, Nas and Akon, uh-oh, Nas and Akon)
And give 'em all you got, cause it's a shakedown
Uh-oh-oh, (Here we go)

[Nas]
My man was smart
Robbed the bank, buried the cash
Did ten years, came home and bought him a Jag
Other side of town, stick-up kids ride around
Young niggas not prepared this time around
Walk in the jewelry store yellin', "Get on the floor"
Snatched the sales lady up, hit her with the bulldog
Grabbin' the ice, the heist went fast as the Vice
Had rushed in, bussin', could you imagine this life?
The streets come alive and laugh at your sorrows
Leavin' your soul hollow
That you fill it back up liquor bottles
Black Messiah had the jux, 20 ki's uncooked
Easy to push, some Japanese dealers were crooks
They leave niggas eyes cut out; what it means to us
He seen too much, but we don't give a fuck
Black truck pull up to the door
Infa-green night vision lens we can see through the war
"Get on the floor"

[Hook: Akon]
We back now
A bunch of gangsters strapped so make a way now
When they come wavin' them gats you know the lay down
And give 'em all you got, cause it's a shakedown
Uh-oh-oh
Do I make myself clear, uh-oh-oh



Yo, this is Nas, the rebel to America
I load the clips 'til my lips are crass, cracked
Like a vet buggin out from flashbacks
My raps I shoot at your skull will leave yah sprung
I'm wavin' automatic guns at nuns
Paragraph wizard makin' mics malfunction
I blow the fuse with the style I choose
Science, dropped, my raps are toxic
My voicebox locks and accels like a rocket
Nas assasinates the Pope with a scope
I mutilate mics 'til my voicebox is broke
Try to battle me and gag for breath
Words I speak is a step beyond death
A rapper Charles Manson, I'm just that odd
I'm so strong, long enough to box with God
I throw a pitch at your brain so try and catch it
My thought are bugged, my brains should be put in a straight jacket
I'm nastier than cannibalism
My sharp is a shank in prison, thoughts abrupt, risen
My rap is a ritual of Satan
Though I'm not demonic, my voice is electronic
My brain is deranged
In a metamorphic change, my soundwaves are strange
Many say that I'm propelled to Hell
But I met the Devil and wrecked his brain cell
Police murderer, I love to kill a black cop
Nasty Nas is as deadly as a crack spot



[Hook:]
It ain't hard to tell
(Nasty)
(Nasty)
(Nasty)

[Verse 1:]
It ain't hard to tell, I excel then prevail
The mic is contacted, I attract clientele
My mic check is life or death, breathing a sniper's breath
I exhale the yellow smoke of buddha through righteous steps
Deep like the Shining, sparkle like a diamond
Sneak a Uzi on the island in my army jacket lining
Hit the Earth like a comet – invasion!
Nas is like the Afrocentric Asian, half-man, half-amazing
Cause in my physical, I can express through song
Delete stress like Motrin, then extend strong
I drink Moet with Medusa, give her shotguns in hell
From the spliff that I lift and inhale, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x2

[Verse 2:]
The buddha monk's in your trunk, turn the bass up
Not stories by Aesop, place your loot up, parties I shoot up
Nas, I analyze, drop a jewel, inhale from the L
School a fool well, you feel it like Braille, it ain't hard to tell
I kick a skill like Shaquille holds a pill
Vocabulary spills I'm Ill plus Matic
I freak beats, slam it like Iron Sheik
Jam like a Tec with correct techniques
So analyze me, surprise me, but can't magnetize me
Scannin' while you're plannin' ways to sabotage me
I leave 'em froze like her-on in your nose
Nas'll rock well, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x2

[Verse 3:]
This rhythmatic explosion is what your frame of mind has chosen
I'll leave your brain stimulated, niggas is frozen
Speak with criminal slang, begin like a violin
End like Leviathan, it's deep, well let me try again
Wisdom be leaking out my grapefruit, troop
I dominate break loops, giving mics men-e-strual cycles
Street's disciple, I rock beats that's mega trifle
And groove even smoother than moves by Villanova
You're still a soldier, I'm like Sly Stone in Cobra
Packing like a Rasta in the weed spot, vocals'll squeeze Glocks
MC's eavesdrop though they need not to sneak
My poetry's deep, I never fail
Nas's raps should be locked in a cell, it ain't hard to tell

[Hook:] x2

[Outro:] x5
(Nasty!)



[Bobby Byrd:] ("GET INVOLVED!!!" GET INVOLVED!!!" GET INVOLVED!!!" GET INVOLVED!!!")

[Intro: Nas]
Hold up, hold up, hold up man, this is Nas, hip hop still dead
1980's, I need all my pioneers to set it off on this one right here
I asked where they are, here they are

[Verse 1: MC Shan (Nas)]
Hip Hop when niggas knew the art of war (Shan!!!)
Rough rhymes that's what gave the hard the core
Now it's all good best friends became gladiators
Matter fact you blow more steam than hot gladiators
Some niggas is ghost written but I ain't hatin (80's!!!)
Cause I still spit fire like the Son of Satan
Shan motherfucker and I'm Queensbridge bred
Check Myspace (Queens!!!) Forever will they bare my face

[Verse 2: Raheem from The Furious Five (Nas)]
Who said lightnin can't strike in the same place twice
Trailblaze the game, made for life stayed nice
Yeah you made the Top 50, don't mention my name (Here they are!!!)
I had you open before crack, cocaine grow-in
Before The Fever, before +Missy's+ first +Misdemeanor+
Before Run's, first pair of Adidas, got heaters
And I pop pop, pop, pop, heaters
Stop dealers, on my block was the first hot wheeler

[Verse 3: Doctor Ice from UTFO (Nas)]
You never knew (1980's y'all!!!) Somethin so butter could come from the gutter
I'm, Doctor Ice the diamond the cutter
Like, Jacob The Jeweler and Rick is The Ruler (UTFO!!!)
Boogie Down Kris is The Teacher but Doc run the schoolin
Y'all got y'all, sneakers and beepers, your dutches and reefas
We got our, eight tracks and sneakers, our hookers and reefers
My work is, never in vain, born to insert
So even when I'm buried, I'm still the diamond in the dirt, let's work

[Verse 4: Kangol from UTFO (Nas) {Ladies Screaming Kangol's name}]
{Go Kangol!!} Yeah what's up fam?
My chick for twenty years tried to cut your man
She tried to take the house, the kids, the pots and pans
I'm on to project Plan B, nigga fuck Roxanne!!! (Get focused y'all!!!)
Tried to take the pot I piss in, now the chick outta my system
The whooped niggas need to listen listen listen listen
Cock aim fire don't you miss 'em miss 'em miss 'em
And every chance you get you diss 'em diss 'em diss 'em diss 'em

[Chorus: Nas]
HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
{Aww man, make me feel like I'm back in the days with my cassette player, tape in the radio y'all!!!}
(Where are they now?)
{Your man Nas, I asked y'all where they at? The pioneers I got love for them man that's why I'm doin this}
{I got love for them man, so here they are two thousand and seven, yeah}
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)

[Verse 5: Kool Moe Dee (Nas)]
Where am I? On high with a pen
Blessed manifest rhyme god transcend (Pay attention y'all)
You call him God's Son, I call him God sent
First the God sent me, then the God Rakim
How can Nas not win when the God sent him
To resurrect true rhyme God kingdom
You should say amen when you see me
When you pray I'm him then you believe me

[Verse 6: Sha Rock from Funky Four +1 (Nas)]
Yeah! Sha ready to rise, ready to blaze somethin
Mother of the mic so I'm here to claim somethin
I got the munchies for the vultures that crushed the culture
Yo Nas brought us back on this track so bring it back (They don't stop y'all!)
From dusk to dawn equip the mic on my palm
I bring the love so you can get it on
Got the books on lock, mother of hip hop
For realla, come under from some of you niggas

[Verse 7: Tito from Fearless Four (Nas)]
You cats is foul frontin like you hard as a rock
When these brothers were the buildin blocks, that made you turn up the box
Doug E. Fresh and The Get Fresh Crew, To Markie D and Cool Rock (Know your history y'all!!!)
Rest in peace to the Human Beat Box (Know your history!)
Like when I first heard Jay, Darryl and Joe, saw a UTFO
I knew right then and there I wanna blow
There need to be a museum where everybody could see 'em
Said everybody take some pedium, and get respect

[Verse 8: Grandmaster Caz from The Cold Crush Brothers]
You got another thing comin if you think me and my man ain't sellin
Got more gold than Mr. Drum and we sellin
Through Welcome To The Terrordome, niggas are ever wrong
That's why you get no ends, but just in case
You got a death wish, for flare for the dramatics
There's some static in the attic {?} hid it looking at it
I'm a 'matic, nice to the fifth power son and I'm still at it
I was about to flip power son 'til I saw a vision, Caz!!!

[Chorus: Nas]
HEY!! Where are, where they nooooooow, huuuhhhhhooohhh HEY!)
{Grandmaster Caz, y'all know what this is do y'all know what this means!!!}
{The fact, that each brother got on this track, the fact, that each sister got on this track}
(Where are they now?)
{To rap, took time out of there schedule, when y'all ain't even got no love}
{But they still givin y'all love, that's hip hop y'all}
(HEY! Hit me! Where are they nooooooow?)
{Give it up to the OG's the original gangstas of Rap, yeah}

[Verse 9: Linque AKA Isis from X-Clan]
Nas you had to ask Linque, where you been?
Rippin on the mics with the devilish grin
Sort of like a tack cause I stay under they skin
Cause when I open up my mouth I blow them chicks to the wind
Don't get besides yourself like you Siamese twins [Professor X:] ("This is protected!")
Still got the pen to make the ?message of sin? ("By the red, the black")
You bring it back I do it over again ("and the green")
Exposin those who pretend, stay on my grind 'til the end

[Verse 10: Dana Dane (Nas)]
First there was a tree and a MC grew and became (Brooklyn!)
Another rapper born in Queens, 9/6 the b-day
Moms moved and born {?}, dad hit the freeway
My young life was screenplay, better yet a cliché (I can't believe it!)
To rap in the eight-tay, no lenses in the east-say?
They say we were a fad but fad don't add reggae
We played by the D-Day, eveyday, Eve's day
Capital D-A-N-E and hip hop, must be in it

[Verse 11: Pebblee Poo from Def Committee (Nas)]
C'mon! Well I'm the ?wa-say-why? with the with the same crew
First name Pebblee, last name Poo (Oh!)
Gina Parks? says a {?} I'm a leader, theiver, greeter
Last mark the game like Run and them Adidas (Do the history ya'll!!!)
I'm a real estate investor but, I still blessed her
Microphone teacher outta Alpha Four ?"Beavers?
Hold on I get deeper, dope b-boy speaker
Practice what I preach-a, DAMN I'm a keepr, huh

[Verse 12: Just Ice (Nas)]
Just the mic and make 'em stand up [RAW!]
Lyrics are legendary status so get ya hands up
Clap to the freestyle (Just Ice!) dance, but in the meanwhile
Cool calm collected, smooth that's how I get down
Then at the stage, hold 'em up like a twelve gauge
Page after page, all you see is a pure rage!
So pass the gat, grab ?taps? for the beat
Just Ice signing off [Whaaat?!] Yo I'm out y'all, PEACE!!!!!

[Outro: Nas]
Yo that's incredible man play that again!!!



They dug me out the soil in the Mines of the Motherland
Now I'm misplaced, one hand to another hand
Illegal smugglin', people strugglin'
Wish they could just throw me back in the mud again
Yeah, guess that's how we got here
Slave Trade then the Diamond Trade
Every child's afraid
When his Mother and Father get sprayed
Forced in the Army, young killer Brigade
Gets a new name and then he give his nose glue
Til' his mind can't take what he's gon' through
Lookin' in that dirt for that ice so blue
Then The Royal Family, the ice goes to
And this thing has to change, feelin' half-ashamed
As I rap with my Platinum chain
When you shop for a gift for me
You think about the misery?
The same way we made Apartheid History
We can do the same thing to the conflict ice
But everybody wanna shine, right?

[HooK: Nas]
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants Diamonds without the Bloodshed
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants Diamonds without the Bloodshed
They wanna Shine on 'em
Shine on 'em X 7

[Verse 2: Nas]
My VVS glimmers on my chest
200-thou-encrusted watch on my wrist
I wonder how people starve to death
When God bless the land that lacks the harvest
The stone's equality, but they homes are poverty
And the whole world ignores the robbery
Bought my girl pretty rocks when she's mad at me
Tear-drop shaped, uh, perfect Clarity
It shocks, so many are killed annually
'Cause of greed, lust, and pure Vanity
Stop talkin' and do somethin' about it
Every Holiday Season, Jewelry stores crowded
Kids snatched from their homes, Mutilated alive
Husbands separated from wives, keep a Jesus piece to be fly
But back in the day there was a time when they called us shine

[HooK: Nas]
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants Diamonds without the Bloodshed
Everybody wants Heaven but nobody wants dead
Everybody wants Diamonds without the Bloodshed
They wanna shine on 'em
Shine on 'em X 7



[Nas]
Alright, are you sure

[Kelis]
Yeah, I'm sure
So wait, you're telling me there's no-
You can't think of anybody
In your past, in your dirty dark crazy past (Nas laugh)
So if I gave you a free pass, you wouldn't wanna do them just one last time

[Nas]
No

[Kelis]
Come on

[Nas]
No

[Kelis]
I don't believe you, all them-
All them bitches?
I'm serious, okay I'm saying you have
Before we get married you have one free pass
I don't need to know about it

[Nas]
Mhm...

[Kelis]
But it's one girl, there's one girl that you had in the past that you could say
"You know what? Let me hit that one more time"

[Nas]
Ah, I can't really think of nobody
Definitely ain't nobody 'cause I've been there, done that
You know, let me go through it



[Intro: Nas]
Man, we love you man, you hear me?
This is coming from the General man, Nas man
Bravehearts love you man, this is to all of ya niggas
Who been using my name from day one to make yourselves famous
Whether you shouting me out on your records
Whether you try to come at me on your records, or whether you just you know...?
You know... you know how you dick riding man? This goes out to ya
Cause we love you man, I've done made a lot of niggas famous man
But I'm gon' make you...I make you make the papers, this one's for you
Ayo, word up
It been a lot of times when a nigga ain't wanna fuck with this rap shit no more
Fuck this shit, but you know...? Through the year I started to see shit, you knowamsayin?
Nigga see niggas driving around with fancy cars, diamonds, all that shit
Niggas thinking a nigga chilling
Got to go through a whole bunch of big shit, all that bullshit
But you know what? Fuck that shit, you know how I feel? Yo

[Chorus: Nas]
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's the life baby, you gots to understand it's life baby
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's the life baby, you gots to understand it's life baby

[Verse 1: Nas]
I got the mansion and the nice ride
Platinum chain, and an ice watch
All this fame in my life's hard
I entertain in so many places
See so many different faces
They look the same from the stages
After the concert, hours of long work
Home sick from the road, smoking my lungs hurt
Even though now I'm recording songs
It's better than, when I was peddling, doing wrong
I brought the crew along, we thugging
Fucking married bitches; they go to their husbands
Bitches ain't shit, we laughing with them
Can't even role the streets now, without the heat
I bust the nigga off impost, that shit is weak
On trial, what I'ma tell the judge
He don't give me no smile, he don't give me no love, nor the jury
That's when I need celeb status and the blackness
This motherfucker's hate rappers, what a life

[Chorus: Nas]
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby

[Verse 2: Nas]
My girl hate when I'm with my boys
Think I'm cheating, every morning knocking at my door
State policeman, give him a reason, but I don't give it to him
They said they heard a disturbance, and I just listen to him
See, I cooperate until they push me
Cops hate when you know the law, you ain't pussy
You not fake, can't explain how much I miss the block
When we was slinging with my niggas, screaming "Fuck the cops!"
Now when I'm dreaming I can see my dead friends smile
Wake up, I get some air, hit the mall for a while - pick up some gear
I'm going to the studio; my engineer put the track up from "out west"
And he told me spit it clear
Another hit just made, another album
So ones again we getting paid, and now we wilding
Get hype to shoot the video, all in the city yo
I'm hoping that a nigga blow, but ya don't hear me though

[Chorus: Nas]
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby

[Verse 3: Nas]
The haters say I ain't shit
Hope I fall, but I can't slip
Got to ball, got to bank chips
Old ladies hate my moms cause their kids ain't amount to nothing
Catch my moms on the bench fronting
I got to stay awake, got to pray today
Glad I'm still alive, fuck what them haters say
So many times I ain't wanna rhyme
Wanted a normal life where I ain't Nas all the time
So many problems too, do what I got to do
As long as my moms say, "Boy, I'm proud of you"
I keep laying hits, winners never quits
Plus if I stop, how would I stay legit?

[Chorus: Nas]
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby
I'm never gonna give it up, fuck that
I made a mil', but that ain't good enough
Ocean and a beach so I can really live it up
See, that's my life baby, you gots to understand my life baby



[Verse 1]
What up kid? I know shit is rough doing your bid
When the cops came you should have slid to my crib
Fuck it, black, no time for looking back it's done
Plus congratulations, you know you got a son
I heard he looks like ya, why don't your lady write ya?
Told her she should visit, that's when she got hyper
Flipping, talking 'bout he acts too rough
He didn't listen he be riffing while I'm telling him stuff
I was like yeah, shorty don't care, she a snake too
Fucking with them niggas from that fake crew that hate you
But yo, guess who got shot in the dome-piece?
Jerome's niece, on her way home from Jones Beach
It's bugged, plus little Rob is selling drugs on the dime
Hanging out with young thugs that all carry nines
And night time is more trife than ever
What up with Cormega, did you see him, are y'all together?
If so then hold the fort down, represent to the fullest
Say what's up to Herb, Ice and Bullet
I left a half a hundred in your commissary
You was my nigga when push came to shove, one what? (One love)

[Hook: Nas and Q-Tip] x5
One Love

[Verse 2]
Dear Born, you'll be out soon, stay strong
Out in New York the same shit is going on
The crackheads stalking, loudmouths is talking
Hold, check out the story yesterday when I was walking
That nigga you shot last year tried to appear
Like he hurting something, word to mother, I heard him fronting
And he be pumping on your block, your man gave him your Glock
And now they run together, what up son, whatever
Since I'm on the streets I'mma put it to a cease
But I heard you blew a nigga with a ox for the phone piece
Wilding on the Island, but now in Elmira
Better chill cause them niggas will put that ass on fire
Last time you wrote you said they tried you in the showers
But maintain when you come home the corner's ours
On the reals, all these crab niggas know the deal
When we start the revolution all they probably do is squeal
But chill, see you on the next V-I
I gave your ma duke's loot for kicks, plus sent you flicks
Your brother's buckwilding in 4-Main, he wrote me
He might beat his case, 'til he come home, play it low key
So stay civilized, time flies
Though incarcerated your mind die, I hate it when your moms cries
It kinda makes me want to murder, for reala
I even got a mask and gloves to bust slugs but one love

[Hook: Nas and Q-Tip] x5
One Love

[Verse 3]
Sometimes I sit back with a Buddha sack
Mind's in another world thinking how can we exist through the facts
Written in school text books, bibles, et cetera
Fuck a school lecture, the lies get me vexed-er
So I be ghost from my projects, I take my pen and pad
For the weekend hittin L's while I'm sleeping
A two day stay, you may say I need the time alone
To relax my dome, no phone, left the nine at home
You see the streets had me stressed something terrible
Fucking with the corners have a nigga up in Bellevue
Or HDM, hit with numbers from 8 to 10
A future in a maximum state pen is grim
So I comes back home, nobody's out but Shorty Doo-Wop
Rolling two phillies together in the Bridge we called 'em oo-wops
He said "Nas, niggas cold be busting off the roof
So I wear a bullet proof and pack a black trey-deuce"
He inhaled so deep, shut his eyes like he was sleep
Started coughing, one eye peeked to watch me speak
I sat back like The Mack, my army suit was black
We was chilling on these benches where he pumped his loose cracks
I took the L when he passed it, this little bastard
Keeps me blasted and starts talking mad shit
I had to school him, told him don't let niggas fool him
Cause when the pistol blows the one that's murdered be the cool one
Tough luck when niggas are struck, families fucked up
Coulda caught your man, but didn't look when you bucked up
Mistakes happen, so take heed never bust up
At the crowd catch him solo, make the right man bleed
Shorty's laugh was cold blooded as he spoke so foul
Only twelve trying to tell me that he liked my style
Then I rose, wiping the blunt's ash from my clothes
Then froze only to blow the herb smoke through my nose
And told my little man I'mma ghost, I paused
Left some jewels in his skull that he can sell if he chose
Words of wisdom from Nas: try to rise up above
Keep an eye out for Jake, Shorty Wop, one love

[Hook: Nas and Q-Tip] x10
One Love



(feat. Foxy Brown & AZ)

Verse One: Foxy Brown
Check it, uhh
Protect this, nigga for the necklace
I throw the death wish , the pretty slim sex shit
The rep this, remember Fox said this
We on some next shit, we are blessed this
The scares on our backs mean we met this
The lie for them, for 25 sentence
To keep my eyes on 'em, I straight knowin' when the light shine on 'em
Shitty drugs and drama, oppposite three pretty thugs and a don momma
Fillin' the rest, the steel in they chest
And Boogs threw the kiss of death, it was over
And we laid out, chill I was open off the way he ate out
It was real, for real I was fuckin' wit' mills and he was frag-ile
We wowin', the brown stallion
Stay stylin', on the low foulin'
The whole Firm woulin', we lucked it
I know the trick bitch he fuck with, on some duct shit
Heard through the grade that she sucked it, Firm Sos and Esco
Mad loco, Fox and Mega for whatever and through this chedda
We gon' stay family, till we fry though
The fam will never split even if one of us die though
Along with our get go's, we gon' blaze til it brick-o's
Peep the na na, sweet taboo
The Firm tattoo on the tha tha, now tell me what crew
Hold it down like we do da da

Verse Two: Az the Vizuiliza
Till the death of this, murderous moves persue effortless
Ice neckalce, high priced dressed executives
Peep the grammer, flim built strong stamina
Forty-four nickel plate long with the silencer
Play for keeps in shut eye you stay sleep shit
Remain deep in ???? thrown at ya veins jeeps
Juiliani suite got all the kings goin' up for creek
Devil like biz now, who left his twirl in the streets
No intelligence, stritcly slow niggas minds with ????
It's evident, Feds mess up paid ya residents
We all for livin', heavyweight Firm division
Mine, I check mine ?Iaswines? is my religion
You know the stees, take aim, cock and squeeze
It's the prophecies, got the philosciphies Socrates
Next up

Verse Three: Cormega
Yo I believe that's me (yo Mega represent for the family)
Aye yo, the Feds fot me in the top ten, cuz when my door got knocked in
A four four man's hoped in, my sinister mind
Shines like a Dilinger, Mega exhaulted Babyface crime emperor
Yo life is based on cultures and creeds, and feed the way
Be the thug nigga sess, I've seen niggas tied up
Handcuffed and ????, cold crisis is live when drugs supply driver
The Millenium drives up, rimes and my blinds ya eyes temporarily
Nas and Mega be heavily armed for felony, John you could never see
The next fat cat of NYC, It Was Written like ghetto life heirogriphics
Livin' since my real niggas bailed me out of prision, a lot of scams
Cause the narcotics beamin', Queens had marked dollars
And the knowledge of thieves, my dream is the legacy
Of my penetentary, fake thugs couldn't even take gloves to burry me

Verse Four: Nas Escobar
To all theroughbreds takin' the corners, ya'll need to join us
Firm most powerful nation of rap performers, high class generals
Confidence, payin' lawyers
Swift as Oscar Delaholia, green berett warriors
Fakes I keep them like the John Kennedy tape, in the new with two
Bustin' all in they face, I'm never worried cause your see through
My man built the Sugar Hill from sweet tooth, we all eat
Cause we I speak truth, uneducated black youth
Street diploma, teach Greeks and Romans but the legacy was stollen
It's a Firm thing, generally green I wrote the theme
On how to sell a million while ya cats are mad at ya promotion team
I roll with the nice as Fox, black ice pushin' whips without a license
Yeah, tight as five strokes, Nas got 19 wifies
Seven sheisty, nine of them Piceses
Three white meats under tight cheese, woulin'
Big links is heavy like bricks, used to want a pitbull
While feedin' them raw steak, it's core take
More cake, I take the time off the so-called king of the town
And lock it down



[Verse 1]

I sip the blood of Christ from a gold cup
I love this life
My soldiers smoke you, no price
Dead men in graves roll over
I'm part Apache, slave master, African, who asked me
Fans tear my clothes, bitches try to trap me
30,000 seats rise to their feet to hear me flow
Got two mansions on the East Coast
Models deep throat
I heard about them kidnap dudes, had dinner with some
Shake hands with killers just to see who really was one
Study his moves, how he look fake - but that's the trick to it
Now we turn you to bait
The street shit I stick to it
Rappers hate me, bitches saying, "how did he start?"
They go to psychics asking 'em for my astrology chart
I'm the righteous thug, fight for Mumia
Racist white judge - made Diallo's murderers free
See, they don't like us
And what about conspiracies to kill black boys
But y'all ain't hearing me, worship the planet like asteroids
Look around and everything you see was once an idea
From somebody's thoughts who turned into reality clear
Look at the tallest sky scrapers, it just didn't appear
Somebody thought it up and built it up and put it right there

[Hook]

Aye-yo rich niggas burn and roll up in Testarossa's
Poor niggas plan to come up they cop the toasters
Dead niggas lay in they grave and roll over
But it is too late, too late
Aye-yo rich niggas burn and roll up in Testarossa's
Poor niggas plan to come up they cop the toasters
Dead niggas lay in they grave and roll over
But it is too late, too late
Aye-yo Aye-yo Aye-yo



Verse One:
What up kid? I know shit is rough doing your bid
When the cops came you shoulda slid to my crib
Fuck it black, no time for looking back it's done
Plus congratulations you know you got a son
I heard he looks like you, why don't your lady write you?
Told her she should visit, that's when she got hyper
Flippin, talkin about he acts too rough
Ge didn't listen he be riffing while I'm telling him stuff
I was like yeah, shorty don't care, she a snake too
Fucking with them niggas from that fake crew that hate you
But yo, guess who got shot in the dome-piece?
Jerome's niece, on her way home from Jone's beach, it's bugged
Plus little rob is selling drugs on the dime
Hanging out with young thugs that all carry 9's
At night time it's more trife than ever
Whattup with Cormega, did you see 'em, are y'all together?
If so then hold the fort down, represent to the fullest
Say whassup to herb, ice and bullet
I left a half a hundred in your commissary
You was my nigga when push came to shove
One what? 'One Love'

Verse Two:
Dear born, you'll be out soon, stay strong
Out in New York the same shit is going on
The crack-heads stalking, loud-mouths is talking
Hold, check out the story yesterday when I was walking
The nigga you shot last year tried to appear like he hurting something
Word to mother, I heard him fronting
And he be pumping on your block your man gave him your Glock
And now they run together, what up son, whatever
Since I'm on the streets I'ma put it to a cease
But I heard you blew a nigga with an ox for the phone piece
Wiling on the island but now with el mara
Better chill 'cos them niggas will put that ass on fire
Last time you wrote you said they tried you in the showers
But maintain when you come home the corner's ours
On the reals, all these crab niggas know the deal
When we start the revolution all they probably do is squeal
But chill, see you on the next VI
I gave your mom dukes loot for kicks plus sent your flicks
Your brother's buck wiling in four maine he wrote me
He might beat his case, 'til he come home I play it low key
So stay civilized, time flies though incarcerated your mind dies
I hate it when your mom's cries
It kinda wants to make me murder, for real-a
I've even got a mask and gloves to bust slugs but One Love

Verse Three:
Sometimes I sit back with a Buddha sack
Mind's in another world thinking how can we exist through the facts
Written in school text books, bibles, etcetera
Fuck a school lecture, the lies get me vexed-er
So I be ghost from my projects
I take my pen and pad for the weekend hitting Ls while I'm sleeping
A two day stay, you may say I needed time alone
To relax my dome, no phone, left the 9 at home
You see the streets have me stressed something terrible
Fucking with the corners have a nigga up in Belle Vue
Or h.d.m., hit with numbers from 8 to 10
A future in a maximum state pen is grim
So I comes back home, nobody's out but shorty doo-wop
Rolling two phillies together, in the bridge we call them oowops
He said Nas, niggas could be busting off the roof
So I wear a bullet proof and pack a black tres-deuce
He inhaled so deep, shut his eyes like he was sleep
Started coughing when i peeked to watch me speak
I sat back like the mack, my army suit was black
We was chilling on these benches where he pumped his loose cracks
I took the L when he passed it, this little bastard
Keeps me blasted and started talking mad shit
I had to school him, told him don't let niggas fool him
'Cause when the pistol blows the one that's murdered be the cool one
Tough luck when niggas are struck, families fucked up
Could've caught your man, but didn't look when you bucked up
Mistakes happen, so take heed never bust up
At the crowd catch him solo, make the right man bleed
Shorty's laugh was cold blooded as he spoke so foul
Only twelve trying to tell me that he liked my style
Then I rose, wiping the blunts ash from my clothes
Then froze only the blow the herb smoke through my nose
And told my little man that I'm a go cyprose
Left some jewels in the skull that he can sell if he chose
Words of wisdom from Nas try to rise up above
Keep an eye out for Jake shorty I'm out 'One Love'



Lame foot soldiers get croaked in my vicinity
The ode for old murder, criminal activity
Diamond encrusted bracelets, escape death
Cars and yachts, I flaunt things that say success
Flow to the water turns my electric chair on
Inside the barren trunk, got pack of Stan heron
Nasir Jones, Not a Coppo, The Picasso, word painter
Black Sinatra, Rap King Cole, gangster
Point blank body armor
I'm violence, you're the Dalai Lama
You just holla drama



[Intro]
Yeah
I want all my niggas to come journey with me
My name is Nas, and the year is 1973
Beginning of me, therefore I could see
Through my belly button window who I am...

[Verse 1]
I existed in a womb, just like an abyss
Came straight from spirit land, my hands balled in a fist
Punching on my moms stomach, kicking on her cervix
Twitching cause I'm nervous
Thought my intended purpose
Was to be born to reign, not in scorn or vain
But to take on a name, my pops chose for me
Bloodstream full of indo
Developing eyes
Looking out my belly button window
My father's size
On his face he wears a frown
And I'm wondering if they even want me around
Cause I'll go back to spirit town
So I could rest longer before I come back down
The chute again, in the near future when
My moms and pops can agree on this
Was here before but my moms saw her gynocologist
He dumped me off, first they want me then turn around and they dont
You got 120 days do what you want
But as for me coming back this be my last time
Abort me, keep me, give me away, make up ya mind

[Hook]
I shot my way out my mom dukes
I shot my way out my mom dukes

[Verse 2]
They must wanna keep me, cause 4 months past and I'm still alive
Guess I got what you call an ill-will to survive
When I look hard the lights is killing my eyes
I know when moms is laying down cause I get bored and start to get live
Move side to side hear loud music and vibe
All black babies are born with rhythm thats no lie
Solar energize, mineralize food through my mothers tube
I'm covered in this thick layer of goo
Month two was the least most comfortable
My umbilical cord choking me
But month 3 was closer, see
Thats when pops took moms to see the doc at the clinic
But I was saved cause he changed his mind in the last minute
Watching 'em yell, heard my moms voice well
Feared fist fights, so terrified when we fell
While they broke up furniture and smashed plates on the wall
I wondered if I am born will I be safe at all
This place they call the world through my view was so large
Couldn't wait to get up, grow up and take charge
Month 5, Month 6 went by, hoping I'm born in July
But the Lord already figured out a date and time
Septemeber 14th, '73
Get ready world, doctors in the front waiting for me
Arms open cause they know when I drop, alot of shit's gonna stop
See how the goverment will start re-training cops
Month 9, I'm a week over due, the labor induced
Pops told my moms to push and take deep breaths too
Said stay calm, holding her arm, I'm trying to hold on
Surgical gloves touching my scalp, my head pops out
Everything blurry, my first breath screams out
Tears pouring down my pops face he's so proud
Wanted to hold me, but I was so bloody
They washed me off and he said "At least that nigga ain't ugly!"
Placed me in his arms snuggly, laid me on my mother
Finally, I got to see who held me in her body
She loved me,and I plan to overthrow the devil
Y'all bout to see this world in trouble
Motherfuckers...



[Intro:]
Yeah
I want all my niggas to come journey with me
My name is Nas, and the year is 1973
Beginning of me, therefore I could see
Through my belly button window who I am...

[Verse 1]
I existed in a womb, just like an abyss
Came straight from spirit land, my hands balled in a fist
Punching on my moms stomach, kicking on her cervix
Twitching cause I'm nervous
Thought my intended purpose
Was to be born to reign, not in scorn or vain
But to take on a name, my pops chose for me
Bloodstream full of indo
Developing eyes looking out my belly button window
My father's face wears a frown
And I'm wondering if they even want me around
Cause I'll go back to spirit town
So I could rest longer before I come back down
The chute again, in the near future when
My moms and pops can agree on this
Was here before but my moms saw her gynocologist
He dumped me off, first they want me then turn around and they dont
You got a 120 days do what you want
But as for me coming back this be my last time
Abort me, keep me, give me away, make up ya mind

[Hook: Nas]
I shot my way out my mom dukes

[Verse 2:]
They must wanna keep me, cause 4 months past and I'm still alive
Guess I got what you call an ill-will to survive
When I look hard the lights is killing my eyes
I know when moms is laying down cause I get bored and start to get live
Move side to side hear loud music and vibe
All black babies are born with rhythm thats no lie
Solar energize, mineralize food through my mothers tube
I'm covered in this thick layer of goo
Month two was the least most comfortable
My umbilical cord choking me
But month 3 was closer, see
Thats when pops took moms to see the doc at the clinic
But I was saved cause he changed his mind in the last minute
Watching 'em yell, heard my moms voice well
Feared fist fights, so terrified when we fell
While they broke up furniture and smashed plates on the wall
I wondered if I am born will I be safe at all
This place they call the world though my view was so large
Couldn't wait to get up, grow up and take charge
Month 5, Month 6 went by, hoping I'm born in July
But the Lord already figured out a date and time
Septemeber 14th, 73
Get ready world, doctors in the front waiting for me
Arms open cause they know when I drop, alot of shit's gonna stop
See how the goverment will start re-training cops
Month 9, I'm a week over due, the labor induced
Pops told my moms to push and take deep breaths too
Said stay calm, holding her arm, I'm trying to hold on
Surgical gloves touching my scalp, my head pops out
Everything blurry, my first breath screams out
Tears pouring down my pops face he's so proud
Wanted to hold me, but I was so bloody
They washed me off and he said "At least that nigga ain't ugly!"
Placed me in his arms snuggly, laid me on my mother
Finally, I got to see who held me in her body
She loved me,and I plan to over through the devil
Y'all bout to see this world in trouble
Motherfuckers...



Find a room to lock yourself in and close the door
It's some heavy concepts that we gotta explore
We gotta strip the word down rugged and raw
The rhetoric of martin king just saint around no more

Dave Bowie ain't here James Baldwin neither
They all were leaders
But they ain't help me get this porch two seater
A lawyer left the hood he never looked back
To be a fortune 500 C.E.O it took rap

So what if my pants sag with my hat turned back
The same swag got our merchandise flying off the rack
Marketing companies thats hiring blacks
Fresh hip hop lingo for your campaign ads

The controversy surrounds who could say it and win
Some niggas are full time some play and pretend
So fuck that no apologies on the issue
If it offends you
It's meant to
It's that simple

[Chorus]
Tryin' to erase me from y'all memory
Too late I'm engraved in history (I'm here my niggas)
Speak my name and breath life in me
Make sure y'all never forget me (y'all give me life)
'Cause y'all use my name so reckless
Whether to be accepted or disrespected (and I love it)
And I love especially when y'all do it in public
And I'm the subject
'Cause y'all my niggas

Yo I was thinking a little bit what would it take
To authenticate my nigganess
Ball ridiculous
26 inches when I call up the dealership
Yeah that's some nigga shit

We only out for our own benefit
We havin' too many kids
Recordings, welfare recipients
The infamous free clinics is the sickest shit
It makes me think what the hell they clean their syringes with

Everybody bleedin'
The cops are the demons
Courtrooms full of goons
Jail busher's leanin'

Handcuffs squeezed too tight
On you've life
If you fight they just give in
People used to do sit ins

They got Nigeria and Niger two different countries
Somehow Niger turned to nigga
And shit got ugly
The problem is we started thinking like the colonists
'til Noble Drew Ali
Started droppin' that consciousness

[Chorus]
My father was not a banker
Neither was my neighbor when it came to getting paper
Who the hell was gonna train us
A pressure couldn't escape us through the ages
We changed the basis of derogatory phrases

And I say its quite amazing
The use the ghetto terms developed our own language
No matter where it came from
Its celebrated now people are mad if they ain't one

[Talking]

[Chorus: x 2]



The year is 1994 and New Year’s is creeping up upon us. An MC from Queensbridge named Nas is currently keeping the streets on fire from coast to coast. Many brothers on the block, as well as Rap critics acknowledge Nas’ debut  LP Illmatic to be one of the greatest solo debuts of all time

Keep in mind, this after the riots. I think the O.J. Simpson trial was still on everybody's mind. Race, poverty and conflict were framing a lot of what was in America and Hip-Hop. I originally did this for a magazine called 4080. In it’s time, 4080 was a force of nature. I remember Harry Allen telling me how much he loved it. But the owner had addiction problems that forced it to close

Nas was  a legend already because of his verse on Live at the BBQ. I was already a fan. I did this interview at the 4080 offices on a speaker phone. The interview was not seen again until it was republished in the book Lyrical Swords Vol. 2: Westside Rebellion in 2006. When Jay Z and Nas settled their differences, it was partially reprinted on Allhiphop.com. This is the first time

AB: What were your earliest memories of Hip-Hop? Not much being a part of it- but just the music itself and the culture?

Nas: I remember it just bein’ the fly shit, the new shit. Just niggas, Black people, young Black people, loud music, big speakers, turntables, females, weed, Private Stock, and seeing’ records. Like, if somebody was a big name, you saw he made a record. I mean, it was mad rappers. But when you look at a niggas record – you seen that was some shit! As being a young Black man, you would have never thought to see yourself on some wax. And that tight there, you was the man. You was chillin’. Even if a n***a never knew you, if they see you on record you was the man

AB: So what was the first Hip-Hop album you bought?

Nas: I think it was Run-DMC “King of Rock.” If it wasn't that, it was LL Cool J’’s “Radio.” Those were the first ones I bought. The other ones, I stole out my man’s crate

AB: What were the first ones you stole?

Nas: The first one I stole was I think, Mary Jane Girls. I consider that Hip-Hop

AB: I understand you used to break back in the day?

Nas: Yo, that was a long time ago. I'd rather not talk about it. We all did it

AB: I used to do that for a minute. So tell me about your youth. What was your relationship like with your father?

Nas: He was just a cool muthafucka. He was different from what I would visualize: a father being when you would look down and watch a [show] like Cosby Show. He was different than that type of shit. But he’s just a cool n***a – a straight up and down person

AB: And your mother?

Nas: My moms is real strong, real sensitive, real caring and real intelligent

AB: Do you have any business plans?

Nas: Ill Will music, dedicated to my man Ill Will. Bless the dead. He would probably be spinnin’ for me right now on the turntables or chillin’ with me ‘cause he was my right hand man. But now he’s still here with me, spiritually

AB: We all know a lot of Black men that have lost their lives needlessly. What do you think are the reasons for the havoc coast to coast?

Nas: It’s just that we're naturally born Black and aggressive towards getting what we deserve. We’’re born knowing that something is missing. We're born feeling like we're born in an alien nation. From day one, your moms and what she goes through. I mean just, just, generations. It’s what your parents have already been through. Really, it depends on how your family structure is. If your moms is on dope, and your pops ain't there, you gonna grow up real strong in certain ways and real fucked up in certain ways. But if your moms is there and your pops is there but they are just weak people who didn't know how to guide you …If you're the kind of person who takes things upon yourself, then you're gonna be a different way. You know it’s all kinds of ways we come out. It’s so many of us that are around each other. So much s**t on our minds. We're thinking’ we're tyrants trying to get to the right solution. We're thinking’ about all the different ways of getting it and it’s mad obstacles in our way. It’s mad shit that we don't see in our way that makes us fall. It’s so easy for us to f**k up, especially when you are coming from a poor family

AB: On Main Source’s “Live at the BBQ” you had a line that said “When I was 12 I went to hell for snuffin’ Jesus.” I'm not a Christian, but the fact that a man would make a casual remark like that about the murder of an acknowledged Prophet to some and saviour by others- what brings lines like that out?

Nas: When I'm feeling’ up to a point where I’m on some shit where I just don't give a shit ‘bout nobody. ’Cause ain't nothin’ in my pocket. I’m going through some shit, I’ll diss anybody I want to. I'll tell you why. I could break the s**t down for you. Because when a person is that angry, that’s how he feels about everything. That’s how I felt lyrically at the time

AB: Reminds me of Malcolm X, in the movie when he yells to the priest “You tell Jesus to kiss my ass! What has he done for me. “He ain't done nothin’ for me!”

Nas: I kinda felt like how Malcolm X felt. And this was before the movie, I just thought of Malcolm when I said that. You know what I mean? I knew he would be behind me

AB: Are you coming to the West Coast any time soon?

Nas: True indeed. I plan on coming’ out there with the Queens shit, the inner side of Queens material. It’s a lot of punk muthaf**kas that never say Queens and shit

AB: Why do you think that is?

Nas: I don’t know, to tell you the truth. I don't know. It just became like a religion for some rappers not to mention Queens. But I’m from Queensbridge, and I’m just representing’. It’s all about the bridge with me

AB: Its funny to me because some of my earliers memories are from Queens rappers

Nas: B.D.P. put a cease to that shit

AB: Is that what it is? do you think they had an influence on that whole angle?

Nas: KRS ONE was so ill. He just came out and destroyed shit. A lot of rappers from Queens just couldn’t fuck with him. Or, at the time as just trying to concentrate on their career. You know, getting money or whatever. There wasn’t really a lot of battling rappers accept LL Cool J

AB: So what kind of angle were you trying to come on with this album?

Nas: I just wanted to speak. I just wanted to be the voice of a nation

AB: I saw a quote from a Hip-Hop magazine where you said you wanted to be the first Black President

Nas: Word up!

AB: How do you plan to get there?

Nas: Its’ so many tricks. So much shit. The people, the politicians, the government. The government is ill. They on some old Illmatic shit. They are just like the slave masters but more modern. They have different goals. The world is different now. They just on some new shit. Its about who got game, who’s smart and moves first

AB: When I look at the Declaration of Independence, America is nothing more than an Idea that has never really been put into practice

Nas: True indeed

AB: Like Disneyland. Where everybody is supposed to be happy. But it does not exist

Nas: I might have to quote you on that one day. Wise words

AB: Thank you brother. Can America happen? Or do you think America is just a concept?

Nas: As long as they keep living those ideals and shit. and trying to do that, I think yes. ‘Cause America is cool right now as long as you know what you gotta do. Like that nigga Don King will tell you in a minute. H’e s a Black man and he’s paid. So that means you can get that dough. Straight up and down. It's some good here

AB: I was recently reading a book by Dennis Kimbro called Think and Grow Rich. He quotes a guy named S.B. Fuller who says that “Poverty is a state of mind.”I thought it was profound. I wondered if you agreed with that

Nas: Hmmm. Yeah, in ways. In ways

AB: In which ways is it not?
Nas: I mean, poverty is just reality. There is real poverty. You know what I’m saying? I don’t know. That shit is deep

AB: What human being had the most influence on you as a person?

Nas: Malcolm X and N.W.A

AB: Stay strong, and we’ll be in contact in the future

Nas: Alright, god. One Love

Adisa Banjoko is Founder of the Hip-Hop Chess Federation. The grand opening of their new community education center is  Sat., August 16th 2014 in The Bay Area. They teach chess, Hip-Hop dance, jiu jitsu and more! For more information visit www.facebook.com/hiphopchess



[Hook x2]
Your mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tongue, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
When the ... niggas after you where you gonna run
You mouth got in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tounge, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want it with no one
... niggas now are after you and here they come

[Verse 1]
This nigga thinkin that everybody puss til he got his shit push
Lot of shit poppin, got him all swiss cheesed up
He fell to his knees and wished he never released words from outta his mouth bout the next man's Gs
Telling me that he was heavenly involved to rob
Any nigga who scared to murder who had cash
Didn't deserve the convertible cars, sipping bourbon at bars
He feel if they ain't real he should get stuck, him and his peoples
You must be sniffing that diesel
Cause if that nigga knew you was scheming he would just leave you in pieces
Plus he's a friend of ours, we got our Benz's that power
Motor cars hung on the wire, left summers puff party
Plus you don’t get enough really never meant ..laugh and threat
.. That they wouldn’t budge they play the ..

[Hook (little different)]
Your mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tongue, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
When the ... niggas after you where you gonna run
You mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tounge, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
... niggas now are after you and here they come

[Verse 2]
These niggas live after death before ...
I got you we smoke the same weed, same cars we drive
Knew two of these dudes got into murder shit just last year
I start fuck with them thinking make me lose my career
We still touch though its just dough
I make some songs that ... on they dirty money just smell wrong
But I don't knock you because we come from the same upbringing
I came up slinging, the same way they came up slinging
One thing I learn though, still judge niggas by it
Say alot about men who contend but can't be quiet
The school from which I learn is the street of old
Fuck fools they talk to worm in six feet hole
Be telling niggas what I'm eatin, what I’m holding, its sickening
Don't be conerned with what I'm eating, cause what I eat you ain't shittin
These niggas that start beef, they talk like bitches
And I'm the type to give you ...
Yo, black stocking cap on my face pulled down
From behind, all you hear is the gun cock back sound
And now I put it in yo mouth, fuck you were sayin?
Suck on this you trip, try to duck and imma spray ya

[Hook (little different)]
Your mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tongue, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want beef with no one
When the ... niggas after you where you gonna run
You mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tounge, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
... niggas now are after you and here they come

[Verse 3]
You make promises that you can keep full of deceit
Street face swallow pride ...talk to you money shit
You wana run with it .. talk about shit
You ain't’ get none of it
You whisper got bitch unless is for the real
Always ..tryin' to ..can’t remember I said ..fire on you ..
If .. run off ‘cause the things gotta
You ain’t get no wings ..but ends
How ... I’m going blow to you I expect to win

[Hook (little different)]
Your mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tongue, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
When the .. niggas after you where you gonna run
You mouth got you in it your ass can’t get you out
Next time hold your tounge, you wouldn’t have to hold your gun
Know when you don't want war with no one
... niggas now are after you and here they come



Situations I be kicking just you get you pacing
That attentive, parental supervision, you should do the diction
Street chronicles, struggles and losses
Can make a nigga's moms hang up crosses and horseshoes
I brought you, to that state of mind you needed
By now your weeded, bob your head, recline seated
And put your life inside the shoes of the shiestiest crews
With sports cars and the iciest jewels, y'all know the rules
In this street life, by now the beasts might be least white
Stash your heat right, my pop passed the peace pipe
And shed light on, he put me right on
To be an icon, cuz dead niggas got they name wrote up in krylon
The fast life, fistfights that shit could like amuse me
Some chose a road some niggas died so what's to choosing?
At nighttime, it especially addresses me
Preferably, around 10, when my weed cipher begin
We start bugging on facts, half the facts that's for sure
Put your zone in my world if we adapt, crack, and pour
Make a toast yo that's how we break bread together
Probably when we dead be better, the problems ahead whatever
Courvoisier sipping, whipping' out-of-state missions
And just in case you're snitching, the safe's hidden
With these conniving things, niggas make it to obvs (obvious) to bring
Hatred to enterprising cream, advise your team to wiser schemes



[dmx - dialogue]
I ain't goin back to jail
Next time, the county or the state see me
It's gonna be in a bag

Uhh! this is it baby!
End of the road, ha hah!
When you a dawg, you a dawg for life!
You don't hear me though, you don't hear me though
You don't hear me though, c'mon, c'mon!

[method man]
Watch them young guns that take none, nobody safe
From the friday the 13th, ghetto jason
Itchy trigger finger achin, snatch yo' ass
Out that s-class for fakin, forty-fo' blast
Is a bloodbath, take your first step down a thug path
Ain't no love here, just slugs here
Kids know the half you get plugged here, that's just impossible
For the weak to last now behold the unstoppable
Third eye watchin you, watchin me
Throwin rocks from the penalty box, cop a plea
Young g we was born to die, don't cry for me
Just keep the heat closely and ride for me
Cause we family for better or worse, you and i
From the dirt, you snatch purse, so hard it hurt
To be here, and each year, I'm pourin out more beer
For deceased peers, holdin fort
Police line 'do not cross', they found his corpse
In the loft with the head cut off, and butt naked
Homicide the crime method, add another
Killer verse to the murder record, the grand finale

[lennox speaking - movie dialogue]
Who wan' test me, c'mon!
Me shot pussy-hole fi fun

[nas escobar]
Hot corners, cops with warrants, every block is boring
Friday night, getting bent, lick a poem
My dawg, not even home a month yet, and blaze a girl
In the stomach, he robbin niggas who pumpin
Lil' blood got popped, by the group home cat
Everybody nervous in the hood, pullin they gats
Fiend yellin out, who got those? go and see
Shorty snot-nosed, he don't floss but he got dough
Thug faces, fugitives runnin from court cases
Slugs shootin past for the love of drug paper
Queens cap peelers, soldiers, drug dealers
And god'll throw a beam of lightning down cause he feel us

May the next one, strike me down if I'm not the realest
The mayor wanna call the swat team to come and kill us
But, dawgs are friends, if one see the morgue, one'll live
To get revenge, and we ride to the end
Bravehearts blow the lye with henn, and still rise
Took alive with live men, my man got three six-to-eighteen's
And only five in, the belly of the beast
Didn't wanna hear the shit I tried to tell him on the streets
It's irrelevant, the beast love to eat black meat
And got us niggas from the hood, hangin off his teeth
We slangin to eat, bringin the heat
Bulletholes, razor scars is the pain in the street, huh

Chorus: ja rule (repeat 2x)
When you a dawg you a dawg for life (ride or die)
My dawgs feel pain from love (see eye to eye)
Give us one shot at life (let us fly)
Come on niggas! (we dawgs for life)

[dmx and lakid {dialogue}]
There's mad money out here dawg
Mad money out here
What you tryin to get it? (word up)
You gonna bust your gun to get it? (tsh, whatever yo)
I hear you I hear you

[dmx]
Uhh, I've lost my grip on reality or so it would seem
Pinch myself to wake up, cause I know it's a dream
Niggas that don't know me see me and think i'ma rob em
Niggas that know me well see me and think i'ma problem
I'm just a nigga that's misunderstood
But word to God I turn your last name to underwood
Cause if I see it, i'ma take it and run with it, that's me
What type of bullshit is this nigga on? that's d
The dawg come and getcha outside
The more blood flows, when I plug holes with the snub nosed
Gun blows, bullets whistle, wouldn't miss you
Hit you all up in your mouth like it tried to kiss you
Drama, it's right here, how much you need?
Beat you down with gat see how much you bleed
How much you plead, for your life, you was a killer
And all the bitches comin up out that ass you feelin, gettin realer
Now beg for your life, one more time, one more crime
One more nine, c'mon cry nigga
It's over! this is the shit, that hits hard
You either the last one standing, or the last one to fall

Chorus



[Verse 1: Nas]
Blaze a 50, sit back in the drop top Azure Bentley
Of course with me, this chick who'd make Bobby divorce Whitney
Brazilian candy, from Miami
Masseuse, wedding ring on, loving Celine Dion
Hate rap, told me where she get cake at
She's a part-time dancer, part time romancer
Tries to be a mother when she gets a chance to
Left her husband alone to raise they son, he's in pampers
Modeled for a year, got her bachelors degree
33, recovering from plastic surgery
Went from 34B to 36 double D
Met her in San Diego at tha Super Bowl party
Had the Henny, sipped it up with Terrell Davis
MVP, we flicked it up from Sports Illustrated
I was silked out, flossing with Stoute, he had the gators
When she walked in, she lit up the room like Las Vegas
Terrell said her man's a fullback for the Raiders
A drunk who'd fuck cheerleaders and wind up in the papers
It's easy to get the pussy, just don't fall in love
Next thing you know I'm hugged up with this bitch in the tub
Palm Springs, Al Capone's Suite washing her feet
Is this love? Somebody's wife fucking a thug
Hitting it raw, tasting it, wilding out of my character
Taping it, Tyra Banks face with Faiths lips
Giving head like she knew me for years
Pillow talk, she let out tears, told me bout her husbands affairs
Millions she would get if his neck got slit
She rolled the equality, then passed the la to me
Told me 'bout her man's life insurance policy
He stays on the golf course, wears Le Coq Sport
Evenings he drinks his wines on his private resort
You can take him there, here go the keys, you can slip in the rear
Chop a nigga up, yo, meet me somewhere
So we can make more money, then you could ever see rapping
Split the cash and move to Venezuela, adapting
P-11's, ACP shells for blasting
Caught him with his spanish maid
He had a lighter with a can of spray, burning her legs
She tied to the bed, sex S&M, sadomasochistic
Sadistic, yoked her from behind, blew him out exsistance
His maid cried "No", lucky she was blindfold
Naked with mad burn marks all on her thighs, yo
Twelve point five million, he kept his funds
In the Lloyd's of London, goes to his wife and his children
Yo, I thought "What if shorty gets scared, electric chair's all I envision
All she'll probably get is psychiatric supervision"
I switched the plan, the maid flied to Switzerland
Fake ID, forged his wife name, catch the next flight
The same night, headed to Spain, nice game
Now we're back to where we meet again

[Verse 2: Nas]
Blaze a 50, sit back in a drop-top Azure Bentley
Of course with me, this chick who'd make Bobby divorce Whitney
Top down, night air blow her hair
Sky black, stars glow, the face on the moon stare
Fastlane on the nine-five, honey laughs about the cash
Took a blast out of her coke bag
Snorted it, started screaming "Yo, we almost crashed!"
Earlier I took the coke out, replaced it with crushed up glass
Her head nodded down to her chest, slowly she fell asleep
Overwhelmed by greed, put to death



Honies, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas, to Nas to Escobar

The path we all walk, starts out long it's like a boardwalk
Monopoly, some make it around, some go down, it's prophecy
Happy days balancing with life's atrocities
Hoppin' in V's, knowin' some day I got to lead properly

High up in a five realizing the price paid
For this life laid in the light shade
One might say, top of the world's two whips, a crib and a girl
Quick to celebrate it, poppin' corks like they made it

Pretentious, arrogant niggas is senseless
Pro-ball players with white wives, peep they night lives
While you could catch me in a crisp white five
Dark tinted, dijon-scented, with Al Green on, my theme song
Love and happiness, how can it seem wrong?

I mean before this, I used to rock a taurus with the donuts
Now I grown up, got it chromed up
Got the rap game sewn up, sho-nuff
Niggas acting cool but it's really no love
I feel a slow buzz, off the dutch

This is everyday, every second
Got to make it pay, every lesson I learnt
Got me open while most of these rappers'll stay burnt

Honies, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas, to Nas to Escobar

Money, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas, to Nas to Escobar

With so much drama in QBC
It's kinda hard being Escobarro
Elderado Red, sippin' Dom out the bottle
My life is like a Donald Goines novel
We wave glasses like bravo

Drunk niggas with mad problems, and shot pockets
My niggas from the block rock this
Box cocaine, cook it and chop it

Looking to profit, in different ways
Goin' through this difficult stage, called life
But each year my physical's praised

Some fell beyond the reach of help
Cut in the street, thinkin' they could teach theyself
When all we wanted was a piece of wealth
And randomly, feed our family, the streets are insanity

Amply, living in this thug's fantasy
Richest nigga in show biz is what I plan to be
Heavy chain and my QB sway, living this king's life
Magazines write about me, in this dream it's all tight

Honies, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas, to Nas to Escobar

Money, cash, weed, cars
Ghetto celebrities, hood movie stars
Gat slingers now rap singers are who we are
Went from Nasty to Nas, to Nas to Escobar

Now the main thing that boggle my brain be all the bottles of pain
Iced the chain and all the followers came
They tried to throw me off track but I caught that
They thought I lost that but I'm continuing to make more stacks

Halftime, New York state of mind, it was written was hittin'
Trips overseas, southeast, diamond and riches
Sleepin' on the plane wake up when we land
Feelin' real scared, on the ground
Rollie flush, princess cuts, and large rounds

The crews up, findin' time to shine rocks
It's real, you violate, be in a pine box
If it go there, I lay you before you lay me, it's crazy
I didn't make the game, the game made me
Records for the babies so they raised up in mansions
Haters keep hating, and ladies'll keep glancing

Y'all know the routine out this [Incomprehensible], word up



[INTRO: ALL]
1,2, Eye for an eye we in this together
Son your beef is mine So long as the sun shines to light up the sky
We in this together son your beef is mines

[Verse 1: Raekwon]

Ayo,ayo,ayo, my thug related style attract millions
Fans, they understand my plan
Who's the kid up in the green Land?
Then I skate motivate gettin' (Sniff)
Lifted, me and my chick get eight
Now im coolin' with the clique Mobb Deep and
Nas, word up here's the first prize I generate
Off the head piece, freestyle session word up son


[Verse 2: Nas]

Check it out yo,To my seed, may I lead you into no greed or evil
In the categories of stories I breed my sequel
You know the money, blues, blunts, broken 22's
Monkey see, monkey do shorty sipping sunny dew
On a low like a ????? o,chill shades of flow
Big Havoc at like you know, kid


[Verse 3: Prodigy]

Kid, you don't know me, you don't wanna know me
You tried to blow me your weak side just showed me
Stepped out my door on 41st Side at 12,
Didn't see my crew around so I got bent for search
I had to jet back upstairs so I can stash my 9
It was a Friday night Rikers had it bad one time
Cause niggas getting bagged on a regular son
D's like "Fuck the drugs, all we want is the guns,"
So I proceed with caution, eyes open whenever walking
Niggas be ass talking then be victims of extortion
Hold myself down the only way I know
Niggas pumping back in streets, in debt cause they owe
Street life is like a trial, ass out if you blow
The maximum is death son you know how that go



[Verse 1]

Heard ya got your masters
Did college up
Never look back
Now that's what's happenin'
And it's good to see you made it out the hood with a degree a true man with passion
Now you can enter the so called white man's society and go right past them
Lookin' in the wall street journal for your face but it's always absent
Everyday that's him eatin' flan and ambrosia his watch on his arm golden, Latin
Try to get his attention but he's flinching very close(unknown) so I mention
We was neighbors some time ago
He was kinda cold
In this restaurant full of his kind and mold
He sighed and tried to look surprised I know
This side of the city where he resides so
I had to go
I heard him laugh hard at some sad black jokes
Hate so called intellectuals no balls and suggest we vote
He stand all proud speakin' to correct his folks
Suggest that we don't sell dope but I guess it's true but who the fuck are you

[Hook]
Who are you trying to tell me who I am
Trying to tell me who I am
Who are you trying to tell me what I'm not
Tryin' to tell me what I'm not
Who are you trying to tell me who I am
Tryin' to box me in tryin' to find who I am


[Verse 2]

I'm Idi Amin
I'm Marcus Garvey
8 Track Brown
I'm Muhammad Ali
I'm Reginald Lewis
George Washington Carver
I'm Nas with incredible music
Let's do this
Thinkin' of a Master Plan
Sippin' on Disasters
Smokin' on Gangsta
Watchin' niggas argue chillin' on my bar stool
With my hell up in Harlem, hat in hand, with a girl named Pat
She more than the waitress you order your drink with
She's divorced the banker and bought the bar
She got an automobile
She give her order to kill
You get caught and robbed
You can see your walk is off you can lose your rhythm when your out in the gutter for awhile
You easily go from soft to hard
Now it's all about hustlers, number runners, ho's, and sharks
And we all know the code of the block
And you're talkin' some gibberish, some anti nigga shit cause you marched back with Rosa Parks
Brother don't start
Go build your Noah's Ark
You can float to the end of the world then pretend what you're not
But I know what you are
While I roll in my car
While I'm spinnin' my knot
While our enemies plot you ain't outta the shot
Matter of fact you are an easier target
And I respect everything you accomplished, but hope that I never get old and talk that nonsense
So who the fuck are you

[Hook]

[Outro]

See Queen Nzinga
Winnie Mandela
Ida B Wells
Why can't you tell
Why can't you tell



(feat. Ludacris & Doug E. Fresh)

{*Doug E. Fresh beatboxes*}

[Nas] Yeah.. what.. you!
[DEF] UH-HUH! C'MON!
[Nas] Yeah.. yeah, what?
[DEF] Nasty Nas, Virgo
[Nas] Uh-huh
[DEF] L-L-Ludacris, Virgo
[Nas] Uh uh uh
[DEF] Doug Fresh
[DEF] As we go, somethin like this
[Nas] Nasir..

[Nas]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo
Hey girl, just come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo
We sippin on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though
I drop you off at, Willoughby and Myrtle
Smash with the Virgo, ain't got to take your shirt off
You seen me convince your homegirl though

Plus she says her life is too hard
She says that she wanna come and build with the God
Promise that she gon' play her part
Cause what I spit gets straight to her heart
And, she's damn fine, feet Hammertime, damn if I mind
Love is the bu-bubblin back of your waistline
I don't waste time, gotta GET GET ON IT
Just you and me, two glasses, sip on Patron and
In the club scene where I met Ms. Green Eyes
She walked by askin me, "Are you Nas?"
Why? "If you was I'd be totally twi"
What's that? "Totally with it, T.W.I."
Ha ha, well, here I am, yep I'm the man
Bartender put a Cosmo in that girl hand
So, here we standin before I begin
Homegirl made a knot out of the cherry stem
Tongue skills, yeah I like that, now we on the right track
Straight to my Phantom, call Africa Black {*brrrring*}
Ever since then, she been yappin a track
Told her friends, now they hollerin behind her back
Sing!

[Ludacris]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo (that's right!)
Hey girl, just come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo (tell 'em, tell 'em)
We sippin on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though
I drop you off at, Peachtree and Myrtle (uh)
Smash with the Virgo, ain't got to take your shirt off
You seen me convince your homegirl though

Now I was, so fresh and so fly in diamonds
When I stepped up in the club even my arms was shinin
Bling! A little cute thing said, "What's yo' name?"
I put my necklace in her face and told her read the chain
Oooh ooh, so stuck up, told me shut the fuck up
BLAOW! Ludacris in the ho-oooh-ouse
The needle hit the record, they was playin this song
All the ladies hit the floor and it was EH EH ON
Live forever like Fame, let the Leroys dance
While I'm laid back chillin in my b-boy stance
Could be a little pop lockin if your girl's top droppin
But watch for cockblockin on my coochie stock options
But later for the ASSDAQ, throw 'em on the fast track
Make 'em swip swap Nasty N-A-S pass that
Honey in the black cause I'm feelin her curves
He looked down at what I had and said WA WA WORD
Why only serve one when we can serve up two
Then at the bachelor's pad, doin what the Virgos do
And these women so shy but get loud undercover
So we can have sex but I CAN'T BE YOUR LOVERRRRRRRRRRR
{*DEF breakdown*: buck buck buck buck buck buck)
Ah, ah-ha-ha, ah-ha-ha, ah-ha ah ah-ah SING!

[Doug E. Fresh]
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo (c'mon)
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and just chill with the Virgo (c'mon)
Baby girl, won't you come and hold my hand
Won't you come and chill out with the Virgo (c'mon)
We sippin on Merlot, you ain't got be my girl though (that's right)
I drop you off at, Two-Fifth and Lex-o
Smash with the Virgo, ain't got to take your shirt off
Seen you convince your homegirl though

They got my voice for the record and my voice for the beat
Virgo proof baby run the streets
So let's go (let's go) let's go (let's go) for the beat
Let's go (let's go) it's the Virgo
Let's go (Nasty Nas) let's go (Ludacris)
And if you don't know, now you know - Doug E. Fresh



Uhh, where am I going?
Where am I? Where the hell am I?
Yo, it's ill...

[Verse 1]
Yo, my wife's tired of fucking me
Life tries ducking me
Luckily, I find 'em just at the right time
Mac in my right arm, tequila bottle in my left arm
Like Christion, watching my life go
Can´t do myself in
Wolves in the night yo, hell's men
Two revolvers, I can let 12 spin, hop in my Benz
Push it to the limit, buck-sixty, who wit' me?
My Cris', two L's, twisted blunts and inner conscience
Telling me that I ain't shit
No matter how much cash I sit wit'
Still gotta ask the Lord for forgiveness
My precious baby girl came like forty nights of rain
To replenish my adolescent brain
Blessed be her name, before her birth, I was insane
So I drive to cool the pressure down, delay the pain
I ate from these poisonous, fucked up streets
Tasted larceny, it was sweet, I starved for more to eat
Though I took, that was to live, hope God will forgive
As odd as it is, the more I gain the harder it is
To maintain, bitches playin' games
Niggas snitchin', I ain't saying names
But y'all niggas better watch how y'all slang
Lost so many close niggas
Drunk, almost crashed, I'm going too fast
Highway patrol will just flash
Lights in my rearview
If they stop me, I hope they lock me
Instead they speed ahead
Yo, nigga, watch me

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'ma ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand, trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
'Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself, alone in the zone
Drunk by myself

[Verse 2]
Heard niggas hate me, but I hated too once
Been in the shoes of a Wolf in the night when he hunts
For every shell niggas bust, we bust at ourselves
Can't tell these niggas nothing though
Bullets wake 'em up well
Take 'em to hell
Stick up niggas once ran up on me
My decadent lifestyle attracted sharks on me
I ain't your mark, homie
It's hard to look straight, my foot on the brake
Spilling my bottle, not even shook of the Jakes
Could hardly look both ways
Put out the haze, blurry vision
Think about the time in my life before I was in television
Hella women, jealous niggas up in my vision
Since we all hood niggas, expect kilos
But what they not seeing is police expect RICO
Only if I could take care of everybody, intoxicated
Windows up, blastin' A.C., going wherever instinct takes me
I hate it when I'm like this
The bottle's my accomplice

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
Yo, I'll ride to the end of the road, if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand, I try to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
'Cause that's the way I feel I am already
When I'm drunk by myself, alone in the zone
Drunk by myself

[Verse 3]
The reason that I want to be alone
Tired of all the things that went wrong
That would have went right if I would have did it on my own
Take another swig
The more I drink, the more I think bad thoughts
Fake friends who hung around, who wanna bring you down
Not knowing who to trust, rumors about niggas coming through
Supposedly to shoot at us, not knowing what was true
Or what to believe, that's why I'm on the low lately
Choosing a Henny bottle over a friend, driving again
To keep my mind off that weak shit
There's love through it all
Things to live for
I swerve, almost crash into a wall
Think about the good, find myself laughing
Turn the cell off, no way to be reached
Know I'm near my crib
Tryna see my way through the streets
Reminded of the positive, I take my drunk ass home
Start to feeling out of it, can't wait to get out of this whip
Bring my ass to the crib, I'm tired...

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'ma ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand, trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
'Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself, all alone in the zone
Drunk by myself



1.I Am... (Intro)
2.N.Y. State of Mind Pt. II
3.Hate Me Now
4.Small World
5.Favor for a Favor
6.We Will Survive
7.Ghetto Prisoners
8.You Won't See Me Tonight
9.I Want to Talk to You
10.Dr. Knockboot
11.Life Is What You Make It
12.Big Things
13.Nas Is Like
14.K-I-SS-I-N-G
15.Money Is My Bitch
16.Undying Love
17.Nature Shines



It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Street's disciple, my raps are trifle
I shoot slugs from my brain just like a rifle
Stampede the stage, I leave the microphone split
Play Mr Tuffy while I'm on some Pretty Tone shit
Verbal assassin, my architect pleases
When I was twelve, I went to hell for snuffing Jesus
Nasty Nas is a rebel to America
Police murderer, I'm causing hysteria
My troops roll up with a strange force
I was trapped in a cage and let out by the Main Source
Swimming in women like a lifeguard
Put on a bulletproof nigga I strike hard
Kidnap the President's wife without a plan
And hanging niggas like the Ku Klux Klan
I melt mics till the sound wave's over
Before stepping to me you'd rather step to Jehovah
Slamming MC's on cement
Cause verbally, I'm iller than a AIDS patient
I move swift and uplift your mind
Shoot the gif when I riff in rhyme
Rapping sniper, speaking real words
My thoughts react, like Steven Spielberg's
Poetry attacks, paragraphs punch hard
My brain is insane, I'm out to lunch, God
Science is dropped, my raps are toxic
My voicebox locks and excels like a rocket

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Fatal is merciful and they curse me
When I grip the mic I show no mercy
I got heart, I rip the party apart
From the seams and hem up like bell-bottom jeans
But you get done, you get blues like 501
Brothers are live but I bet ya I'm liver son
So let me get upon the scene and redeem
The dream of a team, and knock 'em out like Mitch Green
Smoke some thai weed, flow at a high speed
Rap on off breaks stomping like Northlakes
Cause I'm living larger than the founders of Fendi
An Asiatic brother that many rappers envy
So round up your crew and entourage
And let the God Merciful just take charge

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

Some of them said (said what?) that the Ak should quit
But I don't sweat it, cause I'm too big for that small shit
Like pigs when it comes to a showdown
Huff and puff but the Ak won't get blown down
Cause I come strong, rather than come at all and not be ready
That's what separates me from the petty
MC's gas themselves by drinking too much Getty
And get torn the fuck up like confetti
I'm rich and thick, your lyrics like Aunt Jemima
It doesn't take Keenan Ivory Wayans to know that I'mma
Get you sucker if you bite like a piranha
So save them preschool rhymes for the kids at Wonderama
Point blank, period, with no comma
Rhymes so dangerous, call for the homicide
Cause I knock 'em dead even when I'm at my worst
The only future that lies ahead of them is the lights from the hearse
Got game like a crackhead
But don't be misled, I keep rappers on lock like a dread
Knots in the head from the words that I said
So get a shovel and dig your grave cause the shit you talk is dead

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!

I grab up girls like jacks
Add 'em on like tax, and I'm over like Hot Trax
As far as brothers are concerned a pressure cooker from start
To finish I diminish like a Cuisinart
Secondly, I'm sick of critics, who's necking me
(Ooh he got an afro) yo, but I got dough
Why's my name the Large Professor?
Cause I milked your cow in other words I hit your heifer
Don't talk about how you can break Rambo
That's just a bunch of mamba-ja-hambo
Propaganda, save it for Savanda
Joe and Amanda, Zach and Alexandra
Don't let the folks around your way puff your head
Cause you'll be the owner of a hospital bed
I'll kick fire out your ass so fast
You'll be as crispy as my man Bill Blass

It's like that y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
That y'all (that y'all!), that y'all (that y'all!)
And that's all!



He's a kaleidoscope to look in; a black men and white women
Sometimes together make exotic looking children
But mixed race kids become fixated on separating themselves from the hatred
Your grandma on the black side make you slam the station
Your grandma on the white side was educated in schools that were segregated; maybe she was racist
Maybe you can't, today, school her on some brand new today shit
If I grew up a rich boy, like this boy, this white boy, like you boy, the Christmas toys, the privileged joys
I think I'd be less stressed, the whole family at home, the ideal address
But he's dealing with self mutilation, dungeons and dragons, Ouija boards, rituals with satan
Yeah, we grew up with similar anger



Alchemist you know me man
I'm the type of nigga that write rhymes right on the spot in the studio
Soon as I hear the track, you know what I'm sayin'?
Word but I wanted to bring a couple of books to the studio today

Man I found these shits up in the crib man in boxes man
I don't even remember when I was writing these shits
Oor what's in these shits man probably a bunch of bullshit man
Fuck it check it

How can I trust you when I can't trust me?
Picture myself a old man a O.G
Some niggas will conversate with lairs all day time pass
(Nah lemme start somethin' else)

Soul on ice death threats given by clowns
I guess livin' is prison when you live around clowns
I'm hexed cursed worse I been blessed first I thought I was abnormal
'Cause I would overcome any tasked called to

So there it is I'ma prince I'ma get slain
Some do minor shit swear they on the top of they game
Ya rhymin' is called "Vagina Monologue"
It kinda supports theories of scary niggas who should lie in the morgue

Rarely y'all come in contact with the real
Since Pun passed he was the last shine of sun I could feel
Yo said there's a few left since music's expressions of life
Damn I wish I took more time to write in my book of rhymes

Oh shit Tina, I been lookin' for this bitch number damn
No this rhyme is weak, this is week I remember this bullshit right here
(My book of rhymes)
Gandhi was a what the fuck?

Gandhi was a fool, nigga fight to the death
The US Army is a school that teach ya plights of conquest
(I wonder when I wrote this, nah it's weak)
The money's ya religion sky the limit live life
Numbers is big business makes the poor live strife

The glimmers of hope provoke those without dollars to dream
Through your existence become wealthy knowledge is king
Pimps and card sharks
Thieves murderers with hard luck

Addicts and fiends prostitutes passin' for teens is my society
Cops that shoot blacks is routine for notoriety
Grow up watchin' well dressed niggas with charms
Beautiful ladies on their arms

Dangerous new cars was my fantasy for Nas
Rubbing my lips with Campophenique
Still behind the ears wet turned out to be
Pioneers vets amongst hustlers crack sellers and lairs and squares
(Nah that was weak there)

My people be projects or jail never Harvard or Yale
Pardon me type in my two way while I'm chargin' my cell
It's hard to be iced up with Gucci
God poverty's real I can't fight you
'Cause you would sue me niggas be groupies

I see imitators tryin' to make albums spittin' my style
And they don't even realize that I notice they stealing Nas' shit
I pump some Rick James with that Teena Marie
My Nina lean on me like Swoop it's crap this can't be
My book of rhymes

This can't be my book of rhymes writing this bullshit
(My book of rhymes)
Nah neva that fuck that, aw why you laughin' Alchemist?
Huh you a funny nigga, naw yeah
(My book of rhymes)

I'm tellin' you I'ma come up with some new shit now
Fuck that I'ma write again now fuck that
I musta been high on some shit
Mmm what the fuck is this?

Look how we treat pregnancy women in the 'hood
Our values so low our values are no good
Things our mothers told us we shoulda heeded
'Cause now we need it, we older almost able t

I'm jealous of you how come you so beautiful?
Smelling fresh youthful intelligent while I'm stressin' and shit
Aiyo I envy you 'cause all you do is smile and things come your way
Such a innocent child is what some say

I get upset 'cause I just want to be treated the way you are
Like a star not a worry in this world thus far
But wait a minute we both need ya mother's attention
I must be crazy jealous of my own baby infant
(Kinda crazy)



NAS
Ayo, late night, candlelight, fiend with diesel in his needle
Queensbridge leader, no equal
I come from the Wheel of Ezekiel
To pop thousand-dollar bottles of scotch, smoke pot and heal the people
Any rebuttal to what I utter get box-cuttered
Count how many bad honeys I slut, it’s a high number
Name a nigga under the same sky that I’m under
Who gets money, remain fly, yeah, I wonder
Eyes flutter, it's love when Nas pops up
Stars get starstruck, panties start drippin’
The ways of Carlito, blaze, torpedo cigars
Drop Rolls, hoes drop clothes
Louis the XIII, freaks, women nice size
I ride like Porsches, thick, brown and gorgeous
It ain’t my fault, semiautomatic weapons I brought
The world crazy, I’m rich and I’m girl-crazy
Dick ‘em, convince ‘em all to praise me
They ideology is confusion, I lose ‘em
Fellates me, who hate me? My gun off safety
Since the Tunnel and Skate Key, my jewelry in HD

Silent rage, pristine in my vintage shades
I’m not in the winters of my life or the beginning stage, I am the dragon
Maserati, pumpin’ Biggie, the great legend
Blastin’, I’m after the actress who played Faith Evans
My little Jackie Onassis, dig?
I’m so high, I never land like Mike Jackson’s crib
Vest on, .45 still crack ya rib sacrilege
Talk trash about the nasty kid
Past nasty now, I’m gross and repulsive, talk money
Is you jokin’, cash everywhere, in my bank, in the sofa
In the walls, in the cars, in my wallet, in my pocket
On the floors, ceilings, the safe, bitch, I got all you envy
But don’t offend, I’m skinny, but still I’m too big for a Bentley
You are your car, what could represent me
Too Godly to be a Bugatti, you honestly
Must design me somethin’ Tommy Mottonic from Queens had before the ’90s
Drug dealer call, rush to the bar
Move, niggas, we don’t give a fuck who you are
Black card heavy like a magnet, in my stitched denims
Pretty women see them them saggin’, bet a hundred stacks
Niggas’ll run it back just havin’ fun
I ain’t even begun to black, light another blunt in fact

For the hustlers, thick as yellow bitches for the suck of it
Got a bunch of niggas in prison braggin’
Saying it was Nas I used to hustle with
I display fashions while my lungs engage hashes, guns on my waist past his
Since I’m cakin’ up, put funds in my safe, laughin’
And joining the blunt passin’ you niggas was straight assin’
Excuse the vulgarity, I’m still not fully adjusted
Or used to the new fans hearin’ me spit rapidly
I never see the whips niggas be claimin’ they drivin’
I guess entertainment means blatantly lyin’
Fake it ’til you make it, I’ve driven those toys
Been in the wars, in the streets, cops kickin’ in doors
For my deen niggas, your flow cheap as limousine liquor
I’m no fake rap CD listener
Sit back and roll a mean swisher
For my Gs, tell these clowns make room for the king, nigga



Ay yo..you... You that just flipped on this C.D. player:
I just wanna inform you that when you got somebody good, you hold on to 'em

Must be nice... having someone who understands the life you live
Must be nice... having someone who's slow to take and quick to give
Must be nice... having someone who sticks around when the rough times get thick
Someone who smiles bright enough to make the projects feel like a mansion

Must be nice...having someone who loves you despite your faults
Must be nice...having someone who talks the talk but also walks the walk
Must be nice...having someone who understands that a thug has feelings too

Someone who loves you fa sho
You must remember to never let 'em go

'Cause even when your hustling days are gone
She'll be by your side, still holding on
Even when those twenties stop spinning
And all those gold-diggin' women disappear, she'll still be here

Must be nice... having someone you could come home to from a long day of work
Must be nice... having someone you don't have to show;
They know exactly where it hurts
Must be nice... having someone who trusts you...
Despite what they've heard
Someone as mighty as a lion, but still gentle as a bluebird

Must be nice... having someone you don't have to tell you don't wanna be wrong
Must be nice... having someone you can grow old with until God calls you home
Must be nice... having someone who understands that a thug has feelings, too
Someone that loves you fa sho, you never let em go!

'Cause even when your hustling days are gone
She'll be by your side, still holding on
Even when those twenties stop spinning (And they will stop one day)
And all those gold-diggin' women disappear, she'll still be here

'Cause even when your hustling days are gone
She'll be by your side, still holding on
Even when those twenties stop spinning
And all those gold-diggin' women disappear, she'll still be here

'Cause even when your hustling days are gone
She'll be by your side, still holding on
Even when those twenties stop spinning
And all those gold-diggin' women disappear, she'll still be here



[Intro:]
Uhh, Uhh, Where am I going?
Where am I? Yo, it's ill

[Verse 1]
Yo my wife's tired of fucking me
Life tries ducking me
Luckily I find 'em just at the right time
Mac in my right arm, Tequila bottle in
My left arm like Cristian
Watching my life go, Can´t do myself in
Wolves in the night yo, hells men
Two revolvers I can let twelve spin
Hop in my Benz, push it to the limit
Buck-sixty, who wit' me? My (?) to well
Twisted blunts and inner conscience
Telling me that I ain't shit
No matter how much cash I sit with
Still gotta ask the lord for forgiveness
My precious baby girl came like forty nights of rain
To replenish my adolescent brain
Blessed be her name, before her birth I was insane
So I drive the cooler pressure down, delay the pain
I ate from these poisonous, fucked up streets
Tasted larceny, it was sweet, I starved for more to eat
Though I took, that was to live, hope God will forgive
As odd as it is, the more I gain the harder it is
To maintain, bitches playin' games
Niggas snitchin', I ain't saying names
But y'all niggas better watch how y'all slang
Lost so many close niggas, drunk almost crashed
I'm going too fast, highway patrol will just flash
Lights in my rearview, if they stop me I hope they lock me
Instead they speed ahead
Yo nigga watch me

[Hook]
I'm drunk by myself, gun under my seat
I don't want none of my peeps caught up in none of my beef
I'm a ride to the end of the road if I have to
Praying no car speeds by for me to crash to
Steering wheel in my hand
Trying to hold it steady
Anything in my way is dead
Cause that's the way I feel, I am already
When I'm drunk by myself alone in the zone
Drunk by myself

[Verse 2]
Heard niggas hate me, but I hated too once
Been in the shoes of a Wolf in the night when he hunts
For every shell niggas bust, we bust at ourselves
Can't tell them niggas nothing though, bullets wak'em up well
Take them to hell
Stick up niggas once ran up on me
My decadent lifestyle attracted sharks on me
I ain't your mark homey
It's hard to look straight, my foot on the brake
Spilling my bottle not even shook of the Jakes
Could hardly look both ways, put out the haze blurry vision
Think about the time in my life before I was in televison
Hella women, jealous niggas up in my vision
Since we all hood niggas expect kilos
For what they not seeing is police expect Rico
Only if I could take care of everybody, intoxicated
Windows up blastin A.C. going wherever instinct takes me
I hate it when I'm like this
The bottle's my accomplice

[Hook]

[Verse 3]
The reason that I want to be alone
Tired of all the things that went wrong
That would have went right if I would have did it on my own
Take another swigg
The more I drink, the more I think bad thoughts
Fake friends who hung around who wanna bring you down
Not knowing who to trust, runors about niggas coming through
Supposedly to shoot at us, not knowing what was true
Or what to believe, that's why I'm on the low lately
Choosing a Henny bottle over a friend, driving again
To keep my mind off that weak shit
There's love through it all, things to live for
I swerve, almost crash into a wall
Think about the good, find myself laughing
Turn the cell off, no way to be reached
Know I'm near my crib, trying to see my way through the streets
Reminded of the positive, I take my drunk ass home
Start feeling out of it, can't wait to get out of this whip
Bring my ass to the crib
I'm tired...

[Hook]



[Nate Dogg & (Nas)]
(All star baby)
Young quick see (F-U-B-U)
Lately all I see is D-P-G

When I turn the radio on keep hearin' me (All day, everyday)
Livin' the good life, good life uh huh good life (Braveheartz)

[Nate Dogg & (Nas)]
Sure as the world is turnin' round and round (Shit is real yo)
There's these niggas, bitches, snitches tryin' to bring you down
(Fucked up) But I don't know why I mention
And if I don't pay no attention I'm cool (Real niggas do real things)
(Real niggas do real things)
Sure as my chronic is the best in town [* Inhale and coughs *]
Those who trippin' slippin' listen, we ain't stoppin' now (Can't stop)
We won't even pause, y'all can lick my balls (Bitches)
We livin' the good life, good life, good life
(Livin' the good life baby)

[Hook]
Young quick see (Come on, come on)
Lately all I see is D-P-G (Nate Dogg)
When I turn the radio on keep hearin' me (Still, still, still)
Livin' the good life, good life uh huh good life (We livin' the life)

[JS]
It ain't nothin' but a paper chase
But even when ya paper straight
Every stage just another way to see cake
But niggas still gotta die hate
Well fuck it, I'ma do it cause the streets put me to it
See y'all niggas is late
See it's big face, big livin'
Big dogs and big pimpin'
Game played with nothin' but precision
Money, cars, and women
See niggas hatin' cause they on the outside
Wishin' they could find a way in it
You see the rims spinnin' all black tinted
With the niggas who'll bring it to ya brain
If it's fuckin' with change
Fifty-four nigga remember the name
Ritz, glitz only when we empty clips
And dismember your brain
Cause I remember pain, gain pain, this winner reign
But now it's high tech out here in the center lane
See we got the world respectin' the slang
The good life, hit the studio, the club, straight to the plane

[Hook]
[Nas]
Yo, yo, yo
Pass you cowards, classical rap mix form power
Yasser Arafat, I'm stormin' with lead showers
And I'm murderous, common is formerly Nastradamous
I'm goin' for the top regardless
Pretty Boy Floyd, the rotten tooth king
Ghosts of my dead friends linger
I toast to you lover, blunts lit, wish I was hittin'
Cock back, four pound, let six in the air
Rock that raw sound, gettin' wet to this year
Cause of the projects Hannibal Lec, hand on my tech
In front the White House, my ice out demandin' respect
Braveheartin' to the grave darlin' wavin' my sterling
From out the black Bentley it's off, spray till y'all fallin'
East to West Coast ballin'
Nate Dogg, Nas, and Kurupt, liven it up, dimes in the cut
Sizin' us up, y'all wanna fuck, gin and tonic my cup
And we live the good life, still chronic it up

[Hook]



[Verse 1: Nas]
It's the late night greasy spoon patron
Poolhall making
Big bets, midsection got the 8 in
Dior Christian pimpin'
Got that penal system diction
Riffing, you don't want it you snitchin'
Spit a few at a traitor with that new AR
Try to kill me I'm the leader, that's coup d'etat
Streetsweepers in that Coupé all black
Bitches want my chipped tooth back
Steel mac, so my kufi never gets smacked
Squeeze a fifth with a grip as I dip
From the paparazzi
Still playing numbers you can't stop me
Still wearing bundles, and spark weed
If I ever say "Queens get 'em", you know they got me
Success, scandal, bone deep, personal beef
So lead by example, or get trampled
Since Hip Hop Is Dead, this is the N
Congratulations in order 'cause we did it again

[Hook: Nas]
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still getting it and don't even love the doe
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still ripping, and I don't even love the hoes
Still getting it and don't even love the doe
Steel gripping it, you know that I tug the fo'
Stay splifted 'cause you know that I love the dro

[Verse 2: Nas]
The style is taboo, the chain's offensive
Brain on airplanes, Gucci frames are vintage
The two Tec Don in Yukon's and Benzes
Chicks who suck other chicks tits like infants (wow)
The Apprentice but not Trump
I'm the nigga with Glocks and pumps
That you don't see much
Sucker free from chumps
Homes with cobblestones in front of 'em
He's got guns in cummerbunds, so understand you under son
Don't make me have you running from a hundred guns
Don't make me grab your only son
I'm coming from
A place Tanqueray and weed's the only escape
From phonies who hate
When you rolling with papes
That's why the god party with juicy models
They mob me, Denali, Charlie Luciano - hardly
Have to tell y'all, I kill y'all
For spitting songs that involve me nigga
Original verbal assassin, have to carve me a nigga

[Hook: Nas]
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still getting it and don't even love the doe
Don't hate me now, congratulate me now
I'm still ripping, and I don't even love the hoes
Still getting it and don't even love the doe
Steel gripping it, you know that I tug the fo'
Stay splifted 'cause you know that I love the dro



If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Hip hop just died this mornin'
And she's dead, she's dead
Yeah, niggas smoke, laugh, party, and die in the same corner
Get cash, live fast, body their man's mama
Rich-ass niggas is ridin' with three llamas
Revenge in their eyes, Hennessey and the ganja
Word to the wise with villain state of minds
Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind
Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind
(Grindin', hittin' Brazilian dimes from behind)
Whenever, if ever, I roll up, it's sown up
Any ghetto will tell ya Nas helped grow us up
My face once graced promotional Sony trucks
Hundred million in billin', I helped build 'em up
Gave my nigga my right, I could have gave left
So like my girl Foxy, a nigga went Def
So, nigga, who's your top ten?
Is it MC Shan?
Is it MC Ren?
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Hip hop just died this mornin'
And she's dead, she's dead
The bigger the cap, the bigger the peelin'
Come through, something ill, missin' the ceilin'
What influenced my raps? Stick-ups and killings
Kidnappings, project buildings, drug dealings
Criticize that, why is that?
'Cuz Nas rap is compared to legitimized crap
'Cuz we love to talk on ass we gettin'
Most intellectuals will only half listen
So you can't blame jazz musicians
Or David Stern with his NBA fashion issues
Oh, I they like me in my white tee
You can't ice me, we here for life, B
On my second marriage, hip hop's my first wifey
And for that we not takin' it lightly
If hip hop should die, we die together
Bodies in the morgue lie together
All together now
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
If hip hop should die before I wake
I'll put an extended clip inside of my AK
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Roll to every station, murder the DJ
Everybody sound the same, commercialize the game
Reminiscin' when it wasn't all business
If it got where it started
So we all gather here for the dearly departed
Hip hopper since a toddler
One homeboy became a man then a mobster
If the guys let me get my last swig of Vodka
R.I.P., we'll donate your lungs to a Rasta
Went from turntables to mp3s
From "Beat Street" to commercials on Mickey D's
From gold cables to Jacobs
From plain facials to Botox and face lifts
I'm lookin' over my shoulder
It's about eighty niggas from my hood that showed up
And they came to show love
Sold out concert, and the doors are closed shut







Verse 1:
You only get 1 shot to make a first impression. There ain't no such thing as second chances in this game. It only takes 1 man to knock you out the box. It only takes 1 woman to drive you insane. It only took 1 sniff now look Im addicted. It took 1 bad decision. Now my whole life is shifted. It only took 1 shot to kill my best friend. It only took 1 Glock for me to get revenge. It only takes 1 pill just to ease the pain. It only takes 1 bullet to end everything. Right here and right now. ‘cause of sick of all of it. The 1 times. The jakes and the fakes. Sick of all of them. To many haters hating 1 man. Wish that I could burry all of them. Under 1 grave. Without even 1 chance of being found. Yo it takes 1 strike. 2 strikes. 3. And you’re out of here. Getting 25 to life. Without a chance to get out of there. 12 jurors. 1 judge. 1 cell. No love. 1 god. And 1 chance to change things. You get 1

Chorus:
You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. On 1 Mic. You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. A ha...A ha
You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. On 1 Mic. You get 1 shot. And 1 life. Better get it right.A ha...A ha

Verse 2:
It only takes 1 beat for me to fxxx it up. It only takes 1 verse for you to give it up. It only takes 1 mic for me to reck shit. It only takes 1 time for you to know the time. It only takes 1 listen for you to feel the man. It only takes 1 DJ to make a band. It only takes 1 convo to understand. It only takes 1 snitch to go and take the stand. It only takes 1 blunt to make the pain go. It only takes 1 lie to know she gotta go. It only took 1 look to know that she’s a hoe. It only took 1 no from you for her to go. She asked you to marry her. And you passed it up. You had your opportunity

Chorus:
You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. On 1 Mic. You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. A ha...A ha
You get 1 shot. And 1 life. This is real life. On 1 Mic. You get 1 shot. And 1 life. A ha...A ha



Coming soon...



[Nas]
Yea you know how it be
All my thugs gon' thuggin' the streets
But let the Choir Sing
(Choir Humming)

Yea you know how it be
All 'em thugs gon' thuggin' the streets
But let the Choir Sing
(Choir Humming)

Now put your hoods on
Put your gloves on, nigga!

[Nashawn]
Ayo I gotta break these streets shit down
I'm walkin' through Town
I'm holdin' my very big 3-pound
Costumers is floodin' the kid
And it's the first of the month
So many hands I dropped my shit
Pickin' my rocks up
I told the Fiends back off
And now I ain't servin' none of ya'll
Fresh Black Truck hopped in it
Tinted, Rims glissin' got a Bitch in it
Race to the finish
Nashawn straight Menace
Guineas - in my left hand
While I'm drivin' drunk which on you want
Hand-gun, Machine or the Pump?
I'll murder you, have everybody in your crew
In Black-suit, your gril in Black vial lookin' Gorgeous
I'mma Gangsta!
Shanksta, body you fuckin' her
I ain't lovin' her, I'm guttin' her
And you know how it be
When you comin' from and livin' in the P's

[Nas]
Yea you know how it be
All my thugs gon' thuggin' the streets
But let the Choir Sing
(Choir Humming)

Yea you know how it be
All 'em thugs gon' thuggin' the streets
But let the Choir Sing
(Choir Humming)

Now put your hoods on
Put your gloves on, nigga!



[Intro]
Keep it raw for ya. No doubt PR. Check it

[Verse 1]
Play your position focus on life, see what you're missing
Reality, the tale or the caliber
.45-Nickel-9. check the calender
'97m deep algebra, black plaga
Rule the world high, ___
With my gangster for single years
And rap world emulates my life for years
Autobiography a part of me
Portaits of the ill shit inside of me
Magnetic, jigged up to my faded wig
Any position I'm in, I find a way to live
Out of state, on the block or behind metal gate
Yo, this heavyweight got cheddar to make
Smack your head off, click wildling, push through
Puerto rock warriors too you through
The drama
Escobar or Pablo, Miliano, Pabo; take the world pronto
Word to mine, genuine, Señor Juan at your table
Poision you, mad fatal
Just the way it is, when you let the hood raise you
Never let them hoes play you
Mental, smart, strong and stable



[nature]
Do you see what I see?
Do you smoke what I smoke?
Do you wanna smoke?
Do you wanna ride?

Yeah aiyyo aiyyo
When I walk into a room, niggas feel a slight breeze
Stay a little while till they feel they might freeze
Never understood why they never liked me
'cause when I locked the door, they turned into to icees
Starin at my feet all you see is nikes
Bet you never seen a ill pair like these
Size ten, never find me in a tight squeeze
At the airport, minutes before my flight leaves
Round trip tickets to who knows where
Stay boarding, never at least a day's warning
Previous plans, they spoiling
A dollar and a dream, the theme to new york, stay torrance
From st. john's to wake forest, wait for us
Straight ballers, you hearin it first
Nate flawless in almost every event
Puttin up point, while niggas like y'all stay scoreless

[Chorus]
All my niggas from the projects, light one up
To my bitches from the projects, light one up
And stay high, high
And pass me a cup of that good shit (so high)
We on some hood shit (so high)
Niggas from the projects, light one up
To my bitches from the projects, light one up
And stay high, high
And pass me a cup of that good shit (so high)
We on some hood shit (so high)

[nas]
What's me without the hood?
A tree without wood, a dutch wit no bud
A cut wit no blood
A fuck but don't nut, I be incomplete
If me and the street wasn't in between the sheets
I'm a product of hard luck, the money and murder game
Here's nature, kill a faker, man you heard of the name
From the cold streets of qb, old beef to new beef
No peace, through the song, what I see you see

[nature]
Mad bitches wanna smoke wit me
Niggas wanna roll wit me
Usually in my hood, find me in yo' city
Grimy-ette so pretty, it's like there's two me's
Wit no favorites, I try to love both of me
Thinkin of a way where I can better myself
Sometimes I get a head of myself
Holdin weed wit intention, frontin like I got it prescribed
So high I must be outta my mind

Chorus

[nature]
It's like hoppin in a glass pool, half full
Niggas only hit the bottom when they crash through
Mash fools out like they fast food
Bon' appetit, platinum or not, it ain't no match for me
I sum niggas whole careers up, scared tough niggas
Bluff niggas into thinkin that their year's up
It ain't a game, took six months off, the shit jumps off
Mini-me's are gettin punched in they jaw
My dunn call this shit animal rap
Me, I call it dumbin
My near-sighted niggas saw it comin
More stunnin, brand new flows to toy wit
Neck flooded on some hurricane floyd shit
Back and forth to st. crouix kid, same plan
Playin sega dreamcast till the plane lands
A changed man, niggas don't know, they never will
And if they don't understand, then they ain't fam, simple as that

Chorus 2x



Its ny state of mind



Send* corrections to the typist [Swizz

Beatz] Yo
Man it's, a real game out here Know
What I'm sayin Nas Beats?
Back in effect man Swizz
Beatz da monsta (what's poppin )?[Nas]

Get
In line everybody, get in line Listen
The fuck up to, what's going down Pay

Attention aight, [Chorus]x2?
Niggas
Salute me bitches, salute me The
Block salute me the, hood salute me You
Should salute me they, should salute me So
Fuck who you are I'm
The motherfuckin general [Nas]

When
I walk through everything stops silence, Remain
Quiet babies, don't cry thugs don't buss Cops
Cut off sirens oxygen, freeze Noises
To a minimun nigga I, pop and I squeeze I
Represent the pain and struggle Cut
Out your eyeballs then brain-fuck you Yo
You testin with death I'm
Confronting the justice expressing, my voice to the public They
Got to free some brothas or we kidnap the judges They
Got to free some sistas or we kidnap the judges They
Got to beat the system that's enslaving the poor Our
Practicing gun, rages they, R's and 44's .Many
Fought teams and for green this is war This
Is life and I'm the hardest got, ya label all scared Callin
Up the radio don't, want my records to air Y'all
Ain't playin fair to, every rapper in the game I'm

Comin fo y'all blood make, room for the king Nas...[Chorus]x2
[Nas]

I'm
The leader that's, it nobody, higher Nobody
Touchin my crown nobody, dyin Nobody
Smoother harder, tougher, believe, it I'm
Much more smarter much, more strategic Scholarships
And hollow tips a, lot of walkin caskets They
Talk a good one but there's never no action And
I'm the type to poison ya sista twist, her Through
Wit her put, the gun in your face and make you hit her Make
You quiver -when they silhouette of a Don Benson, Light
Up a Cu-ban recite, a few psalms Enlighten
You quick teach, you how a king wins wars Keep
Your ears to the street love, your enemies more 'Cuz
Hate can frustrate and, confuse Too
Eager you lose patience, plan, your attack then you move - ghetto Green
Berets got, freaks got hoes who

Be jumpin out of movin cars and land at my feet - because [Chorus]x2



Y'all know what it is
The streets named me Illmatic, for that I'm still at it
Can't hate us
Fellas

Vice behind me on the intersection
Sex and drugs, my anthology on perfection
Dress superb, admired by conspirers
Who wanna try me, but ain't high enough to four-five me up
Child of the eighties, y'all niggas is lazy
Complain about labour pains, nigga show me the baby
And my nigga Game, light another L, pass the bottle
Pro-black, I don't take cotton out of aspirin bottles
Yeah, I learnt my lessons, and heard y'all snitchin'
Witnessin' you rockin' with Nas, confirmed my suspicion
Green fatigues on, My niggas I bleed for 'em
I can show 'em the water, but can't make 'em drink it
And I can show 'em my fortunes but can't force 'em to think rich
And still I don't abort 'em ? when and if they sink quick
Ignore the ignorance, I rep the brilliance of Queensbridge
And pray to fans, let Murder Inc. live

I don't talk about my guns, nigga I just blaze

'Pac is watchin', Big is listenin'
While Pun talkin' to us, Jam Jay still spinnin'
To every nigga listenin'
I was supposed to be amongst kings, my Mom shouted out at my Christening
And while you still listenin', Shyne locked in a man hole
Cam got shot inside his lambo', sample, life is a gamble
15 years old red rag around my hand, My sisters used to laugh and call me 'Rambo'
Seen Eazy's legacy melt away like a candle
I rekindled the flame
Dre created The Game
Nigga with an attitude from the cloth I came
Young homie ate his way up from the bottom of the food chain
Keep the crown, clown, I rock an LA Dodger Fitted
I showed my ass at Summer Jam but New York was down with it
Now the ball's in my court, never dribble out of bounds with it
Behind the back to Nas, he alley oop to Jigga, nigga

Me and nasty puffin', this a classic, trust me
How you gon' pass the dutchie ? to them niggas that don't love me
I'm talkin' niggas that never wanted to see me on top
Same niggas that never wanted to see the Doctor's Advocate drop, flop, I think not
I'll fuck you rap niggas like virgins
Dre took my training wheels off his curtains
I don't need no encore, no claps, no cheers
The Game ain't over, this the beginning of my career
The ending of yours, the endin' of his
Like Flavor Flav's clock, I'm back to handle my biz
Nigga, it's Game Time, that was Dre's favorite line
Back when proof was in the booth and I recited his lines
And I still think about my nigga from time to time
Make me wanna call 50, and let him know what's on my mind
But I just hold back 'cause we ain't beefin' like that
He ain't Big, and I ain't Pac, and we just eatin' off rap
One love

I'll do Marsha's bit if you want, but it seems kinda pointless
I thought Nas was on point with his multis, the cotton line is a bit old though



Uhh, oooooooooooooh baby, baby
Keep it thug, and keep yo' heat, na nah nah nah nah

[Nas]
Now slowly, thinkin of all the things that oppose me
I think of kings who died and rappers out to dethrone me
For they crown they head is cut off, bodies is laid
Dead in the street, it's so fuckin pitiful
First they love you, could be the bitch that even live with you (hoe)
Mad at your riches, now she switched, turned miserable
Cause she wanna dress like Bonnie, Robin and Crystal do
But Crystal's single, Bonnie's broke and her niggas too (ha)
I can do bad by myself; went from rags to wealth
From Jags to Bentleys to, plenty ass bitches
Can't keep they hands to theyself no more
I'm like, Hugh Hefner, you lesser, you just a

[Chorus]
Wanna be me, you can't you faggot, you bitch
You coward, you clown, you just wanna be down
So you - wanna be me, you bitch, you phony
You clone me, you wanna be son, I'm the one and only
But you - wanna be me, you suckers, you weak
You flunkies, you fake, you couldn't come close on my worst day
But you - wanna be me, I burn you and learn you a lesson
Concernin this mic profession, turn your direction

[Nas]
You can't be me, not in your wildest fantasy
It's childish; should I have to resort to violence?
Pay me a half a million, I'll consult your album
And show you how to stay off my dick
That's the thing I hate the most, can't even call you a man
When you gotta call out my name to get you some fans
No talent, you need direction; you a pussy with a yeast infection
You unlucky, I'm your fuckin C-section
Plus I'm the last real nigga alive
Toast glass, Ill Will, the label get high

Realize, how many classics I gave you
Perhaps if you think back you'll realize that I made you

[Chorus]
[Nas]
You can't be me, I'm tryin to walk a straight line
Why they tryin to take mine? I'm past +8 Miles+ of every state line
Eating, alligators and, hummingbird hearts
At the player's ball, Brianni suits, y'all birds watch
As real millionaire, shit'll take place
Evil as Hitler's hate-race people
This is God son, and I've come from the God under pure peace
To represent the streets, you'll see that my plan
Is not to destroy your man
But to bring more to mankind and teach
Every MC reach for your pens and papers
Lesson one be creative; what you made of junior?
Cause soon you'll be a grown man with the mic in your hand
And understand, to battle Nas not in your plan
I'm the last real nigga alive, understand that
And you my offspring, the boss sting
A bulletproof Porsche things, hard for you to understand that
Nas the king, where my bricks, where my band at?
Play me a gangster's theme, while you entertain me
If I ain't cryin laughin, to the lions, throw your ass in
What the fuck was you niggas thinkin?
Guns'll clutch if I get a inklin that you comin for the kingpin
But I laugh at you cowards, ha ha ha
Take me out, try try try, but you

[Chorus]
You can't be me







Intro:



1. "Album Intro"

2. "N.Y. State of Mind, Pt. II"
(N. Jones, C. Martin)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Gifted Pearl Music/EMI April Music (ASCAP)
Produced by DJ Premier for Works of Mart Productions, Inc
Recorded at D&D Studios and The Hit Factory, NYC by Eddie Sancho
Assistant engineer: Dexter Thibou
Mixed at D&D Studios by DJ Premier
Contains samples of "N.Y. State of Mind," performed by Nas, courtesy of Sony Music Entertainment, Inc. Contains excerpts from the composition "N.Y. State of Mind," written by N. Jones and C. Martin and published by Zomba Enterprises/Gifted Pearl (ASCAP)

3. "Hate Me Now" feat. Puff Daddy
(G. Marchand, N. Jones)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Copyright Control
Produced by Pretty Boy and D. Moet for Fox 5 Music and by Poke and Tone for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at Sony Studios and The Hit Factory, NYC by Kevin Crouse and Steve Souder
Mixed by Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Puff Daddy appears courtesy of Bad Boy/Arista Records

4. "Small World"
(N. Jones, N. Myrick, C. Broady)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/6 July Music (ASCAP)
Produced by Nashiem Myrick for Top of New York and Carlos Broady for 6 July Music
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali
Keys: Mike Goods

5. "Favor for a Favor" feat. Scarface
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, B. Jordan)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions, Inc./Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at Sony Studios, NYC and Hit Factory, NYC by Steve Souder and Kevin Crouse
Mixed at Hit Factory, NYC by Kevin Crouse
Bass guitar: Kirk Lyons
Scarface appears courtesy of Rap-A-Lot/Virgin Records America, Inc

6. "We Will Survive"
(N. Jones, S. Barnes, J. Olivier, J. Edgerten)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music (BMI)/Slam-U-Well Music (ASCAP)/Copyright Control
Produced by Poke and Tone for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc. and Jamel Edgerten
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali
Contains samples from "This Is It" performed by Kenny Loggins courtesy of Sony Music Entertainment. Contains excerpts from the composition "This Is It" written by Loggins and McDonald and published by Milk Money Music & Tauripin Tunes (ASCAP)

7. "Ghetto Prisoners"
(N. Jones, D. Blackmon)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Grease
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali

8. "You Won't See Me Tonight" feat. Aaliyah
(N. Jones, T. Mosley, M. Elliott)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Warner Chappell Music (ASCAP)/Mass Confusion Music (ASCAP)
Produced by Timbaland for Timbaland Productions
Recorded at Hit Factory, NYC by Kevin Crouse
Mixed at Manhattan Center, NYC by Jimmy Douglas
Aaliyah appears courtesy of Blackground Entertainment

9. "I Want to Talk to You"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, A. West)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions/Track Masters Entertainment, Inc. & Alvin West for Xtraordinaire Productions
Recorded and mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Kevin Crouse

10. "Dr. Knockboot"
(N. Jones, S. Barnes, J. Olivier)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music (BMI)/Slam-U-Well Music (ASCAP)
Produced by Poke and Tone for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at Hit Factory and Music Palace, NYC by Jon Shriver
Mixed at Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali
Contains excerpts from the composition "Say What" written by Dave Matthews and published by Music One LLC admin. by MRBI

11. "Life Is What You Make It" feat. DMX
(N. Jones, L. Lewis)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)/300MER4 (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions/Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at Sony Studios, NYC by Steve Souder
Mixed by Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
DMX appears courtesy of Ruff Ryders Entertainment/Def Jam Records

12. "Big Things"
(N. Jones, A. West, G. Masser, M. Masser)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Jobete Music Co., Inc. (ASCAP)/Screen Gems EMI (BMI)
Produced by Alvin West for Xtraordinaire Productions
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali
Contains excerpts from the composition "Them from Mahogany" written by Gerald Masser and Michael Masser published by Jobete Music Co., Inc. (ASCAP)/Screen Gems EMI (BMI)

13. "Nas Is Like"
(N. Jones, C. Martin, W. Mitchell, R. Bell, R. Bell, G. Brown, R. Handy, C. Horne, R. Mickens, C. Redd, G. Redd, C. Smith, D. Thomas, J. Bettis, S. Porcaro)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Gifted Pearl Music (ASCAP) admin. by EMI April Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Skematics & WB Music Corp
Produced by DJ Premier for Works of Mart Productions, Inc
Recorded at D&D Recording and Hit Factory, NYC by Eddie Sancho
Assistant engineer: Dexter Thibou
Mixed at D&D Studios, NYC by DJ Premier
Contains samples from "It Ain't Hard to Tell" performed by Nas, courtesy of Sony Music Entertainment, Inc. Contains excerpts from the composition "It Ain't Hard to Tell" written by Nasir Jones/William Mitchell/Robert Bell/Ronald Bell/George Brown/Roy Handy/Cleveland Horne/Robert Mickens/Clarence Redd/Gene Redd/Claydes Smith/Dennis Thomas/John Bettis/Steven Porcaro, and published by EMI April Music, Inc./Zomba Enterprises/Skematics & WB Music Corp

14. "K-I-SS-I-N-G"
(N. Jones, A. West, L. Lewis, R. Kelly)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)/R. Kelly Publishing LTD/Zomba Songs, Inc. (BMI)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions/Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded and mixed at Hit Factory, NYC by Kevin Crouse
Contains "When a Woman's Fed Up" performed by R. Kelly courtesy of Jive records. Contains excerpts from the composition "When a Woman's Fed Up" written by R. Kelly published by Zomba Songs, Inc. o/b/o itself and R. Kelly Pub. Inc. (BMI)

15. "Money Is My Bitch"
(N. Jones, S. Barnes, J. Olivier)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/12 & Under Music (BMI)/Slam-U-Well Music (ASCAP)
Produced by Alvin West for Xtraordinaire Productions & Poke and Tone for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali

16. "Undying Love"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis)
Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Ill Will Music, Inc. (ASCAP), admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc. (ASCAP)/Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. for Total Package Productions/Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded at The Hit Factory, NYC and Music Palace by Jon Shriver
Mixed at The Hit Factory, NYC by Rich Travali

-

Executive producers: Nas and Steve "The Commissioner" Stoute
Creative direction: Ola Kudu for Kokujin Design, Inc
Photography by Daniel Hastings/Lab 1228
Additional photography by Piotr Sikora
Pharaoh mask casting & sculpting by Dave Cortés & Nicolas Villella

-

THANKS
To God, my mother, love you! My pops love you. My brother jungle
[in progress...]

-

℗ © 1999 Sony Music Entertainment, Inc



Chorus-
Said it ain't to much for me
To have you next to me
I can't believe it
All the things i do
To keep you loving me
And its just to much for me
To not have you by my side
Cause no matter what your going through
You know that im gon' ride yea

Nas-
You a brave girl
Im a brave heart
And car heart
And champion hunnies
You in the benz buggy with the fullies
I ride beside ya
We about to pull a all nighter
Im super freak like Rick James
Sex in rangers
Parked on dangerous blocks
You like it when the strangers watch
Im looking out for cops
You a girl with no fear people put ya hands in the air
For the GQ man of the year
That bentley that polstry leather, the leather
That be up in the coats i wear
Wherever i go so there ya have it
Cashmere fabrics never caught in last years garments
Holsters under armpits chauffers and the charms lit
And the coders holding on the dons wrist
She got the ill will chain on
Turqouise boots sayin god son
This the theme song

Chorus-Amerie

Baby-
You know the size of this sh*t
I flips it quickly loose this trouble for these people get with me
Holla at my hoes 'cause i dip my bitches
From gold to platinum from rag to riches
Im the boss of the boss

The pimp shotcaller
Worldwide riding in the benz with a scroller
In your city tear ya mall up
Pimp fly bitches and tear their walls up
Dress nice im super neat
Ice on white wit 3's on her feat
Worldwide robber from coast to coast
From europe japan i gets that dough
Send out 2 i get back 4
Ya broad around me imma lace that hoe
Smoke dro redo my whips
Redo my chips this the bird man b**ch

Chorus-Amerie

Foxy Brown-
BK i throw it up
Free stay manoloed up
Cris air canary
All these niggas hear me
Lou Vittoun Lou Bratton
Bring fever cock sucker when foxy throw it on
I speak how i feel im a fox 5 general
Yall rap b****hes is all so subliminal
Thats why i ones them everytime i pass em
Frontin wit young g the fox 5 captian
So which hoe wanna f*ck wit huns
So come ???????? one by one
So make um bust off the big magnum
Spray off in the lobby
Call us the shower posse
The don ??? come through stylin hard
Wit 2 booms from the sherlock squadray
It be a bachelor that fox them sparrin
And leave yall niggas on the sideline starvin

Chorus-Amerie

Amerie-2x
I, I, I wanna get to know you
I,I,I want you with me
I, I, I just want to show you
How good it would be close to me



Verse One:
Yo, the Lord is my shepard
The sword is my weapon
Reward is a blessin', that comes from the struggle
Shoes been scuffled, blood's been shed, another Mother loses a son
'cause where I'm from the young chooses a gun
Before they choose an education
But once dead their ain't no awakenin'
So like once said, life ain't for fakin
Yo, you wit' me when I say duct tape 'em?
Fuck waitin'
Got the truck outside, Benz jeep for navigation
Everything in position, they'd rather be fuckin' wit' Satan
When I aim I ain't missin', master of assasination'
I heard he call himself Esco, drive a Lexo
Rocks his hat sideways, showin' off his waves with a chipped tooth
Is this the truth?
This is what we do, sip a brew
Wait around his crib until it turns around two AM
As soon as he walks in the door we slay 'em
You guys got fat while I was away, so start payin'

Chorus - Okay, you wanna play rough?!
(gun shots) (scratching - a thug changes, and love changes) repeat 3X
Okay yo, we could play rough!

Verse Two:
Okay now, drive up to my crib, am I high enough?
Who these niggas tryin' to hide in their truck
I ain't order cable, why in the fuck these niggas
Ducked in they seat? are they lookin' for me?
But I ain't do shit, could it be that niggas thought
I slept like B.I.G. and Pac did
May they rest in peace, but while I'm alive I pop shit
P-11 Glock spits 17 shot clips
Put these niggas in boxes, where they Moms and Pops is
Pull the strap from under the seat
Back up in the street
Watch these niggas thats tryin' to watch me, I carefully creep
Take off my shoes, barefoot nigga poppin' my heat
Empty every shell in their direction
Its you, I should've guessed it!
Same niggas that I was connected wit', I know sent you
Now I'm'a take you off here, you dont know what you got into

Chorus

Verse Three:
Walked in his house, smackin' him up, "what you talkin' about?" he said
Shut-up nigga! knocked him in his head with chrome
Never thought I'd be in his home
With his wife taped up for my niggas to bone
Fuckin' with me, you should've known
I'll have 'em write "stupid nigga" on your tombstone
What money can do, get you hit for less than a G
For threatenin' me
I'm'a do it myself, take you to Hell, this ones for free
Killin' you niggas with nothin'
Left him dead, engine runnin'
You the only I'm makin' sure that gets whats comin'
Look at your Woman, anal ripped out, its your fault
They gang banged your bitch out in your face and you saw it
But before I let you have it I'm searchin' your crib
For pictures of relatives, addresses to where they live
Shit like that, incase a nigga wanna strike back
I'll be right up in his ass to blow 'em out with the Mac
Niggas treat you like Fam, and you on it like that?
Now you gotta lay flat, gettin' eatin' by rats
Gettin' even's never wrong, its only right to react
Eye for an eye, 'cause the sweetest part is payback
Somebody kncokin', who dat?
"a cop man", let him in
And give that mothafucka one under the chin
Can't believe this nigga down with the Feds!
The copped screamed out your government before he dropped dead
Dont explain, I put the pound on his head
Blew 'em! before that I can't remember the last time I said......
Okay, so we gonna play rough!

Chorus







QB
Where the fuck y'all at?
Ha, ha, ha
Yeah, let's go

[Hook - Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleamin', switchin' lanes, two seatin'
Hate 'em or love 'em for the same reason (Fresh)
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in (Yes)
So in God's Son we trust, 'cause they know
I'ma give 'em what they want
They lookin' for a (Hero)
I guess that makes me a (Hero)

[Verse One - Nas]
Another chapter of the cleanest rapper
Distinguished gentlemen
Crooks and Castles on his back, Maybach-er
Exotic lady eye catcher, holla at ya
Call me the chiropractor
Working like Muay Thai class
Can prespire out ya
And of course I've been the boss since back when
Rockin' D-boy Fila, velour and a 190 black Benz
Now they shut down the stores that I'm shoppin'
Used to be train robbin', face covered in stockin'
I'm him

[Hook - Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleamin', switchin' lanes, two seatin'
Hate 'em or love 'em for the same reason (Fresh)
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in (Yes)
So in God's Son we trust, 'cause they know
I'ma give 'em what they want
They lookin' for a (Hero)
I guess that makes me a (Hero)

[Verse Two - Nas]
Rubber grip hold the reloader
Come at me, I'ma rip your soldiers in half
Silverback ape, nickel-plated mag
Young, rich and flashy
Young bitch, I'm nasty
All black clothes, the ice lay on me so classy
And every time I close my lids
I can still see the borough, I can still see the bridge
I can still see the dreams that my niggas ain't never lived to see
Tell 'em angels open the door for me
From nine Berettas and movin' raw
To chillin' in wine cellars, sticks and humidors
That's what I call mature
That's what I call a G
That's what I call a pimp
That's what I call a gangsta to the fullest, shit
I'm trying to make more C.R.E.A.M. by every September 14
That's my dream, so I can be more clean
As I grow yearly
I can see things more clearly
That's why they fear me

[Hook - Nas & Keri Hilson]
Chain gleamin', switchin' lanes, two seatin'
Hate 'em or love 'em for the same reason (Fresh)
Can't leave it, the game needs him
Plus the people need someone to believe in (Yes)
So in God's Son we trust, 'cause they know
I'ma give 'em what they want
They lookin' for a (Hero)
I guess that makes me a (Hero)

[Verse Three - Nas]
It's Universal apartheid, I'm hog-tied
The corporate side blockin' y'all from goin' to stores and buyin' it
First L.A. and Doug Morris was ridin' with it
But Newsweek articles startle big wigs
They said, "Nas, why is he tryin' it?"
My lawyers only see the Billboard charts is winnin', forgettin'
Nas the only true rebel since the beginning
Still in musical prison, in jail for the flow
Try tellin' Bob Dylan, Bruce or Billy Joel they can't sing what's in they soul
So Untitled it is, I never changed nothin'
But people, remember this: if Nas can't say it
Think about these talented kids with new ideas
Bein' told what they can and can't spit
I can't sit and watch it, so shit, I'ma drop it
Like it or not, you ain't gotta cop it
I'm a hustla in the studio, cups of Don Julio
No matter what the CD called, I'm unbeatable, y'all
Let's go!

Yeah, yeah
Nas, Polow da Don



1. "The Prediction"
(R. Jackson, J. C. Moore)
Beauty on the duty Music (ASCAP)/Care Moore Communications, Inc. Pub. (BMI)
Produced by Nas and Rich Nice for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Soundtrack Studios, NYC and Manhattan Center Studios, NYC
Additional recording at Chung King Studios, NYC
Mixed by Rich Nice and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Keyboards: Rich Nice
Thunder and wind: "The Most High"
Vocals: Rich Nice
Bass: Delroy "Chris" Cooper
Percussion: Rudy Bird
Vibes: Squidlly

2. "Life We Chose"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, F. Wesley Jr.)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)/Rubber Band Music, Inc./Songs of Plygram (BMI)
Produced by L.E.S. for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by Tone, L.E.S. and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming: L.E.S
Featuring samples from the Fred Wesley and the Horny Horns featuring Maceo Parker recording "Peace Fugue" produced under license from Atlantic Recording Corp. by arrangement with Warner Special Products. Written by Fred Wesley Jr. and published by Rubber Band Music, Inc./Universal Songs of Polygram (BMI)

3. "Nastradamus"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, J. Brown)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mawkeen's Music, Inc. (ASCAP)/Dynatone Publishing Company admin. by Unichappell Music, Inc. (BMI)
Produced by L.E.S. for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by Tone, L.E.S. and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mastered by Tony Gillis at The Hit Factory, NYC
Bass guitar: Jerry Barnes
Programming: L.E.S
Contains "(It's Not the Express) It's the J.B.'s Monorail" (Pts. 1 & 2) written by James Brown and published by Dynatone Publishing Company admin. by Unichappell Music, Inc. (BMI). Used by permission. "Nastradamus" contains "(It's Not the Express) It's the J.B.'s Monorail" (Pts. 1 & 2) performed by The JB Horns courtesy of Universal Music Group

4. "Some of Us Have Angels"
(N. Jones, D. Blackmon)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Damon Blackmon (ASCAP)
Produced by Dame Grease for Vacant Lot Productions, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Right Track Studios, NYC and Soundtrack Studios, NYC
Mixed by Dame Grease and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Drum programming and keyboards: Dame Grease

5. "Project Windows" feat. Ron Isley
(N. Jones, N. Myrick, C. Broady)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./NashMack Music (BMI) admin. by Warner Chappell/6 July Music (ASCAP)
Originally produced by Nashiem Myrick for Top of New York and Carlos Broady for 6 July Music
Re-produced by Poke and Tone for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc. and Al West for Xtraordinaire Entertainment
Recorded by Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by Poke, Tone and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Bass guitar: Kevin Scott
Ron Isley appears courtesy of Teaneck Records/The Island Def Jam Music Group

6. "Come Get Me"
(N. Jones, C. Martin)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Gifted Pearl Music/EMI April Music (ASCAP)
Produced by DJ Premier for Works of Mart, Inc
Recorded at D&D Studios by Eddie Sancho and Jason Goldstein at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC
Mixed by DJ Premier and Norty Cotto
Assistant engineer: Dexter Thibou
Programming and scratches: DJ Premier
Contains samples of dialogue from the LP If I Were President performed by Timmy Rogers used courtesy of Universal Music Special Markets, Inc

7. "Shoot 'Em Up"
(N. Jones, K. Muchita)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Juvenile Hell Publishing admin. by BMG Songs, Inc. (ASCAP)
Produced by Have for Mobb Deep, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at The Hit Factory, NYC and Right Track Studios, NYC
Mixed by Nas, Tone and James "Bonzai" Caruso at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mastered by Tony Gillis at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming: Havoc

8. "Last Words" feat. Millenium Thug
(Nasir Jones, L. Lewis, Nashawn Jones, Middlebrooks, Williams, Jones, Bonner, Satchell, Beck, Pierce)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)/Ricks Music/Play One Music (BMI)
Produced by L.E.S. for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC
Mixed by L.E.S. and James "Bonzai" Caruso at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming: L.E.S
Contains samples of "Good Luck Charm" performed by The Ohio Players used courtesy of Universal Music Special Markets
Inc. Written by Middlebrooks, Williams, Jones, Bonner, Satchell, Beck and Pierce, and published by Unichappell Music, Inc. o/b/o Ricks Music/Play One Music (BMI)

9. "Family" feat. Mobb Deep
(N. Jones, K. Muchita, A. Johnson, D. Blackmon)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Juvenile Hell Music admin. by BMG Songs/P. Noid Publishing/Careers BMG Publishing, Inc./Damon Blackmon (ASCAP)
Produced by Dame Grease for Vacant Lot Productions, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Right Track Studios, NYC and Soundtrack Studios, NYC
Mixed by Dame Grease and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Drum programming and keyboards: Dame Grease
Mobb Deep appears courtesy of Loud Records

10. "God Love Us"
(N. Jones, D. Blackmon)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Damon Blackmon (ASCAP)
Produced by Dame Grease for Vacant Lot Productions, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Right Track Studios, NYC and Soundtrack Studios, NYC
Mixed by Dame Grease, Rich Nice and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming and keyboards: Dame Grease

11. "Quite Niggas" feat. Bravehearts
(N. Jones, D. Blackmon, J. Jones, M. Epps, E. Gray)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Damon Blackmon (ASCAP)
Produced by Dame Grease for Vacant Lot Productions, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by Dame Grease and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming and keyboards: Dame Grease

12. "Big Girl"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, L. Bryant, R. Douglas)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mawkeen's Music (ASCAP)/Leo Medea Popular Songs/Miss Vera Music Co./Ration Songs, Inc. c/o Music Sales Corp. (BMI)
Produced by L.E.S. for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by L.E.S. and Rich Ravali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Programming: L.E.S
Contains samples of "You're a Big Girl Now" performed by The Stylistics used courtesy of Universal Music Special Markets, Inc. and Amherst Records, Inc. Written by Lamar Bryant and Robert Douglas and published by Leo Medea Popular Songs, Miss Vera Music Co. and Ration Songs, Inc. (BMI)

13. "New World"
(N. Jones, L. Lewis, D. Paich, J. Porcan)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mawkeen's Music/Hudmar Publishing/Rising Storm Music (ASCAP)
Produced by L.E.S. for Big Things Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC and Kevin Crouse at The Hit Factory, NYC
Mixed by L.E.S. and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Background vocals: Tara Watkins, Candice Anderson & Lenesha Randolph
Vocal production by Rich Nice
Contains samples from "Africa" performed by Toto courtesy of Sony Music, written by David Peach and Jeff Porcan and published by Hudmar Publishing and Rising Storm Music (ASCAP)

14. "You Owe Me" feat. Ginuwine
(N. Jones, T. Mosley, Static)
Ill Will Music, Inc., admin. by Zomba Enterprises, Inc./Mass Confusion Music (ASCAP)
Produced by Timbaland for Timbaland Productions
Recorded by Jimmy Douglas at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC and Rich Nice at The Hit Factory, NYC and South Beach, Miami
Mixed by Timbaland and Jimmy Douglas at Manhattan Center Studios, NYC
Programming and keyboards: Timbaland
Ginuwine appears courtesy of 550 Music/Epic Records

15. "The Outcome"
(R. Jackson, J. C. Moore)
Beauty on the Duty Music (ASCAP)/Care Moore Communications, Inc. Pub. (BMI)
Produced by Rich Nice for Track Masters Entertainment, Inc
Recorded by Jason Goldstein at Soundtrack Studios, NYC and Manhattan Center Studios, NYC
Additional recording at Chung King Studios, NYC
Mixed by Rich Nice and Rich Travali at The Hit Factory, NYC
Keyboards: Rich Nice
Thunder and wind: "The Most High"
Vocals: Rich Nice
Bass: Delroy "Chris" Cooper
Percussion: Rudy Bird
Vibes: Squidlly

-

Executive producer: Nas
A&R executive: Rich Nice
Album coordinator: Nikki Martin
Mastered by Chris Gehringer at The Hit Factory, NYC
Legal representation: Matt Greenberg for Grubman Indursky and Schindler, PC
Art direction: Julian Alexander
Photography: Kwaku Alston
Design: Julian Alexander and Eric Steinhilber

-

Thank you GOD for being the Supreme Being, and watching over us. I appreciate everything you do. I was influenced to make music by my father, Olu Dara. He inspired me to be me. along with my mom, I have been blessed with life. I have see a lot in my years. Life is a gift, enjoy it. I focus only on being creative and hope people of the world can enjoy what I'm creating. Peace... Real Is Real
One Love
-Nas

-

℗ © 1999 Sony Music Entertainment, Inc



I’d like to dedicate this one here
To my star
This the one I cherish
She loves me unconditionally
No matter what
My love will always be here for you baby
Yeah
So for god, who gave me this gift
You
I give you this

[Hook:]
(if i had it all)
Ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da-de-da-de-da
Ba ba ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da
Woah
Yeah
Trust me your my little one
Trust me your my little one
Woah
(if i had it all)

[Verse 1: Nas]
Even though we don’t live in the same home
And i might have missed your graduation
And no matter how many miles i am away from… you
You know, that i, love you
You hear daddy on every station
Thinking, im loving my occupation
I know i got you home waiting
Dessy, i do, it all, for you

[Hook:]
(if i had it all)
Ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da-de-da-de-da
Daddy’s little girl
Ba ba ba ba ba ba ba
I would give you the world
Ba-de-da
Woah
Little girl, give you the world
Yeah
Trust me your my little one
Trust me your my little one
I’ll give you the world
Woah
(if i had it all)


[Verse 2: Nas]
Even though you’ll be grown soon
You gotta stand on your own two
Please listen what daddy told you
I know, you think, that i’m old school
You’ll see that i was right soon
One day, you will meet the right groom
And then, you will see your life bloom
And then you know, what’s right, for you

[Hook:]
(if i had it all)
Ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da-de-da-de-da
Daddy’s little girl
Ba ba ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da
Woah
Daddy’s little girl
I would give you the world
Yeah
Trust me your my little one
Trust me your my little one
(if i had it all)
Woah

[Verse 3: Nas]
Respect your mom, no one will replace her
She’s the one who went through the labor
(if i had it all)
But you don’t owe her no favor
But her respect is due
See, daddy just wanna show you
(if i had it all)
All the heartache i go through

For you

[Hook:]
(if i had it all)
This world of mine
I’ll give it all to you
Ba ba ba ba ba
Ba-de-da-de-da-de-da
Ba ba ba ba ba ba ba
Its your world baby girl
Ba-de-da
Woah
Yeah
(if i had it all)
Trust me your my little one
Trust me your my little one
Woah
(if i had it all)
(if i had it all)



Yo... yeah...
It's that Queens shit, the real shit...
Illmatic...
It's the N-A-S, yes... yo...
I wake up every morning
Thinking what we gon' do today
(What we gon' do today)
There's got to be a better way
(Got to be a better way)
To maintain is the price of fame
Life is like a dice game
(Maintain is the price of fame)
Life is like a dice game
1, 2...
I never knock a brother
I'm anti-jail for real
Smooth criminal skill
Locked in a human flesh shield
Watching niggas get rich beside me
Pushing a 5 B-Y me
Up in the passenger seat
But I see me as Hallie Selassie in my kingdom
Sipping Asti Spumante
Dripped in, reality kicks in
I need the papes to start clicking
Got a connect out in Richmond
Every nigga in the fam will pitch it
It's on, word is bond
That's my name, big Nas
All wise to civilize
From the Northern Hemisphere of the earth
Peace to my seed and thanks for her birth
Destiny, that's her name
It's going on
You know my name
Big Nas in the house, y'all
On the freestyle tip
When I finish this shit
It's sure to be a hit
Peace...



In a day of 1999 it had to happen
The result of man's stupidity became real
Death smell is everywhere
In their nicely worked out war plan
Through the sky come rockets down there people are scored
Everybody does try to save his own everywhere in town
On the run the people turn to animals
Love and hate does not exist here more
No more hope
Which led to the world's last breath
Fire does control our world till the end
Go fight stand up if you are not scared
Tell them the people are dead
The merciless radioactivity spread real fast
Burning skin makes the pain a torture, everybody gets blind
Can't feel hot and cold no more, it is so strange
Listen to the people helpless screams, it is too late
Moving forward slowly and together we are strong
We will tell them what we are thinking
About their bloody war
And we stop the war and there will be no hate
And we will together rule the world peacefully



Uhh, ooh baby, baby
Keep it thug and keep yo' heat, na nah nah nah nah

Now slowly, thinkin of all the things that oppose me
I think of kings who died and rappers out to dethrone me
For they crown they head is cut off, bodies is laid
Dead in the street, it's so fuckin pitiful

First they love you, could be the bitch that even live with you (hoe)
Mad at your riches, now she switched, turned miserable
Cause she wanna dress like Bonnie, Robin and Crystal do
But Crystal's single, Bonnie's broke and her niggas too (ha)

I can do bad by myself; went from rags to wealth
From Jags to Bentleys to plenty ass bitches
Can't keep they hands to theyself no more
I'm like, Hugh Hefner, you lesser, you just a

Wanna be me, you can't you faggot, you bitch
You coward, you clown, you just wanna be down
So you wanna be me, you bitch, you phony
You clone me, you wanna be son, I'm the one and only

But you wanna be me, you suckers, you weak
You flunkies, you fake, you couldn't come close on my worst day
But you wanna be me, I burn you and learn you a lesson
Concernin' this mic profession, turn your direction

You can't be me, not in your wildest fantasy
It's childish; should I have to resort to violence?
Pay me a half a million, I'll consult your album
And show you how to stay off my dick

That's the thing I hate the most, can't even call you a man
When you gotta call out my name to get you some fans
No talent, you need direction; you a pussy with a yeast infection
You unlucky, I'm your fuckin' c-section

Plus I'm the last real nigga alive
Toast glass, ill will, the label get high
Realize, how many classics I gave you
Perhaps if you think back you'll realize that I made you

Wanna be me, you can't you faggot, you bitch
You coward, you clown, you just wanna be down
So you wanna be me, you bitch, you phony
You clone me, you wanna be son, I'm the one and only

But you wanna be me, you suckers, you weak
You flunkies, you fake, you couldn't come close on my worst day
But you wanna be me, I burn you and learn you a lesson
Concernin' this mic profession, turn your direction

You can't be me, I'm tryin to walk a straight line
Why they tryin to take mine? I'm past 8 Miles of every state line
Eating alligators and hummingbird hearts
At the player's ball, Brianni suits, y'all birds watch

As real millionaire, shit'll take place
Evil as Hitler's hate-race people, this is God son
And I've come from the God under pure peace
To represent the streets, you'll see that my plan

Is not to destroy your man
But to bring more to mankind and teach
Every MC reach for your pens and papers
Lesson one be creative; what you made of Junior?

'Cause soon you'll be a grown man with the mic in your hand
And understand, to battle Nas not in your plan
I'm the last real nigga alive, understand that
And you my offspring, the boss sting

A bulletproof Porsche things, hard for you to understand that
Nas the king, where my bricks, where my band at?
Play me a gangster's theme, while you entertain me
If I ain't cryin laughin, to the lions, throw your ass in

What the fuck was you niggas thinkin'?
Guns'll clutch if I get a inklin' that you comin for the kingpin
But I laugh at you cowards, ha ha ha
Take me out, try try try, but you

Wanna be me, you can't you faggot, you bitch
You coward, you clown, you just wanna be down
So you wanna be me, you bitch, you phony
You clone me, you wanna be son, I'm the one and only

But you wanna be me, you suckers, you weak
You flunkies, you fake, you couldn't come close on my worst day
But you wanna be me, I burn you and learn you a lesson
Concernin' this mic profession, turn your direction

You can't be me



Light somethin', stop frontin'
How much money's enough? Think maybe like the trillion figures
Pray my daughter don't wild like the Hilton Sisters
That'd kill me yo, filthy rich
My daughter pass it on to the next generation
Throwing carnations at my tombstone
In my new home, meet moms in my Yves St. Laurent suit on
Then we do a dance like my man Luther Jam
But my verse came first
I stole change out her purse
Now I wanna dig her up outta the earth
Too morbid, learn forward toward a new paragraph
Blue carats, D-Class, strictly that kush in the weed bag
Tryna figure out what Berry Gordy had put in production
Studio smoky now, hard like David Ruffin
Hit a spliff through a sÃ©ance
And I, play on playa
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Gotta get your papes on, play on playa
Before it's all gone, sip Dom, tip waiters
Do the yacht thing, mÃ©nage swing, baby
Spendin' dubs on your buzz, gotta live crazy
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Get your papes on, play on playa
Get your papes on, play on playa
Get your papes on
Ruby red grapefruit juice with Grey Goose
Rubies in Hey-Zeus piece
Pimped out like Snoop be, but an East Coast thing
My girl stocking tied up in a knot, top of my bean head
Billion dollar dream hear
Went from triple beams to digital
Serving fiends, the minimal, 60 G's, no criminal
No mo', just mo' doe, mimosas pouring, Oprah's earrings on fingers
While your girl performs cunnilingus
'Cause this big money aroma lingers
Barber cleans his blade, then he give me a fade
Hot towel on the face
Hot models who vomit after they eat so they can stay lightweight
Swallowing my protein like an Ovaltine shake
Come through like Moe Green from Godfather, so clean
Where I step, I Clorox it
Keep 20 G's on both sides of the thighs, that's four pockets
Eighty thousand, browse for the nicest price
But we ain't into buying Conflict Ice
That's the **** they stole from the Congo and other black soil
True mack for you, nappy hair, just spinnin'
Honey gave me a massage with the happy ending
Finest females I just came on, and sprayed her
Gotta get your papes on, play on playa
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Gotta get your papes on, play on playa
Before it's all gone, sip Dom, tip waiters
Do the yacht thing, mÃ©nage swing, baby
Spendin' dubs on your buzz, gotta live crazy
Finest females I spit game on, I sprayed her
Get your papes on, play on playa
It's kinda hard for a playa like you
But let me show you how a **** like me get revenue
What you never do is punk out, what you better do
Never let the game get ahead of you, get a better view
Better yet a better crew, praise God, I'ma marry you
Get your homie, carry you, bury you
Slowly, roll me another blunt stuff it
Lick it, puff it, tuck it, **** it
That man, that gang, that bang it was
In D O double G we trust
Yep yep, young loc with the two steps
He creepin' with two Tecs, he's sleepin' with two chicks
Right before he blast, all you heard was two clicks
End of existence, for instance
Rewind it, replay it, re-chop it, remix it
Re-twist it, goddamn D O double G, 'cause we missed it
Travel slow, I'm a Indian but not a Navajo
I smoke the big leaf in all the big deef's
My hair in two braids, I'm the big Chief
Ladahdah be dahdadah
Yeah, break that down, how fresh ya are
The King from Queens, Mr. Escobar
Connect with the best from the west, yes yes ya are
Oh, my God, it's Snoop Dogg and Nas, playa play on



I'd like to dedicate this one here, to my star
Someone I cherish, she loves me unconditionally
No matter what, our love will always be here for you baby
Yeah, so from God, He gave me this gift, you
And I give you this, the world
(If I had it all)

If I had it all
If I had it all

Yeah, just me and my little one
(If I had it all)
Just me and my little one
(If I had it all)

Even though we don't live in the same home
And I mightta miss your graduation
And no matter how many miles I'm away from you
You know that I love you

Hear daddy on every station
Thinking, I'm loving my occupation
I know I got you home waitin' to see
I do it all for you
(If I had it all)

(If I had it all)
Daddy's little girl I would give you the world
Little girl I'd give you the world
(If I had it all)
Yeah, just me and my little one
Just me and my little one
(If I had it all)
I'd give you the world

Even though you'll be grown soon
You gotta stand on your two
Please listen what daddy told you
I know you think that I'm old school

You'll see that I was right soon
One day, you will meet the right groom
And then, you will see your life bloom
And then you'll know what's right for you
(If I had it all)

(If I had it all)
Daddy's little girl
Daddy's little girl I would give you the world
(If I had it all)
Yeah, just me and my little one
(Whattup)
(If I had it all)
Just me and my little one
(If I had it all)

Respect your mom, no one will replace her
She's the one who went through the labor
(If I had it all)
But you don't owe her no favors
But her respect is due

See, daddy just wanna show you
(If I had it all)
All the heartache I go through
(If I had it all)
It's for you

If this world were mine, I'd give it all to you
(If I had it all)
Yeah
(If I had it all)
It's your world baby girl, yeah
Yeah, just me and my little one
(If I had it all)
Just me and my little one
(If I had it all)

If I had it all
If I had it all



Ei sais kokeiluu kielt kerta ei johda minnekkn
Vaikka s kyll muistat lupaukset joista luistat
Yhteen hetkeen s heitt pottiin kaiken muun
Seint sulkee ympyrs kun juokset karkuun itses
Pidempn jos et n s trmt esteeseen ennen pitk
Sun tytyy saada hengitt pelkt et tuhlaat elms
Et tahdo tuntee varmaa roihussa poltat karmaa
Tiedt s ne liekit levii pian sun siltoihin
Seint sulkee ympyrs kun juokset karkuun itses
Pidemp jos et n s trmt esteeseen ennen pitk
Juhlan jlkeen vieraat lhtee tyhjt kuoret j
Sient sulkee ympyrs kun juokset karkuun itses
Pidempn jos et n niin s esteeseen trmt
Seint sulkee ympyrs kun juokset karkuun itses
Pidenpn jos et n s trmt esteeseen ennen pitk



Look here see
Pretty Mike shanked Two-Face Al over some gal
Found the body dead in the isles
Death by strangulation, microphone cord, a dirty broad
Guess they'll never play it again Sam
Damn that was my jam, now she's on the lamb
She made it out with 200 grand, what a scam!
While these two compete on who's the star of the show
Golden legs there makes off with the dough
I read the paper there with Joe the Butcher
He says one glance is all it took ya, she's a real looker
They say her old man's a bootlegger
Transporting in any weather, and at this rate we'll never get her
Fellas, think it's time to call it a night
All this talk of this mystery dame's gettin' me tight
Thought I saw her in my eyesight, right
Hate to spoil the party, what are you guys havin', the same?
Waiter another round for the gang
It's strange how I always felt outta place
Joe The Butcher's my ace, but in comes Freckle Face
So I said 'Ssee you later'
'Fore I hurt him and his two ugly thumb breakers
He met them in Louisiana wrestling gators
An idiot can tell they're involved with the caper
So I pulled the revolver on my waist up
Between the patrol car and the gray truck
Behind the street lamp was a silhouette
White gloves and a real long cigarette
What do ya know all this time she's got me in her scope
She spoke says the Devil got you guys by the throat
Your conspiracy theories won't work without evidence
That's the reason why Eric B is not president
Well, what do ya say
Ya see?
Ya see?
Ya see?
Look here see
I know you got soul you're trying to hide it
How did you kill a man out in Cypres
One Eyed Charlie, he only hangs with the criminal minded
Says you guys did it **** is he lyin'
She says, 'Walk this way I'll tell you a children's story'
We hit the bodega got her a few 40's
We jumped in my ride we drove and she cried
Twisted off the cap there and opened her mouth wide
Swallowed it, whole bottle's half empty
Drinks like a fish now she's past tipsy
The truth came out as we got to her suave house
Chopped and screwed, her mouth and sat me on the couch
I said it's gettin late c'mon give it to me straight
Who's ya sponsor lady? She says Bill Gates
What are ya born '77 or '78?
She said, â€½Nah it goes way to an earlier dateâ€
Slave times, claims the slaves said rhymes
But she fell in love with some fella named Clive
Who? Clive Campbell from Sedgwick Ave
The Bronx, now she shows me the cash
I said who's Clive, don't play with me skirt
She said Clive Campbell, he's Kool Herc
Listen up sweetheart, now we gettin' somewhere
As she's talkin' she starts vanishing in thin air
But before she drops the money bag on the floor and died
She said, â€½If you really love me I'll come back aliveâ€
Hip hop is so **** dead!



[Intro]
So many niggas get fucked up in the game
See, that's where they get caught out there in that word "Game"
'Cause it's not no fuckin' game

[Verse 1]
When you hear shells coming at ya
Hot ones from a shotgun, I bet nigga runs faster
Loose a shoe to get away from a blaster
Think about that casket—you don't wanna be in that shit
Quick to take consignment; you taking everybody's package
Money over bitches was the law you practiced
So you act as if money was no object
Spendin' fazools, trips for your whole projects
Epcot Center, linens for ya bitches, Rolies for your dogs
Now we in the mall, slayed by his bitches
Every day I'm reminiscing, how he was living, having fun
'Cause any day coulda led to prison
Not for a short bid, 'cause if the feds ever caught kid
It'd be like 25 years conspiracy
Another 25 for RICO, snatching up him and his people
He had his jeep bulletproof, silencers on the Desert Eagle
Flipping bricks in Gary, Indiana
He had it locked down from the streets to the slammer
Only trusted two things: his trigger and his hammer
Used to be a bum 'til he had a six-month run
Had a lawsuit, 30 G's, the case was won
Met with Mexican Hoyé, cop boya
Bought a barbershop, named it after seeing Sade
That's where they found his body, in a barber chair face down
Bullets in his chest, sliced apart from the waist down
Planned to sell his shop, stick Hoyé for everything he got
Take jewels and his pies
Fill his shoes with cement and drop his body in the tides
But Hoyé was wise
Even when he ain't around he got ears and eyes
Gotta stay a step ahead of this game to stay alive

[Chorus]
Always wanted fame, always wanted cash
To live fast, get the girls with the biggest ass
Fuck a 9 to 5, gotta drive a 5
Now that I got it, the hardest thing to do is stay alive
Always wanted fame, always wanted cash
To live fast, get the girls with the biggest ass
Fuck a 9 to 5, gotta drive a 5
Now that I got it, the hardest thing to do is stay alive

[Verse 2]
Cokehead Sandra, she grew in Gowanus
Her man was large and Sandra was his baby mama
Stayed in drama, fighting with hood rats that he was fucking
No job all day, she did nothing
They son was 7-years-old, she really was a wifey
First should she would transport blow, overnight for a G
He paid up front, they laid up once
She got pregnant, she wouldn't dead it
She had a boy, named her son Infinite after his father who did dirt
She didn't know disaster would follow
Capsules and bottles of crack in the back of his Mazda
He let her drive while he drove the burgundy 5
He often talk about how he wants to murder these guys
From off of Bergen Street, had mad work in the street
Lifestyle, richest nigga, far from how he used to be
Never thought he'd rock diamonds; never took weakness for kindness
That's how he gradually grew
Did a favor for a favor—now the nigga in with the crew
And now he live major, house in Dix Hills next to Brooke Shields
With the cook and the maid, shit was real
Saved his first bills made in his bodega
"Good luck, player" sign on the paper taped in the window
Escaped from a would-be kidnap, and slept
Thought niggas feared his rep 'til he got wet
Woulda had the world in his hands, his girl did a scam
The owner's rich, is boning niggas to get rid of her man
Welcome to the game, baby

[Chorus]
Always wanted fame, always wanted cash
To live fast, get the girls with the biggest ass
Fuck a 9 to 5, gotta drive a 5
Now that I got it, the hardest thing to do is stay alive
Always wanted fame, always wanted cash
To live fast, get the girls with the biggest ass
Fuck a 9 to 5, gotta drive a 5
Now that I got it, the hardest thing to do is stay alive
The hardest thing to do is stay alive
The hardest thing to do is stay alive











[Nas]
I think I can remember some...

Brenda the back-bender used to have me in the twister
Grabbed her up and left her at the Buena Vista
Chelsea used to tell me choke her while I stroke her
Stuck a Heineken bottle up in the ass, a real joker
Used to run my bubble bath, tons of laughs, sexy chick
Mad skills, she used to try to eat my excrement
Used to play Atari 1200, baby-sitter made me kiss her
Put hickeys on her stomach
Toya was a tomboy 'til we played catch a screw
Had her out past her curfew, Sheila had this perfume
That drove a nigga wild, was a child then, Gertrude
Used to put my face in her crotch
Spun my tongue around in a circle while she watched
Eiserea knew I was a player, brought Fatima, loud screamer
While I blew clouds of reefer, they sucked juice out my uretha
While Marvin Gaye pumped from the speaker

[Chorus]
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, and all the wild things I used to do
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
Remembering the times it was on my mind, but none of them could touch you

[Nas]
Was only scared of them STDs, syphilis, VD and herpes
Daffy Duck-lookin' bitch burnt me, correction
Urinary tract infection, what I got for no protection
Was a horny dog, mornings waking up with a log
Dick stuck to my draws, wet dreams in the mind
Of a one-of-a-kind sex fiend, Justine was luscious wanna cuff us when fucked us
Me and her best friend, this thick Texan named Tamika, English teacher
Wedding ring on finger, bent her big ass over the fold-out sofa
The weather was cold and Loretta would throw on nothing but a thong
Under the coat and
Put a show on just to show me she loved me
She would undress and wait in zero below weather
In slippers and a sun dress for me to arrive
Kept a freak in the ride with her head in my lap, the steering wheel's high

[Chorus]
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, and all the wild things I used to do
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
Remembering the times it was on my mind, but none of them could touch you

[Nas]
Thank God I got bank god, so fuck pimpin'
Fuck broke condoms, pills and penicillin
Abortion clinics, I was one of the best who did it
Lesbian shit, wheelchair girls and midgets
Twin sisters, cousins, mothers and daughters, some wasn't no quarters
Long chin, some with funny odors
Long blond weaves, overweight, cottage cheese
Some I paid college fees, then they strip tease
And it's sad I don't remember great times that made me drool
And the sex gave me flashbacks when I was like eww
Mature with it now dog, here's the side of Nas
Principles are lined up, things prioritized
Se mamma I left that alone, faded memories, the reason that I'm grown
It'd be senseless for us to lie about our old experiences, no longer
Are we tempted

[Chorus]
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
(now we could properly begin this)
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, and all the wild things I used to do
Remember the times I hung with the dimes, remember the times I fucked a few
Remembering the times it was on my mind, but none of them could touch you



[Lyrics missing]



[Intro]
What you say? Can't hear you, man, speak the fuck up
(It's what they want) Word (It's what they want)

[Verse 1]
Nastradamus, skama lit, know when I rep
Flow when I'm set, I got the chips to make a Lotus my whip
Gold on my neck was once a code of respect
For high rollers and vets
Now it's loads of baguettes
Prefer a Mac-10 over a Tec
No matter sober or wet, I smack soldier cadets
Trees that might eject my hype back
Famous phrase "Nigga, light that"
Hoes you fuck ask you: 'Where your ice at, dunn?'
It's all about Playboys when we was young
Could only get tongue, then finally we could cum
Busting in hoes, guzzling 4's
Crack blitz, '86, you turn hustling pro
From bottles, to seven in your hand
To fake Pepsi's, to get to the crack, unscrew the can
Gleam blunted, seeing 100's, stacks of boy with a lean on it
We got it if the fiends want it
The whole block singing the same theme "Don it"
Fuck it, too many crabs in the bucket
If it's ice work, I'm gon' truck it
You gotta love it, you gotta love it

[Hook]
(It's what they want) Fuck it, you gotta love it
(It's what they want, huh? It's what they want)
Fuck it, you gotta love it
(It's what they want, huh?) Fuck it, you gotta love it

[Verse 2]
Some girls get too emotional, fanatic extremist
Compulsive, with malice incentives, the foulest of bitches
Hunger my riches, her childish wishes
Be suspicious of those sleeping with fishes, them hoes
Conspicuous and it shows, tricking this dough
Kicking this flow, slip and you fold
So when your clique roll, I let my clips go
Niggas on opposite poles
I got that confident soul, for those locked in a hole
Inhumane, living hostile opposed
To living on the street, proper from my top to my toes
Aeropostale my clothes, Vernon niggas in Suburbans with liquor
Preposterous foes, finicky foul niggas
See niggas and blacks, there goes a loud difference
Coke sniffing, tapping 13-year-old chickens
You can't be a kingpin when you snitching
Regardless, we still make you a target
We shoot you in jail, chrome objects
Hit you in your own projects, it's street-onomics
This rhyme is edited, credited through ebonics
Miserable cats, hunger paining
Get off your ass, stop complaining
My crew be in Montego Bay Macarena-ing
Marinating, while you home, waiting your arraignment
This thug life you claimed it, I make millions from entertainment
Now back in the hood, certain cats, they wanna kill me
They ice grill me, but on the low, niggas feel me
You gotta love it

[Hook]
Fuck it, you gotta love it (It's what they want, huh?)
Fuck it, you gotta love it (It's what they want)
Fuck it, you gotta love it (It's what they want, huh?)
(It's what they want...it's what they want)



NAS
"Get-get.. get down!"

New York streets where killers'll walk like Pistol Pete
And Pappy Mason, gave the young boys admiration
Prince from Queens and Fritz from Harlem
Street legends, the drugs kept the hood from starvin'
Pushin' cars, Nicky Barnes was the 70's
But there's a long list of high-profile celebrities
Worldwide on the thorough side of things
Livest kings, some died, one guy, one time
One day grabs me, as I'm about to blast heat
40-side of Vernon, I turned well he asked me
"What you up to, the cops goin' bust you"
I was a teen drunk off brew, stumbled I wondered
If God sent him, cause two squad cars entered the block
And looked at us, I ain't flinch when they watched
I took it upstairs, the bathroom mirror, brushed my hair
Starin' at a young disciple, I almost gave my life to what the dice do
Yeah man, throwin' them bones
Hopin my ace get his case thrown
His girl ain't wait for him, she in the world straight hoein'
While he lookin' at centerfolds of pretty girls
Showin' they little cooch, gangstas don't die he's livin' proof
The D.A. who tried him was lyin'
A white dude, killed his mother durin' the case
Hung jury, now the D.A. is bein' replaced
Pre-trial hearin' is over, it's real for the soldier
Walks in the courtroom, the look in his eyes is wild
Triple-homicide, I sit in the back aisle
I want to crack a smile when I see him
Throw up a fist for black power, cause all we want is his freedom
He grabbed a court officer's gun and started squeezin'
Then he grabbed the judge, screams out, nobody leavin' everybody

[Chorus]
"Get down, get down! Get down, get down!" [Repeats]
Everybody
"Get down, get down! Get down, get down!"

[Nas]
Some niggas fuck they enemies in they ass when they catch 'em
Weird-ass niggas are dangerous, so don't test 'em
They make you, disappear, this a year that I won't forget
Sold CD's double platinum, met mo' execs
Southern niggas, independent label, real killers
Know the business, ran Tennessee for years, now they chillin'
They had the coke game somethin' crazy
Sold music out the trunk of they car, that shit amazed me
Put me onto heron blunts, sherm or somethin'
Took a puff, what the fuck, I turned to punch them
Southern niggas ain't slow, nigga tried to play me
I left from around them dudes, they cool but they crazy
Now I'm back around the old school that raised me
New York gangstas, we loungin', out in L.A. see
A dude wrote my dawg from Pelican Bay
The letter say, "Nas I got your back - the fools don't play"
I rolled with some Crips down to a Crenshaw funeral
Never saw so many men slaughtered and I knew the ho responsible
The nigga still alive in a hospital
Midnight they crept in his room and shot the doctor too
See my cousin's in the game, thuggin' and things
He plugged me with a dame who was half-Mexicano
Gave the ass up, I'ma mack daddy Soprano
She passed me the indigo, but the imbecile
Should of never tippy-toed, thought my eyes were closed
Openin' the hotel room do', to let her goons in
But I moved in a manner, on some Jet Li shit
I let the hammers blow, wet three kids
See honey thought I had somethin' to do, with all the drama
Cause I was with a crew, that had her people killed
Called up my cousin, told him I ain't fuckin' with you
He responded cool, but told me out here this how motherfuckers

[Chorus]
All I really gotta say is that
If that's how our people goin' get down, how we ever goin' get up?
How we ever goin' get up if that's how we get down?
A shame when you ain't look at it
My folk is yo' folk, but we all kinfolk
Somebody gotta make a change







What, what...yeah

[Verse 1: Nas]
I ain't seen as much death, nor seen as much crime
Since the blackout in Queensbridge in '79
Everybody's a killer now; pimps, playas, and dons
Shorties on the block push drops and carry on
Niggas look through our window wherever we drove
Through the tint, to see if the Benz is matching the clothes
We the Queens kings, I used to view the cats that are old
Seeing things that made me real from my skin to my soul
Girls who turned hoes, friends who turned foes
Bad luck niggas who bring death wherever they go
Never sleep, it feels better to know
It's all real though

[Interlude]
Everything is real
Where we Headed now?
Up to more money, would be more fun
Leave with mo' bitches, carry more guns
Where we headed now? Where we going, yo?
It's getting real, son; we gon' let it flow
Where we Mo' bitches, it be more dough
It be more fun, holding more...

[Verse 2: Nas]
How the hell are we supposed to excel from the street
Where the Jake's crew face young kids who wanna eat?
Quantum Leap to this Black world, hustlers and ghettos
Self-made millionaires who tussle with the devil
Bust a lil metal lead, wrestle you, to the pebbles
On the hard ground, that's if your guard down
It's a struggle, brothers jump bail
To come chill with they niggas on the block, with them rocks for sale
On the horn with the god Shapelle, my Queens comrade
Yo, run and come in with the dime bag

[Verse 3: Shapelle]
Ayo, I need dat, I got to smoke dat
Send me some Chunky Black, so I could smoke away the pain
Try to find my brain, but the thought still remain
Yo, it's on again once the death stunts these chains
'Cause I been through it; the drug game, I thought I knew it
I got knocked, took it to trial, but I blew it
25, but only lived 20 years of my life
Took 5 from me; got me wrapped up like a mummy
Now I'm in the system a.k.a. the devil's home
Where they tell you where to eat, sleep, shit, and use the phone
Now I'm living with, drug dealers, and chain stealers
Bitch niggas who got knocked and turned squealers
Imagine, sharing a cell with a rehabilitated addict
Who love fucking with faggots, but I civilized the savage
I sat him down and made him study mathematics
Now I'm sitting in the cell thinking...
About this reefer I'ma get this weekend
On the V.I., I rather be... uh, damn, damn







Anyone know the beat in the background when nas is talking?


Https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fd94Mt9eSog&list=WL&index=115



[Intro]
Yeah
I want all my niggas to come journey with me
My name is Nas, and the year is 1973
Beginning of me, therefore I could see
Through my belly button window who I am...

[Verse 1]
I existed in a womb, just like an abyss
Came straight from spirit land, my hands balled in a fist
Punching my mom's stomach, kicking on her cervix
Twitching 'cause I'm nervous, though my intended purpose
Was to be born to reign, not in scorn or vain
But to take on a name, that my pops chose for me
Bloodstream full of indo, developing eyes
Looking out my belly button window, my father sighs
On his face he wears a frown, and I'm wondering
If they even want me around, as I go back to spirit town
So I could rest longer before I come back down the chute again
In the near future when
Mom and pops could agree on this, was here before
But my mom saw her gynecologist, he dumped me off
First they want me, then turn around and say they don't
You got 120 days, do what y'all want
But as for me, coming back, this be the last time
Abort me, keep me or give me away, make up your minds

[Hook 4X: Nas]
I shot my way out my mom dukes

[Verse 2]
They must wanna keep me, 'cause 4 months passed, I'm still alive
Guess I got what they call Ill Will to survive
When I look hard, the lights is killing my eyes
I know when mom's laying down, I get bored, start to get live
Move side to side, hear loud music and vibe
All black babies are born with rhythm, that's no lie
Solar energize, mineralize food, flowing through my mother's tube
I'm covered in this thick layer of goo
Month two was the least most comfortable
My umbilical cord choking me
But month 3 was closer, see
That's when pops took moms to see the doc at the clinic
But I was saved, he changed his mind in the last minute
Watching 'em yell, heard my mom's voice well
Feared fist fights, so terrified when we fell
While they broke up furniture and smashed plates on the wall
I wondered if I am born, will I be safe at all
This place they call the world though my view was so large
Couldn't wait to get out, and grow up and take charge
Month 5, Month 6 went by, hoping I'm born in July
But the Lord already figured out a date and time
Septemeber 14th, '73
Get ready world, doctors in the front waiting for me
Arms open 'cause they know when I drop, a lot of shit's gonna stop
See how the goverment will start re-training cops
Month 9, I'm a week overdue, the labor induced
Pops told my moms "Push, and take deep breaths, too"
"Stay calm," holding her arm, I'm trying to hold on
Surgical gloves touching my scalp, my head pops out
Everything is blurry, my first breath screamed out
Tears pouring down my pop's face, he's so proud
Wanted to hold me, but I was so bloody
They washed me off and he said "At least that nigga ain't ugly!"
Placed me in his arms snuggly, laid me on my mother
Finally, I got to see who held me in her body, she loved me
And, yo, I plan to over throw the devil
And y'all bout to see this world in trouble
Motherfuckers...











[Intro: AZ + (Nas)]
Ayo, what's up, what's up?
Let's keep it real, son, count this money
You know what I'm sayin'? (Yeah yeah)
Ayo, put the Grants over there in the safe
You know what I'm sayin'?
‘Cause we spendin' these Jacksons
The Washingtons go to wifey, you know how that go
(I'm sayin' that's what this is all about right
Clothes, bankrolls, and hoes
You know what I'm sayin'?
Yo, then what man, what?!)

[Verse 1: AZ]
Visualizin' the realism of life in actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
‘Cause, yeah, we were beginners in the hood as Five Percenters
But somethin' must've got in us ‘cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some restin' in peace and some are sittin' in San Quentin
Others, such as myself, are tryin' to carry on tradition
Keepin' this Schweppervescent street ghetto essence inside us, ‘cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though we know, somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leaving thievin'
We'll be leavin' with some kind of dough
So, until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers will be somewhere stackin' plenty papers
Keepin' it real, packin' steel, gettin' high
‘Cause life's a bitch and then you die

[Hook: AZ] (x2)
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go

[Verse 2: Nas]
I woke up early on my born day; I'm 20, it's a blessin'
The essence of adolescence leaves my body, now I'm fresh
And, my physical frame is celebrated ‘cause I made it
One quarter through life, some godly-like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual, plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I pus from
My skull, ‘cause it's pain in my brain vein, money maintain
Don't go against the grain, simple and plain
When I was young at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbin' foreigners, take they wallets, they jewels and rip they green cards
Dipped to the projects, flashin' my quick cash
And got my first piece of ass, smokin' blunts with hash
Now it's all about cash in abundance
Niggas I used to run with is rich or doin' years in the hundreds
I switched my motto; instead of sayin', "Fuck tomorrow!"
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Time is Illmatic, keep static like wool fabric
Pack a 4-matic to crack your whole cabbage

[Hook: AZ]
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we get high
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die
That's why we puff lye
‘Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die



[Intro: Nas]
Squeeze!
Squeezin' on ya; real niggas creepin' on ya

[Verse 1: Nas]
I got cream, some ganja trees, and fronto leaves
Honda bikes, diamond dykes, rubbin' me, lovin' me
Don't let my seed hear this, cover her ears
Real shit; no surrender, no fear, we pioneers
Of all this ice shit, biscuits, and tight whips, rims
Bangin' blends in the S-Class, half a thousand
Slap pounds with cats who shot down shit
Real niggas who stay around chips, and down Cris
Sips of Henny; chicks who bless you, finessin' it, professional
Slob with ice cubes, just like Vanessa do
Reppin Q, smoke amazing Thai
Shit that givin' you triple Asian eye
Yeah, bitch, a nigga stayin' fly
From tube socks and Timbs, to blue rocks, a Benz
Who got the ends?
The type'll make 2Pac [?]
To all niggas who shine; yes, who got revenge
I won't showboat, my flow choke you
And if it don't, the fo' fo'll smoke you
Left your seed reminiscin' on ya
MC's I'm pissin' on ya
Shine cause my chips are longer
It's gremlins I'm sic'n on ya
Shots your dodgin'
While Esco could rock the whole fuckin' Garden
Real niggas always gon' play this shit..







NAS
"Get-get.. get down!"

New York streets where killers'll walk like Pistol Pete
And Pappy Mason, gave the young boys admiration
Prince from Queens and Fritz from Harlem
Street legends, the drugs kept the hood from starvin'
Pushin' cars, Nicky Barnes was the 70's
But there's a long list of high-profile celebrities
Worldwide on the thorough side of things
Livest kings, some died, one guy, one time
One day grabs me, as I'm about to blast heat
40-side of Vernon, I turned well he asked me
"What you up to, the cops goin' bust you"
I was a teen drunk off brew, stumbled I wondered
If God sent him, cause two squad cars entered the block
And looked at us, I ain't flinch when they watched
I took it upstairs, the bathroom mirror, brushed my hair
Starin' at a young disciple, I almost gave my life to what the dice do
Yeah man, throwin' them bones
Hopin my ace get his case thrown
His girl ain't wait for him, she in the world straight hoein'
While he lookin' at centerfolds of pretty girls
Showin' they little cooch, gangstas don't die he's livin' proof
The D.A. who tried him was lyin'
A white dude, killed his mother durin' the case
Hung jury, now the D.A. is bein' replaced
Pre-trial hearin' is over, it's real for the soldier
Walks in the courtroom, the look in his eyes is wild
Triple-homicide, I sit in the back aisle
I want to crack a smile when I see him
Throw up a fist for black power, cause all we want is his freedom
He grabbed a court officer's gun and started squeezin'
Then he grabbed the judge, screams out, nobody leavin' everybody

[Chorus]
"Get down, get down! Get down, get down!" [Repeats]
Everybody
"Get down, get down! Get down, get down!"

[Nas]
Some niggas fuck they enemies in they ass when they catch 'em
Weird-ass niggas are dangerous, so don't test 'em
They make you, disappear, this a year that I won't forget
Sold CD's double platinum, met mo' execs
Southern niggas, independent label, real killers
Know the business, ran Tennessee for years, now they chillin'
They had the coke game somethin' crazy
Sold music out the trunk of they car, that shit amazed me
Put me onto heron blunts, sherm or somethin'
Took a puff, what the fuck, I turned to punch them
Southern niggas ain't slow, nigga tried to play me
I left from around them dudes, they cool but they crazy
Now I'm back around the old school that raised me
New York gangstas, we loungin', out in L.A. see
A dude wrote my dawg from Pelican Bay
The letter say, "Nas I got your back - the fools don't play"
I rolled with some Crips down to a Crenshaw funeral
Never saw so many men slaughtered and I knew the ho responsible
The nigga still alive in a hospital
Midnight they crept in his room and shot the doctor too
See my cousin's in the game, thuggin' and things
He plugged me with a dame who was half-Mexicano
Gave the ass up, I'ma mack daddy Soprano
She passed me the indigo, but the imbecile
Should of never tippy-toed, thought my eyes were closed
Openin' the hotel room do', to let her goons in
But I moved in a manner, on some Jet Li shit
I let the hammers blow, wet three kids
See honey thought I had somethin' to do, with all the drama
Cause I was with a crew, that had her people killed
Called up my cousin, told him I ain't fuckin' with you
He responded cool, but told me out here this how motherfuckers

[Chorus]
All I really gotta say is that
If that's how our people goin' get down, how we ever goin' get up?
How we ever goin' get up if that's how we get down?
A shame when you ain't look at it
My folk is yo' folk, but we all kinfolk
Somebody gotta make a change





